The supreme medicine tree of knowledge of Buddha cannot perform its beneficial growth-fostering function in two places only: in those in the two vehicles of individual salvation who have fallen into the abyss of nondoing, and in unsuitable sentient beings with rotten roots of goodness who are sunk in the floodwaters of erroneous views and craving—yet Buddha never has rejected these people. The knowledge of Buddha has no increase or decrease, because its roots are stable and grow ceaselessly. 
This is the seventh characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“When the eonic holocaust starts in the universe, it burns up all the plants and trees, and even the mountains, consuming all without leaving anything. 
Suppose someone picked up some dry straw and threw it in that fire—do you think it could do aught but burn?” “No.” “It is more possible for that straw not to burn than for Buddha’s knowledge, analyzing all sentient beings, all lands, all ages, and all phenomena of all times, not to know something. 
Because that knowledge impartially comprehends all clearly. 
This is the eighth characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“When a gale destroys the worlds, a great wind called destruction arises, able to pulverize the billion worlds of the universe, their iron mountains and so on, to smithereens. 
There is another wind, called blocker, circling the billion-world universe, blocking the gale of destruction so that it cannot reach the worlds in other places. 
Without this blocking wind, all the worlds in the ten directions would be completely destroyed. 
Buddha similarly has a great wind of knowledge, called extinguisher, which can extinguish the afflictions and habit energies of all great enlightening beings; and a great wind of knowledge called skillful sustaining, which skillfully sustains the enlightening beings whose faculties are not yet mature, not letting the extinguishing whirlwind totally eliminate all their afflictions and habit energies. 
Without Buddha’s skillfully sustaining wind of knowledge, countless enlightening beings would fall into the states of those content with individual salvation. 
By this knowl edge enlightening beings are enabled to transcend the stages of the two lesser vehicles of individual salvation and abide in the ultimate rank of Buddha. 
This is the ninth characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“There is nowhere the knowledge of Buddha does not reach. 
There is not a single sentient being who is not fully endowed with the knowledge of Buddha; it is just that because of deluded notions, erroneous thinking, and attachments, they are unable to realize it. 
If they would get rid of deluded notions, then universal knowledge, spontaneous knowledge, and unobstructed knowledge would become manifest. 
It is as if there were a great scripture, equal in extent to a billion-world universe, in which are written all the things of the universe—there are written the things of the iron peripheral mountains, to an extent equal to those mountains; there are written the things on the land, to an extent equal to the land; there are written the things in the million-world galaxies, to an extent equal to the galaxies; there are written the things in the thousand-world systems, to an extent equal to the systems; there are written the things in the continents, to an extent equal to the continents, and so on; the things of the oceans, the polar mountains, the abodes of earth and sky, the celestial abodes in the sky of the desire realm, the abodes in the form realm, the abodes in the formless realm, are each written down to an equivalent extent. 
Though this scripture is equal in measure to a billion-world universe, yet it entirely rests in a single atom; and as this is so of one atom, it is also true of all atoms. 
Then suppose someone with clear and comprehensive knowledge, who has fully developed the celestial eye, sees these scriptures inside atoms, not benefiting sentient beings in the least, and, with this thought—‘I should, by energetic power, break open those atoms and release those scriptures so that they can benefit all sentient beings’—then employs appropriate means to break open the atoms and release the great scriptures, to enable all sentient beings to benefit greatly. 
Then the Buddha, with the unimpeded, pure, clear eye of knowledge, observes all sentient beings in the cosmos and says, ‘How strange—how is it that these sentient beings have the knowledge of Buddha but in their folly and confusion do not know it or perceive it? 
I should teach them the way of sages and cause them forever to shed deluded notions and attachments, so they can see in their own bodies the vast knowledge of buddhas, no different from the buddhas.’ Then Buddha teaches them to practice the way of sages, so they get rid of deluded notions, after which they realize the infinite knowledge of Buddha and aid and comfort all living beings. 
This is the tenth characteristic of the mind of Buddha; great enlightening beings should know it thus. 
“Great enlightening beings should know the mind of Buddha who has realized Thusness and is completely awake, in terms of such infinite, unimpeded, inconceivably great characteristics.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, in order to explain again what he meant, spoke in verse. 
Buddhas’ knowledge has no resting place, Just as space rests on nothing. 
Sentient beings’ various inclinations, And knowledge of expedients, All rest on buddhas knowledge, While buddha’s knowledge rests on nothing. 
The liberations of buddhas, Disciples, and the self-enlightened, All depend on the reality realm, While reality has no increase or decrease. 
Buddha’s knowledge, similarly, Produces all knowledges, Without increase or decrease, Without beginning or end. 
Just as water flows under the ground So those who seek it find it, Without thought, without end, Its effective power all-pervasive, Buddha knowledge is also like this, Being in all creatures’ minds; If any work on it with diligence, They will soon find the light of knowledge. 
Just as the water spirit has four jewels Which produce all gems, Hidden in a secret place Where ordinary people cannot see, So too do Buddha’s four knowledges Produce all knowledge, While no one can see them Except great enlightening beings. 
As in the ocean are four jewels Which can drink up all waters So that the ocean does not overflow And does not increase or decrease, Likewise does Buddha’s knowledge Stop waves and remove attachment to teachings; Boundlessly great and vast, It produces enlightening beings and buddhas. 
From the nadir to the summit of being, The desire, form, and formless realms, All rest in space, While space does not discriminate: 
The knowledge of enlightening beings, Of disciples and the self-enlightened, All rest in the knowledge of Buddha, While buddha-knowledge has no discrimination. 
On the Snowy mountains is a medicine Called inexhaustible roots Which can make all trees grow— Their roots, trunks, leaves, flowers, and fruits. 
Buddha’s knowledge too is like this, Grown from the seed of enlightenment; Once enlightenment is attained, It also produces the practices of enlightening beings. 
If someone puts a handful of straw In the eonic fire, Where even diamond blazes, The straw could not but be burned: 
The ages and lands of all times And the sentient beings therein Buddha completely knows More surely than the burning of that straw. 
There is a wind called destruction Which can pulverize a universe; If not stopped by another wind, Destruction would reach infinite worlds. 
The great wind of knowledge is also like this, Extinguishing the delusions of enlightening beings; There is another wind of skillfulness, Enabling them to live, in the land of buddhahood. 
It is as there is a great scripture Equal in extent to a universe Existing inside one atom, And in all atoms as well; Someone with intelligence and wisdom Sees all clearly with pure eyes And breaks the atoms, releasing the scriptures For the benefit of all beings. 
Buddha-knowledge, likewise, Is in all beings’ minds; Wrapped up in deluded thoughts, They are unaware, unknowing; The buddhas’ great compassion Causes them to get rid of deluded ideas So knowledge can appear And benefit enlightening beings. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the sphere of Buddha, who has realized Thusness and is completely awake? 
Knowing the spheres of all worlds by means of unobstructed, unimpeded knowledge is the sphere of Buddha. 
Knowing the spheres of all times, all lands, all things, and all beings, the undifferentiated sphere of True Thusness, the unobstructed sphere of the reality realm, the boundless sphere of absolute truth, the unquantified sphere of space, and the objectless sphere, is the sphere of Buddha. 
Just as the spheres of all times, and so on, up to the objectless sphere, are all infinite, so is the sphere of Buddha infinite. 
Just as the objectless sphere has no existence in all places, so also does the sphere of Buddha have no existence in all places. 
“Great enlightening beings should know the sphere of mind is the sphere of Buddha; just as the sphere of mind is measureless and boundless, without bondage or liberation, so too is the sphere of Buddha measureless and boundless, without bondage or liberation. 
Because by such and such thoughts there are infinite such and such manifestations. 
It is like when the great water spirit showers rain according to will, the rain does not come from inside or outside; the sphere of Buddha is also like this—according to such and such thoughts, there are infinite such and such manifestations, yet they do not come from anywhere in the ten directions. 
Just as the water of the ocean all comes from the mental power of the king water spirit, so too does the water of the ocean of omniscience of all buddhas all come from the buddhas’ past vows. 
“The ocean of omniscience is infinite, boundless, inconceivable, and inexpressible, but I will tell something of it by way of simile, so please listen carefully. 
The southern continent has 2,500 rivers, which flow into the ocean; the western continent has 5,000 rivers, which flow into the ocean; the eastern continent has 7,500 rivers, which flow into the ocean; the northern continent has 10,000 rivers, which flow into the ocean. 
These four continents thus have 25,000 rivers, which continuously flow into the ocean. 
What do you think—is that a lot of water?” “Yes indeed.” “There is also a water spirit Ten Light Beams, which rains even more water than that into the ocean; the water spirit Hundred Light Beams rains even more water than that into the ocean; the water spirits Magnificent Arrays, Thoughtful, Thundering, Joy, Infinite Light, Continuous Shower, Great Victory, Great Surge, and eight billion more such water spirits each rain more and more into the ocean; the son of the water spirit Ocean, named Rose Apple Banner, rains even more than that. 
The water in the abode of the water spirit Ten Light Beams flows into the ocean, even more than the aforementioned; the water in the palace of the water spirit Hundred Light Beams flows into the ocean, even more; the water of the palaces of each of the water spirits, each with more and more water, flows into the ocean, and the water in the palace of the water spirit Rose Apple Banner, son of the water spirit Ocean, which is yet more, also flows into the ocean. 
The water in the palace of the water spirit Ocean, which is even more, surges forth into the ocean; the water it produces is violet, and it surges forth at regular times, so the tide of the ocean is regular. 
Thus the ocean’s water is infinite, its treasures are infinite, its creatures are infinite, and the earth it rests on is infinite too. 
Do you think that the ocean is infinite or not?” “It is truly infinite, incomparably so.” “The infinity of this ocean does not come up to the smallest fraction of the infinity of the ocean of buddha-knowledge. 
Similes are made for beings according to their mentalities, but the sphere of Buddha is beyond similitude. 
Great enlightening beings should know that the ocean of knowledge of Buddha is infinite, because of ceaseless cultivation of all enlightening practices from the very first determination for enlightenment. 
They should know that the collection of treasures therein is infinite, because all elements of enlightenment, the seeds of the three treasures, continue unending. They should know the sentient beings in which it dwells are infinite, because it is used by all listeners and self-illuminates, those still learning and those beyond learning. They should know the ground it rests on is infinite, because it is the abode of all enlightening beings, from the first stage of Joy to the ultimate stage of Nonobstruction. 
Great enlightening beings, in order to enter infinite knowledge and benefit all sentient beings, should know the sphere of Buddha in this way.” Then Universally Good uttered these verses to again explain his meaning: 
As the sphere of mind is infinite, So is the sphere of buddhas. 
As the sphere of mind is born from intellect, So should the sphere of Buddha be seen. 
The water spirits, without leaving their places, Shower rain by the power of mind; Though the rain does not come from or go anywhere, Yet it falls everywhere according to the minds of the spirits: 
The Ten-Powered Sage, in like manner, Does not come from anywhere or go anywhere, To those with pure minds appearing physically, Vast as the cosmos, yet fitting in a pore. 
The treasures of the ocean are infinite, So are its creatures and ground; The nature of the water is one flavor, equal, without distinction, While those born therein each receive benefit. 
The ocean of buddha-knowledge is also thus; All it contains is infinite; Those in the stages of learning and no learning All gain benefit therein. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the conduct of Buddha? 
Great enlightening beings should know unobstructed action is the conduct of Buddha; they should know the conduct of true thusness is the conduct of Buddha. Just as True Thusness is not born in the past, does not move into the future, and does not arise in the present, likewise the conduct of Buddha is not born, does not move, and does not arise. 
Just as the realm of reality is not quantified or unquantified, because it has no form, likewise the conduct of Buddha is not quantified or unquantified, because it has no form. 
It is as if a bird flew through the sky for a hundred years, the places it passed and those it had not passed would both be immeasurable, because the realm of space has no boundaries: 
in the same way, if someone spent trillions of eons expounding the particulars of the conduct of Buddha, what was explained and what was not yet explained would both be immeasurable, because the action of Buddha has no bounds. 
“Buddha, completely enlightened, engaged in unobstructed action, has no dwelling place, yet can show what he does to all beings and enables them to go beyond all obstructed paths once they have seen this. 
It is as when the golden-winged king of birds flies in the sky, it circles and hovers, observing the dragon palaces in the ocean with its clear eyes; exerting its forceful strength, it churns the ocean waters with its wings, causing the waters to part, and snatches dragons, male or female, whose life it knows is about to end. 
The ‘golden-winged bird king’ Buddha, in like manner, engaged in unimpeded action, observes all sentient beings in all abodes in the cosmos with the clear Buddha-eye; if any have planted roots of goodness that have developed to maturity, the Buddha exerts the forceful ten powers and with the two wings of tranquillity and insight churns the waters of emotion of the ocean of birth and death, causing the water to part, then snatches those beings, places them in the Buddha teaching, and causes them to stop all deluded notions and false descriptions and abide in the nondiscriminatory unobstructed action of the enlightened. 
“Just as the sun and moon travel alone through the sky conferring benefit on sentient beings, with no notion of where they come from or where they are going, likewise the buddhas, by nature fundamentally silent and extinct, without discrimination, appear to course all universes, performing buddha-work to benefit sentient beings without cease, yet not producing false notions of coming from somewhere or going somewhere. 
Great enlightening beings should see and know the actions conducted by Buddha in terms of infinite such means, infinite natures and characteristics.” Then Universally Good, to recapitulate, uttered these verses: 
Just as True Thusness is not born, does not perish, Has no location, and cannot be seen, Likewise the action of the Great Benefactor Transcends in the triple world and cannot be measured. 
The reality realm is not the reality realm, yet not not the reality realm; It is not quantified and not unquantified. 
The action of the Great Worthy is also thus, Neither quantified nor unquantified, because there is no body. 
If a bird flies for billions of years, The sky behind and ahead are equal, no different; When Buddha’s conduct is expounded for eons, The told and the untold cannot be measured. 
The golden bird in the sky watches the sea, Parts the waters and snatches dragons; The Ten-Powered can pull out virtuous people, Remove them from the sea of existence, and rid them of delusion. 
Like sun and moon traversing the sky Shining on all without distinction, The World-Honored traverses the cosmos Teaching beings without stirring a thought. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the attainment of enlightenment of Buddha? 
They should know that Buddha’s attainment of enlightenment has no view of any phenomena, is impartial toward things, has no doubts, no duality, no signs, no activity, no cessation, no measure, no boundaries; avoiding extremes, abiding in the middle way, it is beyond all verbal explanation. 
Buddha knows the thoughts and mental patterns of all sentient beings, their faculties, dispositions, inclinations, afflictions, obsessions, and habits; in sum, Buddha instantly knows all things in all times. 
“It is as the ocean can reflect the physical forms of all sentient beings on earth, and therefore is called the ocean: 
the enlightenment of the buddhas is also like this, reflecting the thoughts, faculties, dispositions, and inclinations of all sentient beings, yet without reflecting anything—therefore it is called the enlightenment of the buddhas. 
“The enlightenment of buddhas cannot be expressed in writing, cannot be reached by any verbal expression, cannot be explained in any language; but it is expediently elucidated according to need. 
“When buddhas attain true awakening, they acquire a body equal in extent to all sentient beings, a body equal in extent to all phenomena, a body equal in extent to all lands, a body equal in extent to all times, a body equal in extent to all buddhas, a body equal in extent to all languages, a body equal in extent to True Thusness, a body equal in extent to the cosmos, a body equal in extent to space, a body equal in extent to the realm where there is no obstruction, a body equal in extent to all vows, a body equal in extent to all practices, and a body equal in extent to the ultimately calm realm of nirvana. 
As are the bodies they acquire, so is their speech and mind; they attain measureless, countless such pure spheres of body, speech, and mind. 
“Upon attaining true awakening, buddhas see within their body all sentient beings attaining true awakening, and see all sentient beings enter nirvana, all of the same nature, which is no nature. 
No nature of what kind? 
That is, no nature of appearances, no nature of exhaustion, no nature of birth, no nature of destruction, no nature of self, no nature of nonself, no nature of living being, no nature of nonliving being, no nature of enlightenment, no nature of the cosmos, no nature of space, and also no nature of attaining true awakening. 
By knowing all things are natureless, a buddha attains omniscience, and by great compassion continues to save sentient beings. 
“Just as space never increases or decreases whether all worlds become or disintegrate, because space has no birth, similarly the enlightenment of buddhas has no increase or decrease whether there is attainment of enlightenment or not, because enlightenment has no signs or countersigns, no unity and no variety. 
“Suppose someone were able magically to produce as many minds as grains of sand in the Ganges River, and each mind also produced as many buddhas as grains of sand in the Ganges River, all featureless, formless, and signless, and continued to do so incessantly throughout as many eons as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River—how many buddhas do you think would be magically produced by that person’s magically produced minds?” The enlightening being Wondrous Qualities of Natural Origination of Buddha said, “As I understand your meaning, magical production and nonproduction are equal and have no distinction—how can you ask how many there would be?” The enlightening being Universally Good said, “Very good—it is as you say. 
Even if all sentient beings were to instantly attain enlightenment, that would be equal to not attaining enlightenment, no different. 
Because enlightenment is signless. 
If it has no signs, it has no increase or decrease. 
“Great enlightening beings should thus know that attainment of true awakening, the same as enlightenment, is uniformly formless. 
A buddha, attaining true awakening, by the means of unity, enters the concentration of thoroughly aware knowledge and, having entered it, manifests, in one vast body attaining true awakening, as many bodies as there are sentient beings dwelling in that body. 
As this is so of one vast body attaining true awakening, so it is of all vast bodies attaining true awakening. 
“Great enlightening beings should know that in one pore of Buddha’s body are buddha-bodies as numerous as all sentient beings. 
And as this is so of one pore, so is it of every point in the entire cosmos. Know that there is not a bit of space where there is no buddha-body. 
Because Buddha’s attainment of true awakening reaches everywhere. 
According to capability and power, on the lion seat under the enlightenment tree at the site of enlightenment, with various bodies, Buddha attains true awakening. 
“Great enlightening beings should know that in each moment of thought of their own minds there are always buddhas attaining true awakening. 
Because the buddhas do not attain true awakening apart from this mind. 
As this is true of one’s own mind, so is it also true of the minds of all sentient beings—in all are buddhas attaining true awakening, all-pervasive, existing everywhere, without separation or annihilation, without cease, entering the inconceivable doors or means of enlightenment. 
Great enlightening beings should know Buddha’s attainment of enlightenment this way.” Then, to recapitulate, the enlightening being Universally Good spoke these verses: 
The truly awake know all things Are nondual, beyond duality, all equal, Inherently pure as space, Not distinguishing self and nonself. 
As the ocean reflects beings’ bodies And is therefore called the ocean, Enlightenment reflects all mental patterns And hence is called true awareness. 
Just as worlds have formation and decay While space does not increase or diminish, While all buddhas appear in the world, The one form of enlightenment is ever formless. 
When someone emanates minds emanating buddhas, Emanation and nonemanation are no different in essence; Though all sentient beings attain enlightenment, There is no increase or decrease, enlightenment or no. 
Buddha has a concentration called well aware; Entering this concentration under the enlightenment tree, Buddha emits light beams as many as beings, Awakening all kinds, like lotuses blooming. 
As many thoughts, faculties, and desires As are in beings in lands of all times, That many bodies appear— Hence true awareness is called infinite. 
“How should great enlightening beings know Buddha’s turning of the wheel of teaching? They should know it thus: 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching by three kinds of turning, the cycles of the path of insight, the path of practice, and the path beyond learning, and stops what should be stopped, because of knowing that all things are apart from extremes of annihilation and eternity. 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching apart from the realm of desire and the realm of negation, because of penetrating the spacelike limit of all things. Buddha turns the wheel of teaching without verbal explanation, because of knowing that all things are inexpressible. Buddha turns the wheel of teaching ultimately quiescently, because of knowing that all things are of the essence of nirvana. 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching with all means of literature and language, because the voice of Buddha reaches everywhere. 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching knowing that the voice is like an echo, because of comprehending the true nature of all things. 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching producing all messages in one message, because there is ultimately no center. 
Buddha turns the wheel of teaching without omission or exhaustion, because of absence of clinging inside or outside. 
“Just as all writing and speech cannot be exhaustively told of, the same is true of Buddha’s turning the wheel of teaching—all letters are arranged to express it, without cease, without ever exhausting it. 
The wheel of teaching of Buddha enters into all speech and writing, yet has no dwelling place. 
Just as writing enters into all business, all words, all calculations, all mundane and transmundane subjects, yet dwells nowhere, so also does the voice of Buddha enter into all points, all beings, all phenomena and principles, all works, and all consequences, yet does not dwell anywhere. 
All the various languages of all sentient beings are not apart from the wheel of teaching of Buddha, because the real aspect of speech and sound is identical to the wheel of teaching. 
Great enlightening beings should know the turning of the wheel of teaching of Buddha thus. “Also, if great enlightening beings want to know the wheel of teaching that Buddha turns, they should know where Buddha’s wheel of teaching comes from. 
What is the provenance of the Buddha’s wheel of teaching? 
Buddha makes so many utterances, turning the wheel of teaching according to the innumerable differences in mental patterns and inclinations of all sentient beings. 
Buddhas, truly awake, have a concentration called ultimately unimpeded and fearless; having entered this concentration, with each mouth of each body of attainment of true enlightenment they produce as many utterances as there are sentient beings, each utterance containing all sounds, each different, turning the wheel of teaching, to make all sentient beings happy. 
Those who know the turning of the wheel of teaching thus are considered to be following all Buddha teachings. Those who do not know this are not following them. 
Great enlightening beings should know Buddha’s turning the wheel of teaching thus, because it universally enters the infinite realms of living beings.” Then, to recapitulate, Universally Good said in verse, Buddhas’ wheel of teaching has no turning; It has no arising and no attainment at any time. 
Just as writing is never exhausted, So is the teaching-wheel of the Ten-Powered. 
Just as writing enters everywhere, yet with no arrival, Such is the teaching-wheel of the Enlightened, Entering all speech without entering aught, Able to make all beings rejoice. 
Buddhas have a concentration called ultimate; They preach after entering this concentration, Speaking to enlighten all beings, Boundless though they be. 
In each utterance they also utter Countless sayings, each different, Free in the world, without discrimination, Causing all to hear according to inclination. 
Words do not come from inside or outside, Are neither lost nor accumulate; Yet for sentient beings buddhas turn the teaching-wheel— This freedom is most extraordinary. 
“How should great enlightening beings know Buddha’s ultimate nirvana? 
If great enlightening beings want to know the greate nirvana of buddhas, they should know its fundamental essence. 
As is the nirvana of ultimate reality, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of space, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of the nature of things, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of detachment from desire, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of formlessness, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of selfhood, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of the ultimate essence of all things, so is the nirvana of Buddha; as is the nirvana of ultimate True Thusness, so is the nirvana of Buddha. 
Because nirvana has no birth and no emergence; if something has no birth and no emergence, then it has no extinction. 
“Buddha does not tell enlightening beings about the ultimate nirvana of buddhas and does not show it to them. 
Because Buddha wants to cause them to see all buddhas always present before them, to see in one moment all the buddhas of past and future, in their full splendor, just as if they were actually present, yet without entertaining any notions of duality or nonduality. 
Because great enlightening beings permanently abandon all conceptual clinging. 
“Buddhas appear in the world in order to provoke inspiration in seṅtient beings and manifest nirvana in order to provoke longing in sentient beings: 
in reality the buddhas have no appearance in the world and no nirvana either. 
Buddha always abides in the pure realm of reality, manifesting nirvana according to the minds of sentient beings. 
“For example, when the sun comes out and illumines the world, its image is reflected in all clean vessels of water, being in all places without coming or going. 
If one vessel breaks, then the reflection of the sun does not appear in it. 
Do you think it is the fault of the sun that its reflection does not appear there?” “No—it is just because the vessel is broken; it’s no fault of the sun.” “The knowledge of realization of Thusness, buddha-knowledge, is also like this, appearing throughout the cosmos, without before or after: 
Buddha appears in the clean mind-vessels of all sentient beings. 
If the mind-vessel is always clean, the embodiment of Buddha is always seen; if the mind is polluted, the vessel breaks and the Buddha cannot be seen. 
“If there are any sentient beings who can be liberated by nirvana, Buddha then manifests nirvana for them; but really Buddha has no birth, no death, no crossing over into extinction. 
“It is like, for example, the element fire, which can make fires in all worlds. 
Sometimes in one place the fire will go out, but do you think the fire in all worlds is extinguished?” “No.” “Similarly Buddha performs the tasks of buddhahood in all worlds; if what can be done in one world is finished, a buddha manifests entry into nirvana, but the buddhas in all worlds do not all pass away into extinction. 
Great enlightening beings should know the great nirvana of the truly enlightened thus. 
“Again, suppose, for example, a magician well versed in magical arts, by the power of the techniques of illusion, manifests phantom bodies in all cities, towns, and villages in all lands in a billion-world universe, and sustains them there by magical power for an eon, while in other places, the magic performance being finished, the bodies disappear. 
Do you think that when that great magician disappears in one place, he disappears in all places?” “No.” “In a similar way Buddha, the Truly Enlightened, knowing the various magical arts of infinite wisdom and means, manifests in all universes, sustaining that permanently, throughout the future. 
If in one place, according to the minds of beings, what is to be done is finished, Buddha manifests nirvana; but can you say because Buddha has appeared to enter nirvana in one place that Buddha becomes extinct everywhere? 
Great enlightening beings should know the great ultimate nirvana of Buddha in this way. 
“Furthermore, Buddha, when manifesting nirvana, enters immovable concentration, and having entered this concentration, emanates from each body infinite trillions of great light beams, each light beam producing countless lotus blossoms, each lotus blossom having untold petals of exquisite jewels, with a lion throne on each petal and a buddha sitting cross-legged on each throne. 
The number of those buddhas is exactly equal to the number of sentient beings; all are fully adorned with the most sublime virtues, produced by the power of past vows. 
If there are any sentient beings with mature roots of goodness who see the buddha-incarnations, they will all receive the teaching; those buddha-bodies remain forever, teaching and liberating sentient beings according to the situation, without losing an opportunity. 
The bodies of buddhas have no locus, are not real or unreal; only by the power of the past vows of the buddhas, and the capacity of sentient beings to be liberated, do they appear. 
Great enlightening beings should know the great nirvana of Buddha in this way. 
Buddha abides in the infinite, unobstructed, ultimate realm of reality, in the realm of space, in the essence of True Thusness, without birth or death, and in ultimate truth, appearing to sentient beings according to the time, sustained by past vows, without ever ceasing, not abandoning all beings, all lands, all phenomena.” Then, to recapitulate, Universally Good said in verse, While the sun sheds light illumining the world, When a vessel breaks and water leaks out, the reflection disappears; So it is with the sun of supreme knowledge; Those without faith see it as extinct. 
Fire makes fires in the world, While in one city it goes out sometime: 
Likewise the Buddha pervades the cosmos And appears to pass away where the work of teaching is done. 
A magician makes bodies appear in all lands, Which disappear when their function is done: 
So does Buddha disappear when the teaching is done, While always seen in other lands. 
Buddha has a concentration, called unmoving, Which is entered after teaching beings: 
Instantly Buddha’s body emanates infinite lights, The lights produce lotuses, on which are buddhas: 
The buddha-bodies are countless as phenomena, Visible to those with virtue; Each of these countless bodies Has a full span of life and array of adornments. 
Like birthlessness is the emergence of Buddha, Like deathlessness the nirvana of Buddha: 
All words and similes end— All purposes are achieved, beyond compare. 
“How should great enlightening beings know the roots of goodness planted by seeing, hearing, and attending Buddha? 
They should know these roots of goodness are not fruitless, because they produce endless awareness, because they remove all obstacles, because they certainly reach the ultimate end, because they are free from falsehood, because all vows are fulfilled, because they do not end creative action while according with knowledge of the uncreate, because they generate the knowledge of buddhas, because they go on throughout the future, because they accomplish all kinds of excellent practices, and because they reach the stage of effortless knowledge. 
“For example, if a man eats a little bit of diamond, it will never be digested, but must pass through the body. 
Because diamond is incompatible with the impurities of the physical body. 
In the same way, planting a little bit of roots of goodness with Buddha must pass through the body of afflictions of all conditioning and reach the abode of unconditioned ultimate knowledge. 
Because this little bit of root of goodness is incompatible with the afflictions of conditioning. 
“Even if one piled up dry straw as high as a mountain, if one tossed an ember of fire the size of a seed into it, it would all burn up for sure. 
Because fire burns straw. 
Like this, planting a little bit of roots of goodness with Buddha surely can burn up all afflictions and ultimately enable one to attain nirvana without remainder, because the essence of this little bit of root of goodness is ultimate. 
“For example, in the Snowy mountains there is a tree of the finest medicine called good sight: 
if any see it, their eyes are purified; if any hear of it, their ears are purified; if any smell it, their noses are purified; if any taste it, their tongues are purified; if any touch it, their bodies are purified; if any take the earth it grows in, that can also perform the beneficial function of removing disease. 
The supreme medicine of Buddha similarly can perform all benefits for sentient beings. 
If any see the physical body of Buddha, their eyes are purified; if any hear the name of Buddha, their ears are purified; if any smell the fragrance of the morality of Buddha, their noses are purified; if any taste the flavor of the teaching of Buddha, their tongues are purified, they gain the universal tongue and understand the principles of language; if any come in contact with the light of Buddha, their bodies are purified and they ultimately attain the supreme body of reality; if any think of Buddha, they attain purity of Buddha-remembrance concentration. 
If any sentient beings honor the ground Buddha has crossed, or a tomb or shrine, they too will be endowed with roots of goodness, annihilate all afflictions, and attain the felicity of sages. 
I tell you, even if there are sentient beings who see and hear Buddha, but because of being veiled by obstructions due to their deeds do not become believers, if they still plant roots of goodness, none will be in vain—they will reach the ultimate end and enter nirvana. Great enlightening beings should thus know that the roots of goodness planted by seeing, hearing, and attending Buddha are free from all evil and imbued with good. 
“Buddha uses all kinds of similes to explain all kinds of things, but there is no simile that can explain this principle. 
Because the road of intellectual knowledge ends, because it is inconceivable. 
The buddhas and enlightening beings just tell sentient beings similes according to their mentalities in order to gladden them, but this is not the ultimate. 
This gate of the teaching is called the secret point of the buddhas; it is called that which cannot be known by any worldlings; it is called entry into the seal of Buddha; it is called opening the door of great knowledge; it is called revealing the essence of Buddha; it is called perfecting all enlightening beings; it is called that which all worldlings cannot destroy; it is called wholly conforming to the realm of buddhas; it is called able to purify all realms of sentient beings; it is called expounding the ultimate inconceivable teaching of the real nature of Buddha. 
Buddha does not expound this teaching to anyone but enlightening beings intent on the Great Vehicle, only expounding it to enlightening beings riding the inconceivable vehicle of enlightenment. 
This gate of teaching does not come into the hands of anyone but great enlightening beings. 
“It is like, for example, the seven treasures of a universal ruler, by which universal rulership is shown; these treasures do not come into the hands of anyone but the crown prince born of the first wife who has developed the characteristics of a sage ruler. 
If the universal ruler does not have a son with many virtues, after the ruler’s life ends the treasures will disperse and perish in seven days. 
The treasure of this scripture is also like this: it does not come into the hands of anyone but the true offspring of the sovereign Buddha, born in the house of Buddha, who plant the roots of goodness characteristic of buddhas. 
If there are no true offspring of Buddha, this teaching will perish before long. 
Because those in the two lesser vehicles of individual salvation do not hear this scripture, much less absorb and hold it, read, recite, or copy it, or analyze and explain it—only the great enlightening beings can do these things. 
“Therefore, great enlightening beings, hearing this teaching, shall rejoice and receive it with respect. 
Because great enlightening beings appreciating this scripture will quickly attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
Even if enlightening beings spend countless eons practicing the six ways of transcendence and cultivating the various elements of enlightenment, as long as they have not heard this teaching of the inconceivable great power of Buddha, or if they have heard it and do not believe or understand it, do not follow it, enter it, or attain it, they cannot be called true enlightening beings, because they cannot be born in the house of Buddha. 
If they get to hear this teaching of the immeasurable, inconceivable, unobstructed, unhindered knowledge of Buddha, and having heard it, take it to heart, follow it, and awaken to it, these people will be born in the house of Buddha, accord with the sphere of all buddhas, be endowed with all qualities of enlightening beings, detach from all mundane things, develop the conduct of all buddhas, realize the true nature of all enlightening beings, have no doubts about the power of Buddha, abide in the teacherless truth, and plunge deeply into the unimpeded realm of buddhahood. 
“After great enlightening beings have heard this teaching, then they can know infinite things by knowledge of equality; then they can part with arbitrary discriminations by means of a straightforward, honest mind; then they can see the buddhas before them by means of supreme devotion; then they can enter the impartial realm of space by means of the power of attention; then they can travel the boundless cosmos by means of free thought; then they can acquire all virtues by means of the power of knowledge and wisdom; then they can shed all worldly defilements by means of spontaneous knowledge; then they can enter the network of all ten directions by means of the will for enlightenment; then they can know the buddhas of all times are of one and the same essence, by means of great observation; then they can enter this teaching by the knowledge of dedication of roots of goodness, entering without entering, not clinging to a single thing, always observing things through one universal principle. 
Great enlightening beings, perfecting these accomplishments, attain teacherless, spontaneous knowledge with a minimum of effort.” Then Universally Good, to recapitulate, spoke these verses: 
Immeasurable are the virtues attained By seeing, hearing, and honoring buddhas; Ultimately endless in action, Needed to destroy afflictions and remove misery. 
As when a man ingests a little diamond It is not digested but must pass through, The virtues of honoring buddhas Destroy illusion and lead to adamantine knowledge. 
Just as straw piled high as a mountain A tiny ember of fire will burn up, The small virtue of honoring buddhas Will end affliction and lead to nirvana. 
In the Snowy mountains is an herb called good to see Which relieves all sickness when seen, heard of, smelled, or touched; If any see or hear of buddhas, They will gain excellent virtues and reach buddha-knowledge. 
Then, by the spiritual power of Buddha, and by natural law, untold hundreds of quintillions of worlds in each of the ten directions quaked in six ways: surging up in the east, sinking in the west; surging up in the west, sinking in the east; surging up in the south, sinking in the north; surging up in the north, sinking in the south; surging up on the periphery, sinking in the middle; surging up in the middle, sinking on the periphery—moving in eighteen ways: 
trembling, trembling all over, trembling equally all over; rising, rising all over, rising equally all over; surging, surging all over, surging equally all over; quaking, quaking all over, quaking equally all over; roaring, roaring all over, roaring equally all over; crashing, crashing all over, crashing equally all over. 
There rained clouds of all kinds of flowers, parasols, banners, pennants, fragrances, garlands, perfumes, ornaments, and radiant jewels, all surpassing those of the heavens, as well as clouds of enlightening beings singing eulogies, clouds of different bodies of untold enlightening beings, clouds of true awakening, clouds of purifying inconceivable worlds, clouds raining the sounds of the words of the buddhas, filling boundless universes. 
As on this earth the power of Buddha manifested in this way, causing all enlightening beings to rejoice greatly, so did this transpire in all worlds throughout the ten directions. 
At that time, in each of the ten directions, past as many worlds as atoms in eighty unspeakable numbers of hundreds of septillions of buddha-lands, there were eighty unspeakable numbers of hundreds of septillions of buddhas, alike named Universally Good, who all appeared to the enlightening beings and said, “Bravo, Offspring of Buddha! 
You are able, imbued with the power of the enlightened, conforming to the nature of reality, to expound the teaching of the manifestation of Buddha. 
We buddhas of the same name, eighty unspeakable numbers of hundreds of septillions of us in each of the ten directions, all expound this teaching. And what we expound, so do all Buddhas in all worlds in the ten directions. 
In this assembly as many great enlightening beings as atoms in a hundred thousand buddha-lands have attained the concentration of spiritual powers of all enlightening beings; we give them the prediction that they will attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment in one lifetime. 
As many sentient beings as atoms in a buddha-land have roused the determination for unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment; we also give them a prediction, that in the future, after as many eons as atoms in unspeakable buddha-lands, they will all become buddhas, all with the same name, Supreme Realm of the Enlightened. 
In order to enable the enlightening beings of the future to hear this teaching, we all preserve it together. 
As the sentient beings are liberated in this world, so are the sentient beings liberated in all worlds in the cosmos.” Then, owing to the spiritual power of the buddhas of the ten directions, owing to the power of the original vows of Vairocana, because the natural order is so, because of the power of roots of goodness, because the buddhas activate knowledge in an instant, because buddhas respond to conditions without missing the time, because they awaken enlightening beings at appropriate times, because their past deeds have no loss or decay, because they foster the attainment of the great practice of Universal Good, and because they manifest the mastery of omniscience, in each of the ten directions, past as many worlds as atoms in ten unspeakable numbers of tens of quadrillions of buddha-lands, there were as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten unspeakable numbers of tens of quadrillions of buddha-lands who came here, filling all universes in the ten directions, showing the vast magnificent adornments of enlightening beings, emitting networks of great beams of light, shaking all worlds in the ten directions, demolishing the palaces of all demons, extinguishing the pains of the states of ill, revealing the power of all enlightened ones, singing praises of the infinite different virtuous qualities of the enlightened, showering all kinds of rains, manifesting infinite different bodies, receiving the teachings of infinite buddhas. 
By the spiritual power of Buddha, they each said, “Bravo, offspring of Buddha: 
you are able to explain this indestructible teaching of buddhas. 
We are all named Universally Good, and we each have come here from the presence of a buddha called Freedom Marked by Universality, from worlds called Universal Light. 
In those worlds we also expound this teaching, with the same expressions, the same principles, the same explanations, the same certitude, without increase or decrease. 
We have all come here, by the spiritual power of Buddha, and by having attained the Buddhas’ teaching, to be witnesses for you. 
And as we come here, the same is true of all worlds in the whole cosmos, throughout space, in all ten directions.” Then the enlightening being Universally Good—with the spiritual power of Buddha, looking over all the great congregations of enlightening beings, wishing to recapitulate the immense power of the manifestation of Buddha, the indestructibility of the true teaching of the enlightened, how infinite roots of goodness are not in vain, how the emergence of buddhas in the world always comprises all supreme qualities, the ability to observe skillfully the minds of all sentient beings and teach them the truth according to their needs, without missing the right time producing the infinite light of truth of enlightening beings; the adornments of freedom of all buddhas, and how all enlightened ones are one body, no different, produced by great practices of the past—said in verse: 
The actions of all buddhas Are beyond mundane similitudes; In order to enlighten sentient beings, They make similes of nonsimiles for illustration. 
This subtle, mysterious, profound teaching Is hard to get to hear in a billion ages; Those with vigor, wisdom, and self-control Can get to hear this mystery. 
Any who hear this teaching and rejoice Have served countless buddhas; Being absorbed into the power of Buddha, Gods and humans honor and praise them. 
This is the foremost wealth transcending the world: 
This can liberate all living beings, This can produce the pure Path— You should keep it attentively. 
Detachment from the World He was with as many great enlightening beings as atoms in untold quadrillions of buddha-lands, all of whom were to attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment in one lifetime, and had come from various lands in other regions. All of them were endowed with the means and wisdom of enlightening beings: 
that is, they skillfully observed sentient beings and civilized them by the power of appropriate means so that they would live by the way of enlightening beings; they skillfully observed all worlds and went to them by the power of appropriate means; they skillfully examined the realm of nirvana and meditated on it and assessed it; they did away with all false conceptions and cultivated sublime practices without interruption; they were well able to take care of all sentient beings; they skillfully penetrated the principles of infinite liberative means; they knew sentient beings are empty and have no existence, yet they did not deny the fruits of action; they knew the various differences in the compulsions, faculties, spheres, and means of sentient beings’ minds; they were able to absorb and hold the teachings of buddhas of past, present, and future, to understand them themselves, and also explain them to others; they were well versed in all mundane and transmundane things and knew their true reality; they examined all compounded and uncompounded things and knew them to be nondual; in a single moment of thought they were able to acquire all the knowledge and wisdom of the buddhas of all times; they were able to show attainment of true awakening moment to moment, to cause sentient beings to become inspired and attain the Way; they knew the spheres of all sentient beings in the mental objects of one sentient being; though they entered the stage of the enlightened, they did not give up the works carried out by enlightening beings; their deeds, knowledge, and means did not fabricate anything; they stayed in the world for countless ages for each and every sentient being, yet they were hard to meet even in incalculable eons; they turned the wheel of the true Teaching, pacifying sentient beings without fail; they had already fulfilled the pure practical commitments of the buddhas of past, present, and future. 
They had perfected infinite such virtues, so that even if all the buddhas spoke for boundless eons they could not tell of them all. Their names were Universally Good, Universal Eye, Universal Emanation, Universal Wisdom, Universal Vision, Universal Light, Universal Contemplation, Universal Illumination, Universal Symbol, Universal Awareness, and so on. There were as many such enlightening beings as atoms in untold quadrillions of buddha-lands: 
all of them had accomplished the vow of practice of Universal Good; their profound determination and great vows were already fulfilled; they traveled to all places where buddhas were appearing in the world, requested them to turn the wheel of teaching, and were well able to receive and hold the eye of truth of the buddhas, perpetuating the lineage of buddhas; they knew the order of all buddhas’ appearance in the world and giving instructions, their names, countries, attainment of enlightenment, and turning the wheel of teaching; in worlds where there were no buddhas, they appeared and became buddhas, able to purify defiled sentient beings, able to destroy the action obstructions of enlightening beings, and enter the unimpeded pure realm of reality. 
Then the great enlightening being Universally Good entered a vast concentration called Buddha flower array. 
When he entered this concentration, all worlds quaked in six ways, moving in eighteen ways, producing a tremendous sound that none did not hear. After that he rose from concentration. 
At that point the enlightening being Universal Wisdom, knowing the congregation had assembled, asked the enlightening being Universally Good, “Please tell us—what are the reliances of great enlightening beings? 
What are their extraordinary thoughts? 
What are their practices? 
What are their spiritual friends? 
What are their exertions of energy? 
What are their attainments of peace of mind? 
What are their ways of developing sentient beings? 
What are their precepts? 
How do they receive the prediction of enlightenment? 
How do they enter into the state of enlightening beings? 
What are their entries into enlightenment? 
What are their penetrations of the activities of sentient beings? 
What are their entries into worlds? 
What are their entries into ages? 
What are their explanations of past, present, and future? 
What are their entries into past, present, and future? 
What are their developments of a tireless mind? 
What are their knowledges of differentiation? 
What are their mental masteries? 
What are their explanations of Buddha? 
What are their developments of the Universally Good mind? 
What are their principles of Universally Good practice? 
For what reasons do they generate great compassion? 
What are the causes of their development of the will for enlightenment? 
What are their expressions of respect to spiritual friends? 
What are their purities? 
What are their transcendent ways? 
What are their conscious knowledges? 
What are their realizational knowledges? 
What are their powers? 
What are their impartialities? 
What are their expressions of the true meaning of the Buddha teaching? 
What are their teachings? 
What do they preserve? 
What are their intellectual powers? 
What are their masteries? 
What are their qualities of nonattachment? 
What are their equanimities? 
What are their generations of knowledge? 
What are their magical displays? 
What are their supports of powers? 
What are their attainments of great joy and solace? 
What are their profound penetrations of the Buddha teaching? 
What are their bases? 
What are their developments of fearlessness? 
What are their developments of minds free from doubt? 
What are their inconceivabilities? 
What are their skillful esoteric sayings? 
What are their skillful analytic knowledges? 
What are their entries into concentration? 
What are their universal entries? 
What are their doors of liberation? 
What are their spiritual powers? 
What are their insights? 
What are their liberations? 
What are their groves? 
What are their palaces? 
What are their enjoyments? 
What are their adornments? 
What are their developments of an unshakable mind? 
What are their profound, great determinations they don’t give up? 
What are their contemplations? 
What are their explanations of things? 
What are their purities? 
What are their definitive marks? 
What are their illuminations of knowledge? 
What are their peerless states? 
What are their indomitable attitudes? 
What are their outstanding minds? 
What are their oceanic knowledges entering unexcelled enlightenment? 
What are their jewel-like states? 
What are their adamantine commitments to universal enlightenment? 
What are their great undertakings? 
What are their ultimate great tasks? 
What are their indestructible faiths? 
What are their ways of receiving the prediction of enlightenment? 
What are their dedications of roots of goodness? 
What are their attainments of wisdom? 
What are their developments of a boundlessly broad mind? 
What are their hidden treasuries? 
What are their rules of behavior? 
What are their controls? What are their unimpeded functions? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to sentient beings? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to lands? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to phenomena and principles? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to bodies? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to vows? 
What are their unimpeded functions in respect to realms? 
What are their unimpeded functions of knowledge? 
What are their unimpeded functions of spiritual capacities? 
What are their unimpeded functions of miraculous abilities? 
What are their unimpeded functions of power? 
What are their versatilities? 
What are their spheres? 
What are their powers? 
What are their fearlessnesses? 
What are their unique qualities? 
What are their activities? 
What are their bodies? 
What are their physical actions? 
What is their speech? 
What is their purification of speech? 
What are the protections they receive? 
What are their accomplishments of great works? 
What are their minds? 
What are their determinations? 
What are their comprehensive minds? 
What are their profound minds? 
What do they strive to practice? 
What are their certain understandings? 
What are their certain understandings of worlds? 
What are their certain understandings of beings? 
What are their habit energies? 
What are their graspings? 
What do they cultivate? 
What are their accomplishments of the Buddha teachings? 
What makes them regress from the way of the Buddha teachings? 
What are their paths of emancipation? 
What are their qualities of certainty? 
What are their ways of generating the qualities of buddhahood? 
What are their appellations of greatness? 
What are their paths? 
What are their infinite paths? 
What are their aids to enlightenment? 
What are their ways of cultivation? 
What are their ways of adornment? 
What are their feet? 
What are their hands? 
What are their guts? 
What are their internal organs? 
What are their hearts? 
What is their armor? 
What are their weapons? 
What are their heads? 
What are their eyes? 
What are their ears? 
What are their noses? 
What are their tongues? 
What are their bodies? 
What are their minds? 
What is their action? 
What is their abiding? 
What is their sitting? 
What is their reclining? 
What are their dwelling places? 
What are their spheres of action? 
What are their observations? 
What are their universal observations? 
What is their springing? 
What is their lion’s roar? 
What is their pure giving? 
What is their pure discipline? 
What is their pure tolerance? 
What is their pure energy? 
What is their pure concentration? 
What is their pure wisdom? 
What is their pure benevolence? 
What is their pure compassion? 
What is their pure joy? 
What is their pure equanimity? 
What are their principles? 
What are their pure laws? 
What are their virtues used to foster enlightenment? 
What are their knowledges used to foster enlightenment? 
What are their sufficiencies of insight? 
What are their quests for truth? 
What are their understandings of truth? 
What are their norms of practice? 
What are demons? 
What are demons’ actions? 
How are the actions of demons gotten rid of? 
What are visions of Buddha? 
What are actions of Buddha? 
What are actions of conceit? 
What are actions of knowledge? 
What is possession by demons? 
What is being supported by Buddha? 
What is being supported by truth? 
What do enlightening beings do while living in the heaven of satisfaction? 
Why do they die in that heaven? 
Why do they appear to abide in the womb? 
Why do they manifest subtle processes? 
Why do they manifest birth? 
Why do they manifest a smile? 
Why do they show the act of walking seven steps? 
Why do they appear as children? 
Why do they appear to live in a palace? 
Why do they appear to leave home? 
Why do they demonstrate austerities? 
How do they go to the site of enlightenment? 
How do they sit on the site of enlightenment? 
What are the extraordinary signs when they sit on the site of enlightenment? 
Why do they demonstrate the conquering of demons? 
What are the attainments of the power of the enlightened? 
How do they turn the wheel of teaching? 
How are good and pure ways acquired due to the turning of the wheel of teaching? 
Why do the enlightened ones manifest extinction in final nirvana? 
Please explain these things to us.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good said to Universal Wisdom and the others, “Offspring of Buddha, great enlightening beings have ten kinds of reliance. 
They take the determination for enlightenment as a reliance, as they never forget it. 
They take spiritual friends as a reliance, harmonizing as one. 
They take roots of goodness as a reliance, cultivating, gathering, and increasing them. 
They take the transcendent ways as a reliance, fully practicing them. 
They take all truths as a reliance, as they ultimately end in emancipation. 
They take great vows as a reliance, as they enhance enlightenment. 
They take practices as a reliance, consummating them all. 
They take all enlightening beings as a reliance because they have the same one wisdom. 
They take honoring the buddhas as a reliance because their faith is purified. 
They take all buddhas as a reliance because they teach ceaselessly like benevolent parents. 
These are the ten: if enlightening beings rest in these principles, they can become abodes of the unexcelled great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of extraordinary thought. What are they? 
They think of all roots of goodness as their own roots of goodness. 
They think of all roots of goodness as seeds of enlightenment. 
They think of all sentient beings as vessels of enlightenment. 
They think of all vows as their own vows. 
They think of all truths as emancipation. 
They think of all practices as their own practices. 
They think of all things as teachings of Buddha. 
They think of all modes of language as the path of verbal expression. 
They think of all buddhas as benevolent parents. 
They think of all buddhas as one. 
These are the ten: if great enlightening beings rest on these principles, they will attain unexcelled skillful thought. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of practice. What are they? 
Practice dealing with all sentient beings, to develop them all to maturity; practice seeking all truths, to learn them all; practice of all roots of goodness, to cause them all to grow; practice of all concentrations, to be single-minded, without distraction; practice of all knowledge, to know everything; practice of all cultivations, to be able to cultivate them all; practice dealing with all buddha-lands, to adorn them all; practice dealing with all good companions, respecting and supporting them; practice dealing with all buddhas, honoring and serving them. 
These are the ten: if great enlightening beings rest on these principles, they will attain the practice of the unexcelled knowledge and wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of spiritual friends. What are they? 
Spiritual friends who cause them to persist in the determination for enlightenment; spiritual friends who cause them to generate roots of goodness; spiritual friends who cause them to practice the ways of transcendence; spiritual friends who enable them to analyze and explain all truths; spiritual friends who enable them to develop all sentient beings, spiritual friends who enable them to attain definitive analytic and expository powers; spiritual friends who cause them not to be attached to any world; spiritual friends who cause them to cultivate practice tirelessly in all ages; spiritual friends who establish them in the practice of Universal Good; spiritual friends who introduce them to the reaches of knowledge of all buddhas. These are the ten. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of exertion of energy: 
exertion of energy to educate all sentient beings, to enter deeply into all Buddha teachings, to purify all worlds, to practice all sciences of enlightening beings, to eliminate all evils of sentient beings, to stop the miseries of all vicious cycles, to destroy all demons, to become pure, clear eyes for all sentient beings, to honor all buddhas, and to please all buddhas. 
These are the ten: if great enlightening beings abide by these things, they will be able to fully achieve the unexcelled transcendent energy of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of attainment of peace of mind. 
What are they? Abiding themselves in the will for enlightenment, they should also induce others to abide in the will for enlightenment, to attain peace of mind. 
Ultimately free from anger and strife themselves, they should also free others from anger and strife, to attain peace of mind. 
Free from the state of ordinary ignorance themselves, they also free others from the state of ordinary ignorance, and attain peace of mind. 
Diligently cultivating roots of goodness themselves, they also induce others to cultivate roots of goodness, and attain peace of mind. 
Persisting in the path of the transcendent ways themselves, they also induce others to abide in the path of the transcendent ways, and attain peace of mind. 
Being born themselves in the house of Buddha, they should also enable others to be born in the house of Buddha, to attain peace of mind. 
Deeply penetrating the real truth of absence of intrinsic nature, they also introduce others into the real truth of absence of inherent nature, and attain peace of mind. 
Not repudiating any of the buddhas’ teachings, they also cause others not to repudiate any of the buddhas’ teachings, and attain peace of mind. 
Fulfilling the vow of all-knowing enlightenment, they also enable others to fulfill the vow of all-knowing enlightenment, and attain peace of mind. 
Entering deeply into the inexhaustible treasury of knowledge of all buddhas, they also lead others into the inexhaustible treasury of knowledge of all buddhas, and attain peace of mind. 
These are the ten; if great enlightening beings abide by these principles, they will attain the peace of the supreme knowledge of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of developing sentient beings: 
by giving, by their physical bodies, by teaching, by cooperation, by nonattachment, by showing the practices of enlightening beings, by clearly showing all worlds, by showing the great magnificent qualities of the Buddha teachings, by various manifestations of spiritual powers, and by various subtle skillful means. 
These are ten ways in which enlightening beings develop and perfect the realm of sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of precepts: 
not giving up the determination for enlightenment, leaving behind the stages of individual salvation, observing and benefiting all sentient beings, inducing all sentient beings to live by the teachings of Buddha, cultivating all the sciences of enlightening beings, not being acquisitive in respect to anything, dedicating all roots of goodness to enlightenment, not being attached to any of the incarnations of buddhas, reflecting on all things and getting rid of grasping and clinging, and regulating all their faculties. 
These are the ten; if great enlightening beings abide by these principles, they will attain the unexcelled great transcendent discipline of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of receiving the prediction of buddhahood, by which they know inwardly they will receive the prediction: 
arousing the determination for enlightenment with extraordinary will; never giving up the practices of enlightening beings; continuing to carry out the practices of enlightening beings in all ages; practicing all Buddha teachings; having complete faith in the guidance of all buddhas; cultivating all roots of goodness and bringing them to fulfillment; placing all sentient beings in the enlightenment of buddhas; harmonizing and unifying with all spiritual friends; thinking of all spiritual friends as buddhas; perpetually preserving the fundamental aspiration for enlightenment with diligence. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of entry into the state of enlightening beings: 
they enter into fundamental vows, practices, precepts, ways of transcendence, attainment, different undertakings, various understandings, adornment of buddha-lands, command of spiritual powers, and manifestation of incarnation. 
By these they enter into the states of enlightening beings of all times. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of entering enlightenment: 
they enter boundless realization of true awareness, boundless turning of the wheel of teaching, boundless means of liberation, boundless different explanations, boundless taming of sentient beings, boundless command of spiritual powers, boundless different embodiments, boundless concentrations, boundless powers and fearlessnesses, and boundless revelation of nirvana. 
By these great enlightening beings enter among all the enlightened ones of all times. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of penetrations of actions of sentient beings: 
they penetrate all sentient beings’ past actions, future actions, present actions, good actions, bad actions, mental actions, actions of senses, actions of understanding, actions of afflictions and habit energies, timely and untimely actions of teaching and training. 
By these enlightening beings penetrate the actions of all beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of entry into worlds: 
they enter defiled worlds, pure worlds, small worlds, large worlds, worlds within atoms, subtle worlds, inverted worlds, upright worlds, worlds where there are buddhas, and worlds where there are no buddhas. 
Thereby enlightening beings enter all worlds in the ten directions. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of entry into ages: 
they enter into past ages, future ages, present ages, countable ages, uncountable ages, countable ages as uncountable ages, uncountable ages as countable ages, all ages as not ages, nonages as all ages, and all ages as one instant. 
Thereby they enter into all ages. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of explanation of past, present, and future: 
they speak of the past of the past, the future of the past, and the present of the past; they speak of the past of the future, the present of the future, and the endlessness of the future; they speak of the past of the present, the future of the present, and the equality of the present; they speak of past, present, and future being the one instant of the present. 
These are the ten ways by which enlightening beings explain all pasts, presents, and futures. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of knowing the worlds of past, present, and future: 
they know their definitions, their speech, their deliberations, their rules, their appellations, their orders, their provisional names, their endlessness, their quiescence, and their total emptiness. 
Thus do enlightening beings know all things in all times. 
“Great enlightening beings develop ten kinds of tireless mind: 
honoring and serving all buddhas tirelessly; attending all spiritual teachers tirelessly; seeking all truths tirelessly; listening to true teaching tirelessly; expounding true teaching tirelessly; educating and civilizing all sentient beings tirelessly; placing all sentient beings in the enlightenment of the buddhas tirelessly; spending untold eons in each and every world carrying out enlightening practices tirelessly; traveling in all worlds tirelessly; examining and pondering all Buddha teachings tirelessly. 
These are the ten; if enlightening beings abide by these principles they will attain the tireless supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of knowledge of differentiation: 
If great enlightening beings rest on these principles, they will attain the buddhas’ unexcelled, far-reaching knowledge of differentiation. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of mental command: 
mental command of retaining what they hear, as they retain all teachings without forgetting; mental command of practice, as they skillfully observe all things as they really are; mental command of reflection, as they comprehend the nature of all things; mental command of the light of the teachings, as they illumine the inconceivable attributes of buddha-hood; mental command of concentration, as their minds are not distracted as they hear the teachings of all buddhas of the present; mental command of universal sound, as they understand inconceivable numbers of utterances; mental command of all times, as they expound the inconceivable Buddha teachings of all times; mental command of various intellectual powers, as they expound boundless Buddha teachings; mental command of producing unobstructed ears, as they hear all the teachings of untold buddhas; mental command of all qualities of buddhahood, as they are firmly established in the powers and fearlessnesses of the enlightened. 
If enlightening beings want to attain these things, they should study and practice diligently. 
“Great enlightening beings speak of ten kinds of Buddha: 
the Buddha of attainment of true enlightenment, the Buddha of vows, the Buddha of rewards of action, the Buddha of preservation of true teaching, the Buddha of nirvana, the Buddha of the cosmos, the Buddha of mind, the Buddha of concentration, the Buddha of fundamental nature, the Buddha adapting to mentalities. 
“Great enlightening beings develop ten kinds of Universally Good mind: 
they develop a mind of great benevolence, to save all beings; they develop a mind of great compassion, to bear suffering in place of all beings; they develop a mind of total giving, relinquishing all they have; they develop a mind that thinks of omniscience above all, gladly seeking all Buddha teachings; they develop a mind adorned with virtues, learning all practices of enlightening beings; they develop an adamantine mind, so as not to become heedless wherever they may live; they develop an oceanic mind, as all pure qualities flow in; they develop a mind like a mountain, enduring all harsh words; they develop a peaceful mind, giving to all sentient beings without fear; they develop a mind with ultimate transcendent wisdom, skillfully observing that all things have no existence. 
If enlightening beings establish these minds, they will soon be able to achieve the skillful knowledge of the enlightening being Universally Good. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten principles of Universally Good practice: 
vowing to live through all future ages; vowing to serve and honor all buddhas of the future; vowing to settle all sentient beings in the practice of Universally Good enlightening beings; vowing to accumulate all roots of goodness; vowing to enter all ways of transcendence; vowing to fulfill all practices of enlightening beings; vowing to adorn all worlds; vowing to be born in all buddha-lands; vowing to carefully examine all things; vowing to attain supreme enlightenment in all buddha-lands. 
If enlightening beings practice these principles diligently, they will soon be able to fulfill the practical undertakings of Universal Good. 
“Great enlightening beings arouse great compassion by ten kinds of observations of sentient beings: 
they see sentient beings have nothing to rely on for support; they see sentient beings are unruly; they see sentient beings lack virtues; they see sentient beings are asleep in ignorance; they see sentient beings do bad things; they see sentient beings are bound by desires; they see sentient beings are sunk in the sea of birth and death; they see sentient beings chronically suffer from illness; they see sentient beings have no desire for goodness; they see sentient beings have lost the way to enlightenment. 
Enlightening beings always observe sentient beings with these awarenesses. 
“There are ten kinds of causes of enlightening beings’ development of the will for enlightenment: 
they become determined to reach enlightenment to educate and civilize all sentient beings, to remove the mass of suffering of all sentient beings, to bring complete peace and happiness to all sentient beings, to eliminate the delusion of all sentient beings, to bestow enlightened knowledge on all sentient beings, to honor and respect all buddhas, to follow the guidance of the buddhas and please them, to see the marks and embellishments of the physical embodiments of all buddhas, to comprehend the vast knowledge and wisdom of all buddhas, and to manifest the powers and fearlessnesses of the buddhas. 
“When enlightening beings develop the will for supreme enlightenment and attend and serve spiritual teachers in order to awaken to omniscient knowledge, they should generate ten kinds of spirit: 
a spirit of service, a spirit of joy, a spirit of noncontention, a spirit of docility, a spirit of not seeking anything else, a spirit of wholehearted devotion, a spirit of having the same virtues, a spirit of having the same vows, a spirit of being in the presence of enlightenment, a spirit of cooperation in perfection of action. 
“If great enlightening beings arouse such spirits, they will attain ten kinds of purity: 
purity of profound determination, reaching the ultimate end without corruption; purity of physical embodiment, appearing according to need; purity of voice, comprehending all speech; purity of intellectual powers, skillfully explaining boundless Buddha teachings; purity of wisdom, getting rid of the darkness of all delusion; purity of taking on birth, being imbued with the power of freedom of enlightening beings; purity of company, having fully developed the roots of goodness of sentient beings they worked with in the past; purity of rewards, having removed all obstructions caused by past actions; purity of great vows, being one in essence with all enlightening beings; purity of practices, riding the vehicle of Universal Good to emancipation. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten transcendent ways: 
transcendent giving, relinquishing all they have; transcendent discipline, keeping the precepts of buddhas pure; transcendent tolerance, abiding in the tolerance and forbearance characteristic of the enlightened; transcendent vigor, not regressing in whatever they do; transcendent meditation, focusing their minds on one point; transcendent wisdom, observing all things as they truly are; transcendent knowledge, entering into the powers of buddhas; transcendent vowing, fulfilling the great vows of Universal Good; transcendent spiritual powers, demonstrating all autonomous actions; transcendent teaching, penetrating all buddhas’ teachings. 
If enlightening beings abide by these principles, they will attain the supreme transcendent knowledge of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of conscious knowledge: 
conscious knowledge of the infinite differentiations of all worlds; conscious knowledge of the inconceivability of all realms of sentient beings; conscious knowledge of all things, each individual being immanent in the variegated manifold, and the variegated manifold being immanent in each individual unit; conscious knowledge of the vastness of all spheres of reality; conscious knowledge of the ultimacy of all realms of space; conscious knowledge of all worlds entering the past; conscious knowledge of all worlds entering the future; conscious knowledge of all worlds entering the present; conscious knowledge of the infinite undertakings and vows of all buddhas reaching fulfillment in one knowledge; conscious knowledge that the buddhas of past, present, and future all attain emancipation by one and the same practice. 
By these, enlightening beings can attain the illumination of mastery of all truths; their vows will all be fulfilled, and they will be instantly able to understand all buddhas’ techniques and attain true enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of realizational knowledge: 
they know the unity of all things; they know the infinity of all things; they know the presence of all things in a single instant; they know the interpenetration of mental activities of all sentient beings; they know the equality of faculties of all sentient beings; they know the impassioned habitual activities of all sentient beings; they know the mental compulsions of all sentient beings; they know the good and bad acts of all sentient beings; they know all enlightening beings’ vows and practices, masteries, preservation of the Teaching, and mystical transfigurations; they know all buddhas’ fulfillment of the ten powers and attainment of true enlightenment. 
By these, enlightening beings can attain skillful use of all the teachings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of power: 
the power to comprehend the inherent essence of all things; the power to comprehend that all things are like phantoms; the power to comprehend that all things are like illusions; the power to comprehend that all things are Buddha’s teachings; the power to have no attachments to anything at all; the power to clearly understand all things; the power of the respectful mind never abandoning spiritual teachers; the power to cause all roots of goodness to reach supreme knowledge; the power of deep faith in all buddhas’ teachings without rejection; the power of skill in preventing the will for omniscience from backsliding. 
Based on these powers, enlightening beings can acquire the supreme powers of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of impartiality: 
impartiality toward all sentient beings, all things, all lands, all determinations, all roots of goodness, all enlightening beings, all vows, all ways of transcendence, all practices, and all buddhas. 
If enlightening beings abide by these principles, they will attain the supreme impartiality of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of expression of the true meaning of the Buddhas’ Teaching: 
that is, all things only have names; all things are like illusions; all things are like reflections; all things only originate conditionally; all things are pure in action; all things are just made by words; all things are the ultimate reality; all things are signless; all things are the highest truth; all things are the realm of reality. 
“Great enlightening beings expound ten kinds of teaching: 
the teaching of profundity; the teaching of enormity; the teaching of variegation; the teaching of omniscience; the teaching of following the ways of transcendence; the teaching of generating the powers of the enlightened; the teaching of the interrelation of past, present, and future; the teaching of causing enlightening beings not to regress; the teaching of praising the virtues of buddhas; the teaching of the sciences of all enlightening beings; the equality of all buddhas, and the interrelation of all spheres of enlightenment. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can accomplish the supremely skillful preaching of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings preserve ten things: 
they preserve all the virtues they have accumulated, all the teachings spoken by all buddhas, all similes, all means of access to true principles, all means of generating mental command, all means of removing doubt and confusion, means of perfecting all enlightening beings, the equal doors of concentration explained by all buddhas, the ways of ingress into the illumination of all truths, and the free exercise of spiritual powers of all buddhas. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can attain the power of preservation of supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of intellectual power: 
the intellectual power of not arbitrarily discriminating among things; the intellectual power of not fabricating anything; the intellectual power of not being attached to anything; the intellectual power of realizing emptiness; the intellectual power of freedom from the darkness of doubt; the intellectual power of receiving support from Buddha in all things; the intellectual power of spontaneous awareness of all truths; the intellectual power of skill in differentiation of expressions of all truths; the intellectual power of truthfully explaining all things; the intellectual power of gladdening all sentient beings according to their mentalities. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can attain the supremely skillful intellectual powers of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of mastery: 
mastery of educating and civilizing all sentient beings; mastery of illumining all truths; mastery of cultivating all virtuous practices; mastery of extensive knowledge; mastery of the discipline of nonreliance; mastery of directing all roots of goodness to enlightenment; mastery of undiminishing energy; mastery of wisdom crushing all demons; mastery of inducing the determination for enlightenment according to inclinations; mastery of manifesting attainment of true enlightenment according to the needs of those to be taught. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can attain the mastery of the supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of nonattachment: 
nonattachment to all worlds, all sentient beings, all phenomena, all actions, all roots of goodness, all places of birth, all vows, all practices, all enlightening beings, and all buddhas. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can quickly overturn all concepts and attain supreme pure wisdom. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of equanimity: 
equanimity in accumulating all virtues; equanimity in undertaking all different vows; equanimity in regard to all living beings; equanimity in regard to the consequences of actions of all living beings; equanimity in regard to all phenomena; equanimity in regard to all pure and defiled lands; equanimity in regard to all phenomena; equanimity in regard to the understandings of all sentient beings; equanimity in regard to nonconceptualization of all practices; equanimity in regard to the nondifference of all buddhas’ powers; equanimity in regard to the wisdom of all buddhas. 
If enlightening beings rest in these, they will attain the supreme great equanimity of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of generating knowledge: 
they generate knowledge by knowing the understandings of all sentient beings; knowing the various distinctions of all buddha-lands; knowing the domains of the network of the ten directions; knowing all worlds, inverted, upright, and so on; knowing the unity, variety, and universality of all things; knowing all the various physical forms; knowing the misconceptions and delusions of all worldlings without clinging to them; knowing that all truths ultimately lead to emancipation by one path; knowing the spiritual power of the enlightened can enter all universes; knowing that the seed of enlightenment in all sentient beings, past, present, and future, does not die out. 
Based on these principles, enlightening beings can comprehend all things. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of magical displays: 
magical display of all sentient beings, all bodies, all lands, all gifts, all voices, all practical undertakings, all education and civilization of sentient beings, all attainments of true enlightenment, all explanations of truth, and all empowerments. 
Based on these phenomena, enlightening beings can acquire all means of supreme magical displays. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of support of power: 
support by the power of buddhas, support by the power of truth, support by the power of sentient beings, support by the power of acts, support by the power of practices, support by the power of vows, support by the power of the environment, support by the power of time, support by the power of good, and support by the power of knowledge. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can gain the support of the power of supreme mastery of all truths. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of great joy and solace. 
Enlightening beings determine to follow, serve, and please all buddhas that emerge in the world throughout the future; thinking of this, they become very happy. 
They also determine to honor those buddhas with the best of offerings; thinking of this, they become very happy. 
They also think, ‘When I make offerings to those buddhas, they will surely teach me, and I will faithfully listen with respect and practice according to the Teaching, and will surely always be born in the state of enlightening beings,’ and thinking this they become very happy. 
They also think, ‘I shall carry out the practices of enlightening beings for untold eons and always be with the enlightening beings and buddhas,’ and they become very happy at this thought. 
They also think, ‘The fears I had in the past before I set my heart on supreme enlightenment—fear of not being able to live, fear of a bad reputation, fear of death, fear of falling into miserable conditions, fear of the authority of the crowd—have all gone since I set my mind on enlightenment, so that I no longer fear, am not afraid, cannot be intimidated, and cannot be hurt by any demons or cultists.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. 
They also think, ‘I shall enable all sentient beings to attain supreme enlightenment; after they attain enlightenment, I shall cultivate the practices of enlightening beings in the company of those buddhas for as long as they live, faithfully provide them with offerings appropriate to buddhas, and, after they pass away, set up innumerable monuments to each of them, honor their relics, and preserve the teachings they leave.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. 
They also think, I shall array all worlds with the finest adornments, filling them with all kinds of marvels, equally pure. 
I shall also cause all kinds of spiritual powers, sustaining forces, tremors, and shining lights to pervade them all.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. They also think, ‘I shall put an end to the doubts and confusions of all sentient beings, purify all sentient beings’ desires, open up all sentient beings’ minds, annihilate all sentient beings’ afflictions, close the doors of the states of misery for all sentient beings, open the doors of states of felicity for all sentient beings, break through the darkness of all sentient beings, give light to all sentient beings, cause all sentient beings to get free from the action of demons, and cause all sentient beings to reach the abode of peace.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘The buddhas are as rare and difficult to meet with as the udumbara flower, which one can hardly get to see once in countless ages. 
In the future, when I want to see a buddha, I will immediately be able to do so; the buddhas will never abandon me, but will always be with me, allow me to see them, and constantly expound the Teaching to me. 
After I have heard the Teaching, my mind will be purified, free from deviousness, straightforward, and free from falsehood, and I will always see the buddhas in each moment of thought.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. 
They also think, ‘In the future I shall attain buddhahood, and by the spiritual power of the enlightened will show the attainment of enlightenment individually to all sentient beings in all worlds, pure and fearless, roaring the great lion’s roar, pervading the cosmos with my original universal undertaking, beating the drum of truth, showering the rain of truth, performing the giving of true teaching, perpetually expounding the truth, with physical, verbal, and mental action, sustained by great compassion, untiring.’ With these thoughts they become very happy. 
Based on these ten kinds of great joy and solace, enlightening beings can attain the unexcelled great joy and solace of the knowledge and wisdom of true enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of profound penetration of the buddhas’ teachings: 
they penetrate all worlds of the past; they penetrate all worlds of the future; they penetrate the numbers, patterns, explanations, and purities of worlds of the present; they penetrate the variety of all worlds; they penetrate the various actions and consequences of all sentient beings; they penetrate the various practices of all enlightening beings; they know the order of appearance of all buddhas of the past; they know the order of appearance of all buddhas of the future; they know the lands and congregations of all buddhas present in the cosmos, their teaching and training; they know principles of the world, principles of Buddhist disciples, principles of individual illuminates, principles of enlightening beings, and principles of buddhas, but though they know all these principles, they have no discrimination, and yet expound various principles. 
They thoroughly penetrate the realm of reality because there is nothing to penetrate. 
According to these principles they penetrate the most profound essence of the great knowledge and wisdom of unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of basis on which they carry out their practices: 
they carry out the practices of enlightening beings based on honoring all buddhas, taming all sentient beings, associating with all good companions, accumulating all roots of goodness, purifying all buddha-lands, entering deeply into all transcendent ways, fulfilling all vows of enlightening beings, and on infinite will for enlightenment and the enlightenment of all buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings carry out their practices. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of development of fearlessness: 
they develop fearlessness annihilating all obstructing actions, preserving the true teaching after the extinction of buddhas, conquering all demons, not begrudging their bodies and lives, smashing all the false arguments of heretics, gladdening all sentient beings, causing all congregations to rejoice, taming all spirits, goblins, titans, sprites, and serpents, leaving the states of the two lesser vehicles of individual salvation and entering the most profound teaching, and carrying out enlightening practices tirelessly for untold eons. 
Based on these enlightening beings can attain the supreme fearlessness of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of developing a mind free from doubt. 
They make this determination: ‘I shall take care of all sentient beings by giving; I shall take care of all sentient beings by ethical conduct, tolerance, vigor, meditation, wisdom, benevolence, compassion, joy, and equanimity.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. 
This is their first way of developing a mind free from doubt. Great enlightening beings also think, ‘When the future buddhas appear in the world, I shall serve and honor them in all ways.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is their second development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I shall adorn all worlds with various marvelous webs of light.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the third development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I shall cultivate the practices of enlightening beings throughout all future ages and fully develop countless sentient beings throughout the entire cosmos by means of the supreme methods of teaching and taming.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. 
This is the fourth development of a mind free from doubt. Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I shall cultivate the practices of enlightening beings, fulfill the great vows, acquire omniscience, and abide therein.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the fifth development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I shall carry out the practices of enlightening beings for the sake of all beings in the world, become a pure light of all truths, and illumine all the teachings of buddhas.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the sixth development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I should know all things are Buddha teachings and explain them to sentient beings according to their mentalities to enlighten them all.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the seventh development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I shall attain the way to nonobstruction in the midst of all things, by knowing that all obstructions are ungraspable.’ Thus their minds are free from doubt and they abide in the essence of truth, finally to attain supreme complete perfect enlightenment. When they make this determination they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the eighth development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I should know that all things are transmundane things, get rid of all false notions and delusions, and adorn myself with the adornment of unity, there being nothing to adorn.’ Here they understand by themselves and not through another. 
When they make this determination they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. This is the ninth development of a mind free from doubt. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘I should realize supreme enlightenment in regard to all things, by getting rid of all false notions and delusions, by attaining instantaneous knowledge, because unity and difference cannot be grasped, by transcending all categories, by ultimate nonfabrication of false descriptions, by detachment from all words, and by dwelling in the realm of ineffability.’ When they make this determination, they are definitely free from doubt—no doubt can arise in their minds. 
This is the tenth development of a mind free from doubt. Based on these, enlightening beings can be free from all doubt and confusion regarding all Buddha teachings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of inconceivability. 
All their roots of goodness are inconceivable. 
All their vows are inconceivable. 
Their knowledge that all things are like illusions is inconceivable. 
Their arousal of aspiration for enlightenment and cultivation of enlightening practice without losing roots of goodness and without arbitrary notions is inconceivable. 
Their not grasping extinction and liberation in spite of having profoundly penetrated all things, because all their vows are not fulfilled, is inconceivable. 
They cultivate the path of enlightening beings and manifest the appearances of incarnation, birth, leaving home, austere practices, going to the site of enlightenment, conquering demons, achieving supreme enlightenment, teaching, and passing away, their spiritual transformations free, unceasing, not abandoning their vow of compassion, saving and protecting sentient beings—all of this is inconceivable. 
Though they are able to manifest the ten powers of buddhas and their freedom of mystical projection, yet they do not give up the mind equal to the cosmos, and teach sentient beings—this is inconceivable. 
They know that in all things signlessness is their sign, their signs are signless, nondiscrimination is discrimination, discrimination is nondiscrimination, nonexistence is existence, existence is nonexistence, inaction is action, action is inaction, nonexplanation is explanation, explanation is nonexplanation—this is inconceivable. 
They know mind is equal to enlightenment, they know enlightenment is equal to mind, they know mind and enlightenment are equal to sentient beings, yet they do not give rise to confusion of mind, confusion of thoughts, or confusion of views—this is inconceivable. 
From moment to moment they enter absorption in extinction and exhaust all contamination, yet they do not experience ultimate reality and do not end roots of goodness with contamination: 
though they know all things are free from contamination, yet they know the end and extinction of contaminations; though they know the principles of buddhas are identical to the things of the world and the things of the world are identical to the principles of buddhas, yet they do not form notions of worldly things within the principles of buddhas, and do not form notions of principles of buddhas in the things of the world—all things enter the realm of reality because there is nothing entered; they know all things are nondual because there is no change: 
These are the ten inconceivabilities of enlightening beings; if enlightening beings abide in them, they will attain the supreme inconceivable qualities of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of skillful esoteric sayings: 
the skillful esoteric sayings in all the discourses of buddhas; skillful esoteric sayings about all places of birth; skillful esoteric sayings about all enlightening beings’ spiritual manifestations and attainment of enlightenment; skillful esoteric sayings about the consequences of actions of all sentient beings; skillful esoteric sayings about the defilement and purity produced by all sentient beings; skillful esoteric sayings about how to be ultimately unobstructed in the midst of all things; skillful esoteric sayings about how in every place in space are worlds, some becoming, some decaying, without any gaps in between; skillful esoteric sayings about how everywhere in all places in all universes, in all phenomena, even in microscopic points, there are buddhas manifesting birth, attainment of buddhahood, and entry into final nirvana, filling the cosmos, each distinctly seen; skillful esoteric sayings about seeing all sentient beings as equally nirvanic, being unchanging, yet not giving up great aspirations, causing them to be fulfilled by the vow for omniscience; skillful esoteric sayings about not abandoning teachers in spite of knowing that truths are not realized through the agency of another, honoring the enlightened even more, becoming one with spiritual friends in cultivating, dedicating, and living by virtues, with the same actions, the same essence, the same emancipation, the same fulfillment. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can master the unexcelled skillful esoteric speech of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of skillful analytic knowledge: 
skillful analytic knowledge penetrating all lands; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating all abodes of sentient beings; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the mental activities of all sentient beings; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the faculties of all sentient beings; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the consequences of actions of all sentient beings; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the practices of all Buddhist disciples; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the practices of all individual illuminates; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating the practices of all enlightening beings; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating all mundane things; skillful analytic knowledge penetrating all principles and attributes of buddhahood. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme knowledge of buddhas that skillfully distinguishes all things. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of entry into concentration: 
entry into concentration in all worlds; entry into concentration in the bodies of all sentient beings; entry into concentration in all phenomena; entry into concentration seeing all buddhas; entry into concentration and remaining for all ages; entry into concentration and manifesting inconceivable bodies on emerging; entry into concentration in all buddha-bodies; entry into concentration realizing the equality of all sentient beings; entry into concentration instantly comprehending all enlightening beings’ knowledge of concentration; entry into concentration accomplishing all the deeds and vows of enlightening beings in one instant and never ceasing. 
If enlightening beings abide in these, they will attain the buddhas’ supremely skillful methods of concentration. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of universal entry: 
universal entry among sentient beings, into lands, into the various features of worlds, into fires, into floods, into buddhahood, into arrays of adornments, into the embodiments of boundless virtues of buddhas, and into all kinds of explanations of truth. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the buddhas’ means of penetrating everything by great knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of doors of liberation: 
pervading all worlds with one body, showing infinite various forms in all worlds, putting all worlds in one buddha-field, universally supporting all realms of sentient beings, filling all worlds with the adornment bodies of all buddhas, seeing all worlds in one’s own body, showing the emergence of all buddhas in one world, filling all worlds with one body, and showing the free play of spiritual powers of all buddhas in a single instant. 
Through these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme door of liberation of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of spiritual power: 
the power of knowledge of means of remembering past lives; the power of knowledge of means of unhindered clairaudience; the power of knowledge of means of knowing the inconceivably many mental actions of sentient beings; the power of knowledge of means of unobstructed clairvoyant vision; the power of knowledge of means of manifesting inconceivable great mystic powers according to the minds of sentient beings; the power of knowledge of means of appearing in infinite worlds with one body; the power of knowledge of means of entering innumerable worlds in a moment of thought; the power of knowledge of means of producing infinite adornments and adorning inconceivable worlds; the power of knowledge of means of displaying innumerable emanated bodies; the power of knowledge of means of manifesting unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment in untold worlds, in accord with the minds of innumerable sentient beings. 
Through these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme skillful spiritual power of buddhas, displaying them variously to all sentient beings to make them learn. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of insight: 
the insight of practical knowledge of the consequences of actions of all sentient beings; the insight of practical knowledge of the quiescence, purity, and non-conceptuality of all realms of sentient beings; the insight of practical knowledge that the mental objects of all sentient beings are of but one character, totally ungraspable, and that all things are indestructible; the insight of practical knowledge of ability to cause infinite subtle utterances to be heard in all worlds; the insight of practical knowledge of how to universally destroy the obsessions of all minds; the insight of practical knowledge of how to appear to be born or not to be born by expedient means; the insight of practical knowledge of abandoning all objects of perception and sensation; the insight of practical knowledge that all things are neither forms nor formless, are of one nature, which is no nature, not discriminating anything yet able to comprehend all kinds of truths and explain them analytically for measureless ages, abiding in the realm of reality and realizing unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings know that the birth of all sentient beings is fundamentally birthless because they comprehend that birth cannot be grasped: 
yet they know causes, know conditions, know events, know objects, know actions, know birth, know extinction, know speech, know confusion, know freedom from confusion, know delusion, know freedom from delusion, know defilement, know purity, know birth and death, know nirvana, know graspability, know ungraspability, know attachment, know nonattachment, know rest, know movement, know departure, know return, know origination, know nonorigination, know dissolution, know emancipation, know maturity, know faculties, know how to civilize—they teach beings according to needs, never forgetting the deeds of all enlightening beings. 
Because enlightening beings set their minds on complete perfect enlightenment for the sole purpose of helping sentient beings. 
Therefore, enlightening beings always edify sentient beings without tiring, in harmony with what is to be done in all worlds. This is called the insight of practical knowledge of interdependent origination. 
“Great enlightening beings have no attachment to Buddha and do not develop attachments; they have no attachment to the teachings and do not develop attachments; they have no attachment to lands and do not develop attachments; they have no attachments to sentient beings and do not develop attachments. They do not see that there are sentient beings, yet they carry on educational activity, civilizing and teaching ways of liberation; they do not give up the practices of enlightening beings, with great compassion and great commitment. Seeing buddhas and hearing their teachings, they act accordingly; trusting the buddhas, they plant roots of goodness, ceaselessly honoring and serving them. 
They are able to shake infinite worlds in the ten directions by spiritual powers; their minds are broad, being equal to the cosmos. They know various explanations of truth, they know how many sentient beings there are, they know the differences among sentient beings, they know the birth of suffering, they know the extinction of suffering; while knowing all acts are like reflected images, they carry out the deeds of enlightening beings. They sever the root of all subjection to birth. They carry out the practices of enlightening beings for the sole purpose of saving all sentient beings and yet do not practice anything. 
Conforming to the essential nature of all buddhas, they develop a mind like an immense mountain. They know all falsehood and delusion, and enter the door of omniscience. Their knowledge and wisdom are broad and vast and unshakable, due to attain true enlightenment. This is the insight of practical knowledge of equally saving all sentient beings in the ocean of birth and death. 
“These are the ten insights; based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme insight of practical knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of liberation: 
liberation from afflictions; liberation from false views; liberation from all grasping; liberation from mental and physical elements; liberation transcending the two lesser vehicles of individual emancipation; liberation by accepting the nonorigination of things; liberation by freedom from attachment to all worlds, all lands, all beings, and all things; liberation in infinite abodes, liberation rising from the practices of enlightening beings into the stage of nondiscrimination of buddhas; liberation able to know all pasts, presents, and futures in a single moment. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can perform the supreme deeds of buddhas and teach and develop all sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of grove. 
Birth-and-death is a grove for enlightening beings because they do not reject it. 
Teaching sentient beings is a grove for enlightening beings because they do not tire of it. 
Living in all ages is a grove for enlightening beings because they embrace all great deeds. Purifying the world is a grove for enlightening beings because it is where they themselves sojourn. 
All abodes of demons are a grove for enlightening beings because they conquer them all. 
Thinking about the teachings they hear is a grove for enlightening beings because they examine them truthfully. 
The six ways of transcendence, four means of integration, and thirty-seven aids to enlightenment are a grove for enlightening beings because they succeed to the domain of the Buddha. 
The ten powers, four fearlessnesses, eighteen unique qualities, and all other aspects of buddhahood are a grove for enlightening beings because they do not think of anything else. 
Manifesting the autonomous spiritual capacities of all enlightening beings is a grove for enlightening beings because they use great spiritual powers to turn the wheel of teaching unceasingly and civilize sentient beings. 
Instantly showing all sentient beings the attainment of true enlightenment in all places is a grove of enlightening beings because the body of reality pervades all worlds in space. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can achieve the buddhas’ unexcelled peaceful, happy action, free from sorrow and affliction. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of palace. 
The determination for enlightenment is a palace of enlightening beings because they never forget it. 
The blessing and wisdom of virtuous conduct are a palace of enlightening beings because they civilize sentient beings in the realm of desire. 
The meditative concentrations of pure benevolence, compassion, joy, and equanimity are a palace of enlightening beings because they teach the sentient beings in the realm of form. 
Birth in the heaven of pure abodes is a palace of enlightening beings because no afflictions can affect them. 
Birth in the formless realm is a palace of enlightening beings because they enable sentient beings to escape difficult situations. 
Birth in the world of defilement is a palace of enlightening beings because they enable all sentient beings to cut off afflictions. 
Appearing to abide in a mansion with spouse, children, and retinue, is a palace of enlightening beings, because they develop their past associates. 
Appearing to dwell in the rank of ruler, celestial world guardian, Indra, or Brahma is a palace of enlightening beings, in order to tame beings with the mentality of controllers. 
Persisting in all practices of enlightening beings, freely exercising spiritual powers and attaining mastery of them all, is a palace of enlightening beings because they autonomously and skillfuly exercise the knowledge of meditations, liberations, and concentrations. 
The guarantee that all buddhas receive of coronation as a monarch of all knowledge, supremely independent, is a palace of enlightening beings because they abide among the adornments of the ten powers and perform the autonomous deeds of all monarchs of truth. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain coronation by truth and freedom of spiritual powers in all worlds. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of enjoyment. 
They enjoy right mindfulness because their minds are not distracted. 
They enjoy knowledge, distinguishing all things. 
They enjoy visiting all buddhas, listening to the teachings tirelessly. 
They like the buddhas because they fill the ten directions without bound. 
They like enlightening beings because they freely appear in infinite ways for the benefit of sentient beings. 
They enjoy the doors of concentration because in one door of concentration they enter all doors of concentration. 
They enjoy mental command of mnemonic formulae because they hold all the doctrines without forgetting and hand them on to others. 
They enjoy unhindered powers of analysis and elucidation, expounding a single saying inexhaustibly. 
They enjoy attaining true enlightenment, manifesting bodies in infinite ways, attaining true enlightenment for the sake of sentient beings. 
They enjoy turning the wheel of true teaching, destroying all misleading doctrines. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme enjoyment of truth of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of adornment: 
the adornment of power, being indestructible; the adornment of fearlessness, being invincible; the adornment of meaning, explaining untold meanings inexhaustibly; the adornment of doctrines, contemplating and expounding the collection of eighty-four thousand doctrines without forgetting them; the adornment of vows, the universal vows undertaken by all enlightening beings never regressing; the adornment of deeds, cultivating the deeds of Universal Good and gaining emancipation; the adornment of lands, making all lands one land; the adornment of the universal voice, showering the rain of truth throughout all buddha-worlds; the adornment of empowerment, carrying out innumerable deeds in all ages without cease; the adornment of mystic manifestations, showing in the body of one being as many bodies as there are sentient beings, causing all sentient beings to perceive them and seek all-knowledge without regressing. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the adornment of all supreme attributes of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings develop ten kinds of unshakable mind: 
an unshakable mind able to give up all possessions; an unshakable mind pondering and examining all teachings of Buddha; an unshakable mind recollecting and honoring all buddhas; an unshakable mind pledging not to harm living beings; an unshakable mind caring for all sentient beings without choosing between enemies and friends; an unshakable mind ceaselessly seeking all attributes of buddhahood; an unshakable mind carrying out the practice of enlightening beings for untold ages without wearying or regressing; an unshakable mind perfecting well-rooted faith, clear faith, unpolluted faith, pure faith, extremely pure faith, undefiled faith, faith respecting and honoring all buddhas, unregressing faith, inexhaustible faith, indestructible faith, and ecstatic faith; an unshakable mind believing, accepting, and not repudiating the methods of practice of enlightening beings. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme unshakable mind of omniscience. 
“There are ten kinds of profound great determinations that enlightening beings do not abandon: 
they do not abandon the profound great determination to fulfill the enlightenment that all buddhas realize, to edify and civilize all sentient beings, to perpetuate the lineage of buddhas, to associate with all good spiritual friends, to honor all buddhas, to wholeheartedly seek all the virtuous qualities of the Great Vehicle of universal salvation, to cultivate religious practice in the company of all buddhas and maintain pure conduct, to associate with all enlightening beings, to seek the means of applying and preserving all Buddha teachings, and to fulfill all practices and vows of enlightening beings and develop all qualities of buddhahood. 
Based on these, enlightening beings will be able not to abandon all principles of buddhahood. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of contemplation of knowledge: 
contemplation of knowledge of skillfully analyzing and explaining all things, knowing all roots of goodness of past, present, and future, knowing the practices of all enlightening beings, being able to transform freely, knowing the meanings of all doctrines, knowing the powers of all buddhas, knowing all methods of concentration formulae, expounding truth in all worlds, entering all universes, knowing all spaces are inconceivable, and knowing the light of knowledge of all Buddha teachings is unobstructed. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the contemplation of supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of explanation of things: 
they say all things arise from conditions; all things are like magical illusions; all things are free from contradiction; all things are boundless; all things are baseless; all things are indestructible; all things are thus; all things are quiescent; all things are emancipation; all things are one, inherently complete. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can skillfully explain all things. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of purity: 
purity of determination; purity of cutting through doubts; purity of detachment from views; purity of perspective; purity of the quest for omniscience; purity of intellectual powers; purity of fearlessness; purity of living by the knowledge of all enlightening beings; purity of accepting all the guidelines of behavior of enlightening beings; purity of full development of the felicitous characteristics, pure qualities, and all fundamental virtues of unexcelled enlightenment. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme purity of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of definitive mark. 
Great enlightening beings, knowing the suffering of pain, the suffering of disintegration, and the suffering of transitoriness, single-mindedly seek the way of enlightenment; without becoming lazy, they carry out the practices of enlightening beings, unwearied, without fear or apprehension or anxiety; not giving up this great undertaking, seeking omniscience steadfastly, not retreating, ultimately attaining unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment: this is their first definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings, seeing that there are sentient beings who are foolish and deluded to the point of madness, reviling, attacking, and injuring one another by words and weapons, do not abandon the attitude of an enlightening being because of these scenes; they just forbear with tolerance and gentility, concentrate on cultivating the way of enlightenment, abide in the supreme Path, and enter the state of detachment. 
This is their second definitive mark. “When great enlightening beings hear explanation of the most profound teaching of buddhas relating to omniscience, they are able by their own knowledge to deeply believe and accept it, to understand and enter into it. This is their third definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings also think, ‘Having made the profound determination to seek omniscience, I shall become a buddha and attain supreme, complete perfect enlightenment. 
All sentient beings are flowing in the whirl of mundane conditions, suffering immeasurable pains—I should also get them to set their minds on enlightenment, to believe and delight in it, and to cultivate it diligently and steadfastly without regressing. This is their fourth definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings know the knowledge of buddhas is boundless and do not try to assess it in limited terms. 
Enlightening beings, having heard of the boundlessness of buddhas’ knowledge from innumerable buddhas, are able not to make limited assessments. 
Everything written or said in all worlds has limitations and cannot comprehend the knowledge of buddhas. 
This is the fifth definitive mark. “In regard to unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, great enlightening beings have supreme desire, profound desire, vast desire, great desire, complex desire, insuperable desire, unsurpassed desire, steadfast desire, desire that cannot be destroyed by any demons or false teachers or their cohorts, unyielding desire to seek omniscience. Enlightening beings, dwelling in such desire, ultimately never turn back from supreme enlightenment. This is their sixth definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings carry out enlightening actions without concern for their own bodies or lives. No one can discourage or frustrate them, because they proceed with determination toward all-knowledge, because the essence of omniscience is always apparent to them, and because they have the light of knowledge of all buddhas. 
They never give up on the enlightenment of buddhas and never abandon the wise. This is their seventh definitive mark. 
“When great enlightening beings see good men and women aiming for the Great Vehicle of universal enlightenment, they foster the growth of their determination to seek buddhahood, cause them to stabilize all foundations of goodness, to internalize the determination for omniscience, and never to turn back from the quest for supreme enlightenment. This is their eighth definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings cause all sentient beings to achieve an impartial mind, and induce them to cultivate the path of universal knowledge. They explain the truth to sentient beings compassionately and cause them never to turn back on the Path of enlightenment. This is their ninth definitive mark. 
“Great enlightening beings have the same foundations of goodness as all buddhas; they perpetuate the seed of buddhahood and ultimately reach omniscient knowledge. This is their tenth definitive mark. 
“These are the ten definitive marks of enlightening beings; by these they can quickly achieve supreme perfect enlightenment and become endowed with the mark of buddhas’ unexcelled knowledge of all truths. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten illuminations of knowledge: 
the illumination of knowledge of certain attainment of supreme perfect enlightenment; the illumination of knowledge seeing all buddhas; the illumination of knowledge seeing all sentient beings dying in one place and being born in another; the illumination of knowledge understanding the doctrines of all scriptures; the illumination of knowledge developing the determination for enlightenment through association with the wise and accumulation of roots of goodness; the illumination of knowledge showing all buddhas; the illumination of knowledge teaching all sentient beings so they may abide in the state of enlightenment; the illumination of knowledge expounding inconceivable great means of access to truth; the illumination of knowledge skillfully comprehending the spiritual powers of all buddhas; the illumination of knowledge fulfilling all transcendent ways. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the illumination of supreme knowledge of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten peerless states, which no listeners or individual illuminates can equal. 
Though great enlightening beings see absolute truth, they do not grasp it as their realization, because all their vows are not yet fulfilled; this is their first peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings plant all roots of goodness, equal to all realities, yet do not have the slightest attachment to them; this is their second peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings, know they are like phantoms because all things are still and void, yet they have no doubt about the way of buddhahood; this is their third peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings, though free from the false ideas of the world, still are able to focus their attention and carry out the deeds of enlightening beings for innumerable eons, fulfill their great undertakings, and never give rise to a feeling of weariness therein; this is their fourth peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings do not grasp anything, because the essence of all things is void, yet they do not experience nirvana, because the path of omniscience is not yet fulfilled; this is their fifth peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings know that all periods of time are not really periods of time, yet they enumerate periods of time; this is their sixth peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings know nothing creates anything, yet they do not give up making the way in search of buddhahood; this is their seventh peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings know that the realms of desire, form, and formlessness are only mind and that past, present, and future are only mind, yet they know perfectly well that mind has no measure and no bounds; this is their eighth peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings carry out enlightening actions for untold eons for sentient beings one and all, wishing to settle them in the state of omniscience, and yet they never tire or get fed up; this is their ninth peerless state. 
Great enlightening beings, though their cultivation of practice is completely fulfilled, still do not realize enlightenment, because they reflect, ‘What I do is basically for sentient beings, so I should remain in birth-and-death and help them by expedient means, to settle them on the supreme path of enlightenment.’ This is their tenth peerless state. 
Based on these ten peerless states, enlightening beings can attain the peerless state of supremely great knowledge and all qualities of buddhahood. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of indomitable attitude. 
They think, ‘I should conquer all celestial demons and their cohorts.’ This is their first indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘I should destroy all false teachings.’ This is their second indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘I should open sentient beings’ minds and edify them with good words, making them all happy.’ This is their third indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘I should fulfill all transcendent practices throughout the cosmos.’ This is their fourth indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘I should amass all virtues.’ This is their fifth indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘Supreme enlightenment is vast and hard to accomplish; I should cultivate practice to bring it to complete consummation.’ This is their sixth indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘I should teach and tame sentient beings with the supreme teaching and the supreme training.’ This is their seventh indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘All worlds are variously different—I should attain enlightenment there in infinite bodies.’ This is their eighth indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘While I am cultivating the conduct of enlightening beings, if sentient beings should come and ask me for my hands, feet, ears, nose, blood, flesh, bones, marrow, spouse, children, elephant, horse, or royal status, I should be able to give them all up without a single thought of sorrow or regret, doing so only to benefit all sentient beings, not seeking resulting rewards, beginning with great compassion and ending with great kindness.’ This is their ninth indomitable attitude. 
They also think, ‘All in past, present, and future—all buddhas, all Buddha teachings, all sentient beings, all lands, all worlds, all times, all realms of space, all realms of phenomena, all realms of verbal usage, all realms of tranquil nirvana—all these various things I should, by means of instantaneous discernment, know, be aware of, see, realize, cultivate, and detach from, and have no conceptions of them, being detached from conceptions, not having various notions, having no attributes, no object. 
They are neither existent nor nonexistent, not one, not dual. 
I should know all duality by knowledge of nonduality, know all forms by formless knowledge, know all discriminations by nondiscriminatory knowledge, know all differences by knowledge of nondifference, know all distinctions by non-differentiating knowledge, know all worlds by nonworldly knowledge, know all times by timeless knowledge, know all sentient beings by knowledge of nonexistence of sentient beings, know all attachments by unattached knowledge, know all abodes by nonabiding knowledge, know all defilements by undefiled knowledge, know all ends by endless knowledge, appear physically in all worlds by ultimate knowledge of the realm of reality, make untold statements by speechless knowledge, enter absence of intrinsic nature by knowledge of one intrinsic nature, manifest various realms by knowledge of one realm, know all things are inexplicable yet manifest free speech, realize the stage of omniscience, and manifest great spiritual powers and displays in all worlds in order to teach and tame all sentient beings.’ This is their tenth indomitable attitude. 
Based on these ten indomitable attitudes, enlightening beings can attain the supreme quality of indomitability of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of mind outstanding like a mountain. 
They attentively cultivate the means of omniscience; this is the first. 
They always observe that the fundamental nature of all things is empty and ungraspable; this is the second. 
They vow to carry out the acts of enlightening beings over measureless eons and cultivate all pure qualities, and by living according to all good and pure principles, see and know the boundless wisdom of the buddhas; this is the third. 
In quest of all aspects of buddhahood, they serve all wise teachers impartially, without seeking anything else, with no ambition to steal the Teaching; with nothing but respect, they are never willful; they are able to give up everything they have, this is the fourth. 
If anyone reviles and slanders them, beats or wounds them, or even kills them, they can accept it all and do not become disturbed or hostile, and do not give up their universal vow of great compassion—indeed, they continually make it grow even more because they are truly emancipated from all things, have perfected relinquishment, realize the truth of all buddhas, and have mastered forbearance and gentility; this is the fifth. 
Great enlightening beings develop overmastering great virtues—virtue overmastering celestials, virtue overmastering humans, virtue overmastering form, virtue overmastering power, virtue overmastering dependents, virtue overmastering desire, virtue overmastering kingship, virtue overmastering sovereignty, virtue overmastering felicity, virtue overmastering intelligence—yet though they perfect such virtues, they are never attached to them: 
that is, they do not cling to enjoyment, desire, wealth, or followers; they only profoundly delight in truth, go according to truth, live according to truth, start out according to truth, end up according to truth, take truth for their reliance, take truth for their salvation, take truth for their refuge, take truth for their home. 
While great enlightening beings experience all kinds of delights of truth, they always avoid all manias, because in the past they determined to enable all sentient beings to get rid of all manias forever and abide in the realm of buddhas. 
This is their sixth outstanding mind. Great enlightening beings have already practiced the way of enlightening beings diligently for immeasurable eons in quest of unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, yet they still think of themselves as just having set their hearts on enlightenment and carry out the acts of enlightening beings, without fright or fear. Though they are able to attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment in an instant, yet for the sake of sentient beings they carry out enlightening practices ceaselessly for measureless eons. 
This is their seventh outstanding mind. Great enlightening beings know all sentient beings are by nature not harmonious or good and are difficult to harmonize, difficult to liberate, are heedless and ungrateful; therefore, enlightening beings make great vows for their sake, wishing to enable them to attain mental and intellectual freedom and autonomy, to be unhindered in their actions, to give up evil thoughts, and not to afflict others. This is their eighth outstanding mind. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘Nobody makes me aspire to enlightenment, and I do not wait for others to help me cultivate practice. I aspire to enlightenment of my own accord, accumulate the qualities of enlightenment, and am determined to work on my own, traveling the path of enlightening beings forever, and accomplish unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
For this reason I now cultivate the practice of enlightening beings; I should purify my own mind and also purify others’ minds, I should know my own sphere and also know the spheres of others; I should be equal in perspective to the buddhas of all times.’ This is their ninth outstanding mind. 
Great enlightening beings perform this contemplation: 
‘There is not a single thing that cultivates the practice of enlightening beings, not a single thing that fulfills the practice of enlightening beings, not a single thing that teaches and tames all sentient beings, not a single thing that honors all buddhas, not a single thing that has been or will be or is ever attained or explained in complete enlightenment.’ The teacher and the teaching are both ungraspable, yet they do not abandon unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
Because enlightening beings search out all things and find they cannot be grasped—this is how they develop supreme perfect enlightenment. Therefore, although they do not obtain anything, yet they diligently cultivate dominant good actions and pure curative measures, so that their knowledge and wisdom develop fully, growing moment by moment to total repletion. 
They are not frightened by emptiness and do not think, ‘If all things are null, what is the sense of seeking the Path of supreme enlightenment?’ This is their tenth outstanding mind. 
These are enlightening beings’ ten mountainlike outstanding minds directed toward unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, based on which enlightening beings can attain the mountainlike outstanding mind of supremely great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of oceanic knowledge entering into unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
They penetrate all realms of sentient beings—this is their first oceanic knowledge. 
They penetrate all worlds without giving rise to arbitrary discriminations—this is their second oceanic knowledge. 
They know all realms of space are measureless and immaterial, and enter the network of all different worlds in the ten directions—this is their third oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings skillfully penetrate phenomena—they penetrate their fluidity, nonannihilation, noneternity, infinity, nonbirth, nondestruction, and totality, because they know them all—this is their fourth oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings know the roots of goodness accumulated by the buddhas, enlightening beings, listeners, individual illuminates, and all ordinary people, of the past, present, and future, the roots of goodness they have accumulated, do accumulate, and will accumulate, the roots of goodness already accomplished, now being accomplished, and to be accomplished by the buddhas of all times in perfect enlightenment, and the roots of goodness in the teaching and civilizing of all sentient beings by the buddhas of all times—knowing all these, they believe in them, approve of them, aspire to them, and cultivate them tirelessly; this is their fifth oceanic knowledge. 
Moment to moment great enlightening beings enter untold eons of the past and know how many buddhas appeared in each eon, no matter how unspeakably many they were, and know their congregations, their teaching and training methods, the life spans of all the sentient beings, and how long their doctrine lasted—all this they see clearly, in each and every eon. 
They also know if there were sentient beings who planted roots of goodness for enlightenment in ages when there were no buddhas. 
They also know if there are any sentient beings who will get to see buddhas in the future when their roots of goodness ripen. 
In this way they tirelessly examine untold eons of the past. This is their sixth oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings penetrate the ages of the future, examine and distinguish all ages, measureless, boundless, and know what ages will have buddhas and what ages will not, how many buddhas will appear in what ages, what the names of each buddha will be, what worlds they will live in, what the names of those worlds will be, how many sentient beings they will liberate, and how long they will live—they observe in this way throughout the future, knowing all endlessly, tirelessly; this is their seventh oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings enter the present, observe and reflect, and moment after moment see boundless kinds of worlds in the ten directions, each having buddhas who have attained, are attaining, and will attain supreme enlightenment, as they go to the site of enlightenment, sit under the tree of enlightenment, conquer the demons, attain unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, get up and go into the city, ascend to the heavens, expound the subtle truth, turn the great wheel of teaching, manifest spiritual powers, tame sentient beings, and finally hand on the teaching of complete enlightenment, give up their lives, and enter final nirvana; after they have entered nirvana, their teachings are collected to preserve them in the world; the buddhas’ monuments are adorned and honored in various ways. 
The enlightening beings also see the sentient beings in those worlds encounter the buddhas’ teachings, accept and preserve and repeat them, remember and ponder them, and increase in wisdom and understanding. 
They extend such observations throughout the ten directions and have no misunderstandings about the buddhas’ teachings. 
Because great enlightening beings know the buddhas are all like dreams, yet they go to all buddhas and honor them. At such times enlightening beings do not cling to their own bodies, they do not cling to the buddhas, they do not ding to the world, they do not cling to the congregation, they do not cling to the preaching, they do not cling to the age; yet they see the buddhas and hear the teachings, observe the world and enter into all ages tirelessly. 
This is their eighth oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings honor countless buddhas in each age, for untold eons, appearing to die in one place and be born in another; they honor the buddhas, as well as the enlightening beings and disciples in their congregations, with all kinds of transmundane offerings. 
After the buddhas pass away, they honor their relics with unsurpassed offerings and also extensively practice charity, satisfying sentient beings. 
With an inconceivable mind, a mind not seeking reward, with ultimate determination, determination to provide benefit, great enlightening beings, for the sake of supreme complete perfect enlightenment, honor the buddhas, benefit sentient beings, preserve the true teaching, and reveal and expound it, for untold eons. This is their ninth oceanic knowledge. 
Great enlightening beings wholeheartedly seek, from all buddhas, from all enlightening beings, from all teachers of truth, the principles expounded by enlightening beings, the principles studied by enlightening beings, the principles taught by enlightening beings, the principles practiced by enlightening beings, the methods of purification of enlightening beings, the methods of development of enlightening beings, the methods of training of enlightening beings, the methods of equanimity of enlightening beings, the method of emancipation of enlightening beings, and enlightening beings’ methods of total mental command. 
Having obtained these teaching, they absorb and retain them, read and repeat them, analyze and explain them, never tiring of this, causing countless sentient beings to develop an awareness of the Buddha teachings that corresponds to omniscience, to penetrate the characteristics of reality, and to attain nonregression in respect to unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. Enlightening beings continue this way tirelessly for untold eons; this is their tenth oceanic knowledge. 
These are the ten oceanic knowledges by which great enlightening beings enter unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment; based on these, enlightening beings can attain the ocean of supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of jewel-like state in unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
They go to the buddhas in countless worlds, behold them, pay obeisance to them, serve them and honor them with offerings; this is their first jewel-like state. 
They listen to true teaching from inconceivably many buddhas, absorb it and remember it, analyze and ponder it, increasing in awareness and wisdom, carrying this out everywhere; this is their second jewel-like state. 
“They disappear from this land and appear to be born elsewhere, yet have no confusion about the Buddha teaching; this is their third jewel-like state. 
They know how to elicit all principles from one principle and are able to analyze and expalin each of them, because the various meanings of all principles are ultimately all one meaning; this is their fourth jewel-like state. 
“They know how to reject afflictions, how to stop afflictions, how to prevent afflictions, and how to extirpate afflictions; they cultivate the practices of enlightening beings, do not experience absolute truth but ultimately arrive at the further shore of ultimate truth; with expedient skill they learn well what is to be learned and cause their past vows to reach fulfillment, without physical fatigue. This is their fifth jewel-like state. 
“They know that all the objects of mental discriminations of enlightening beings have no location, yet they still say there are various locations; though they have no discrimination and do not create anything, yet because they want to tame all sentient beings they do cultivate practices and do act. This is their sixth jewel-like state. 
They know all things are of one and the same essence, which is no essence, no variety, no infinity, no calculability, no measurability, no form, no characteristics—whether one or many, all are ungraspable: 
yet they know for certain what the norms of buddhas, enlightening beings, individual illuminates, hearers, and ordinary people are, what things are good and what are not good, what is mundane and what is supramundane, what is in error and what is without error, what is contaminated and what is uncontaminated, what is compounded and what is uncompounded. This is their seventh jewel-like state. 
Great enlightening beings find that ‘Buddha’ cannot be grasped, enlightening beings’ cannot be grasped, ‘phenomena’ cannot be grasped, and ‘sentient beings’ cannot be grasped; yet they do not give up the vow to tame sentient beings and enable them to attain true enlightenment. 
Great enlightening beings are skillful observers, and know the mentalities of all sentient beings, and know the perspectives of all sentient beings, and guide them accordingly, so that they can attain nirvana; they practice the deeds of enlightening beings zealously in order to fulfill their vow to enlighten sentient beings. This is their eighth jewel-like state. “Great enlightening beings know that tactful instruction, manifestation of nirvana, and all means of liberating sentient beings are construed by mind and thought, and are not aberrant or false. 
Enlightening beings realize that all things are equal in all times; they do not move from Thusness, yet do not abide in ultimate truth; they do not see that there are any sentient beings who ever have received, will receive, or do receive teaching, and they know in themselves they have nothing to practice, there being nothing at all born or perishing that can be grasped; yet they cause their vows not to be in vain by means of all things. 
“Great enlightening beings hear from countless buddhas predictions of future buddhas, each with different names, living in different ages; they listen to this for untold eons and, having heard, cultivate practice, not startled or frightened, not lost or confused, because they know the knowledge of buddhas is inconceivable, because the predictions of the buddhas have no ambiguity in their words, because of the extraordinary power of their own active commitment, and because they foster perfect enlightenment in all who are capable of being taught, fulfilling all their vows, equal in extent to the cosmos. 
This is their tenth jewel-like state. Based on these ten jewel-like states in unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, enlightening beings attain the jewel of supreme great knowledge and wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings generate ten kinds of adamantine mind of commitment to universal enlightenment. 
They think, ‘All truths are boundless, inexhaustible; I should realize them thoroughly by means of knowledge comprehending past, present, and future.’ This is their first adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“They also think, ‘There are infinite sentient beings even on a point the size of a hairtip, to say nothing of in all universes—I should calm them and liberate them by means of unexcelled nirvana.’ This is their second adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“They also think, ‘The worlds of the ten directions are measureless, boundless, limitless, inexhaustible: I should adorn them all with the finest adornments of the buddha-lands, with all the adornments being truly real.’ This is their third adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“They also think, ‘Sentient beings are measureless, boundless, limitless, inexhaustible: I should dedicate all roots of goodness to them and illumine them with the light of unexcelled knowledge.’ This is their fourth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“They also think, ‘The buddhas are infinite, boundless, unlimited, inexhaustible: I should dedicate the roots of goodness I plant to offer to them, causing those roots of goodness to reach everywhere, with no lack; after that I will attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment.’ This is their fifth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“Seeing all buddhas and hearing their teachings, great enlightening beings become very joyful: not attached to their own bodies or to the bodies of buddhas, they understand the body of a buddha is not real or unreal, not existent or nonexistent, not of a particular nature, not without nature, not material, not immaterial, not form, not formless, not born, not extinct, really without existence yet not destroying existence. Because it cannot be grasped through any nature or characteristic at all. 
This is their sixth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“If anyone should revile or beat enlightening beings, cut off their hands or feet, gouge out their eyes, or even cut off their heads, they are able to bear it all and never become angry or vicious as a result of this. They cultivate the practices of enlightening beings for countless eons, taking care of sentient beings, never abandoning them. 
Because enlightening beings have already observed all things to be nondual, and their minds are undisturbed. 
They can give up their own bodies and endure those pains. This is their seventh adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings also think, ‘The ages of the future are infinite, boundless, limitless, inexhaustible: I should travel the path of enlightening beings throughout those ages in one world, teaching sentient beings, and do the same in all worlds in the space of the cosmos, without fright or fear. 
Because this is the way the path of enlightening beings should be in principle, cultivated for the sake of all sentient beings.’ This is their eighth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings also think, ‘Unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment is based on the mind—if the mind is pure and clear, one can fulfill all roots of goodness and will surely attain freedom in enlightenment. If I wish to attain supreme consummate enlightenment, I can do so at will; if I wish to annihilate all grasping of objects, I can do that too—yet I do not annihilate, because I want to reach the ultimate end of the enlightenment of the buddhas. 
And I also do not immediately realize supreme enlightenment, in order to fulfill my original vow to carry out the practice of enlightening beings through all worlds and enlighten sentient beings.’ This is their ninth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
Great enlightening beings know Buddha is ungraspable, enlightenment is ungraspable, enlightening beings are ungraspable, all things are ungraspable, sentient beings are ungraspable, the mind is ungraspable, action is ungraspable, the past is ungraspable, the future is ungraspable, the present is ungraspable, all worlds are ungraspable, and the created and uncreated are ungraspable: thus enlightening beings dwell in quiescence, profundity, silent extinction, noncontention, speechlessness, non-duality, incomparability, essence, truth, liberation, nirvana, and ultimate reality, yet do not give up any of their great vows, do not give up the will for omniscience, do not give up the deeds of enlightening beings, do not give up teaching sentient beings, do not give up the transcendent ways, do not give up taming sentient beings, do not give up serving buddhas, do not give up explaining truths, do not give up adorning the world. 
Because great enlightening beings have made great vows. Though they comprehend the characteristics of all things, their great kindness and compassion increase, and they cultivate measureless virtues. Their minds do not abandon sentient beings, because while things have no absolute existence, the ignorant do not realize this, so enlightening beings are committed to enlightening them so that they clearly comprehend the nature of things. 
All buddhas rest peacefully in quiescence, yet by great compassion they teach in the world ceaselessly—reflecting on this, enlightening beings do not abandon sentient beings. 
Also, they will not abandon great compassion because they have already developed great commitment and have vowed to certainly benefit all sentient beings, to accumulate all roots of goodness, to persist in appropriate dedication, to develop profound wisdom, to accommodate all sentient beings, to be impartial toward all sentient beings; they speak truthfully, without falsehood, vow to give all sentient beings the supremely great teaching, and vow to perpetuate the lineage of buddhas—as long as all sentient beings are not yet liberated, are not yet enlightened, and have not yet realized buddhahood, the enlightening beings’ great undertaking is not completed and they will not give up great compassion. 
This is their tenth adamantine commitment to universal enlightenment. 
“These are the ten adamantine commitments of enlightening beings to universal enlightenment: 
based on these they can attain the indestructible supreme spiritual knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten great undertakings. 
They think, ‘I should serve and honor all buddhas.’ This is their first great undertaking. 
They also think, ‘After the final extinction of all buddhas, I should adorn monuments of the buddhas, offering all kinds of flowers, garlands, incenses, perfumes, aromatic powders, cloths, parasols, pennants, and banners, and take up and preserve the true teachings of the buddhas.’ This is their third great undertaking. 
They also think, I should teach and tame all sentient beings so that they may realize supreme perfect enlightenment.’ This is their fourth great undertaking. 
They also think, ‘I should adorn all worlds with the supreme adornments of the buddha-lands.’ This is their fifth great undertaking. 
They also think, ‘I should develop great compassion and tirelessly carry out the acts of enlightening beings forever in all worlds for the sake of sentient beings, one and all, so that they may all attain the unsurpassed enlightenment of buddhas.’ This is their sixth great undertaking. 
I should spend inconceivable eons with each and every buddha, honoring them and making offerings.’ This is their seventh great undertaking. 
They also think, ‘After the passing away of the buddhas, I should set up a precious monument for the relics of each one, those monuments to be as high and wide as untold worlds; I should also make effigies of buddhas in the same way, and present all kinds of precious banners and pennants, canopies, fragrances, flowers, and robes for inconceivable eons without a thought of weariness, in order to fulfill the teachings of buddhas, in order to honor the buddhas, in order to edify sentient beings, in order to preserve the true teaching, and in order to reveal and expound the teaching.’ This is their eighth great undertaking. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘By these roots of goodness I should accomplish unexcelled enlightenment, gain entry into the state of all buddhas, and be equal in essence to all buddhas.’ This is their ninth great undertaking. 
Great enlightening beings also think, ‘Once I have attained true awakening, I should expound the truth in all worlds for untold eons, and show inconceivable autonomous spiritual powers, without weariness of body, speech, or mind, and without deviating from the truth, because of being supported by the power of Buddha, because of diligently carrying out great vows for the sake of all sentient beings, because of great benevolence being foremost, because of great compassion being ultimate, because of having arrived at the formless truth, because of abiding by true speech, because of realizing that all things are silent and void, because of realizing that all sentient beings are ungraspable and yet not contradicting the doings of action, because of being the same one substance as the buddhas of past, present, and future, because of pervading the cosmos and space, because of realizing that all things are signless, because of attaining birthlessness and deathlessness, because of embodying all qualities of buddhahood, ceaselessly taming sentient beings and carrying out buddha-work by the power of great vows.’ This is their tenth great undertaking. 
Based on these ten great undertakings, enlightening beings persist in the acts of enlightening beings and are imbued with the supremely great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ultimate great tasks: 
to honor and provide for all buddhas; to be able to save all the sentient beings they think of; to single-mindedly seek all facets of buddhahood; to accumulate all roots of goodness; to contemplate all Buddha teachings; to fulfill all vows; to accomplish all enlightening practices; to serve all genuine teachers; to visit the buddhas in all worlds; and to hear and remember the true teachings of all buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can accomplish the ultimate great task of the knowledge of unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of indestructible faith: 
they have indestructible faith in all buddhas, in all buddhas’ teachings, in all wise and holy mendicants, in all enlightening beings, in all genuine teachers, in all sentient beings, in all great vows of enlightening beings, in all practices of enlightening beings, in honoring and serving all buddhas, in the skillful mystic techniques of enlightening beings, and in teaching and taming all sentient beings. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme indestructible faith of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of receiving the predictions of enlightenment: 
having extremely profound inner understanding; being able to develop the roots of goodness of enlightening beings as appropriate; cultivating extensive great practices; open receiving of the prediction; occult receiving of the prediction; realizing enlightenment by their own minds; accomplishing tolerance; teaching and taming sentient beings; comprehending the number of all ages; and mastery of all practices of enlightening beings. 
By these, enlightening beings can receive the prediction of enlightenment from all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of dedication of roots of goodness, by which they can dedicate all roots of goodness. 
They dedicate their roots of goodness to be the same as the enlightened guides in terms of vows, mind, action, faculties, impartiality, mindfulness, purity, state, fulfillment, and incorruptibility; they dedicate their roots of goodness to develop in this way and none other. 
Based on this, they attain supreme dedication of roots of goodness. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of attainment of wisdom: 
giving freely; deeply understanding all Buddha teachings; entering the boundless knowledge of buddhas; being able to cut off doubts in all dialogues; penetrating the doctrines of the wise; deeply understanding the skillful use of words by the buddhas in all their teachings; deeply understanding how planting a few roots of goodness in the company of buddhas will enable one to fulfill all pure qualities and attain the infinite knowledge of buddhas; accomplishing the inconceivable states of enlightening beings; being able to visit untold buddha-lands in one moment of thought; and awakening to the enlightenment of all buddhas, entering all realms of reality, hearing and holding the teachings expounded by all buddhas, and deeply penetrating the variously arrayed sayings of all buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme realizational knowledge of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of development of a boundlessly vast mind: 
development in the company of all buddhas; observing the realms of all sentient beings; observing all lands, all worlds, all phenomena; observing all things as being like space; observing the extensive great practices of all enlightening beings; correctly remembering all buddhas of past, present, and future; observing the results of innumerable actions; purifying all buddha-lands; entering the great congregations of all buddhas; investigating the subtle pronouncements of all buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the boundlessly vast ocean of knowledge of all Buddha teachings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of hidden treasury: 
they know all things are a treasury producing virtuous practices; they know all things are a treasury of right thought; they know all things are a treasury of illumination of mental control; they know all things are a treasury of intellectual powers and exposition; they know all things are a treasury of inexpressible accurate awareness of truth; they know all buddhas’ autonomous spiritual powers are a treasury of observation of revelations; they know all things are a treasury of skillfully developing impartiality; they know all things are a treasury of constant vision of all buddhas; they know all inconceivable eons are a mine of realization that all exist like illusions; they know all buddhas and enlightening beings are treasuries producing joy and pure faith. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the treasury of truth of supreme knowledge of buddhas, and can tame all sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of rules of behavior: 
they should not slander any enlightening teachings; their faith in the buddhas should be indestructible; they should honor and respect all enlightening beings; they should never give up their friendship with wise people; they should not think of those who seek individual salvation; they should avoid all regression on the Path of enlightening beings; they should not give rise to any malice toward sentient beings; they should cultivate all roots of goodness to perfection; they should be able to conquer all demons; they should fulfill all the ways of transcendence. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme discipline of great knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of control: 
control of life, being able to remain alive for untold eons; control of mind, their intellect being able to enter countless concentrations; control of facilities, being able to array all worlds with infinite embellishments; control of action, being able to experience consequences at any time; control of birth, being able to manifest birth in all worlds; control of understanding, being able to see Buddha filling all worlds; control of will, being able to achieve true awakening in any lands whenever desired; control of spiritual powers, showing all kinds of great mystical displays; control of doctrine, revealing boundless gateways to truth; control of knowledge, in each moment of thought manifesting the ten powers and fearlessnesses of buddhas, attaining true enlightenment. 
Based on these ten controls, enlightening beings can attain mastery of enlightenment, fulfilling the transcendence, knowledge, and spiritual power of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded functions: 
unimpeded functions relating to sentient beings, lands, phenomena and principles, bodies, vows, realms, knowledge, spiritual capacities, miracles, and powers. 
What are their unimpeded functions relating to sentient beings and so on? 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded functions relating to sentient beings: 
knowing that all sentient beings are void of being; knowing that all sentient beings are only upheld by thought; explaining the truth to all sentient beings in a manner appropriate to the time; magically producing the appearance of all realms of sentient beings; placing all sentient beings inside a pore without crowding; showing all sentient beings other worlds; manifesting the bodies of the celestial beings Indra, Brahma, and the world guardians for all sentient beings; manifesting the calm behavior of buddhas’ disciples and individual illuminates for all sentient beings; manifesting the deeds of enlightening beings for all sentient beings; manifesting the buddhas’ physical embellishments, powers of omniscience, and attainment of enlightenment for all beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to lands: 
making all lands one land; fitting all lands in a pore; knowing that the totality of lands is inexhaustible; filling all lands with one body sitting; showing all lands in one body; shaking all lands without frightening the beings there; arraying one land with the adornments of all lands; pervading all lands with one buddha and one congregation, showing sentient beings; showing all sentient beings the infinite differentiations of the network of lands filling the ten directions—all small lands, middle-sized lands, large lands, broad lands, deep lands, upright lands, inverted lands, sideways lands, straight lands. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to phenomena and principles: 
they know that all phenomena are in one phenomenon and one phenomenon is in all phenomena, yet they do not contravene the understanding of sentient beings; they elicit all principles from transcendent wisdom, explain them to others, and enlighten them all; they know all things are beyond words, yet they enable all sentient beings to understand them; they know all things are of one characteristic, yet they can expound infinite characteristics of things; they know all truths are beyond explanation, yet they explain boundless ways of access to truth; they can skillfully operate a pregnant symbol representing all truths, accommodating all things in one principle without contradiction, expounding it for untold eons without exhausting it; including all things in the teaching of enlightenment, they enable all sentient beings to gain understanding; they know all things have no boundaries; they know the ultimate nonobstruction of all things, like a network of illusions, with infinite differentiations, explaining this to sentient beings for infinite eons without exhausting it. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to bodies: 
encompassing the bodies of all sentient beings in one’s own body; merging one’s own body into the bodies of all sentient beings; all buddha-bodies entering one buddha-body; one buddha-body entering all buddha-bodies; encompassing all lands in one’s own body; pervading all things of all times with one body, showing sentient beings; showing boundless bodies in one body entering concentration; in one body showing as many bodies as sentient beings attaining enlightenment; showing the body of one being in the bodies of all beings, showing the bodies of all beings in the body of one being; showing the body of reality in the bodies of all beings, showing the bodies of all beings in the body of reality. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to vows: 
they make the vows of all enlightening beings their own vows; they manifest themselves attaining enlightenment by the power of the vow of attainment of enlightenment of all buddhas; they themselves attain supreme perfect enlightenment in accordance with the sentient beings they are teaching; they never end their great vows, throughout all eons, without bounds; detaching from the body of discriminating consciousness and not clinging to the body of knowledge, they manifest all bodies by free will; they give up their own bodies to fulfill the aspirations of others; they edify all sentient beings without giving up their great vows; they cultivate the deeds of enlightening beings in all ages, yet their great vows never end; they manifest the attainment of true enlightenment in a minute point, pervade all buddha-lands by the power of vowing, and show this to each and every sentient being in untold worlds; they explain a phrase of teaching, throughout all universes, raising great clouds of true teaching, flashing the lightning of liberation, booming the thunder of truth, showering the rain of elixir of immortality, fulfilling all sentient beings by the power of great vows. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded functions relating to realms: 
they abide in the realm of reality without abandoning the realm of sentient beings; they abide in the realm of buddhas without abandoning the realm of demons; they abide in the realm of nirvana without abandoning the realm of birth and death; they enter the realm of omniscience without putting an end to the realm of the nature of enlightening beings; they abide in the realm of tranquillity and calm without abandoning the realm of distraction; they abide in the spacelike realm where there is no coming or going, no conceptualization, no form, no essence, and no verbalization, yet they do not abandon the realm of all sentient beings, conceptual representations; they dwell in the realm of occult powers and liberation, yet without abandoning the realm of specific locations; they enter the realm of ultimate nonexistence of sentient beings, yet do not give up teaching all sentient beings; they dwell in the realm of meditation, liberation, spiritual powers, and higher knowledges, quiet and peaceful, yet they manifest birth in all worlds; they dwell in the realm of realization of true enlightenment adorned by all the deeds of buddhas, yet they manifest the composed, tranquil comportment of the personally liberated and individually illuminated. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to knowledge: 
inexhaustible analytic powers; retention of all mnemonic concentration formulae; ability to know and explain with certainty the faculties of all sentient beings; instantly knowing, by unhindered knowledge, the actions of the minds of all sentient beings; knowing all sentient beings’ inclinations, propensities, habits, and afflictions, and giving them remedies in accordance with their ailments; in a single moment they are able to enter into the ten powers of buddhas; by unimpeded knowledge they are able to know all ages of past, present, and future and the sentient beings therein; moment to moment they manifest the attainment of enlightenment, showing it to sentient beings endlessly; they know the actions of all sentient beings in the thoughts of one sentient being, understand the language of all sentient beings in the words of one sentient being. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function relating to spiritual capacities: 
they show the bodies of all worlds in one body; in the audience of one buddha they hear the teachings spoken in the assemblies of all buddhas; in the mind and thoughts of one sentient being they accomplish inexpressible, unsurpassed enlightenment and open the minds of all sentient beings; with one voice they manifest the different sounds of speech of all worlds and enable sentient beings each to attain understanding; in a single moment they show the various differences in results of actions of all ages of the entire past, causing sentient beings all to know and see; they cause all worlds to be fully adorned; they penetrate all pasts, presents, and futures; they emanate the great light of truth and show the enlightenment of all buddhas and the acts and aspirations of sentient beings; they protect all living beings, saints, individual illuminates, enlightening beings, the ten powers of enlightenment they have, and the roots of goodness of enlightening beings. 
If enlightening beings attain these ten unimpeded functions, they can penetrate all Buddha teachings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded functions of miraculous abilities: 
they place untold worlds in one atom; they manifest all buddha-lands, equal to the cosmos, in a single atom; they place the water of all oceans in one pore and travel throughout the universe, without the sentient beings therein being disturbed; they contain untold worlds within their own bodies and manifest all spiritual powers; they tie up innumerable mountain chains with a single hair and carry them through all worlds, without frightening sentient beings; they make untold ages one age and make one age untold ages, showing therein the differences of formation and disintegration, without scaring sentient beings; in all worlds they show various changes and devastations by floods, conflagrations, and gales, without troubling sentient beings; when such disasters arise, they can safeguard the necessities of life of all sentient beings in all worlds, not letting them be damaged or lost; they can hold inconceivably many worlds in one hand and toss them beyond untold worlds, without exciting fear in the sentient beings; they explain how all lands are the same as space, causing sentient beings all to gain understanding. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of unimpeded function of power: 
unimpeded function of power relating to sentient beings, teaching and taming them without abandoning them; of power relating to lands, manifesting untold adornments and arraying them; of power relating to phenomena, causing all bodies to enter the bodiless; of power relating to eons, cultivating practices unceasingly; of the power of enlightenment, awakening those who are asleep; of the power of action, including all practices of enlightening beings; of the power of buddhas, liberating all sentient beings; teacherless power, spontaneously awakening to all truths; of the power of omniscience, attaining true enlightenment by omniscience; of the power of great compassion, not abandoning sentient beings. 
“These are called the ten unimpeded functions of enlightening beings; for those who attain them, being on the verge of attaining supreme perfect enlightenment or not attaining it is up to them and makes no difference—though they attain enlightenment, they still do not stop carrying out the deeds of enlightening beings. 
Because great enlightening beings vow to enter infinite doors of unimpeded function and manifest them skillfully, as is appropriate. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of versatility: 
they make the body of sentient beings the body of lands, without destroying the body of sentient beings; they make the body of lands the body of sentient beings, without destroying the body of lands; in the body of Buddha they show the body of disciples and self-illumined ones, without diminishing the body of Buddha; in the body of disciples and selfillumined ones they show the body of Buddha, without augmenting the body of disciples and self-illumined ones; in the body of practices of enlightening beings they show the body of attainment of enlightenment, without cutting off the body of practices of enlightening beings; in the body of attainment of enlightenment they manifest cultivation of the body of practices of enlightening beings, without diminishing the body of attainment of enlightenment; they show the body of birth and death in the realm of nirvana, without clinging to birth and death; they show nirvana in the realm of birth and death, yet without finally entering nirvana; they enter into concentration, yet manifest all ordinary action, without relinquishing the correct reception of concentration; in the presence of one buddha they hear and absorb the teaching, not moving physically yet by the power of concentration appearing physically in the audiences of untold buddhas, neither dividing their bodies nor rising from concentration, continuously hearing and absorbing the teachings, in this way moment to moment producing untold concentration-bodies in each concentration-body, going on this way, so that the ages of time may be exhausted but the concentration-bodies of enlightening beings are inexhaustible. 
Based on these ten kinds of versatility, enlightening beings can attain the versatility of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten spheres: 
showing infinite ways of access to the realm of reality so that sentient beings can enter; showing the infinite wonderful arrays of all worlds, so that sentient beings can enter; traveling by projection to the realms of all sentient beings to enlighten them all by appropriate means; producing embodiments of enlightening beings from the body of Buddha, producing embodiment of Buddha from the body of an enlightening being; manifesting the world in the realm of space, manifesting the realm of space in the world; manifesting the realm of nirvana in the realm of birth and death, manifesting the realm of birth and death in the realm of nirvana; producing verbalizations of all Buddha teachings in the language of one sentient being; showing all bodies as one body, one body as all different bodies; filling all universes with one body; in one instant causing all sentient beings to rouse the will for enlightenment, each manifesting infinite bodies attaining enlightenment. 
These are the ten spheres of enlightening beings; if they abide in them, they will attain the supreme sphere of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of power: 
the power of the profound mind, not getting mixed up in worldly feelings; the power of the overmastering profound mind, not giving up the ways of enlightenment; the power of means, consummating whatever they do; the power of knowledge, comprehending the activities of all minds; the power of vows, fulfilling all aspirations; the power of practice, continuing forever; the power of vehicles of liberation, able to produce all vehicles of liberation without abandoning the great universal vehicle; the power of miraculous transformations, showing all pure worlds and all buddhas appearing in the worlds in each pore; the power of enlightenment, inspiring all sentient beings to seek enlightenment and become buddhas, without end; the power of turning the wheel of the teaching, explaining one expression of truth in accord with the faculties, temperaments, and inclinations of all sentient beings. 
Based on these ten powers, enlightening beings can attain the buddhas’ ten powers of omniscience. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of fearlessness. 
They can remember all verbal explanations, and think that even if infinite people should come from all over and ask them about a hundred thousand great principles, they would see nothing difficult to answer about those questions. Because of this their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness, able to answer any question and resolve doubts, without any timidity. This is enlightening beings’ first fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings attain the unimpeded intellectual powers bestowed by Buddha and arrive at the furthest reaches of revelation of the secrets intimated by all speech and writing. They think that even if infinite people should come from the ten directions and ask them about infinite doctrines, they would not see anything difficult to answer about those questions. Because of this their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness. They are able to answer any question and resolve doubts, without any timidity. 
“Great enlightening beings know all things are empty and are without self or anything pertaining to self, without creation or creator, without knower, without life, without soul, without personality, detached from mind, body, sense, and sense experience—they forever leave all views and their minds are like space. 
Therefore their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness. They are firm, stable, and brave, impossible to discourage or break down. This is enlightening beings’ third fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings are protected and sustained by the power of Buddha, they live according to the conduct of buddhas, their action is truthful and never degenerates. They reflect that they do not see any conduct in themselves that would provoke the criticism of others. Therefore their minds become fearless and they teach calmly among the masses. This is enlightening beings’ fourth fearlessness. 
“The physical, verbal, and mental actions of great enlightening beings are all pure, immaculate, harmonious, free from all evils. They reflect that they do not see any physical, verbal, or mental action in them that is blameworthy. Therefore their minds become fearless, and they are able to cause sentient beings to live by the teachings of Buddha. This is enlightening beings’ fifth fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings are always accompanied and guarded by powerful thunderbolt-bearers, celestial rain spirits, demigods, celestial musicians, titans, Indra, Brahma, the world-guardian gods, and so on; and all buddhas watch over them heedfully. They reflect that they do not see that there are any demons, false teachers, or people with set views that can hinder their practice of the path of enlightening beings in any way. Therefore their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness. They become very joyful and carry out the deeds of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have developed the faculty of recollection and are free from forgetfulness, as approved by buddhas. They reflect that they do not see any sign of forgetfulness of the ways of expressing the path of attainment of enlightenment as explained by the buddhas. Therefore they become fearless in mind, absorb and hold all buddhas’ true teachings, and carry out the practices of enlightening beings. This is enlightening beings’ seventh fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings have already attained knowledge and skill in means, and have consummated the powers of enlightening beings. They always strive to edify all sentient beings. 
Their aspiration is always focused on perfect enlightenment, yet because of compassion for sentient beings, to perfect sentient beings, they appear to be born in the polluted world of afflictions, noble, with a full retinue, able to satisfy all their desires at will, leading a pleasant and happy life. Yet they reflect that although they are together with their family and associates, they do not see anything to be attached to to the extent of giving up their cultivation of the ways of enlightening beings, such as meditation, liberations, concentrations, mnemonic spells, and analytic and expository powers. 
Because great enlightening beings are already free in the midst of all things and have reached the Other Shore. 
They cultivate the practices of enlightening beings and vow never to stop. They do not see any object in the world that can disturb the path of the enlightening being. 
Because of this their minds become fearless, and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness. By the power of great vows they manifest birth in all worlds. This is enlightening beings’ eighth fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings never forget the determination for omniscience. 
Riding the Great Vehicle, they carry on the practices of enlightening beings. 
They reflect that they do not see in themselves any sign of needing to gain emancipation by means of the lesser vehicles of individual salvation. Because of this their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the other shore of great fearlessness. While able to demonstrate to all the paths of all vehicles of liberation, they ultimately fulfill the impartial Great Vehicle of universal liberation. This is enlightening beings’ ninth fearlessness. 
“Great enlightening beings perfect all good and pure qualities, are imbued with virtue, fully develop spiritual powers, ultimately abide in the enlightenment of all buddhas, fulfill all practices of enlightening beings, receive from the buddhas the prediction of coronation with omniscience, and still always teach sentient beings, carrying on the path of enlightening beings. 
They reflect that they do not see any sign of even a single sentient being who can be developed to maturity to whom they cannot show the masteries of buddhas in order to develop them. Because of this, their minds become fearless and they ultimately reach the Other Shore of great fearlessness. They do not stop the practices of enlightening beings, do not give up the vows of enlightening beings, and show the sphere of buddhahood to any sentient beings who can learn, in order to teach and liberate them. 
This is enlightening beings’ tenth fearlessness. 
“These are the ten fearlessnesses of enlightening beings; based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme great fearlessness of buddhas without giving up the fearlessness of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten unique qualities. 
Without depending on the teaching of another, they spontaneously practice the six transcendent ways: they always gladly give generously and are not mean; they always keep pure precepts, without transgression; they are full of patience and forbearance, their minds imperturbable; they have great energy, never backsliding; they skillfully enter the various meditations, never distracted; they skillfully cultivate wisdom, getting rid of all wrong views. This is their first unique quality, practicing the six transcendent ways according to the path of transcendence without being taught by another. “Great enlightening beings are well able to take care of all sentient beings: 
that is to say, they practice charity, giving material goods as well as teaching; they are rightly heedful at all times; they are mild of countenance and friendly in speech; their hearts are joyful as they point out what is true; they foster understanding of the enlightenment of buddhas; without aversion they impartially benefit all. This is enlightening beings’ second unique quality, striving to unite sentient beings according to the four integrative methods, without being taught by another. “Great enlightening beings skillfully practice dedication—dedication without seeking resulting rewards, dedication in conformity with enlightenment, dedication unattached to any worldly meditations or trances; dedication to benefiting all sentient beings, dedication to perpetuating the knowledge and wisdom of buddhas. This is enlightening beings’ third unique quality, developing roots of goodness and seeking enlightened knowledge and wisdom without relying on the teaching of another. 
“Great enlightening beings arrive at consummate skill in means; they are always concerned with the welfare of all sentient beings, they do not reject the realm of common ignorance, do not seek individual escape, do not cling to their own happiness. 
They only strive to edify and liberate others; they are able to enter and exit meditations and liberations, and have attained mastery of all concentrations. 
They come and go in birth and death as though roaming through a park, never getting sick of it. 
They may live in the palace of demons or may be celestial beings—they manifest their bodies in all realms of life. 
They may become mendicants in non-Buddhistic groups, yet they always avoid all false views. 
They display all secular literature, incantational arts, writing and mathematics, and even entertaining song and dance, being highly skilled in all of these. They may appear as beautiful women, intelligent and talented, foremost in the world. 
They are able to ask about and to answer about all mundane and transmundane principles, able to ultimately resolve all doubts. 
They also comprehend all mundane and transmundane phenomena to the ultimate degree. 
All sentient beings look up to them. Though they manifest the behavior of mendicants and individual illuminates, still they do not lose the mind of the Great Vehicle. 
Though they show attainment of true enlightenment moment to moment, still they do not stop the practice of enlightening beings. This is their fourth unique quality, the ultimate consummation of skill in means without relying on the teaching of another. “Great enlightening beings know well the path of simultaneous practice of the provisional and the true; their intellect is free, and they reach the other shore. 
That is to say, they abide in nirvana, yet give the appearance of birth and death; they know there are no sentient beings, yet they diligently carry out teaching activities; they are ultimately calm and dispassionate, yet they appear to have afflictions; they abide in the one indestructible mystic reality-body of wisdom, yet they manifest infinite bodies of sentient beings everywhere; they always enter meditative concentration, yet they give the appearance of experiencing sensual pleasure; they are always aloof from the triple world, yet they do not abandon sentient beings; they always enjoy the pleasures of spirituality, yet they appear to have concubines who sing and play; though their bodies are arrayed with a multitude of marks and embellishments of greatness, yet they appear as ugly derelicts; they always accumulate virtues and are free from faults, yet they manifest birth in hells or as animals and hungry ghosts; though they have arrived at the furthest reaches of buddha-knowledge, they do not abandon the body of knowledge of enlightening beings. 
Even saints and solitary illuminates cannot know such infinite knowledge and wisdom developed by great enlightening beings—how much less can infantile sentient beings. 
This is enlightening beings’ fifth unique quality, the simultaneous practice of the provisional and the true without being taught by another. “Great enlightening beings’ physical, verbal, and mental actions are carried out in accord with knowledge and wisdom and are all pure. 
That is to say, they are imbued with great compassion and forever abandon malice; they are imbued with true understanding and have no false views. 
This is enlightening beings’ sixth unique quality, of physical, verbal, and mental action in accord with knowledge and wisdom, without depending on the teaching of another. “Great enlightening beings are full of great compassion and do not abandon sentient beings; they accept suffering in place of all sentient beings—the sufferings of hell, the sufferings of animals, the sufferings of hungry ghosts. 
They do this in order to help, and do not become weary—they are only devoted to liberating all sentient beings. 
They never become addicted to objects of desire. 
They always diligently work to extirpate suffering for sentient beings. This is enlightening beings’ seventh unique quality, always exercising great compassion without depending on the instruction of another. “All beings like to see enlightening beings and never tire of seeing them, because great enlightening beings have for ages been pure in deed, without fault. This is enlightening beings’ eighth unique quality, being a welcome sight to all sentient beings, without depending on the instruction of another. 
“Great enlightening beings’ determination, the adornment of the great commitment to omniscience, is unbending; though they be in dangerous, difficult places, among ordinary people, Buddhist disciples, or self-enlightened people, they never lose the clear, pure, wonderful jewel of the determination for omniscience. 
Just as there is a jewel called pure adornment whose luster does not change when it is put in mire, and which can clarify muddy water, in the same way, great enlightening beings, even though they be in places of confusion and pollution, among fools, they never lose or spoil the pure jewel mind seeking omniscience—they can even cause those evil sentient beings to get rid of erroneous views, afflictions, and defilements, and gain the pure mind-jewel seeking omniscience. 
This is enlightening beings’ ninth unique quality, not losing the precious will for omniscience even though in difficult situations, even without the instruction of another. “Great enlightening beings achieve the knowledge of the realm of self-awakening and become enlightened spontaneously without a teacher. Ultimately free, they arrive at the other shore. The turban of the state of freedom from defilement crowns their heads. 
“These are the ten unique qualities of enlightening beings, based on which they can attain the buddhas’ supreme, grandiose unique qualities. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of activity: 
activity related to all worlds, able to purify them all; activity related to all buddhas, able to provide offerings to them all; activity related to all enlightening beings, planting the same roots of goodness; activity relating to all sentient beings, able to teach and transform them all; activity relating to the future, able to take in the whole future; activity of all spiritual powers, able to reach all worlds without leaving one world; activity of all light, emanating lights of infinite colors, with an enlightening being sitting on a lotus seat appearing in each light beam; activity perpetuating the lineage of the three treasures, preserving and sustaining the buddhas’ teachings after the demise of the buddhas; activity of all miraculous transformations, expounding the truth and teaching the sentient beings in all worlds; activity of all empowerments, instantly appearing to sentient beings according to their mental inclinations, causing all aspirations to be fulfilled. 
Based on these ten kinds of activity enlightening beings can achieve the supremely great activity of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of body: 
the noncoming body, not being born in any world; the nongoing body, impossible to find in any world; the nonreal body, realizing all worlds as they really are; the nonfalse body, showing the world the truth; the inexhaustible body, never being annihilated; the stable body, impossible for demons to destroy; the imperturbable body, impossible for demons and false teachers to disturb; the formal body, manifesting pure marks of virtue; the formless body, the forms of all things being ultimately formless; the omnipresent body, being the same one body as all buddhas of all times. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of physical action: 
filling all worlds with one body; ability to appear before all sentient beings; ability to undertake birth in all states of being; traveling in all worlds; going to the assemblies of all buddhas; ability to cover all worlds with one hand; ability to grind the iron surrounding mountains of all worlds to dust with one hand; manifesting the formation and disintegration of all buddha-lands in one’s own body to show sentient beings; admitting all realms of sentient beings into one body; in one’s own body manifesting all pure buddha-lands, with all sentient beings attaining enlightenment therein. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme action of buddhas and be able to enlighten all sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings also have ten more kinds of body: 
the body of transcendent ways, due to correctly practicing them all; the body of the four integrative methods, due to not abandoning sentient beings; the body of great compassion, due to accepting immeasurable suffering in place of all sentient beings without wearying; the body of great benevolence, due to saving all sentient beings; the body of blessings and virtue, due to benefiting all sentient beings; the body of wisdom, being of the same one nature as the bodies of all buddhas; the body of reality, being forever free from undergoing birth in conditioned states; the body of expedient means, appearing in all places; the body of spiritual powers, manifesting all mystic transformations; the body of enlightenment, achieving true awareness at any time, as desired. 
Based on these, enlightening beings attain the supreme body of wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of speech: 
gentle speech, causing all sentient beings to be calm; sweet elixir speech, causing all sentient beings to be clear and cool; nondeceptive speech, everything they say being true; truthful speech, not lying even in dreams; great speech, being honored by all the gods; profound speech, revealing the essence of things; steadfast speech, expounding truth inexhaustibly; straightforward speech, their statements being easy to understand; various speech, being spoken according to the occasion; speech enlightening all sentient beings, enabling them to understand according to their inclinations. 
Based on these, enlightening beings attain the supreme subtle speech of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of purifying speech: 
joyfully listening to the voice of Buddhas; joyfully listening to explanations of the virtues of enlightening beings; not saying anything unpleasant to sentient beings; truly avoiding all faults of speech; joyfully praising the enlightened; singing the praises of buddhas aloud at the monuments of deceased buddhas; giving teachings to sentient beings with a profound, pure mind; praising Buddha with music and song; listening to the true Teaching without worrying about one’s body or life; giving oneself up to serve all enlightening beings and teachers of truth, and receiving the sublime teaching from them. 
“Based on these ten things which purify speech, great enlightening beings gain ten kinds of protection: 
they are protected by all celestial beings, by all nagas, all yakshas, all gandharvas, all titans, all garudas, all kinnaras, all maharagas, all Brahmas, and all teachers of truth, beginning with the buddhas. 
“Having received this protection, great enlightening beings are able to accomplish ten great works: 
gladdening all sentient beings; going to all worlds; knowing all faculties; purifying all devotions; exterminating all afflictions; getting rid of all habit energy; purifying all inclinations; increasing all profound determinations; causing all to pervade all universes; causing all nirvanas to be clearly seen. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of mind: 
a mind like the earth, able to hold the roots of goodness of all sentient beings and make them grow; a mind like the ocean, with the water of truth of infinite great knowledge of all buddhas all flowing into it; a mind like the polar mountain, placing all sentient beings on the supreme transmundane foundations of goodness; a mind like the finest jewel, their desires being pure and unpolluted; a mind like diamond, deeply penetrating all truths with certainty; a mind like the adamantine world-surrounding mountains, being invulnerable to disturbance by any demons or false teachers; a mind like a lotus blossom, which worldly things cannot affect; a mind like an udumbara flower, difficult to encounter through all time; a mind like the clear sun, destroying the darkness; a mind like space, being immeasurable. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme pure mind of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten determinations: 
to liberate all beings; to cause all beings to get rid of their afflictions; to cause all sentient beings to extinguish their habit energies; to eliminate all doubts; to remove all sentient beings’s miseries; to extirpate the difficulties of the states of woe; to respectfully follow all buddhas; to study what all enlightening beings should learn; to show the enlightenment of all buddhas at each point in all worlds; to beat the drum of the highest teaching in all worlds, to cause all sentient beings to gain understanding in accord with their faculties and inclinations. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain buddhas’ mind of great determination and competence. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of comprehensive mind: 
a mind comprehending all spaces, their intentions far-reaching; a mind comprehending all realms of reality, deeply penetrating infinity; a mind comprehending all past, present, and future, knowing them all in a single thought; a mind comprehending the manifestation of all buddhas, clearly understanding their entry into the womb, birth, leaving home, attainment of enlightenment, teaching activity, and ultimate nirvana; a mind comprehending all sentient beings, knowing their faculties, inclinations, and habit energies; a mind comprehending all knowledge, knowing the realms of reality everywhere; a mind comprehending all infinities, knowing the differentiations of the networks of illusions; a mind comprehending all nonorigination, not apprehending any intrinsic nature in any thing; a mind comprehending all nonobstruction, not dwelling on the mind of self or the mind of other; a mind comprehending all freedoms, manifesting realization of buddhahood everywhere in a single instant. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the comprehensive adornments of supreme buddhahood. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of faculties: 
joyful faculties, seeing all buddhas, with faith indestructible; hopeful faculties, understanding whatever Buddha teachings they hear; nonregressing faculties, consummating all their tasks; steadfast faculties, not stopping the practices of enlightening beings; subtle faculties, entering the subtle principle of transcendent wisdom; unceasing faculties, consummating the tasks of all sentient beings; adamantine faculties, realizing the nature of all things; indestructible glowing faculties, illumining all spheres of buddhahood; undifferentiated faculties, being the same one body as all buddhas; unobstructed faculties, deeply penetrating the ten powers of the enlightened. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme faculties of fulfillment of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of profound mind: 
a profound mind not stained by any worldly things; a profound mind not alloyed with the ways of the lesser vehicles of individual salvation; a profound mind comprehending the enlightenment of all buddhas of past, present, and future; a profound mind following the path of omniscience; a profound mind unmoved by any demons or heretics; a profound mind clarifying the comprehensive knowledge of all enlightened ones; a profound mind accepting and holding all truths heard; a profound mind not clinging to any state of life; a profound mind imbued with all subtle knowledge; a profound mind cultivating all qualities of buddhahood. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme, pure, profound mind of omniscience. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of intense profound mind: 
an intense profound mind not backsliding, because they accumulate all roots of goodness; an intense, profound mind removing doubt, because they understand the esoteric sayings of all buddhas; an intense profound mind holding truth, being born by great vows and great deeds; a supremely intense profound mind, deeply penetrating all Buddha teachings; a masterful intense profound mind, mastering all Buddha teachings; a vast intense profound mind, entering into various ways of access to truth; a leading intense profound mind, accomplishing all tasks; a free intense profound mind, adorned by all concentrations, spiritual powers, and mystical transformations; an abiding intense profound mind, embracing their past vows; an unceasing intense profound mind, developing all sentient beings to maturity. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supremely pure intense profound mind of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of diligent practice: 
diligent practice of giving, relinquishing all without seeking reward; diligent practice of self-control, practicing austerities, having few desires, and being content; diligent practice of forbearance, detaching from notions of self and other, tolerating all evils without anger or malice; diligent practice of vigor, their thoughts, words, and deeds never confused, not regressing in what they do, reaching the ultimate end; diligent practice of meditations, liberations, and concentrations, discovering spiritual powers, leaving behind all desires, afflictions, contention, and their congeners; diligent practice of wisdom, tirelessly cultivating and accumulating virtues; diligent practice of great benevolence, knowing that all sentient beings have no nature of their own; diligent practice of great compassion, knowing that all things are empty, accepting suffering in place of all sentient beings without wearying; diligent practice to awaken the ten powers of enlightenment, realizing them without obstruction, manifesting them for sentient beings; diligent practice of the nonreceding wheel of teaching, proceeding to reach all sentient beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme practice of great knowledge and wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of certain understanding: 
certain understanding of the supreme, planting roots of goodness of respect; certain understanding of adornment, producing various adornments; certain understanding of breadth and magnanimity, their minds never narrow or mean; certain understanding of quiescence, able to penetrate the most profound essence of things; certain understanding of universality, their determination for enlightenment extending everywhere; certain understanding of capacity, able to receive the support of the power of Buddha; certain understanding of strength, able to crush all demon activities; certain understanding of clear decision, knowing the consequences of all actions; certain understanding of presence, able to manifest spiritual powers at will; certain understanding of succession, receiving the prediction of buddhahood from all buddhas; certain understanding of freedom, attaining buddhahood at will at any time. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme certain understanding of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of definitive understanding of worlds: 
they know all worlds penetrate one world; they know one world penetrates all worlds; they know the body and lotus throne of one buddha pervades all worlds; they know all worlds are like space; they know all worlds are endowed with the adornments of buddhas; they know all worlds are filled with enlightening beings; they know all worlds enter one pore; they know all worlds enter the body of a single sentient being; they know the enlightenment tree and site of enlightenment of one buddha pervade all worlds; they know all worlds are pervaded by one message that allows sentient beings to hear it differently, to their delight. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain buddhas’ supreme great understanding of buddha-lands. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of certain understanding of the realm of sentient beings: 
they know that all realms of sentient beings essentially have no reality; they know that all realms of sentient beings enter the body of one sentient being; they know that all realms of sentient beings enter the body of an enlightening being; they know that all realms of sentient beings enter the matrix of enlightenment; they know the body of one sentient being enters all realms of sentient beings; they know that all realms of sentient beings can be vessels of the buddhas’ teachings; they know all realms of sentient beings and manifest the bodies of celestial beings for them according to their desires; they know all realms of sentient beings and manifest the tranquil, composed behavior of saints and individual illuminates for them, according to their inclinations; they know all realms of sentient beings and manifest to them the bodies of enlightening beings adorned with virtues; they know all realms of sentient beings and show them the marks and embellishments and the tranquil comportment of buddhas, and enlighten sentient beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely powerful certain understanding of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of habit energy: 
the habit energy of determination for enlightenment; the habit energy of roots of goodness; the habit energy of edifying sentient beings; the habit energy of seeing Buddha; the habit energy of undertaking birth in pure worlds; the habit energy of enlightening practice; the habit energy of vows; the habit energy of transcendence; the habit energy of meditation on equality; the habit energy of various differentiations of state. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can forever get rid of all afflictive habit energies and attain buddhas’ habit energy of great knowledge, the knowledge that is not energized by habit. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of grasping, by which they perpetuate the practices of enlightening beings: 
they grasp all realms of sentient beings, to ultimately enlighten them; they grasp all worlds, to ultimately purify them; they grasp Buddha, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings as offerings; they grasp roots of goodness, accumulating the virtues that mark and embellish the buddhas; they grasp great compassion, to extinguish the pains of all sentient beings; they grasp great benevolence, to bestow on all beings the happiness of omniscience; they grasp the transcendent ways, to accumulate the adornments of enlightening beings; they grasp skill in means, to demonstrate them everywhere; they grasp enlightenment, to attain unobstructed knowledge; in sum, enlightening beings grasp all things, to comprehend them everywhere with clear knowledge. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can perpetuate the practices of enlightening beings and attain the buddhas’ supreme state of not grasping anything. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of cultivation: 
they cultivate the ways of transcendence, learning, wisdom, purpose, righteousness, emancipation, manifestation, diligence, accomplishment of true awakening, and operation of right teaching. 
Based on these, enlightening beings achieve supreme cultivation and practice all truths. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of fulfillment of the Buddha teachings: 
not leaving wise associates; deeply believing in the words of buddhas; not repudiating truth; dedicating unlimited roots of goodness; focusing on the infinity of the sphere of Buddha; knowing the realms of all worlds; not abandoning the realm of cosmic reality; avoiding all realms of demons; correctly recollecting the realm of all buddhas; seeking the realm of the ten powers of buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can achieve the supreme great wisdom of buddhas. 
“There are ten things that cause enlightening beings to regress from the Buddha teachings, which they should avoid: 
slighting the wise; fearing the pains of birth and death; getting tired of practicing the acts of enlightening beings; not caring to remain in the world; addiction to concentration; clinging to roots of goodness; liking the ways of individual liberation; having aversion to enlightening beings. 
If enlightening beings avoid these ten things, they will enter the enlightening beings’ paths of emancipation. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten paths of emancipation: 
evoking transcendent wisdom, yet always observing all sentient beings; detaching from all views, yet liberating all sentient beings bound by views; not minding any appearances, yet not abandoning sentient beings attached to appearances; transcending the triple world, yet always being in all worlds; forever leaving afflictions, yet living together with all sentient beings; attaining desirelessness, yet always most compassionately pitying all sentient beings attached to desires; always enjoying tranquillity and serenity, yet always appearing to be in company; being free from birth in the world, yet dying in one place and being reborn in another, carrying on the activities of enlightening beings; not being affected by any worldly things, yet not stopping work in the world; actually realizing full enlightenment, yet not abandoning the vows and practices of enlightening beings. 
These are enlightening beings’ ten ways of emancipation, which are not common to worldlings, and also are not alloyed with the practices of the two vehicles of individual liberation; if enlightening beings live by these principles, they will attain the qualities of certainty of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten qualities of certainty: 
they are certainly born in the family of buddhas; they certainly live in the realm of buddhas; they certainly know the tasks of enlightening beings; they certainly persist in the transcendent ways; they certainly get to join the assemblies of buddhas; they certainly can reveal the nature of buddhahood; they certainly abide in the powers of the enlightened; they certainly enter the enlightenment of buddhas; they certainly are one and the same body as all buddhas; their abode is certainly none other than that of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of generating the qualities of buddhahood: 
following good friends is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because they plant roots of goodness together; profound devotion is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because they know the masteries of buddhas; making great vows is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because their minds become broad; recognizing their own roots of goodness is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because they know their action is not wrong; tirelessly cultivating practice in all ages is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because it comprehends the future; appearing in countless worlds is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, by maturing sentient beings; not stopping the practices of enlightening beings is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, by increasing great compassion; infinite awareness is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, by pervading all of space in a single moment of thought; excellent action is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, because what has been put into practice is not lost; the potential of enlightenment is a way of generating qualities of buddhahood, causing all sentient beings to gladly set their minds on enlightenment and sustain this will by all virtues. 
Based on these, enlightening beings gain ten appellations of greatness. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten appellations of greatness: 
they are called beings of enlightenment because they are born of knowledge of enlightenment; they are called great beings because they dwell in the Great Vehicle; they are called foremost beings because they realize the foremost truth; they are called superior beings because they are aware of higher laws; they are called supreme beings because their knowledge is supreme; they are called exalted beings because they reveal the unexcelled teaching; they are called beings of power because they have extensive knowledge of the ten powers; they are called incomparable beings because they have no peer in the world; they are called inconceivable beings because they become buddhas in an instant. 
If enlightening beings win these appellations, they accomplish the paths of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of path. 
One path is a path of enlightening beings because they do not give up the sole determination for enlightenment. 
Two paths are a path of enlightening beings because they develop wisdom and skill in means. 
Three paths are a path of enlightening beings because they practice emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness, and are not attached to the three worlds. 
Four practices are a path of enlightening beings: ceaselessly removing the barriers of wrongdoing by repentance, rejoicing in virtue, honoring the enlightened and requesting them to teach, and skillfully practicing dedication. 
The five faculties are a path of enlightening beings: they rest on pure faith, steadfast and imperturbable; they generate great energy, finishing their tasks; they are single-minded in right recollection, without wandering attention; they know the techniques for entering and emerging from concentration; they are able to distinguish spheres of knowledge. 
The six psychic powers are a path of enlightening beings: 
with the celestial eye they see all forms in all worlds and know where sentient beings die and are born; with the celestial ear they hear all buddhas teaching, absorb and remember their teachings, and expound them widely to sentient beings according to their faculties; with telepathic knowledge they are able to know the minds of others freely, without interference; with recollection of past life they are able to remember all ages of the past and increase roots of goodness; with the power of psychic travel they are able to appear variously to beings capable of being enlightened, to induce them to delight in truth; with knowledge of extinction of contamination they actually realize the ultimate truth, while carrying out the deeds of enlightening beings without cease. 
Seven remembrances are a path of enlightening beings: 
they remember buddhas because they see infinite buddhas in a single pore opening the minds of all sentient beings; they remember the Teaching because they do not leave the assemblies of all buddhas—they personally receive the sublime Teaching in the assemblies of all buddhas and expound it to sentient beings according to their faculties, temperaments, and inclinations, to enlighten them; they remember the harmonious Community because they continually see enlightening beings in all worlds; they remember relinquishment because they know all enlightening beings’ practices of relinquishment increase magnanimous generosity; they remember the precepts because they do not give up the aspiration for enlightenment, and dedicate all roots of goodness to sentient beings; they remember heaven because they always keep in mind the enlightening beings in the heaven of happiness who are to become buddhas in the next lifetime; they remember sentient beings because they teach and tame them with wisdom and skill in means, reaching them all, without interruption. 
Following the holy Eightfold Path to enlightenment is a path of enlightening beings: 
they travel the path of right insight, getting rid of all false views; they exercise right thought, abandoning arbitrary conceptions, their mind always following universal knowledge; they always practice right speech, getting rid of faults of speech and following the words of sages; they always cultivate right action, teaching sentient beings to make them peaceful and harmonious; they abide by right livelihood, being frugal and content, careful and correct in behavior, eating, dressing, sleeping, eliminating evil, and practicing good, all in accord with enlightenment, forever getting rid of all faults; they arouse right energy, diligently cultivating all the difficult practices of enlightening beings, entering the ten powers of buddhas without hindrance; their minds always recollect correctly, able to remember all messages, eliminating all mundane distraction; their minds are always correctly concentrated, they enter the door of inconceivable liberation of enlightening beings, and in one concentration they produce all concentrations. 
Entering the nine successive concentrations is a path of enlightening beings: 
they detach from craving and ill-will, and expound the truth without inhibition in all they say; they extinguish thought and reflection, yet teach sentient beings with the thought and reflection of omniscience; they give up joy and emotion, yet they are most joyful when they see all buddhas; they give up worldly enjoyments and follow the transcendent enjoyment of the Path of enlightening beings; henceforth they are unshakable and enter formless concentration, yet without abandoning life in the realms of desire and form; though they abide in concentration in which all perception and sensation are extinguished, they do not stop the activity of enlightening beings. 
Learning the ten powers is a path of enlightening beings: 
knowledge of what is so and what is not so; knowledge of the causes and effects, deeds and consequences, past, future, and present, of all sentient beings; knowledge of the differences in faculties of all sentient beings and explaining the truth to them as is appropriate; knowledge of the infinite different natures of sentient beings; knowledge of the differences in weak, middling, and superior understanding of all sentient beings, and means of introducing them to truth; knowledge of manifesting the appearance and conduct of Buddha throughout all worlds, all lands, all times, all ages, without abandoning the practices of enlightening beings; knowledge of all meditations, liberations, and concentrations, whether defiled or pure, timely or not, expediently producing doors of liberation for enlightening beings; knowledge of distinctions in all sentient beings’ death in one place and birth in another in the various states of existence; instantaneous knowledge of all ages in past, present, and future; knowledge of extinction of all sentient beings’ desires, compulsions, delusions, and habits, without abandoning the practices of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten paths, enlightening beings can attain the path of unexcelled skill in means of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have infinite paths, infinite aids to enlightenment, infinite ways of cultivation, and infinite ways of adornment. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of infinite path: 
because space is infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the cosmos is infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the realms of sentient beings are infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the worlds are infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because time is infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the languages of all sentient beings are infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the embodiments of Buddha are infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the utterances of Buddha are infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because the power of Buddha is infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings; because omniscience is infinite, so are the paths of enlightening beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of infinite aids to enlightenment: 
as space is infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment; as the cosmos is infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment; as the realms of sentient beings are infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment; as worlds are infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment; as the number of eons can never be fully told, so too all worldlings cannot fully tell of enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment; as the languages of sentient beings are infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment, producing knowledge to comprehend ways of speaking; as the embodiment of Buddha is infinite, so is enlightening beings’ development of aids to enlightenment, extending to all sentient beings, all lands, all worlds, and all times; as the utterances of Buddha are infinite, enlightening beings utter one word pervading the cosmos, heard by all sentient beings, so the aids to enlightenment they develop also are infinite; as the power of Buddha is infinite, the aids to enlightenment accumulated by enlightening beings through the power of Buddha are infinite too. 
Based on these factors, enlightening beings can attain the infinite knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of infinite ways of cultivation: 
cultivation without coming or going, because their physical, verbal, and mental doings have no action; neither existent nor nonexistent cultivation, there being no inherent nature; cultivation without increase or decrease, being in accord with fundamental essence; cultivation like an illusion, a dream, a shadow, an echo, an image in a mirror, a mirage in the heat, the moon’s image in the water, being free from all clinging; empty, signless, wishless, nondoing cultivation, clearly seeing the triple world yet ceaselessly accumulating virtues; inexplicable, inexpressible cultivation beyond speech, apart from all definitions and constructions; cultivation of the indestructible realm of reality, directly knowing all phenomena; cultivation of the ultimate reality of True Thusness, entering the space of ultimate reality of True Thusness; cultivation of vast wisdom, the power of their deeds being inexhaustible; equal cultivation of the ten powers, four fearlessnesses, and omniscience of buddhas, directly seeing all things without doubt or confusion. 
Based on these ten elements, enlightening beings can accomplish the supremely skillful cultivation of omniscience of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of way of adornment. 
Without leaving the realm of desire, they enter the meditations, liberations, and trances of the realm of form and formlessness, yet they are not thereby born in those realms. This is their first way of adornment. 
Their knowledge appears to enter the path of personally liberated saints, yet they do not take emancipation by this route; this is their second way of adornment. 
Their knowledge appears to enter the path of individual illumination, yet they do not cease to generate great compassion; this is their third way of adornment. 
Though they have human and celestial retinues surrounding them, hundreds and thousands of concubines and troupes of singers and dancers, they never for a moment leave meditation, liberation, and concentration; this is their fourth way of adornment. 
They take part in amusements and experience pleasure and happiness with all sentient beings, but they never for a moment leave the concentration of equanimity of enlightening beings; this is their fifth way of adornment. 
They have already transcended all worlds and have no attachments to anything, yet they do not abandon efforts to liberate sentient beings; this is their sixth way of adornment. 
They live by the right path, right knowledge, and right insight, yet they can appear to enter false paths, without taking them to be true or pure, to cause the sentient beings involved in them to abandon false principles; this is their seventh way of adornment. 
They always maintain the Buddha’s pure precepts, and their thoughts, words, and deeds are faultless, but because they want to edify immoral sentient beings, they appear to perform the acts of ordinary ignorant people; though they are already filled with pure virtues and abide in the course of enlightening beings, yet they appear to live in such realms as hells, animality, ghosthood, and in difficulty and poverty, in order to enable the beings therein to gain liberation—really the enlightening beings are not born in those states; this is their eighth way of adornment. 
Without being taught by another, they attain unhindered intellect and the light of knowledge, are able to illumine and understand all Buddha teachings, are sustained by the spiritual power of all buddhas, are one and the same body of reality with all buddhas, accomplish all incorruptible mystic states of clarity and purity of great people, abide in all equal vehicles of liberation, are aware of all spheres of buddhahood, are endowed with the light of all worldly knowledge, and clearly see all realms of sentient beings; they are able to be truth-knowing teachers for sentient beings, yet they make the appearance of ceaseless search for truth; though they actually are unexcelled teachers of sentient beings, they show respect to preceptors and religious mentors, because great enlightening beings, by skillful expedients, abide in the path of enlightening beings yet manifest whatever is necessary; this is their ninth way of adornment. 
Their roots of goodness are sufficient, their practices are completed; they are coronated by all buddhas together and reach the furthest extent of mastery of all the teachings, their heads crowned with the turban of the state of nonobstruction. 
Their bodies reach all worlds and everywhere they show the body of Buddha that has no resistance. Masters of the teachings, they attain supreme fulfillment and turn the unimpeded pure wheel of teaching. 
They have already accomplished all manner of freedom of enlightening beings, but for the sake of sentient beings they appear to be born in all lands. 
They are in the same realm as all buddhas, yet they do not abandon the practices of enlightening beings, do not give up the principles of enlightening beings, do not neglect the works of enlightening beings, do not leave the path of enlightening beings, do not slacken the conduct of enlightening beings, do not cut off the graspings of enlightening beings, do not cease the skillful methods of enlightening beings, do not stop doing the tasks of enlightening beings, do not tire of the developmental activities of enlightening beings, do not put an end to the sustaining power of enlightening beings. 
Because enlightening beings want to quickly realize unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment, so they examine the ways of access to omniscience and cultivate the practices of enlightening beings unceasingly. This is their tenth way of adornment. 
Based on these principles enlightening beings can attain the supreme way of great adornment of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of feet: 
the feet of discipline, fulfilling all higher aspirations; the feet of energy, assembling all elements of enlightenment without regressing; the feet of spiritual knowledge, gladdening all sentient beings according to their desires; the feet of psychic powers, going to all buddha-lands without leaving one buddha-land; the feet of determination, seeking all higher laws; the feet of resolute commitment, fulfilling all their tasks; the feet of accord, not opposing the teachings of all the honorable; the feet of delight in truth, tirelessly hearing and holding all teachings spoken by buddhas; the feet of rain of teaching, lecturing to the masses without timidity; the feet of cultivation, getting rid of all evils. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the supreme feet of buddhas, which can reach all worlds in one step. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of hands: 
hands of deep faith, wholeheartedly accepting and ultimately taking up the teaching of buddhas; hands of giving, satisfying all those who seek, according to their desires; hands of initiating greetings, extending their right palm to welcome and lead; hands of honoring buddhas, tirelessly gathering blessings and virtues; hands of learning and skillfulness, cutting off the doubts of all sentient beings; hands of fostering transcendence of the triple world, extending them to sentient beings and extricating them from the mire of craving; hands of settlement on the Other Shore, saving drowning sentient beings from the four torrents; hands of generosity with right teaching, revealing all sublime principles; hands of skillful use of philosophies, quelling diseases of body and mind with the medicine of knowledge and wisdom; hands always holding jewels of knowledge, unfolding the light of truth to obliterate the darkness of afflictions. 
based on these, enlightening beings can acquire the supreme hands of buddhas covering all worlds in the ten directions. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of guts: 
guts free from deception, their hearts being pure; guts free from falsehood, being honest by nature; nonprevaricating guts, having no crookedness; nonswindling guts, having no greed for anything; guts cutting off afflictions, being full of wisdom; pure-minded guts, being free from all evils; guts examining food and drink, remembering reality; guts observing noncreation, being aware of interdependent origination; guts aware of all ways of emancipation, fully developing the will; guts rid of the defilement of all extreme views, enabling all sentient beings to enter into the guts of Buddha. 
These are the ten; based on these, enlightening beings can acquire the supreme, vast guts of buddhas, able to contain all sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of internal organs. 
Perpetuating the seed of buddhas is an organ of enlightening beings, manifesting the immeasurable spiritual power of the Buddha teaching. 
Causing the seed of the Teaching to grow is an organ of enlightening beings, generating the immense light of knowledge. 
Preserving the seed of the spiritual community is an organ of enlightening beings, enabling them to gain access to the irreversible wheel of teaching. 
Awakening those who are rightly stabilized is an organ of enlightening beings, instantly adapting to the time. 
Fully developing unstable sentient beings is an organ of enlightening beings, producing continuity of causal basis. 
Conceiving compassion for wrongly stabilized sentient beings is an organ of enlightening beings, causing thorough development of causal basis for the future. 
Fulfilling the indestructible bases of the ten powers of buddhas is an organ of enlightening beings, with unopposable roots of goodness that conquer the armies of demons. 
The supremely fearless lion’s roar is an organ of enlightening beings, gladdening all sentient beings. 
Attaining the eighteen unique qualities of buddhas is an organ of enlightening beings, with knowledge penetrating everywhere. 
Knowing all sentient beings, all lands, all things, and all buddhas is an organ of enlightening beings, clearly seeing all in a single instant. 
These are the ten; based on these, enlightening beings can attain the indestructible internal organs of great knowledge with supreme virtues of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of heart: 
a heart of diligence, fulfilling all tasks; a heart of perseverance, accumulating embellishing virtuous practices; a heart of great courage and strength, crushing all armies of demons; a heart acting according to truth, extinguishing all afflictions; a heart of nonregression, never ceasing until enlightenment is reached; a heart of inherent purity, knowing the mind is immovable, not having any attachments; a heart of knowledge of sentient beings, adapting to their understandings and inclinations to emancipate them; a heart of great kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity, leading into the way of enlightenment, knowing the various understandings and inclinations of sentient beings, and saving them without using separate paths; a heart of emptiness, signlessness, wishlessness, and nonfabrication, seeing the characteristics of the triple world without grasping them; a heart adorned with an indestructible supreme treasury of marks of felicity, thoroughly invulnerable to all demons. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme heart of the treasury of light of great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of armor: 
they wear the armor of great benevolence, rescuing all sentient beings; they wear the armor of great compassion, enduring all suffering; they wear the armor of great commitment, fulfilling all their tasks; they wear the armor of dedication, constructing the adornments of all buddhas; they wear the armor of virtue, benefiting all sentient beings; they wear the armor of the ways of transcendence, liberating all conscious beings; they wear the armor of wisdom, destroying the darkness of affliction of all sentient beings; they wear the armor of skill in means, generating universal roots of goodness; they wear the armor of the firm stability and freedom from distraction of the mind of universal knowledge, not enjoying other vehicles; they wear the armor of single-minded certainty, free from doubts and confusion in regard to all things. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can wear the supreme armor of buddhas and crush all demon armies. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of weapon: 
giving is a weapon of enlightening beings, destroying all stinginess; self-control is a weapon of enlightening beings, getting rid of all crime; impartiality is a weapon of enlightening beings, removing all discrimination; wisdom is a weapon of enlightening beings, dissolving all afflictions; right livelihood is a weapon of enlightening beings, leading away from all wrong livelihood; skill in means is a weapon of enlightening beings, manifesting in all places; in general, all afflictions such as desire, wrath, and folly are weapons of enlightening beings because they liberate sentient beings through afflictions; birth-and-death is a weapon of enlightening beings because they continue enlightening practices and teach sentient beings; teaching the truth is a weapon of enlightening beings, able to break up all clinging; all knowledge is a weapon of enlightening beings because they do not give up the avenues of practice of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can annihilate the afflictions, bondage, and compulsions accumulated by all sentient beings in the long night of ignorance. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of head: 
the head of nirvana, as no one can see the top; the head of honor, respected by all humans and celestials; the head of universal higher understanding, being supreme in the universe; the head of foremost roots of goodness, honored by the sentient beings of the three worlds; the head bearing sentient beings, developing an indestructible crown; the head of not despising others, in all places always respectful; the head of transcendent wisdom, nurturing all virtuous qualities; the head of union of knowledge and skill in means, everywhere appearing in compatible forms; the head of teaching all sentient beings, taking all sentient beings as disciples; the head of preservation of the eye of reality of buddhas, able to perpetuate the seeds of the three treasures. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme head of knowledge and wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of eye: 
the flesh eye, seeing all forms; the celestial eye, seeing the minds of all sentient beings; the wisdom-eye, seeing the ranges of the faculties of all sentient beings; the reality-eye, seeing the true character of all things; the buddha-eye, seeing the ten powers of the enlightened; the eye of knowledge, knowing and seeing all things; the eye of light, seeing the light of Buddha; the eye of leaving birth and death, seeing nirvana; the unobstructed eye, its vision without hindrance; the eye of omniscience, seeing the realm of reality in its universal aspect. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings attain the eye of supreme knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of ear: 
hearing the voice of praise, they eliminate craving; hearing the voice of criticism, they eliminate anger; hearing explanation of the two lesser vehicles of individual salvation, they do not cling to or seek them; hearing of the Path of enlightening beings, they rejoice greatly; hearing of places of pain and trouble, such as the hells, they arouse great compassion and make vows of universal salvation; hearing tell of the wonderful things of the human and celestial worlds, they know they are impermanent phenomena; hearing praise of the virtues of buddhas, they work diligently to quickly fulfill them; hearing tell of such practices as the six ways of transcendence and four means of integration, they determine to practice them and reach their ultimate end; hearing all sounds of the world, they know they are all like echoes, and penetrate untold profound meanings; great enlightening beings, from their first determination until they reach the site of enlightenment, always hear the true Teaching yet do not give up the work of transforming sentient beings. 
These are the ten; if enlightening beings accomplish these things, they will attain the supreme ear of great wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of nose: 
when they smell foul things, they do not consider them foul; when they smell fragrances, they do not consider them fragrant; when they smell both fragrance and foulness, their minds are equanimous, abiding in relinquishment; if they smell the fragrance and foulness of people’s clothes, bedding, or bodies, they can discern their conditions of greed, anger, and delusion; if they smell the scents of hidden repositories, plants and trees and so on, they can discern them as if they were right before their eyes; if they smell scents from the hells below to the heavens above, they know the past deeds of the beings there; if they smell the fragrance of generosity, morality, learning, and wisdom of buddhas’ disciples, they remain steady in the will for omniscience and do not let it be distracted; if they smell the fragrances of all enlightening practices, they enter the state of budda-hood by impartial wisdom; if they smell the fragrance of the sphere of knowledge of all buddhas, they still do not give up the practices of enlightening beings. 
If enlightening beings accomplish these things, they will acquire the infinite, boundless nose of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of tongue: 
a tongue that reveals and explains the acts of infinite sentient beings; a tongue that reveals and explains infinite doors to truth; a tongue that sings the praises of the infinite virtues of buddhas; a tongue of infinite eloquence; a tongue that expounds aids to the Path of the Great Vehicle; a tongue that covers all space; a tongue that illumines all buddha-fields; a tongue that awakens the understanding of all sentient beings; a tongue that causes all to praise the buddhas; a tongue that defeats all demons and false teachers, destroys all afflictions of birth and death, and fosters arrival at nirvana. 
If enlightening beings accomplish these things, they will acquire the supreme tongue of buddhas, which covers all buddhalands. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of bodies: 
human bodies to teach humans; nonhuman bodies to teach denizens of hells, animals, and hungry ghosts; celestial bodies to teach the beings of the realms of desire, form, and formlessness; learners’ bodies to demonstrate the stage of learning; nonlearners’ bodies to demonstrate the stage of sainthood; individual illuminates’ bodies to teach the way to enter the stage of individual enlightenment; enlightening beings’ bodies to foster the accomplishment of the Great Vehicle; buddhas’ bodies, anointed by the water of knowledge; mentally produced bodies, generated by adaptive skills; the uncontaminated reality-body, effortlessly manifesting the bodies of all sentient beings. 
If they accomplish these, they attain the supreme body of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of mind: 
a mind of leadership, generating all roots of goodness; a stable mind, with profound faith steadfast and unwavering; a mind of profound penetration, understanding in accord with the teachings of buddhas; a mind of insight, knowing the mentalities of all sentient beings; an undisturbed mind, not adulterated with any afflictions; a clear, clean mind, which externals cannot stain or adhere to; a mind observing sentient beings well, not missing proper timing in dealing with them; a mind choosing well what to do, never making a mistake anywhere; a mind closely guarding the senses, taming them and not letting them run wild; a mind skilled in entering concentration, entering deeply into the concentrations of buddhas, without egoism or selfishness. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme mind of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of action: 
hearing the Teaching, out of fondness for truth; expounding the Teaching, to benefit sentient beings; getting rid of covetousness, anger, delusion, and fear, by taming their own minds; action in the realm of desire, to teach beings in that realm; concentrations in the realms of form and formlessness, to foster quick return to noncontamination; aiming for the meaning of the Teaching, to quickly attain wisdom; action in all realms of life, to freely edify sentient beings; action in all buddha-lands, honoring all buddhas; nirvanic action, not cutting off the continuity of birth and death; fulfilling all qualities of buddhahood, without giving up application of the principles of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can achieve the action of buddhas that has no coming or going. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of abiding: 
abiding in the will for enlightenment, never forgetting it; abiding in the transcendent ways, not tiring of fostering enlightenment; abiding in the teaching of truth, increasing wisdom; abiding in dispassion, realizing great meditational concentration; abiding in conformity to universal knowledge, austerity, contentment, moderation in food, clothing, and dwelling, and getting rid of evil, because few desires means few concerns; abiding in deep faith, bearing the true Teaching; abiding in the company of the enlightened, to learn the conduct of buddhas; abiding in generation of spiritual powers, to fulfill great knowledge; abiding in attainment of acceptance, fulfilling the forecast of enlightenment; abiding in the site of enlightenment, fulfilling power, fearlessness, and all aspects of buddhahood. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can reach the buddhas’ supreme abiding in omniscience. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of sitting: 
the sitting of universal monarchs, promoting all virtuous behavior; the sitting of guardian deities, independently establishing the Buddha teaching in all worlds; the sitting of Indra, king of gods, being superior lords of all sentient beings; the sitting of Brahma, being in control of their own and others’ minds; the sitting of lions, being able to expound the truth; the sitting of right teaching, holding forth by means of mental command and intellectual powers; steadfast sitting, vowing to reach the ultimate end; the sitting of great benevolence, bringing happiness to all evil sentient beings; the sitting of great compassion, tirelessly enduring all pains; adamantine sitting, conquering demons and false teachers. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain the buddhas’ supreme sitting of true awareness. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of reclining: 
the reclining of silent tranquillity, because of practicing in accord with principle; the reclining of concentration, because of body and mind being supple; the reclining of Brahma, because of not disturbing self or others; the reclining of good works, because of having no regrets afterward; the reclining of true faith, because of being unshakable; the reclining of the right Path, because of awakening by good companions; the reclining of sublime aspirations, because of skillful dedication; the reclining of completion of all tasks, because of having accomplished all that is to be done; the reclining of relinquishment of all effort, because of thorough training. 
Based on these enlightening beings can attain the supreme reclining of the great teaching of buddhas and be able to awaken all sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of abode: 
the abode of great goodwill, being impartial toward all sentient beings; the abode of great compassion, not slighting the uncultivated; the abode of great joy, aloof from all vexations; the abode of great equanimity, regarding the created and uncreated equally; the abode of all transcendent ways, being led by the aspiration for enlightenment; the abode of universal emptiness, by virtue of skillful analysis; the abode of signlessness, not leaving the absolute state; the abode of wishlessness, examining the experience of taking on life; the abode of recollection and awareness, by virtue of full development of recognition of truth; the abode of equality of all things, by virtue of having gained the prediction of buddhahood. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can reach the supreme abode of buddhas where there is no obstruction. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of sphere of action: 
they take right mindfulness as their sphere of action, as they fulfill the points of mindfulness; they take all realms of being as their sphere of action, as they become truly aware of the implications of the Teaching; they take wisdom as their sphere of action, gaining the joy of buddhas; they take the transcendent ways as their sphere of action, as they fulfill omniscience; they take the four integrative practices as their sphere of action, as they educate sentient beings; they take birth and death as their sphere of action, as they accumulate roots of goodness; they take bantering with all sentient beings as their sphere of action, as they teach them according to their needs and cause them to become free; they take spiritual powers as their sphere of action, as they know the realms of the senses of all sentient beings; they take skill in means as their sphere of action, uniting them with transcendent wisdom; they take the site of enlightenment as their sphere of action, as they attain universal knowledge, without stopping the practices of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can reach the supreme sphere of action of great wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of observation: 
observation knowing all acts, seeing all details; observation knowing various tendencies, not grasping sentient beings; observation knowing faculties, comprehending the nonexistence of faculties; observation knowing phenomena, not violating the realm of reality; observation seeing the verities of buddhahood, cultivating the enlightened eye; observation attaining wisdom, explaining things as they really are; observation accepting the nonorigination of things, definitely comprehending the teaching of Buddha; observation in the state of nonregression, destroying all afflictions and transcending the three worlds and the stages of the lesser vehicles; observation in the stage of coronation, by virtue of unshakable mastery of all Buddha teachings; observation in concentration with hyperconscious knowledge, practicing charity everywhere as Buddhist service. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely great observational knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of universal observation: 
they observe all who come seeking of them, satisfying them without aversion; they observe all immoral sentient beings and establish them in the pure precepts of buddhas; they observe all malicious sentient beings and settle them in the power of enlightened tolerance; they observe all lazy sentient beings and urge them to be diligent and not give up bearing the burden of the Great Vehicle; they observe all confused sentient beings and get them to abide in the state of universal knowledge of buddhas, where there is no distraction; they observe all deluded sentient beings and clear away their doubts and break down reification; they observe all impartial good friends and follow their instructions to live by the Buddha teachings; they observe all principles they hear and quickly attain realizational insight into the supreme meaning; they observe the infinite sentient beings, never abandoning the power of great compassion; they observe the teachings of all buddhas and quickly manage to accomplish universal knowledge. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the universal observation of supreme wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of springing; the springing of a majestic bull, overshadowing all dragons, yakshas, kinnaras, gand-harvas, and other creatures; the springing of a majestic elephant, their minds well tamed and gentle, carrying all sentient beings; the springing of a great water spirit, producing dense clouds of the great Teaching, flashing the lightning of liberation, reverberating with the thunder of truth, and showering the sweet rain of the spiritual faculties and powers, the elements of enlightenment, meditations, liberations, and concentrations; the springing of the great golden-winged bird, evaporating the water of covetousness, breaking the shell of delusion, catching the evil poisonous dragons of affliction, and lifting beings out of the ocean of suffering of birth and death; the springing of a great majestic lion, resting secure in fearless, impartial great knowledge and, using that as a weapon, crushing demons and false teachers; the springing of courage and strength, able to destroy the enemy, afflictions, on the great battlefront of birth and death; the springing of great knowledge, knowing the elements of body, mind, and sense experience, as well as all other interdependent productions, and freely explaining all things; the springing of mental command, retaining teachings by the power of recollection and awareness, and expounding them according to the faculties of sentient beings; the springing of intellectual powers, uninhibited and swift, analyzing everything and causing everyone to receive benefit and be happy; the springing of realization of Thusness, fulfilling all aids to the way to omniscience, and with instantaneous wisdom attaining all that can be attained, understanding all that can be understood, sitting on a lion throne, conquering hostile demons, and realizing unexcelled, complete perfect enlightenment. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can achieve the supreme springing of buddhas in the midst of all things. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of lion’s roar. 
They declare, ‘I will surely attain true enlightenment’—this is the great lion’s roar of the determination for enlightenment. 
‘I will enable those who have not yet transcended the world to transcend, liberate those who are not yet liberated, pacify those who are not yet at peace, and enable those who have not attained nirvana to attain it’—this is the great lion’s roar of great compassion. 
‘I will perpetuate the seeds of the Buddha, the Teaching, and the harmonious Community’—this is the great lion’s roar of requiting the benevolence of the Buddha. 
‘I will purify all buddha-lands’—this is the great lion’s roar of ultimately firm commitment. 
‘I will get rid of all evil ways and difficult situations’—this is the lion’s roar of personally maintaining pure conduct. 
‘I will fully attain the adorning features of body, speech, and mind of all buddhas’—this is the great lion’s roar of tirelessly seeking virtue. 
‘I will fully accomplish the knowledge of all buddhas’—this is the great lion’s roar of tirelessly seeking knowledge. 
‘I will annihilate all demons and all the works of demons’—this is the great lion’s roar of cultivating right practice to stop afflictions. 
‘I will realize that all things are selfless, without being, without life, without personality, empty, signless, wishless, and pure as space’—this is the great lion’s roar of the acceptance of the nonorigination of all things. 
Enlightening beings in their last life shake all buddha-lands and make them all pure: thereupon all the Indras, Brahmas, and guardian deities come and praise them and entreat them, ‘Please, enlightening being, with the truth of birthlessness, appear to be born.’ The enlightening beings then observe all sentient beings in the world by the unobstructed eye of wisdom and see that there are none who compare to themselves—so they appear to be born in royal palaces, walk seven steps by themselves, and declare in a great lion’s roar, ‘I am supreme in the world—I will forever end the realm of birth and death.’ This is the great lion’s roar of doing what one says. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely great lion’s roar of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure giving: 
impartial giving, not discriminating among sentient beings; giving according to wishes, satisfying others; unconfused giving, causing benefit to be gained; giving appropriately, knowing superior, mediocre, and inferior; giving without dwelling, not seeking reward; open giving, without clinging attachment; total giving, being ultimately pure; giving dedicated to enlightenment, transcending the created and the uncreated; giving to teach sentient beings, never abandoning them, even to the site of enlightenment; giving with its three spheres pure, observing the giver, receiver, and gift with right awareness, as being like space. 
Based on these ten principles, enlightening beings can accomplish the supreme, pure, magnanimous giving of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure discipline: 
pure discipline of body, guarding themselves from evil deeds; pure discipline of speech, getting rid of faults of speech; pure discipline of mind, forever getting rid of greed, hatred, and false views; the pure discipline of not destroying any subjects of study, being honorable leaders among people; the pure discipline of preserving the aspiration for enlightenment, not liking the lesser vehicles of individual salvation; the pure discipline of preserving the regulations of the Buddha, greatly fearing even minor offenses; the pure discipline of secret protection, skillfully drawing out undisciplined sentient beings; the pure discipline of not doing any evil, vowing to practice all virtuous principles; the pure discipline of detachment from all views of existence, having no attachment to precepts; the pure discipline of protecting all sentient beings, activating great compassion. 
Based on these ten principles, enlightening beings can attain the supreme flawless pure discipline of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure tolerance: 
pure tolerance calmly enduring slander and vilification, to protect sentient beings; pure tolerance calmly enduring weapons, to protect self and others; pure tolerance not arousing anger and viciousness, the mind being unshakable; pure tolerance not attacking the low, being magnanimous when above; pure tolerance saving all who come for refuge, giving up one’s own life; pure tolerance free from conceit, not slighting the uncultivated; pure tolerance not becoming angered at injury, because of observation of illusoriness; pure tolerance not revenging offenses, because of not seeing self and other; pure tolerance not following afflictions, being detached from all objects; pure tolerance knowing all things have no origin, in accord with the true knowledge of enlightening beings, entering the realm of universal knowledge without depending on the instruction of another. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain all buddhas’ supreme tolerance of truth, understanding without depending on another. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure energy: 
pure physical energy, to attend buddhas, enlightening beings, teachers, and elders, honoring fields of blessings, never retreating; pure verbal energy, extensively explaining to others whatever teachings they learn and praising the virtues of buddhahood, without wearying; pure mental energy, able to enter and exit kindness, compassion, joy, equanimity, meditations, liberations, and concentrations, without cease; pure energy of honesty, being free from deceptiveness, flattery, deviousness, and dishonesty, not regressing in any of their efforts; pure energy of determination on increasing progress, always intent on seeking higher and higher knowledge, aspiring to embody all good and pure qualities; unwasteful pure energy, embodying charity, morality, tolerance, learning, and diligence, continuing unceasingly until enlightenment; pure energy conquering all demons, able to extirpate greed, hatred, delusion, false views, and all other bonds and veils of affliction; pure energy fully developing the light of knowledge, being carefully observant in all actions, consummating them all, preventing later regret, and attaining all the unique qualities of buddhahood; pure energy without coming or going, attaining true knowledge, entering the door of the realm of reality, body, speech, and mind all impartial, understanding forms are formless and having no attachments; pure energy developing the light of the Teaching, transcending all stages and attaining the coronation of buddhas, and with an uncontaminated body manifesting the appearances of death and birth, of leaving home and attaining enlightenment, of teaching and passing away, fulfilling such tasks of Universal Good. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme great energy of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure meditation: 
pure meditation always gladly leaving home, giving up all possessions; pure meditation finding genuine good companions, to teach the right way; pure meditation living in the forest enduring wind and rain and so on, being detached from self and possessions; pure meditation leaving clamorous sentient beings, always enjoying tranquil silence; pure meditation with harmonious mental activity, guarding the senses; pure meditation with mind and cognition silent, impervious to all sounds and nettles of meditational concentration; pure meditation aware of the methods of the Path of enlightenment, contemplating them all and actually realizing them; pure meditation detached from clinging to its experiences, neither grasping nor rejecting the realm of desire; pure meditation awakening psychic knowledge, knowing the faculties and natures of all sentient beings; pure meditation with freedom of action, entering into the concentration of buddhas and knowing there is no self. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme pure meditation of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure wisdom: 
pure wisdom knowing all causes, not denying consequences; pure wisdom knowing all conditions, not ignoring combination; pure wisdom knowing nonannihilation and nonpermanence, comprehending interdependent origination truly; pure wisdom extracting all views, neither grasping nor rejecting characteristics of sentient beings; pure wisdom observing the mental activities of all sentient beings, knowing they are illusory; pure wisdom with vast intellectual power, distinguishing all truths and being unhindered in dialogue; pure wisdom unknowable to demons, false teachers, or followers of the vehicles of individual salvation, deeply penetrating the knowledge of all buddhas; pure wisdom seeing the subtle reality body of all buddhas, seeing the essential purity of all sentient beings, seeing that all phenomena are quiescent, and seeing that all lands are the same as space, knowing all characteristics without impediment; pure wisdom with all powers of mental command, analytic abilities, liberative means, and ways of transcendence, fostering the attainment of all supreme knowledge; pure wisdom instantly uniting with adamantine knowledge comprehending the equality of all things, attaining the most honorable knowledge of all things. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the unobstructed great wisdom of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure benevolence: 
impartial pure benevolence, caring for all sentient beings without discrimination; helpful pure benevolence, bringing happiness by whatever they do; pure benevolence taking care of people in the same way as oneself, ultimately bringing about emancipation from birth and death; pure benevolence not abandoning the world, the mind always focused on accumulating roots of goodness; pure benevolence able to bring liberation, causing all sentient beings to annihilate all afflictions; pure benevolence generating enlightenment, inspiring all sentient beings to seek omniscience; pure benevolence unobstructed by the world, radiating great light illuminating everywhere equally; pure benevolence filling space, reaching everywhere to save sentient beings; pure benevolence focused on truth, realizing the truth of Thusness; pure benevolence without object, entering enlightening beings’ detachment from life. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme, vast, pure benevolence of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure compassion: 
pure compassion without companion, as they make their determination independently; tireless pure compassion, not considering it troublesome to endure pain on behalf of all sentient beings; pure compassion taking on birth in difficult situations, for the purpose of liberating sentient beings; pure compassion taking on birth in pleasant conditions, to show impermanence; pure compassion for the sake of wrongly fixated sentient beings, never giving up their vow of universal liberation; pure compassion not clinging to personal pleasure, giving happiness to all sentient beings; pure compassion not seeking reward, purifying their minds; pure compassion able to remove delusion by explaining the truth. 
Great enlightening beings know all things are in essence pure and have no clinging or irritation, but suffering is experienced because of afflictions of adventitious defilements: knowing this, they conceive great compassion for sentient beings. This is called essential purity, as they explain to them the principle of undefiled pure light. 
Great enlightening beings know that all phenomena are like the tracks of birds in the sky, but that sentient beings’ eyes are clouded by delusion and they cannot clearly realize this; observing them, enlightening beings conceive great compassion. This is called true knowledge, as they teach them the principle of nirvana. 
These are ten kinds of pure compassion, based on which enlightening beings attain the supremely great compassion of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure joy: 
the pure joy of aspiring to enlightenment; the pure joy of relinquishing all possessions; the pure joy of not rejecting undisciplined sentient beings but teaching them and maturing them; the pure joy of being able to tolerate evil-doing sentient beings and vowing to save and liberate them; the pure joy of giving one’s life in search of truth, without regret; the pure joy of giving up sensual pleasures and always taking pleasure in truth; the pure joy of inducing sentient beings to give up material pleasures and always take pleasure in truth; the pure joy of cosmic equanimity tirelessly honoring and serving all buddhas they see; the pure joy of teaching all sentient beings to enjoy meditations, liberations, and concentrations, and to freely enter and emerge from them; the pure joy of gladly carrying out all austere practices that accord with the way of enlightening beings and realizing the tranquil, imperturbable supreme calmness and wisdom of the sage. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely great pure joy of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of pure equanimity: 
the pure equanimity of not becoming emotionally attached to sentient beings who honor and support them; the pure equanimity of not being angered at sentient beings who slight and revile them; the pure equanimity of always being in the world but not being affected by the vicissitudes of worldly things; the pure equanimity of instructing sentient beings who are fit for the Teaching at the appropriate times, while not conceiving aversion for sentient beings who are not fit for the Teaching; the pure equanimity of not seeking the states of learning or nonlearning of the two lesser vehicles; the pure equanimity of the mind always being aloof from all desires that are conducive to affliction; the pure equanimity of not praising the two lesser vehicles’ aversion to birth and death; the pure equanimity of avoiding worldly talk, talk that is not of nirvana, talk that is not dispassionate, talk that is not according to truth, talk that disturbs others, talk of individual salvation, and in general all talk that obstructs the Path of enlightening beings; the pure equanimity of waiting for the appropriate times to teach sentient beings whose faculties are mature and have developed mindfulness and precise awareness but do not yet know the supreme truth; the pure equanimity of waiting for the appropriate times to teach sentient beings whom the enlightening being has already instructed in the past but who cannot be tamed until the enlightening being reaches buddhahood; the pure equanimity of not considering people as higher or lower, being free from grasping and rejection, being aloof from all kinds of discriminatory notions, always being rightly concentrated, penetrating truth and attaining tolerance. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely pure equanimity of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of principle: 
the principle of great learning, steadfastly putting it into practice; the principle of truth, skillfully thinking about it and discerning it; the principle of emptiness, the ultimate truth being emptiness; the principle of silence and calm, being detached from the clamor and confusion of sentient beings; the principle of inexpressibility, not clinging to words; the principle of according with truth, realizing that past, present, and future are equal; the principle of the realm of reality, all things being one in essence; the principle of True Thusness, as all who realize Thusness enter it; the principle of the limit of reality, realizing ultimate truth; the principle of great ultimate nirvana, extinguishing all suffering yet carrying out the practices of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme principle of omniscience. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of law: 
the law of truth, practicing what they teach; the law of detachment from clinging, detaching from both the clinger and that which is clung to; the law of noncontention, being free from all confusing conflicts; the law of silent extinction, extinguishing all irritations; the law of dispassion, all covetousness being ended; the law of freedom from false notions, all arbitrary conceptualization clinging to objects permanently ceasing; the law of birthlessness, being immovable as space; the law of the uncreated, being detached from appearances of origin, subsistence, and annihilation; the law of basic essence, being inherently pure; the law of abandoning all nirvana in which there is still suffering, to be able to generate all practices of enlightening beings and carry them out uninterruptedly. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supremely great law of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment: 
urging sentient beings to generate the aspiration for enlightenment is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, because it perpetuates the three treasures; following the ten kinds of dedication is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, because it stops all that is not good and accumulates all that is good; wisely guiding and teaching is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, because it transcends the virtues of the worlds of desire, form, and formlessness; indefatigability of mind is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, because thereby they finally liberate all sentient beings; relinquishing all internal and external possessions is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, because of having no attachments to anything at all; working unflaggingly to fully develop spiritual refinements is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, by opening the gate of great charity, without limit; dedicating all roots of goodness, superior, middling, or lesser, to supreme enlightenment without slighting any is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, being consonant with skill in means; generating great compassion for bad sentient beings who are mean and fixed on error, not despising them, is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, by virtue of always activating the heart of universal commitment of great people; honoring and serving all buddhas, thinking of all enlightening beings as buddhas, and bringing joy to all sentient beings, is one of enlightening beings’ virtues instrumental in fostering enlightenment, as they keep their original will most firm and steadfast. 
Great enlightening beings accumulate roots of goodness over measureless eons, wishing to attain realization of supreme enlightenment themselves, as though it were in their palm; yet they give away all their roots of goodness to all sentient beings without any grief or regret, their minds being as broad as space—this is a virtue of enlightening beings instrumental in fostering enlightenment, as they develop great wisdom and realize great truth. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can embody the supremely great mass of virtues of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of knowledge instrumental in fostering enlightenment. 
They associate with learned, genuine teachers, and respectfully attend them, obeying them in every way, not deviating from their instructions; this is one, being totally honest, without falsehood. 
They give up conceit forever, they are always humble and respectful, their thoughts, words, and deeds are free from coarseness, they are harmonious and agreeable, and do not prevaricate; this is the second, as their beings become capable of bearing the Buddha teaching. 
They are mentally collected, aware, always alert, never distracted or confused; conscientious and agreeable, their minds are calm and imperturbable; they always remember the six thoughts, always practice the sixfold respect, and always abide by the six principles of steadfastness; this is the third, being a way to develop tenfold knowledge. 
They take pleasure in truth and principle, always enjoying listening to teaching of truth, abandoning worldly philosophies and theses, always concentrating on listening to transcendental talk, leaving the lesser vehicles of individual salvation behind and entering the wisdom of the Great Vehicle of universal salvation; this is the fourth, singlemindedly recollecting without distraction. 
They bear the six ways of transcendence in mind wholeheartedly, have already perfected the practice of the four immeasurable minds, follow the methods of illumination and skillfully put them into practice; they earnestly question intelligent people of knowledge, avoid bad tendencies, and aim for good ways; their minds always like contemplation with right recollection; they subdue their own feelings and protect the minds of others: this is the fifth, firmly executing true practice. 
They always appreciate emancipation and do not cling to the world; they are always aware of their own minds and never have any evil thoughts; they have done away with greed, anger, and malevolence, and their thoughts, words, and deeds are all good; they have certain knowledge of the inherent nature of mind: this is the sixth, able to purify one’s own and others’ minds. 
They observe the five clusters as being like illusory phenomena, the elements like poisonous snakes, the sense mediums like desolate villages, all things as like illusions, flames, reflections, dreams, shadows, echoes, images, like paintings in the sky, like a turning wheel of fire, like the colors of the rainbow, like sunlight and moonlight, signless and formless, neither permanent nor ending, not coming or going, and not abiding either—contemplating in this way, they know all things have no origin and no destruction: this is the seventh, knowing that the essential nature of all things is empty and quiescent. 
When great enlightening beings hear that phenomena have no self, no being, no soul, no person, no mind, no object, no greed, no anger, no delusion, no body, no thing, no master, no sustenance, no attachment, and no action, all of these having no existence, being ultimately nil—having heard this, they deeply believe it, without doubt or repudiation: this is the eighth, being able to perfect complete understanding. 
Great enlightening beings tame their faculties well, and they cultivate action according to truth; they always abide in tranquillity and insight, and their minds are silent and calm, with no disturbing thoughts arising; they have no self, no person, no fabrication, no conditioning, no idea of self, no idea of self doing anything, no excess or lack, and no sense of attainment of this either; their physical, verbal, and mental actions have no coming or going, no energy, no vigor; they see all things and all beings impartially and do not dwell on anything; they are neither of this world nor beyond it, notions of ‘here’ and ‘there’ being inherently irrelevant; they come from nowhere and go nowhere—they always meditate in this way by means of knowledge and wisdom: 
Because great enlightening beings see the principle of interdependent origination, they see the purity of phenomena; because they see the purity of phenomena, they see the purity of lands; because they see the purity of lands, they see the purity of space; because they see the purity of space, they see the purity of the realm of reality; because they see the purity of the realm of reality, they see the purity of knowledge; this is the tenth, cultivating and accumulating all-knowledge. 
These are enlightening beings’ ten kinds of knowledge instrumental in fostering enlightenment, based on which they can attain the buddhas’ store of un-impeded, pure, subtle knowledge of all truths. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of sufficiency of insight: 
skillfully analyzing all things; not grasping or clinging to anything; divorcing all deluded views; illumining all senses with the light of knowledge; skillfully generating rightly directed energy; being able to deeply penetrate knowledge of absolute truth; extinguishing the actions of afflictions and developing the knowledge of extinction and knowledge of birthlessness; observing everywhere with the knowledge of the celestial eye; knowing the purity of the past by the recollection of past states; annihilating the contaminations of sentient beings by the spiritual knowledge of ending contamination. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme illumination of all teachings of the buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of quest for truth: 
quest for truth with a straightforward mind, being free from dishonesty; diligent quest for truth, being free from laziness; wholly devoted quest for truth, not begrudging their lives; quest for truth to destroy all sentient beings’ afflictions, not doing it for fame, profit, or respect; quest for truth to benefit self and others, all sentient beings, not just helping themselves; quest for truth to enter knowledge and wisdom, not taking pleasure in literature; quest for truth to leave birth and death, not craving worldly pleasures; quest for truth to liberate sentient beings, engendering the determination for enlightenment; quest for truth to resolve the doubts of all sentient beings, to free them from vacillation; quest for truth to fulfill buddhahood, not being inclined to lesser aims. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain great knowledge of all elements of buddhahood without being instructed by another. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of understanding of truth: 
generating and developing roots of goodness in accord with the conventional world is the way of understanding of truth of unenlightened ordinary people; attaining indestructible faith, aware of the essence of things, is the way of understanding truth of people acting according to faith; leaving behind erroneous ways and turning to the eightfold right path is the way people aiming for stream-entering understand truth; getting rid of bonds, putting an end to the contaminations of birth and death, and seeing reality is the stream-enterer’s understanding of truth; seeing tasting as affliction and knowing no coming or going is the once-returner’s understanding of truth; not taking pleasure in the world, seeking to end contamination, not having so much as a single thought of attachment to life, is the nonreturner’s understanding of truth; attaining the six spiritual powers, eight liberations, nine concentration states, and four special knowledges, all fully developed, is the saint’s understanding of truth; naturally being inclined to contemplate uniform interdependent origination, the mind always tranquil and content, having few concerns, understanding causality, awakening on one’s own without depending on another, accomplishing various kinds of spiritual knowledge, is the individual illuminate’s understanding of truth; having vast knowledge, all faculties clear and sharp, always inclined to liberate all sentient beings, diligently cultivating virtue and knowledge to foster enlightenment, fully developing buddhas’ ten powers, fearlessnesses, and other attributes, is the enlightening being’s understanding of truth. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the understanding of truth of the supreme great knowledge of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten norms of practice: 
honoring the wise; always being alerted by the celestial spirits; always having shame and conscience before the buddhas; having pity for sentient beings and not abandoning birth and death; carrying tasks through to consummation without change of mind; single-mindedly following the enlightening beings who aspire to universal enlightenment and diligently learning; getting rid of wrong views and earnestly seeking the right Path; destroying demons and the actions of afflictions; knowing the different faculties and temperaments of sentient beings and teaching them to enable them to live in the state of buddhahood; abiding in the infinitely vast cosmos of reality, removing afflictions and purifying the body. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the buddhas’ supreme method of practice. 
“For great enlightening beings there are ten kinds of demons: 
the demon of the clusters of mental and material elements, giving rise to attachments; the demon of afflictions, perpetually confusing and defiling; the demon of actions, able to obstruct and inhibit; the demon of mind, which gives rise to pride; the demon of death, which abandons life; the demon of heaven, being self-indulgent; the demon of roots of goodness, because of perpetual clinging; the demon of concentration, because of long indulgence in the experience; the demon of spiritual teachers, because of giving rise to feelings of attachment; the demon of the phenomenon of enlightenment, because of not wanting to relinquish it. 
Great enlightening beings should apply appropriate means to quickly escape these demons. 
“For great enlightening beings there are ten kinds of demons’ actions: 
cultivating roots of goodness while forgetting the aspiration for enlightenment; giving with ill-will, keeping precepts with hatred, rejecting people of bad character, rejecting the slothful, slighting the confused, and despising the ignorant; being jealous and stingy with the profound teaching, not explaining it to those who are capable of being enlightened, insisting on explaining it to people without the capacity for it as long as wealth and honor are thereby available; not liking to hear about the ways of transcendence, not practicing them even when hearing about them, tending to negligence even when practicing them, becoming narrow and mean in spirit because of laziness, and not seeking supreme great enlightenment; avoiding good companions, associating with bad companions, craving personal release, not wanting to accept life, wishing for the desirelessness and tranquillity of nirvana; arousing hatred and anger toward enlightening beings, looking at them with malevolent eyes, looking for faults in them, talking of their faults, cutting off their support; repudiating true teaching and being averse to hearing it, immediately criticizing it when hearing it, having no respect for those who expound it, claiming oneself to be right and others all wrong; indulging in the study of secular literature, expounding the vehicles of individual salvation while obscuring the profound Teaching, or giving subtle doctrines to unsuitable people, straying from enlightenment and persisting in false paths; always liking to associate with those who are already liberated and at peace, and giving them offerings, while not being willing to approach or edify those who have not yet attained liberation or peace; developing conceit, having no respect, often troubling or hurting sentient beings, not seeking genuine knowledge of truth, being mean and difficult to awaken. 
These are the ten kinds of demons’ actions, which enlightening beings should quickly get away from to seek enlightened action. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of getting rid of demons’ actions: 
associating with the wise and honoring and serving them; not elevating themselves or praising themselves; believing in the profound Teaching of Buddha without repudiating it; never ever forgetting the determination for omniscience; diligently cultivating refined practices, never being lax; always seeking all the teachings for enlightening beings; always expounding the truth tirelessly; taking refuge with all the buddhas of the ten directions, thinking of them as saviors and protectors; faithfully accepting and remembering the support of the spiritual power of the buddhas; equally planting the same roots of goodness with all enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can escape all demonic ways. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten ways of seeing buddhas: 
the buddha of abiding in the world attaining true enlightenment they see by nonattachment; they see the buddha of vows by production; they see the buddha of rewards of action by deep faith; they see the buddha of preservation by following the Teaching; they see the buddha of nirvana by deeply entering it; they see the cosmic buddha everywhere; they see the buddha of mind by peaceful stability; they see the buddha of concentration by infinite independence; they see the buddha of fundamental essence by clear comprehension; they see the buddha of adaptation by universal awareness. 
By these they always see the supreme Buddha. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of buddha-action. 
Guiding at appropriate times is buddha-action because it fosters correct cultivation of practice. 
Causing dream visions is buddha-action because it awakens awareness of past roots of goodness. 
Expounding to others scriptures they have not yet heard is buddha-action because it causes growth of knowledge and resolution of doubts. 
Teaching the way to emancipation to those bound up in regrets is buddha-action because it frees them from a doubting mind. 
Manifesting the glorified body of Buddha for the sake of sentient beings with stingy minds, ignorant minds, minds interested in personal salvation, malevolent minds, doubting minds, scattered minds, or conceited minds, is buddha-action because it nurtures past roots of goodness. 
Widely expounding the true Teaching in times when true Teaching is difficult to come across, causing those who hear it to attain concentrated knowledge and knowledge of spiritual powers, to be able to benefit innumerable sentient beings, is buddha-action because the resolution is pure. 
If anything demonic occurs, being able to manifest a voice equal to space explaining the principle of not harming others, in order to quell it, causing the awakening of understanding and causing the majesty of demons who hear to vanish, is buddha-action because the will is extraordinary and the power great. 
The mind having no lapse, being constantly alert, not permitting experiential entry into the absolute state of individual liberation, and never speaking of the realm of liberation to those whose faculties and characters are not yet mature, is buddha-action because it is the performance of the original vow. 
Shedding all the bonds and contaminations of birth and death, cultivating the practices of enlightening beings continously, taking care of sentient beings with great compassion, causing them to undertake such practice and eventually be liberated, is buddha-action because it does not stop the practice of the deeds of enlightening beings. 
Enlightening beings realize that their own bodies as well as sentient beings are fundamentally quiescent and null, yet, not being surprised or afraid, they still tirelessly cultivate virtue and knowledge; though they know all things have no creation, yet they do not ignore the individual characteristics of things; though they are forever aloof of craving for objects, yet they always gladly behold the form bodies of buddhas; though they know one is enlightened into the truth without depending on another, yet they seek omniscience through many kinds of methods; though they know all lands are like space, they always enjoy adorning all buddha-lands; though they always observe that there is no real person or self, yet they tirelessly teach and enlighten sentient beings; though fundamentally unmoving in the cosmos of reality, yet they manifest a multitude of transformations by spiritual powers; though they have already accomplished omniscience, yet they practice the acts of enlightening beings without ceasing; though they know all things are inexplicable, yet they turn the wheel of the pure Teaching and gladden the hearts of all beings; though they are able to manifest the spiritual powers of buddhas, yet they do not reject embodiment as enlightening beings; though they appear to enter ultimate final extinction, they manifest birth in all places—being able to perform these practices, simultaneously carrying out the provisional and the true, is buddha-action. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can achieve supreme teacherless great action without relying on the instruction of another. 
“For great enlightening beings there are ten kinds of conceited action. 
Not respecting teachers, parents, mendicants, people on the right Path, people aiming for the right Path, or honorable fields of blessings, is conceited action. 
If there are teachers who have attained to supreme truth, who ride the Great Vehicle of universal enlightenment, who know the way to emancipation, who have attained mental command and expound the great principles of the scriptures, to be haughty toward them or their teachings and to be disrespectful is conceited action. 
When in an audience hearing the sublime Teaching expounded, to be unwilling to laud its excellence and cause others to believe and accept it, is conceited action. 
Habitually conceiving the illusion of superiority, elevating oneself and looking down on others, not seeing one’s own faults, not knowing one’s own shortcomings, is conceited action. 
Habitually imagining that one is better than those who are better than oneself, not praising virtuous people who are praiseworthy, and not being happy when others praise them, is conceited action. 
When seeing someone preach, in spite of knowing it is the norm, the rule, the truth, the word of Buddha, to despise the teaching because of disliking the person, to slander it and incite others to slander it, is conceited action. 
Seeking a high seat for oneself, declaring oneself to be a teacher worthy of receiving offerings and not supposed to work, failing to rise to greet old people who have cultivated spiritual practice for a long time, being unwilling to serve them, is conceited action. 
Frowning unhappily on seeing people with virtue, speaking to them harshly and looking for faults in them, is conceited action. 
When seeing intelligent people who know the truth, not being willing to approach and attend them, respect and honor them, being unwilling to ask them what is good and what is not good, what should be done and what should not be done, what acts result in various benefits and comforts in the long night, being foolish and deluded, stubborn and contentious, swallowed by self-importance, never able to see the way to emancipation, is conceited action. 
There are also sentient beings with minds shrouded by conceit, who when buddhas appear in the world are unable to approach, respect, and honor them; in them no new good arises, and goodness from the past evaporates and vanishes; they say what they should not, they contend where they should not; in the future they will surely fall into a deep pit of danger and will not even encounter Buddha, much less hear the Teaching, for hundreds of thousands of eons, though because of having once conceived the aspiration for enlightenment they will in the end wake up on their own—this is conceited action. 
If enlightening beings get rid of these ten kinds of conceited action, they will attain ten kinds of actions of knowledge. 
“The ten kinds of action of knowledge are believing in consequences of action and not denying causality; not giving up the determination for enlightenment, always remembering the buddhas; attending the wise, respecting and providing for them, honoring them tirelessly; enjoying the teachings and their meanings, never tiring of them, getting rid of wrong awareness and cultivating true awareness; getting rid of haughtiness toward all sentient beings, thinking of enlightening beings as buddhas, valuing the true Teaching as much as one’s own being, honoring the enlightened as though protecting one’s own life, thinking of practitioners as buddhas; being free from all that is not good in thought, word, and deed, praising the excellences of sages and saints, and according with enlightenment; not denying interdependent origination, getting rid of false views, destroying darkness and attaining light, illumining all things; acting in accord with the ten kinds of dedication, thinking of the ways of transcendence as one’s mother, thinking of skillful means as one’s father, and entering the house of enlightenment with a profound, pure mind; diligently accumulating all practices that foster enlightenment, such as charity, morality, learning, cessation and contemplation, virtue and wisdom; indefatigably cultivating any practice that is praised by the buddhas, that can break through the afflictions and conflicts of demons, that can remove all obstructions, veils, shrouds, and bonds, that can teach and tame all sentient beings, that can embrace the truth in accord with knowledge and wisdom, that can purify a buddha-land, that can generate spiritual capacities and insights. 
Based on these ten actions of knowledge, enlightening beings can attain the supreme action of great knowledge of buddhas, including all skillful means of liberation. 
“For great enlightening beings there are ten kinds of possession by demons: 
laziness; narrowness and meanness of aspiration; satisfaction with a little practice; exclusivity; not making great vows; liking to be in tranquil extinction and annihilating afflictions; permanently annihilating birth and death; giving up the practices of enlightening beings; not edifying sentient beings; doubting and repudiating the truth. 
If enlightening beings can get rid of these possessions by demons, they can gain ten kinds of support by Buddha: 
they are supported by Buddha in first being able to aspire to enlightenment; in preserving the will for enlightenment life after life without letting it be forgotten; in being aware of manias and being able to avoid them; in learning the ways of transcendence and practicing them as taught; in knowing the pains of birth and death yet not rejecting them; in contemplating the most profound truth and gaining immeasurable reward; in expounding the principles of the two lesser vehicles of salvation for the benefit of sentient beings without actually grasping the liberation of those vehicles; in happily contemplating the uncreated without dwelling therein, and not thinking of the created and the uncreated as dual; in reaching the realm of birthlessness yet manifesting birth; in realizing universal knowledge yet carrying out the practices of enlightening beings and perpetuating the seed of enlightening beings. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme supportive power of buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of support by truth: 
knowing all conditioned states are impermanent; knowing all conditioned states are painful; knowing all conditioned states are identityless; knowing all phenomena are quiescent nirvana; knowing all phenomena arise from conditions and do not come to be without conditions; knowing that ignorance comes from wrong thought, and finally old age and death come from ignorance, so if wrong thought is extinguished, ignorance is extinguished, and finally old age and death are extinguished; knowing the three doors of liberation and generating the vehicle of hearers, realizing the state of noncontention and generating the vehicle of individual illuminates; knowing the six transcendent ways and the four means of integration, generating the Great Vehicle; knowing that all lands, all phenomena, all sentient beings, and all times are spheres of knowledge of buddhas; knowing how to cut off all thoughts, abandon all grasping, detach from before and after, and accord with nirvana. 
Based on these ten, enlightening beings can attain the supreme support of truth of all buddhas. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of activities in the heaven of satisfaction. 
First, they tell the celestials in the heavens of desire the principle of detachment, saying, ‘All dominion is impermanent, all pleasures must fade and vanish,’ and they urge the celestials to aspire to enlightenment. 
Second, to the celestials of the heavens in the realm of form they explain how to enter and emerge from the meditative and liberative concentrations, and if there are any who become attached to them and therefore regenerate views of the body, erroneous views, nescience, and so on, the enlightening beings explain true wisdom to them; if any conceive a deluded idea of purity of material or immaterial things, they explain that they are not pure and are all impermanent, and thus urge them to aspire to enlightenment. 
Third, in the heaven of satisfaction, great enlightening beings enter a concentration called magnificent array of light, and their bodies radiate light illumining the entire universe; according to the mentalities of sentient beings, they preach to them in various voices, so that the sentient beings, having heard, have pure faith and are reborn in the heaven of satisfaction after death, where the enlightening beings urge them to aspire to enlightenment. 
Fourth, the great enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction, with their unobstructed eyes, see all the enlightening beings in all the heavens of satisfaction in the ten directions, so that all the enlightening beings see each other; having seen each other, they discuss the marvelous Teaching—that is, descending spiritually into the mother’s womb, being born, leaving home, going to the site of enlightenment, being imbued with magnificent adornments, and also showing the deeds they have been carrying out since ancient times, by which they attained this great knowledge and its virtues, being able to manifest these things without leaving their original places. 
Fifth, when a great enlightening being is in the heaven of satisfaction, the enlightening beings in the palaces of all the heavens of satisfaction in the ten directions come and gather around respectfully, and then the great enlightening being, wishing to enable those enlightening beings to fulfill their vows, and to gladden them, expounds teachings according to the states those enlightening beings should abide in, according to what they are to do and what they are to stop, what they are to practice and what they are to realize; having heard this, the enlightening beings are very happy and freshly inspired, and return to the places where they live in their own lands. 
Sixth, when great enlightening beings are in the heaven of satisfaction, the celestial devil, lord of the realm of desire, in order to spoil and disrupt the work of the enlightening beings, comes to the enlightening beings with a retinue of demons; then the enlightening beings, in order to crush the army of demons, abide in the gate of knowledge of skill in means of transcendent wisdom which is included in the adamantine path, and expound the truth to them in both gentle and harsh words, causing the demons to be unable to get the upper hand; and when the demons see the sovereign power of the enlightening beings, they all become inspired to seek supreme enlightenment. 
Seventh, great enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction know that the celestials in the realm of desire do not like to hear the truth; then the enlightening beings announce in a loud voice, ‘Today an enlightening being is going to manifest wonders—those who wish to see should come at once.’ Then the celestials, having heard this, gather in droves. 
The enlightening beings, seeing that the celestials have gathered, show them wonders in the palace that the celestials have never seen or heard of; having seen these, the celestials are totally enraptured. 
Then the enlightening beings also produce voices in music saying, ‘Benevolent ones, all conditioned states are impermanent and painful, all things are void of identity; nirvana is tranquil extinction.’ They also say, ‘You all should cultivate the practices of enlightening beings and should fulfill omniscience.’ When the celestials hear this voice of teaching, they grieve and lament and give rise to revulsion and are all inspired to seek enlightenment. 
Eighth, great enlightening beings living in the palace of the heaven of satisfaction are able, without leaving their original place, to go to the abodes of all the innumerable buddhas in the ten directions, see the buddhas, approach them and pay respects to them, and reverently listen to their teaching. 
At that time the buddhas, in order to enable enlightening beings to attain the supreme state of coronation, explain to them a stage of enlightening beings called ‘all spiritual capacities,’ in which all supreme virtues are attained by instantaneous realizational wisdom, and they enter the stage of all knowledge. 
Ninth, great enlightening beings living in the palace of the heaven of satisfaction, wishing to honor the buddhas, use great spiritual powers to produce various offerings called ‘extraordinarily pleasing,’ filling all worlds throughout the space of the cosmos, and present them to the buddhas—when the sentient beings of those worlds see those offerings, all are inspired to seek supreme enlightenment. 
Tenth, great enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction set forth infinite teachings like illusions, like reflections, pervading all worlds in the ten directions, manifesting various forms, various characteristics, various bodies, various modes of conduct, various activities, various methods, various metaphors, various explanations, gladdening all sentient beings according to their mentalities. 
These are the ten kinds of activities of enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction: if they accomplish these things, they can subsequently be born in the human world. 
“When great enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction are about to descend to be born in the human world, they manifest ten things. 
First, they radiate a tremendous light from their feet, called adornment of peace and happiness, which illumines all the miserable states in the universe; all sentient beings who come in contact with this light attain peace and happiness free from suffering, and, having realized peace and happiness, they realize that an extraordinarily great person is going to come forth into the world. 
Second, they emit a tremendous light, called awakening, from the curl of white hair between their brows, illumining the whole universe, shining on all the enlightening beings they worked with in the past; those enlightening beings, bathed in this light, know that an enlightening being is about to be born down on earth, and each produce innumerable offerings and bring them to present to the enlightening being. 
Third, they emanate from their right palms a great light, called realm of purity, which can purify all universes: 
if there are any individual illuminates therein who have attained noncontamination and become aware of this light, they give up their lives; if they do not become aware of this light, they are moved to other worlds by the power of the light; all demons, false teachers, and sentient beings with opinions are also removed to other worlds, except sentient beings who are sustained by the spiritual power of buddhas and are fit to be taught. 
Fourth, they emit great lights from their knees, called pure adornments, which illumine all the palaces of all the heavens; all the celestial beings in those heavens realize that enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction are about to descend to be born in the human world, and they feel bereaved and saddened, and each brings various flower garlands, clothing, perfumes, aromatic powders, banners, canopies, and music to the enlightening beings and respectfully present them, and then follow the enlightening beings in their descent to birth and on till their extinction. 
Fifth, from their gammadion thunderbolt-adorned heart enlightening beings radiate tremendous light, called symbol of invincibility, which shines on the thunderbolt-bearers of power in all worlds; thereupon a hundred billion thunderbolt-bearers all gather and follow and guard the enlightening beings from their birth till their extinction. 
Sixth, from each pore of their bodies they radiate great lights, called distinguishing sentient beings, which illumine all universes and touch the bodies of all enlightening beings and also touch the bodies of all celestials and humans; the enlightening beings and others all think they should stay there and honor the buddhas and edify sentient beings. 
Seventh, from the great jewel palaces they radiate immense light, called continuous observation, which illumines the places where these enlightening beings are going to be born; thereafter other enlightening beings follow them down to earth and take on birth in the same houses, the same villages, or the same cities, in order to teach sentient beings. 
Eighth, from the celestial palace halls and from the ornaments of the magnificent balconies, they radiate a great light, called pure adornments of all palaces, which shines on the abdomens of the mothers by whom they will be born and causes the mothers to be calm and comfortable and replete with all virtues; in the bellies of the mothers there are naturally immense mansions adorned with great treasures in which to rest the bodies of the enlightening beings. 
Ninth, they emanate from their feet vast light, called skillfully abiding; celestials about to die who are bathed in this light all have their lives prolonged and provide for the enlightening beings from their birth till their extinction. 
Tenth, from their minor embellishments they radiate great light, called array of eyes which shows the enlightening beings’ various deeds; at that time humans and celestials may see the enlightening beings in the heaven of satisfaction, or in the womb, or newborn, or leaving home, or attaining enlightenment, or conquering demons, or teaching, or entering extinction. 
Great enlightening beings emanate countless such lights from their bodies, their thrones, their palaces, their towers, all showing various works of enlightening beings; and, having shown these works, because they are replete with all virtues, they descend from the heaven of satisfaction to be born in the human world. 
“There are ten phenomena involved in the great enlightening beings’ manifestation of being in the womb. 
First, great enlightening beings want to develop sentient beings who are small-minded and low in understanding, and not let them get the idea that the enlightening beings are spontaneously born by transformation and that their knowledge and virtues do not derive from cultivation—for this reason enlightening beings appear in the womb. 
Second, because they want to ripen the roots of goodness of their parents, families, and those who did the same practices as they did in the past, they appear in the womb because the roots of goodness of those people will be developed by seeing the enlightening beings in the womb. 
Third, when the enlightening beings enter the womb, they are in a state of right mindfulness and right knowledge, without any confusion; and once they are in the womb they remain correctly mindful, without distraction. 
Fourth, while great enlightening beings are in the womb, they always expound the truth; the enlightening beings and major deities of all worlds gather around them and all are caused to attain boundless spiritual capacities and knowledge—the enlightening beings in the womb have developed such higher faculties of intellectual powers. 
Fifth, while the great enlightening beings are in the womb, they gather great congregations, and by the power of their past vows edify all the hosts of enlightening beings. 
Sixth, great enlightening beings achieve buddhahood among humans, so they should receive the best of births, as humans; therefore they appear in the mother’s womb. 
Seventh, when the great enlightening beings are in the mother’s womb, all the sentient beings in the universe see them, as if seeing their own faces in a mirror. 
At that time the great-hearted among the various beings all come to the enlightening beings and respectfully present offerings to them. 
Eighth, when great enlightening beings are in the mother’s womb, all the enlightening beings from other worlds who are in their final lives come and assemble and recite a great collection of teachings called vast treasury of knowledge. 
Ninth, when great enlightening beings are in the mother’s womb, they enter the concentration that is the treasury of purification and by the power of concentration manifest within the mother’s womb all kinds of adornments of a great palace, all wonderfully fine, to which even the palace of the heaven of satisfaction cannot compare, and cause the mother’s body to be comfortable and free from pain. 
Tenth, when great enlightening beings are in the mother’s womb, by their enormous spiritual power they produce offerings called opening the pure treasury of virtue and offer them to all buddhas in all worlds; the buddhas all explain to them the infinite matrix of enlightening beings’ abode in the cosmos of reality. 
These are the ten phenomena involved in great enlightening beings’ appearance in the womb; if they master these, they can reveal extremely subtle processes. 
while in the mother’s womb, showing the first inspiration for enlightenment up to the stage of coronation; while in the mother’s womb, showing life in the palace of the heaven of satisfaction; while in the mother’s womb, showing birth; while in the mother’s womb, showing childhood; while in the mother’s womb, showing life in a royal palace; while in the mother’s womb, showing departure from householding life; while in the mother’s womb, showing the practice of austerities, going to the site of enlightenment, and attaining true awakening; while in the mother’s womb, showing the turning of the wheel of teaching; while in the mother’s womb, showing ultimate extinction; while in the mother’s womb, showing a great subtlety called infinite different aspects of the practices of all enlightening beings and the autonomous spiritual powers of all buddhas. 
Based on these, enlightening beings can attain buddhas’ supreme subtle process of great knowledge. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of birth: 
birth with right awareness and right knowledge, free from folly and delusion; birth radiating great networks of light beams illuminating the whole universe; birth in the final existence, never to be reincarnated; unborn, unoriginated birth; birth knowing the triple world to be like an illusion; birth appearing corporeally everywhere in all worlds in the ten directions; birth in a body realizing omniscience; birth in a body emanating the lights of all buddhas and awakening all sentient beings; birth in a body entering contemplative concentration with great knowledge. 
When great enlightening beings are born, they shake all buddha-lands, liberate all sentient beings, annihilate all states of misery, and eclipse all demons; innumerable enlightening beings come and gather around them. 
These are the ten kinds of birth of enlightening beings, which they manifest in order to pacify sentient beings. 
“There are ten reasons why great enlightening beings smile and make a promise in their hearts. 
They think, ‘All worldlings are sunk in the mire of craving, and no one but I can rescue them.’ They also think, ‘All worldlings are blinded by passions and afflictions, and only I now have wisdom.’ They also think, ‘Based on this so-called body I will attain the supreme reality-body of buddhas, which fills all times.’ Then the enlightening beings, with unobstructed eyes, look over all the Brahma heavens and all the controlling heavens, and think, ‘These sentient beings all think they have the power of great knowledge.’ Then the enlightening beings observe sentient beings who have long planted roots of goodness and who now are regressing and sinking. 
The enlightening beings observe that though the seeds sown in the world be few, the fruits reaped are many. 
The enlightening beings see that all sentient beings who receive the teaching of Buddha will surely gain benefit. 
The enlightening beings see that enlightening beings who were their colleagues in past ages have become obsessed with other things and cannot attain the great virtues of the Buddha teaching. 
The enlightening beings see that the celestials and humans who were in the same communities with them in the past still are in mundane states, unable to detach from them, and not tiring of them either. 
Then enlightening beings are bathed in the lights of all buddhas and are even more joyful. 
These are the ten reasons great enlightening being smile and make a promise in their hearts; great enlightening beings appear in this way to pacify sentient beings. 
“There are ten reasons great enlightening beings show the act of walking seven steps; to manifest the power of enlightening beings; to manifest the giving of the seven kinds of wealth; to satisfy the wishes of the spirits of the earth; to manifest the appearance of transcending the three worlds; to manifest the supreme walk of the enlightening being, beyond the walk of the elephant, the bull, or the lion; to manifest the characteristics of adamantine ground; to manifest the desire to give sentient beings courageous strength; to manifest the practice of the seven jewels of awakening; to show that the truth they have realized does not come from the instruction of another; to manifest supreme peerlessness in the world. 
These are the ten reasons they show the act of walking seven steps after birth; they manifest this to pacify sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings appear as children for ten reasons: 
to manifest the learning of all worldly arts and sciences; to manifest the learning of riding and military art and various worldly occupations; to manifest the learning of all kinds of worldly things such as literature, conversation, games, and amusements; to manifest the shedding of errors and faults of word, thought, and deed; to manifest entering concentration, staying in the door of nirvana, and pervading infinite worlds in the ten directions; to show that their power goes beyond all creatures, celestial, human, and nonhuman; to show that the appearance and majesty of enlightening beings goes beyond all deities; to cause sentient beings addicted to sensual pleasures to joyfully take pleasure in truth; to show the reception of empowerment of buddhas and being bathed in the light of truth. 
“Having appeared as children, great enlightening beings appear to live in a royal palace for ten reasons: 
to cause the roots of goodness of their colleagues of the past to develop to maturity; to show the power of roots of goodness of enlightening beings; to show the comforts of great spiritual power of enlightening beings to humans and celestials who are obsessed with comforts; to adapt to the minds of sentient beings in the polluted world; to manifest the spiritual power of enlightening beings, able to enter concentration in the heart of the palace; to enable those who had the same aspirations in the past to fulfill their aims; to enable their parents, family, and relatives to fulfill their wishes; to use music to produce the sounds of the sublime teaching to offer to all buddhas; to dwell in subtle concentration while in the palace and show everything from the attainment of buddhahood to final extinction; and to accord with and preserve the teachings of the buddhas. 
“After enlightening beings in their final embodiment have appeared in a royal palace, they leave home. 
Great enlightening beings demonstrate leaving home for ten reasons: 
to reject living at home; to cause sentient beings attached to their homes to give up their attachment; to follow and appreciate the path of saints; to publicize and praise the virtues of leaving home; to demonstrate eternal detachment from extreme views; to cause sentient beings to detach from sensual and selfish pleasures; to show the appearance of transcending the world; to show independence, not being subject to another; to show that they are going to attain the ten powers and fearlessnesses of buddhas; and because it is natural that enlightening beings in their final life should do so. 
Enlightening beings use this manifestation of leaving home to pacify sentient beings. 
“Great enlightening beings demonstrate the practice of austerities for ten reasons: 
to develop sentient beings with low understanding; to remove false views from sentient beings; to show the consequences of action to sentient beings who do not believe in consequences of action; because it is natural to do so in accordance with the adulterated and polluted world; to show the ability to endure toil and diligently work on the Way; to cause sentient beings to want to seek the truth; for the sake of sentient beings who are attached to sensual pleasures and selfish pleasure; in order to show that enlightening beings’ effort is supreme, continuing to the very last life; to induce sentient beings to enjoy the state of calm and tranquillity and increase roots of goodness; to wait until the time is ripe to develop people’s immature faculties. 
Enlightening beings use these expedient means to pacify all sentient beings. 
“Ten things occur when great enlightening beings go to the site of enlightenment: 
they illumine all worlds; they cause all worlds to quake; they manifest their bodies in all worlds; they awaken all enlightening beings and all their colleagues of the past; they manifest all the adornments of the site of enlightenment; they manifest various kinds of deportment and all the adornments of the tree of enlightenment, showing them according to the inclinations of the minds of sentient beings; they see all the buddhas of the ten directions; they continually enter concentration with every step and become buddhas moment to moment, without interruption; the leaders of all creatures, unaware of each other, produce all kinds of wonderful offerings; with unobstructed knowledge they observe all the buddhas carrying out the deeds of enlightening beings in all worlds and fulfilling true enlightenment. 
By these ten things enlightening beings teach and influence sentient beings. 
“Ten things occur when great enlightening beings sit on the site of enlightenment: 
they cause all worlds to quake in various ways; they equally illuminate all worlds; they remove all the sufferings of miserable states; they cause all worlds to be adamantine; they gaze on the lion thrones of all the buddhas; their minds are like space, without conceptualization; they manifest comportment as appropriate; they rest in adamantine concentration; they receive the pure, sublime place sustained by the spiritual power of all buddhas; they can strengthen all sentient beings with the power of their own roots of goodness. 
“When great enlightening beings sit on the site of enlightenment, ten extraordinary, unprecedented events occur: 
all the buddhas of the worlds of the ten directions appear before them, raise their right hands, and praise them as unexcelled guides; all buddhas watch over them and give them power; the enlightening beings who were their colleagues in the past come and surround them and respectfully present various adornments; the plants and trees and all insentient things bend toward the site of enlightenment; the great enlightening beings enter a concentration called observing the cosmos, whose power can cause all enlightening practices to be fulfilled; they attain a spell called oceanic treasury of supreme pure light, and are able to receive the rain from the great clouds of teaching of all buddhas; by spiritual powers they produce superb offerings throughout all worlds which they present to the buddhas; they rest in highest knowledge and actually know the faculties and mental patterns of all sentient beings; they enter a concentration called ‘well aware,’ whose power enables their bodies to fill all worlds in all spaces in all times; they attain pure illumination and unobstructed great knowledge, enabling their physical actions to penetrate past, present, and future. 
These are the ten extraordinary things that happen when great enlightening beings sit on the site of enlightenment. 
“When great enlightening beings are sitting on the site of enlightenment, they manifest the conquering of demons because of observing ten kinds of purpose: 
because the sentient beings in times of confusion are bellicose, enlightening beings want to show the spiritual power of enlightening beings; to cut off the doubts of people in celestial and mundane states who have doubts; to civilize and tame the armies of demons; to cause people who like the military to come and observe demon quelling, so their minds will be subdued; to show that no one in the world can oppose the powers of enlightening beings; to arouse the courage and strength of all sentient beings; out of pity for the sentient beings of degenerate times; to show that even up to the site of enlightenment there are still hordes of demons who come to create disturbance, and only after this does one finally manage to get beyond the reach of demons; to show that the force of afflictions is weak and inferior compared with the mighty power of great compassion and virtue; and to do what must be done in a polluted, evil world. 
These are the ten reasons why great enlightening beings manifest demon-conquering. 
“Great enlightening beings have ten kinds of attainment of powers of the enlightened: 
they attain the powers of the enlightened because they transcend the afflictive activities of all demons; because they fulfill all enlightening practices and master all concentrations of enlightening beings; because they fully accomplish all the far-reaching meditations of enlightening beings; because they fulfill all the pure means of fostering enlightenment; because they attain illumination of knowledge of all things and can think and analyze well; because their bodies pervade all worlds; because they can support all by spiritual power; because their utterances are equal to the minds of all sentient beings; because they are physically, verbally, and mentally equal to the buddhas of all times, and can comprehend the things of all times in a single thought; because they attain concentration of precisely aware knowledge and are imbued with the ten powers of the enlightened, from knowledge of what is so and what is not so up to knowledge of extinction of contaminations. 
If enlightening beings acquire these ten powers, they are called buddhas, truly awake. 
“There are ten aspects of the turning of the great wheel of teaching by truly awakened buddhas: 
they are imbued with the knowledge of the four pure fearlessnesses; they produce utterances consonant with the four intellectual powers; they are able to expound the characteristics of the four truths; they accord with the unobstructed liberation of all buddhas; they are able to provoke pure faith in the minds of all sentient beings; whatever they say is not in vain, being able to extract the poison arrows of suffering from sentient beings; they are supported by the power of great compassionate commitment; their utterances pervade all worlds; they teach endlessly for incalculable eons; the teachings they utter are all able to produce spiritual faculties and powers, ways of awakening, meditations, liberations, concentrations, and such phenomena. 
When buddhas teach, it involves infinite such phenomena. 
“When truly awakened buddhas turn the wheel of teaching, by virtue of ten things they plant pure elements in the minds of sentient beings, which are not in vain: 
because of the power of their past vows; because of being sustained by great compassion; because of not abandoning sentient beings; because of freedom of knowledge able to teach according to the inclinations of sentient beings; because of unerring timing; because of according with suitability and not preaching arbitrarily; because of knowledge of past, present, and future; because buddhas are most excellent, without peer; because their sayings are free and unfathomable; because their knowledge is free and whatever they say is enlightening. 
“When buddhas have done their buddha-work, they manifest final extinction because of ten considerations: 
to show that all activities are really impermanent; to show that all created things are unstable; to show that ultimate nirvana is the abode of peace, without fear; to show those attached to the physical body that the physical body is impermanent, so that they will aspire to dwell in the pure body of reality; to show that the power of impermanence cannot be overturned; to show that all created things do not remain as one wishes and are not under one’s control; to show that all existents are like magical productions and are not hard and fast; to show that the nature of nirvana is ultimately stable and indestructible; to show that all things have no birth or origin, yet have the appearance of assemblage and dissolution. 
Once the buddhas have finished their buddha-work, have fulfilled their vows, have turned the wheel of teaching, have enlightened and liberated those who could be enlightened and liberated, and have made the predictions of buddhahood of the enlightening beings who become honored ones, as a matter of course they enter unchanging, great, ultimate nirvana. 
These are the ten points of consideration because of which they manifest ultimate extinction in nirvana. 
“This teaching is called the far-reaching pure practice of enlightening beings. 
It is expounded by all the infinite buddhas. It can enable the wise to comprehend innumerable matters and to all become joyful. 
It enables the great undertakings and deeds of all enlightening beings to continue, If any sentient beings hear this teaching, believe it, understand it, and put it into practice, they will surely be able to attain supreme complete perfect enlightenment quickly. 
Because they apply the teachings in practice. 
If enlightening beings do not practice in accord with the teaching, they will be forever estranged from the enlightenment of buddhas. 
Therefore, enlightening beings should practice the teaching. 
“This flower of definitive meaning of the points of virtuous practices of all enlightening beings enters into all the teachings, produces all knowledge, transcends all worlds, is beyond the paths of the two lesser vehicles, is not common to all sentient beings, can illumine all ways of entry into truth, and develops transcendental roots of goodness in sentient beings. This book of the teaching of detachment from the world should be honored, listened to and absorbed, recited and remembered, contemplated, appreciated, and put into practice. 
People who can do this will soon attain unexcelled complete perfect enlightenment.” When this book was spoken, by the spiritual power of Buddha and by the nature of the teaching, infinite worlds in the ten directions quaked and great light shone everywhere. 
At that point, buddhas of the ten directions all appeared before the enlightening being Universally Good and said in praise, “It is very good, offspring of Buddha, how you can expound this book of transmundane principles of the flower of definitive meaning of points of virtuous practice of enlightening beings of the highest ranks, which enters into all Buddha teachings. 
You have learned this teaching well and expound this teaching well; you preserve this teaching by spiritual power. We buddhas all rejoice in this, and as we rejoice for you, so do all buddhas. 
We buddhas, all of the same mind, preserve this scripture, so that the enlightening beings of present and future who have not heard it may all get to hear it.” Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, by the power of Buddha, looked over all the masses in the ten directions, throughout the cosmos, and said in verse: 
Cultivating difficult practices for measureless eons, Born of the true teachings of infinite buddhas, Causing countless beings to dwell in enlightenment— Listen as I tell of the peerless deeds of enlightening beings. 
Serving infinite buddhas, abandoning attachment, Widely liberating sentient beings, without forming such concepts, Seeking enlightened virtue, minds independent, Their sublime practices I now tell. 
Free from afflicting actions of demons of the three worlds, Imbued with higher conduct with holy virtues, Destroying delusions, minds at peace— I now tell the path they travel. 
Forever free of the deceptive illusions of the world, Showing sentient beings various transformations; Mind arising, abiding, passing away—they manifest myriad phenomena: 
I tell of their abilities to gladden all. 
Seeing sentient beings born, aging, and dying, Bound and oppressed by afflictions and troubles, They want to liberate them, and so inspire them— Listen to their virtuous practices. 
Generosity, ethics, tolerance, vigor, meditation, wisdom, Skill in means, benevolence, compassion, equanimity, and so on— They practice these for billions of eons: 
Hear the virtues of those people. 
Seeking enlightenment for billions of eons, They never begrudge their lives, Vowing to benefit sentient beings, not doing it for themselves— I now tell of their compassionate deeds. 
To expound their virtues for countless eons Would hardly amount to a drop in the sea; Their virtues are peerless, incomparable— By the power of Buddha I now summarize them. 
In their minds, no high or low— They tirelessly seek the Path, As they go, causing sentient beings To live in good, purifying ways. 
Their wisdom benefits all Like trees, rivers, and springs, And also like the earth Upon which everything rests. 
Enlightening beings are like lotus flowers, With roots of kindness, stems of peace, Petals of wisdom, Fragance of conduct. 
Buddha emanates the light of truth, Causing them to bloom; The water of the created not sticking to them, All who see them are delighted. 
The tree of sublime ways of enlightening beings Grows in the ground of the straightforward mind; Faith is its seed, compassion its roots, Wisdom its trunk; Skillful means are its boughs, Five transcendent ways its branches, Concentration its leaves, spiritual powers its flowers, And omniscience its fruit; Supreme powers are like birds perched in it As it gives shade to the triple world. 
The lion of enlightening beings Has pure good ways for a body, The four truths are its legs, Right mindfulness is its neck, Benevolence its eyes, wisdom its head, Wearing the turban of liberation; In the valley of emptiness of ultimate reality It roars this teaching and scares all demons. 
Enlightening beings are caravan leaders; They see living beings everywhere In the wasteland of birth and death, Afflicted, in dangerous places, Caught by the bandits of manias, Ignorant, blind, straying from the right road: 
Enlightening beings direct them to the right, straight road So they may enter the city of fearlessness. 
Enlightening beings see sentient beings Afflicted by the three poisons, Suffering all kinds of pains, Feverish, oppressed through the long night; Arousing great compassion for them, They explain many ways of curing, Eighty-four thousand kinds, To eliminate all afflictions. 
Enlightening beings are spiritual sovereigns, Civilizing beings by the right way, Causing them to avoid evil and cultivate good, And wholeheartedly seek enlightened virtue. 
Crowned and given predictions of supreme enlightenment By all buddhas, They distribute the wealth of sagacity of people, The jewels of the elements of enlightenment. 
Enlightening beings turn the wheel of teaching Just like what the buddhas turn; Conduct is its hub, concentration the spokes; Knowledge is their adornment, wisdom is their sword. 
Having defeated the bandit afflictions And slaughtered the enemy demons, They put false teachers to flight Whenever they see them. 
Enlightening beings’ ocean of knowledge and wisdom Is boundlessly deep and wide, Suffused with the flavor of truth, Filled with jewels of attributes of enlightenment. 
A great mind is its boundless shore, Omniscience is its tide: No sentient beings can measure it, It can never be fully explained. Enlightening beings’ polar mountain Goes beyond the world: 
Concentration of spiritual capacity its peak, The great mind rests immovable. 
Any who approach it Are imbued with its color of wisdom. It is far beyond all realms of objects; There is no one who does not see it. 
Enlightening beings are like diamond, Determined to find omniscience, Their faith and austere practice Steadfast and unshakable. 
Their minds without fear, They aid living beings And thoroughly annihilate All demons and afflictions. 
Enlightening beings’ great benevolence and compassion Are like layers of dense clouds; Three superknowledges flash lightning, Paranormal powers thunder, And with the four intellectual powers They rain water of eight qualities Moistening all to relieve The fever of afflictions. 
The citadel of truth of enlightening beings Has transcendent wisdom for walls, Conscience for a deep moat, Knowledge as its battlements. Opening wide the gate of liberation, Right mindfulness always guards it. The four truths are the level royal road, The six spiritual powers are the arsenal. The banners of the great Teaching Are hoisted all around; The demons of the three worlds Cannot enter at all. 
The condor of enlightening beings Has magic for its steady feet, Skillful means for its mighty wings, Kindness and compassion its clear eyes; Perched on the tree of all knowledge, It watches the ocean of existence, Snatches human and celestial dragons And places them on the shore of nirvana. 
Enlightening beings’ sun of truth Rises in the world, Its full orb of conduct Running swiftly by psychic travel, Shining with the light of wisdom, Maturing the herbs of faculties and powers, Destroying the darkness of afflictions, Evaporating the ocean of craving. 
The moon of the light of knowledge of enlightening beings Has the realm of reality for its sphere, Coursing through ultimate emptiness, Seen by all the world. In the minds of consciousness of the three worlds, It waxes and wanes through time. Among the stars of the Two Vehicles, It has no peers at all. 
The bodies arrayed with virtues Of enlightening beings, spiritual sovereigns, Are replete with all embellishments and marks of greatness, Looked up to by all humans and celestials. 
Pure eyes of skillful means, A diamond scepter of wisdom, They have mastery of spiritual law And civilize beings with truth. 
Enlightening beings, as great Brahma lords, Independently transcend the three worlds; They have ended all confusion by actions And are imbued with benevolence and equanimity. Everywhere they manifest their bodies And enlighten with the voice of truth. In the three worlds They uproot erroneous views. 
Enlightening beings, as controlling celestials, Are beyond the realm of birth and death; Their sphere is always pure, Their wisdom never recedes. 
Ending the path of lesser vehicles, They receive the spiritual coronation. 
Full of virtue and knowledge, Their fame is heard everywhere. 
Enlightening beings’ knowing mind Is clear and pure as space: There is no essence, no reliance— All is ungraspable. 
Themselves embodying pure conduct, They induce others to do likewise. 
Enlightening beings’ earth of skills Benefits sentient beings; Enlightening beings’ water of compassion Drowns afflictions; Enlightening beings’ fire of wisdom Burns the brush of delusive conditioning; Enlightening beings’ wind of nonabiding Goes through the void of existence; Enlightening beings are like precious jewels, Able to save the poor; Enlightening beings are like thunderbolts, Able to smash perverted views; Enlightening beings are like ornaments, Adorning the body of existence; Enlightening beings are like wishing jewels, Enhancing all actions. 
Enlightening beings’ virtues are like flowers, Always producing the branches of enlightenment; Enlightening beings’ vows are like garlands, Always hung on the necks of sentient beings; The fragrance of enlightening beings’ pure conduct Is sustained, without neglect or offense; The perfume of enlightening beings’ knowledge Scents the three worlds; Enlightening beings’ powers are like screens Able to block the dust of afflictions; Enlightening beings’ knowledge is like a standard, Able to defeat the enemy pride; Their sublime action is colored silk Adorning their knowledge; Conscience is clothing Covering all living beings; Enlightening beings’ unobstructed vehicle They ride out of the three worlds. 
Enlightening beings’ elephant of power Is tame at heart; Enlightening beings’ horse of psychic travel Bounds over all existences; Enlightening beings, dragons of teaching, Shower on the minds of all beings; Enlightening beings, udumbara flowers, Are rarely met in the world; Enlightening beings, courageous generals, Subdue all demons; Enlightening beings’ wheel of teaching Is like what the buddhas turn; Enlightening beings’ lamp disperses darkness So people can see the right road; Enlightening beings’ river of virtue Always follows the course of truth. 
Enlightening beings’ bridge of effort Liberates all kinds of beings; Their great knowledge and universal vows Together make a sturdy ship, Bringing in sentient beings And settling them safely on the shore of enlightenment. 
Enlightening beings’ garden of freedom Truly delights sentient beings; Enlightening beings’ flowers of liberation Adorn the palace of knowledge; Enlightening beings are like wonderful medicines Destroying the diseases of afflictions; Enlightening beings are like the snowy mountains, Producing the herb of wisdom; Enlightening beings are equal to buddhas, Awakening sentient beings. 
In buddhas’ mind is nothing else But true awakening and awakening others; Whence buddhas come forth, Thence come enlightening beings; And like the omniscient, They enter universality by knowledge. 
Enlightening beings skillfully lead All living beings; Enlightening beings naturally awaken To the sphere of omniscience; Enlightening beings’ measureless power Cannot be destroyed by the world; Enlightening beings’ fearless knowledge Knows sentient beings and phenomena: 
All worlds, Forms and characteristics different, Their languages and terms, They can all distinguish. 
Though detached from name and form, They manifest various appearances; No sentient beings can fathom their path: 
Such virtues have enlightening beings accomplished. Realizing natures are all natureless, They have no clinging to existence or nonexistence; This universal knowledge Has no end and no dependence: 
I now will explain In order to gladden sentient beings. 
Though knowing the appearances of things Are like illusions, all empty and null, Yet with compassion and commitment And the spiritual power of buddhas Enlightening beings, by mystical projection, Show innumerable various things. 
Such qualities as this You all should hear about. With one body they can manifest Unlimited different bodies; Without mind or object, They respond to all beings. 
In one voice They can utter all words; The languages of all beings They can produce according to type. 
Forever free of an afflicted body, They manifest an autonomous body; They know things cannot be explained, Yet make various explanations. 
Their minds are always silent and cool, Clear and pure as space, Yet they adorn lands everywhere, Showing all beings. 
They have no attachment to the body Yet are able to manifest bodies In all worlds, Taking on birth according to need. 
Though born in all places, They do not dwell on birth; They know bodies are like space, Variously appearing, according to mind. 
The body of enlightening beings is boundless, Appearing in all places, Always honoring and serving The most worthy of people. 
Perfumes, flowers, music, Banners, pennants, and jeweled canopies, They present to the buddhas, Always with a pure mind. Without leaving the assembly of one buddha They are present in all buddhas’ places; In those great congregations They ask about problems and listen to the Teaching. 
Hearing the Teaching, they enter concentration On each of numberless points, And likewise emerge from concentration With endless manifestations. 
With knowledge and skill in means They realize the world is all illusory, Yet are able to manifest boundless Illusory things of the world. 
They manifest various forms, As well as minds and languages; They enter the net of ideas, Yet without ever clinging. 
Sometimes they manifest initial determination To benefit the world; Sometimes they manifest long-time practice, Boundlessly extensive. 
Charity, morality, tolerance, energy, Meditation, and wisdom, The four boundless minds, four integrative practices, And all such higher principles They may show carried to fulfillment, Accepting them without false notions. 
Sometimes they manifest immanent buddhahood, Anointed and crowned by the enlightened; Sometimes they appear like listeners, Or like the self-awakened. Everywhere in ultimate nirvana, Still they do not give up enlightenment practice. 
They may appear as Indras, Or as Brahma kings, Sometimes surrounded by goddesses, Sometimes alone and silent. Sometimes they appear as monks Quietly taming their minds; Sometimes they appear as monarchs, Ordering the laws of society. Sometimes they appear as artful women, Sometimes as ascetics; They may appear to enjoy sensual pleasures Or to enter meditations. Sometimes they appear newborn, Sometimes young, old, or dying; Any who tried to conceive of this Would be doubtful and go mad. 
Sometimes they appear in celestial palaces, Sometimes they manifest spiritual descent; Sometimes they enter or abide in the womb, Sometimes they are buddhas preaching. Sometimes born, sometimes extinct, Sometimes they appear to enter halls of learning; They may be with consorts, Or apart from society practicing meditation. Sometimes they sit on the site of enlightenment And naturally realize true awakening; Sometimes they manifest active teaching, Or they may appear as beginning seekers of truth. They may appear as embodiments of Buddha, Sitting at peace in infinite lands; Or they may be cultivating the nonregressive path, Accumulating means of enlightenment. 
They penetrate countless ages And reach the Other Shore of them all, Infinite ages a single moment of thought, A single moment of thought, infinite ages. 
All ages are not ages, But they show them as ages to the world; There is no advent and no accumulation, Yet they accomplish the tasks of the ages. 
In a single atom They see all buddhas In all places everywhere, There being nowhere there is no buddha. Lands, beings, phenomena— They see them all, in order, Through incalculable ages, Ultimately inexhaustible. Enlightening beings know the number of living beings Is vast beyond bound: 
All those creatures’ bodies Arise from measureless causal relations; As they know one is infinite, So indeed are all. 
According to their competence, They teach the uninstructed; They know the faculties of sentient beings, Superior, middling, inferior, are not the same. 
They also know faculties change, And which can be taught and which cannot, And that one faculty and all faculties Are mutually interrelated, And their subtle individual differences, And their precise order. 
They also know the mental behavior Of beings past, present, and future, Their inclinations and understandings, All their vexing habits. 
They realize all actions Have no coming or going. 
Once they know people’s behavior, They tell them the unexcelled Teaching. They know thoroughly all kinds Of defiled and pure conduct; In an instant becoming enlightened, They accomplish omniscience. 
Dwelling in buddhas’ inconceivable Mind of ultimate knowledge, Instantly they are able to know The actions of all beings. 
Having mastered the functional power Of enlightening beings’ spiritual knowledge, They can in a single moment Travel to boundless lands. 
Going swiftly like this Throughout endless ages, There is nowhere they do not reach, Yet without stirring a hair. 
Just as a skilled magician Makes all kinds of forms appear Yet one finds in those illusions Neither form nor nonform, Likewise do enlightening beings Use the magic of knowledge of means To manifest various forms Throughout the world. 
As the clear sun and moon, Bright mirrors in the sky, Reflect in myriad waters Without being mixed up by the waters, Likewise, you should know, Enlightening beings’ wheel of truth Appears in the water of minds in the world Without being mixed up by the world. 
Just as a man in a dream Makes all kinds of things And may go on for millennia Without one night ending, Enlightening beings dwelling in the essence of reality Reveal all phenomena, And while countless eons may end, Their instantaneous knowledge is endless. 
As in mountain canyons And in palatial halls All sounds are echoed Without discrimination, Enlightening beings dwelling in the essence of reality Can, with autonomous knowledge, Widely utter words adapted to types, Also without discrimination. 
As one seeing a mirage And thinking it is water Chases it but finds no drink And becomes even thirstier, So too is the case Of sentient beings’ afflicted minds; Enlightening beings take pity on them, Rescue them and free them. 
Seeing form as like clustered foam, Sensations as like bubbles on water, Conceptions as like heat waves, Dispositions as like the pith of a plantain tree, And consciousness as like magic Manifesting various things, Thus knowing the clusters as such, The wise have no attachments. 
The mediums of sense are all empty and silent, Yet turn like the cogs of a machine; The elements are in essence unconnected, Yet fabricate the appearance of the world. 
Enlightening beings abide in real truth, The supreme truth of voidness; They teach widely in many ways, Yet their minds do not dwell on anything. 
There is no coming and no going, And also no remaining, Yet afflictive actions, the cause of suffering, Continue to flow and develop. 
That which is interdependently originated Is neither existent nor nonexistent, not real or false: 
Thus do enlightening beings enter the middle way And teach it without attachment. 
They are able in an instant To manifest the minds of past, present, and future, And all the various phenomena Of the realms of desire, form, and formlessness. Following the three modes of conduct, They expound the three liberations, Define the paths of the Three Vehicles, And accomplish omniscience. 
They comprehend what is so and what is not, All actions and all faculties, Realms, understandings, meditations, Where all paths lead, Recollection of past lives, clairvoyance, And annihilating all delusion. 
They know the ten powers of buddhas, But cannot yet fully achieve them; They realize all things are void, Yet always seek the sublime Teaching; They are not mixed up in afflictions, Yet still do not annihilate contamination. 
With extensive knowledge of ways of emancipation They liberate sentient beings; In this they attain fearlessness And do not give up cultivating their practices. 
Unerring, not deviating from the Path, They do not lose right mindfulness. Their vigor, determination, concentration, And meditative wisdom are undiminishing. 
Pure in conduct, meditation, and altruism, They clearly understand all times; With great compassion for sentient beings, They are totally unimpeded. By entering these gates of truth They accomplish such practices: 
I now tell a little Of the sense of their arrays of virtue. Even if one told of their practices for countless eons One would never exhaust them; Now I tell a little bit, Like a mote of dust of the earth. 
Resting on buddha-knowledge, They generate extraordinary thoughts, Cultivate the best of actions, And embody great benevolence and compassion. 
Heroically striving, inwardly at peace, They teach and enlighten conscious beings; Abiding by pure precepts, They fulfill practices leading to enlightenment. 
Able to comprehend buddhas’ virtues, Sentient beings, actions, and lands, They also know all ages With never a thought of weariness. 
With total command of differentiating knowledge, They arrive at the meaning of truth; They contemplate and explain the incomparable, Peaceful, and calm true awareness. 
They generate the mind of Universal Good And cultivate the actions and vows; With the causal power of compassion, They proceed on the Path pure in mind. 
Practicing the transcendent ways, They perfect conscious knowledge; Realizing power and freedom, They attain unexcelled enlightenment. 
Achieving impartial knowledge, They expound the supreme truth; Able to preserve it, endowed with sublime intelligence, They arrive at the position of the supreme teacher. 
Avoiding all attachments, They expound impartiality of mind; Generating knowledge and wisdom, They produce miracles and attain enlightenment. 
Preserving the truth through all ages, The knowers are most joyful; Deeply penetrating it and relying on it, They have no fear or confusion. 
They realize the inconceivable, Unravel artful mysteries; They skillfully enter concentrations And see all spheres of knowledge. 
Consummating the liberations, They exercise spiritual insights; Forever free from veils and bonds, They roam freely in gardens and groves. 
Virtuous ways are their mansions, All their deeds are admirable; They cause boundless adornments to appear, Their minds unmoved by the world. 
Observing well, profoundly intent, They can elucidate with wonderful eloquence The pure marks of enlightenment, The light of knowledge illumining all. 
Their dwelling place is peerless, Their minds are indomitable; Their will is like a high mountain, Their virtues like a deep ocean. 
They rest in truth like treasure, Wear the armor of vows, Undertake great works, Ultimately invulnerable. 
They gain the destiny of enlightenment, And are steadily broad-minded; Their hidden resources are inexhaustible, They awaken to all truths. 
Masters of worldly knowledge, They function subtly, without obstruction: 
Sentient beings, all lands, And all kinds of phenomena, Embodiments, vows, and realms, Knowledge, spiritual capacities, and so on, They manifest in the world, Countless hundreds of billions. 
Their spiritual powers and states Are free—none can inhibit them; They are adorned with all works Of powers, fearlessnesses, and unique buddha-qualities. 
Their bodies and physical deeds, Their words and purified speech, Are under protection, So they can accomplish ten things. 
When enlightening beings are first inspired And when their minds pervade all, Their senses are undistracted And they attain higher faculties. 
With profound minds, overmastering minds, They get away from deception; With various sure understandings, They thoroughly penetrate the world. 
Abandoning afflictive habits, They take to the supreme Path; Skillfully practicing it, they fulfill it And arrive at omniscience. 
Avoiding regression, they enter the absolute And certainly realize silent extinction; Generating the Path of enlightening teaching, They embody epithets of virtue. 
The paths, the paths of infinity, Up to the paths of adornment— Successively they go by these Without attachment to any. 
Hands, feet, and guts, With hearts of adamant, Wearing the armor of sympathy, Equipped with many weapons, Heads of knowledge, eyes of understanding, Deeds of enlightenment their ears, Pure conduct their noses, They destroy darkness, unhindered. 
Intelligence is their tongue, Their bodies are omnipresent; Higher knowledge is their mind, They cultivate their practices in action and repose. 
They walk on the site of enlightenment, Sit on the lion throne, Recline in universal goodwill, compassion, joy, and equanimity, And rest in emptiness. 
Their spheres of action and contemplation Illumine the realm of enlightenment; Observing the acts of sentient beings, They spring forth and roar. 
Free from greed, they practice pure giving; Abandoning conceit, they preserve pure conduct. 
Never angered, always tolerant, Not lazy, always vigorous, Mastering meditation, Wisdom uncontrived, Kindly saving, tirelessly compassionate, They take joy in truth and abandon afflictions. 
In all realms They know meanings and principles; Their virtues are fully developed, Their wisdom is like a sharp sword. 
Fully aware, they delight in learning And clearly understand how to proceed; They know demons and their ways And vow to get rid of them all. 
Seeing buddhas and buddha-works, They determine to embody them all; Free from pride, they cultivate knowledge, Not taken in by the power of demons; They are supported by the buddhas And also sustained by truth. 
They appear to live in the happy heaven And also appear to die there; They appear to abide in the mother’s womb And also show subtle processes. 
They appear to be born and smile, And appear to walk seven steps; They demonstrate study of arts And learning in the palace. 
They leave home and practice austerities, Go to the site of enlightenment, Sit straight and radiate light, Alerting living beings. 
Conquering demons, they attain true enlightenment And turn the wheel of the unexcelled teaching; When their manifestations are done, They enter great extinction. 
Those practices of enlightening beings Are cultivated over measureless eons; They are boundlessly extensive, And I now tell but a little. 
Though they enable numberless beings To become established in enlightened virtues, They ultimately grasp nothing Of sentient beings and religious principles. 
Imbued with such conduct, They freely exercise spiritual capacities: 
They place myriad lands on a hairtip And for trillions of eons, Holding innumerable lands in their palms, Go everywhere, without fatigue, Then return and place them in their former locations, Unbeknownst to the beings therein. 
Enlightening beings place all lands, Variously arrayed, In a single pore And show them as they really are. 
Also in one pore They contain all oceans Without increase or decrease in the oceans And without injuring sentient beings. 
Numberless iron mountains They pick up and crush to dust, Place each mote in one land, Using up every particle, Then take that number of lands And reduce them to particles too: The number of these particles might be known, But the knowledge of enlightening beings cannot be measured. 
Through one pore They radiate infinite light beams; The lights of sun, moon, and stars, Of jewels and fire, And the lights of the gods Are all eclipsed thereby. Annihilating the pains of miserable states, They teach beings there the unexcelled Way. 
The various different kinds of speech Of all worldly creatures Enlightening beings can utter In one language: 
They can explain distinctly with certainty All the Buddha teachings, Causing the living who hear it To all be very joyful. 
All the ages of the past They place in future and present; The ages of future and present They place far in the past. 
They show infinite lands Burning, becoming, and subsisting, All the various worlds Being in a single pore. 
All buddhas of the ten directions, Past, future, and present, They clearly reveal In their own bodies. 
They know the methods of transfiguration And skillfully adapt to beings’ minds; They manifest various bodies Without attachment to any of them. 
They may manifest the bodies of all sentient beings In the six states of existence; Or the bodies of Brahma, Indra, or world guardians, Or the bodies of all other celestial beings, The bodies of listeners or individual illuminates, Or the bodies of realized buddhas; Or they may appear as enlightening beings Cultivating omniscience. 
They skillfully penetrate the web of beings’ thoughts, Weak, middling, and superior; And show the attainment of enlightenment, And the lands of buddhas. 
They comprehend the web of thoughts And gain mastery of thought; They show all the expedients Of enlightening practices. 
Far-ranging spiritual displays Such as these they show; Such realms of experience No worldlings can know. 
Though they produce manifestations, Nothing is manifested; ultimately this is supreme. They adapt to beings’ minds To get them to travel the way of truth. 
Their bodies, speech, and minds Are equanimous as space; Pure conduct is their perfume, Myriad practices are their clothes. 
With the turban of truth, the topknot of purity, The jewel of omniscience, Their virtues are all-pervasive, And they are crowned as sovereigns. 
The transcendent ways are their weapons, Spiritual capacities their elephants, Psychic travel their horses, Wisdom their bright jewels. Sublime deeds are their consorts, The four means of integration their treasures; Skill in means are their generals, Enlightening beings are the rulers. 
Concentration is their citadel, Empty silence is their palace. 
With the armor of benevolence, the sword of wisdom, The bow of mindfulness, the arrows of insight, They spread the canopy of spiritual power on high And raise the banner of knowledge. 
Their forbearance immutable, They break right through the devil’s troops. 
Mental command is the level ground, Spiritual practices are the rivers, Pure knowledge the wellsprings, Sublime wisdom the forests, Emptiness the clear lakes, The branches of enlightenment lotus blossoms. 
They adorn themselves with spiritual powers, Always enjoying concentration. 
Meditation is their consort, Nirvana is their food, the taste of liberation their drink. 
They freely employ the Three Vehicles; These practices of enlightening beings Subtly develop further as they cultivate them Tirelessly over measureless ages. 
They honor all buddhas, Purify all lands, And cause all sentient beings To abide in omniscience. 
Even if the number of atoms in all lands Could be known, And all realms of space Could be measured with a grain of sand, And every thought in the minds Of all sentient beings could be counted, Still the virtues of enlightening beings Could not be fully told. 
If you want to be endowed with these virtues And higher subtle qualities, And wish to enable living beings To be free from suffering and always peaceful and happy, And wish to make body, speech, and mind All equal to those of the buddhas, You should make an adamant resolution To learn these virtuous qualities. 
Entry into the Realm of Reality Beginning with these, there were five thousand great enlightening beings, all of whom had undertaken the acts and vows of universally good enlightening beings and were unhindered in their sphere of action, pervading all buddha-lands. 
They manifested boundless bodies, going to all buddhas. 
The sphere of their unobstructed eye was pure, seeing the miracles of all buddhas. 
They had attained to infinity in revelations, ceaselessly approaching the entries into enlightenment of all buddhas. 
Their illumination was measureless, having attained the light of knowledge of principles and didactic devices of the ocean of teachings of all buddhas. 
They could explain virtues forever, through purity of intellectual powers. 
They were unfettered in the purity of the realm of knowledge vaster than space, being able to appear in the world in any physical form they wished. 
They were clear-sighted, knowing the realm of beings to be void of beings or souls. 
They had spacelike knowledge, pervading all universes with a net of lights. 
There were also five hundred hearers with great spiritual powers, all of them perfectly aware of the essence of true reason and the principles of truth. 
They had arrived at direct witness of the limit of reality, had penetrated the nature of phenomena, had gotten out of the ocean of existence and into the realm of space of those who have arrived at suchness, had stopped their propensities and habits and were beyond regression, dwelled in the abode of nonattachment and nonobstruction, were in a state as tranquil as space, had cut off all doubt in Buddha, and had entered the path intent on the ocean of buddha-knowledge. 
There were also world rulers, who had served past buddhas, who had accomplished the welfare and happiness of all beings, who were unsolicited benefactors, who had accomplished the protection of others, who had entered into the bliss of the highest knowledge in the world, who were never indifferent toward sentient beings, who issued from the realm of the buddha-teaching, who had accomplished the preservation of the buddha-teaching, who vowed to sustain the lineage of buddhas, who were oriented toward birth in the family of buddhas, who sought omniscient knowledge. 
At that time it occurred to those enlightening beings and their companions, to those hearers of great spiritual powers, and to those world rulers and their companions, “It is not possible for celestials or humans to understand or enter into or focus on or know or cognize or think about or perceive clearly or distinguish or elucidate or establish in the body and mind of other beings the sphere of the enlightened, the realm of knowledge of the enlightened, the basis, the power, the fearlessness, the concentration, the state, the mastery, the body, or the knowledge of the enlightened, except by the support, the magic, the empowerment, and the past vows of the enlightened, by having the qualities of roots of goodness perfected by past buddhas, by being in the charge of spiritual benefactors, by purification of faith, liberative means, and knowledge, by attainment of illumination of higher devotion, by purification of the higher will of enlightening beings, and by the proceeding of the higher will on the undertaking of realizing omniscience. 
May the Buddha show us, enlightening beings and sentient beings—according to our dispositions, different mental capacities, different orientations, different perceptions, different languages, different attainments, different masteries, different stages, different purity of faculties, different mental efforts, different realms of thought, focus on different qualities of buddhahood, and orientation toward various teachings—his past procedure toward omniscience, and show us his past undertaking of the vows of enlightening beings, his past purification of the spheres of the transcendent ways of enlightening beings, the wonder of his past accession to the stages of enlightening beings, his past fulfillment of the undertakings of the spheres of practices of enlightening beings, the appearance of his past accomplishment of the vehicle of enlightening beings, his past purification of the embellishment of the path of enlightening beings, the arrays of his past accomplishments of the ocean of ways of emancipation of enlightening beings, the splendors of the ocean of spiritual transformations he experienced in the past as an enlightening being, the oceans of his past efforts as an enlightening being, the oceans of his spiritual transformations on the threshold of perfect enlightenment, the power of his spiritual manifestations in turning the wheel of truth as a buddha, the oceans of spiritual transformations involved in buddha-land purification, the Buddha’s methods of guiding sentient beings to liberation, the Buddha’s lordship of the city of principles of omniscience, the Buddha’s revelations of the paths of all sentient beings, the Buddha’s transfigurations entering into the states of all beings, the Buddha’s receiving of gifts from beings, the Buddha’s presentations of teachings on right giving to all sentient beings, the Buddha’s projection of the image of Buddha into the mental states of all beings, the Buddha’s displays of miracles to sentient beings, the Buddha’s miracles of teaching and admonishing sentient beings, and the Buddha’s inconceivable manifestations of the realms of concentration of Buddha to all beings—may the Buddha show us these things.” Then the Buddha, knowing what the enlightening beings were thinking, entered the concentration known as “the coming forth of the lion,” a world-illumining manifestation, of which the body is great compassion, the entryway is great compassion, the guide is great compassion, the means of access to the sky of truth is great compassion. 
As soon as the Buddha had entered this concentration, the magnificent pavilion became boundlessly vast: 
the surface of the earth appeared to be made of indestructible diamond, the surface of the ground covered with a net of all the finest jewels, strewn with flowers of many jewels, with enormous gems strewn all over; it was adorned with sapphire pillars, with well-proportioned decorations of world-illumining pearls of the finest water, with all kinds of gems, combined in pairs, adorned with heaps of gold and jewels, with a dazzling array of turrets, arches, chambers, windows, and balconies, made of all kinds of precious stones, arrayed with jewels in the forms of all world rulers, and embellished with oceans of worlds of jewels, covered with all kinds of jewels, with flags, banners, and pennants flying in front of all the portals, the adornments pervading the cosmos with a network of light. 
Outside the grounds where the inexpressibly vast circle of the assembly was, there was a magnificent array of balustrades, and in each direction was a stairway consisting of a mass of jewels, adorned superbly in a well-ordered fashion. 
Also the Jeta grove and buddha-fields as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-fields all became coextensive, vastly expanded, by the power of Buddha. There appeared varied arrays of all kinds of jewels, plains variously set with untold jewels, fences of uncountable jewels set around, and palm trees of various jewels arrayed in rows. 
Also in those lands were innumerable rivers of fragrant water, winding endlessly, filled with perfumed water, with turbulent rapids of flowers of all jewels, whirling to the right, producing the sounds of the sayings of all buddhas. 
There were also inconceivable rows of jewel white lotuses, trees adorned with arrays of lotus blossoms made of jewels, as well as inconceivable numbers of rows of towers of various gems, enveloped in nets of all kinds of jewels, arrays of countless jewels radiating webs of light, countless arrays of all kinds of jewels, of celestial chariots of jewels, and arrays of chests of all kinds of incense releasing banks of all fragrances. 
There also stood innumerable emblems of jewels, emblems of cloth, emblems surfaced with jewels, emblems of flowers, emblems of ornaments, emblems of garlands, emblems of nets of small bells made of all kinds of jewels, emblems of parasols of the finest gems, emblems of jewels pervading everywhere with their radiance, emblems of the finest jewels resounding with the names of all buddhas, emblems of the finest jewels of leonine splendor, emblems of the finest jewels bespeaking the past efforts of all buddhas, emblems of reflections of all objects, arrays of emblems of the finest jewels, well-distributed arrays of ornaments of all kinds of emblems, standing in all quarters. 
The entire sky of the Jeta grove was also adorned with inconceivable celestial cloud-palaces, countless clouds of trees of all fragrances, untold mountains of all kinds of magnificent arrays, untold sweet sounds of clouds of music and songs of praise of all buddhas, untold clouds of jewel lotuses, untold jewel lion thrones spread with celestial jeweled cloth with enlightening beings sitting on them singing beautiful eulogies of buddhas, individual pearly clouds in the forms of celestial lords facing the earth, untold clouds of webs of brilliant white pearls, untold clouds of towers of ruddy pearls, and untold clouds of diamond-raining ornaments. 
What was the reason for that? 
So inconceivable is the virtue of the Buddha, the mass of pure qualities of Buddha, the mighty power of Buddha, the miracle of Buddha’s pervasion of all worlds with one body, the display by all buddhas of the array of all buddha-lands in one body, the buddhas’ display of the reflections of all phenomena in a single atom, the buddhas’ display of the succession of all buddhas of past ages in one pore, the buddhas’ illumination of the stream of atoms in all worlds with a single beam of light, the buddhas’ pervasion of all buddha-lands with clouds as numerous as atoms in all worlds emitted from one pore, and the buddhas’ display of the ages of becoming and decay of all worlds in a single pore: 
as the Jeta grove was in this way purified as a buddha-field, so were all worlds in the ten directions, throughout the space of the cosmos, likewise purified, appearing adorned, decorated, with the body of the Buddha clearly manifest therein, all together in the Jeta grove, filled with enlightening beings, with the ocean of Buddha’s audience standing in orderly ranks, clouds raining all kinds of adornments, lights of energy of all jewels, decorations raining from clouds of all jewels, decorations covered with clouds of arrays of all lands, ornaments raining from clouds of all celestial bodies, ornaments raining from clouds of all flowers, flowery ornaments pervading space, clouds of all kinds of cloth raining robes of various colors, ornaments continuously showering densely from clouds of all kinds of garlands and wreaths, ornaments showering in the forms of all beings from clouds of various incenses hovering everywhere, ornaments of fine powders, dense webs of jewels, raining from clouds of webs of flowers made of all jewels, ornaments of clouds of all kinds of precious banners and pennants held by celestial maidens and carried around the sky, ornaments of lotuses of all jewels with circles of leaves of various gems set atop poles with filaments hanging down, their rustling producing sweet sounds, and ornaments of garlands of various jewels on the body of Buddha, a network of images of all jewels—all of these appeared there. 
As soon as the Buddha had entered this “coming forth of the lion” concentration of buddhas, from the buddha-land of a buddha named King of Splendorous Illuminating Radiance, in the world Golden Cloud Lamp Emblem, which was to the east, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, a great enlightening being named Light from the Origin of the Vows of the Illuminator, given leave by that buddha, left that vast assembly and came to this world Endurance along with as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands, adorning the sky with clouds of various magnificent arrays, showering a rain of clouds of celestial flowers, celestial perfumes, celestial jewel lotuses, celestial garlands, celestial gems, celestial ornaments, celestial jewel parasols, and fine celestial robes of various colors, setting up clouds of celestial jewel banners and pennants in the sky, filling the sky with beautiful arrays of clouds of all jewels; having come to the buddha with these, the great enlightening being and the company of enlightening beings paid respects to the Buddha, then, going to the east, magically produced towers covered with nets of jewels arranged all around, and lion thrones inside of lotuses made of the finest radiant gems, and sat on them, after having covered their bodies with ornamental webs of wish-fulfilling jewels. 
From the south, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha King of the Treasury of All-Illumining Radiance, in the world of Diamond Ocean Womb, a great enlightening being named King of Invincible Energy, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, causing all oceans of worlds to appear decked with webs of all fragrances, causing every place in all buddha-lands to appear decked with webs of garlands of all jewels, causing all groups of lands to appear decked with webs of garlands of all flowers, causing the locations of all buddha-lands to appear decked with webs of braids of all kinds of garlands, causing the congregations in all buddha-lands to be supported by a diamond ground, causing the structures of all buddha-lands to be joined with webs of all kinds of jewels, causing all worlds to appear swathed in all kinds of cloth, conjuring up images of all buddha-lands decked with webs of bundles of garlands bearing images of all jewels, causing all lands to appear decked with webs of strings of the finest radiant jewels illumining all their adornments, and causing all worlds to appear held by a foundation of webs of strings of the most excellent jewels. 
The great enlightening being and company came and presented all this to the Buddha, then went to the south, magically produced towers of world-illumining jewels with lion thrones inside radiant jewel lotuses, and sat thereon, covering the enlightening beings’ bodies with ornamental webs of flowers made of all kinds of jewels. 
From the west, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Lamp of Knowledge of the Realms of the World and the Realm of Reality, in the world Lamp Representing the Radiance of a Polar Mountain of Jewels, a great enlightening being named King of Fiery Energy of Universal Splendor, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, filling all universes with clouds of mountains of fragrant banners of various colors, as many as atoms in untold buddha-lands, filling all universes with clouds of flowers of various scents, mountainous clouds of aromatic smoke of many kinds of incense, clouds of fragrances of various kinds, mountainous clouds of the finest jewels formed by lights from every hair in the shapes of all utensils, mountainous clouds of jewels like stars adorned with various spheres of light, mountainous clouds of spheres of various arrays of diamonds, mountainous clouds of jewels illumining all worlds, mountainous clouds of the finest jewels reflecting the elements of all mountains covering the sky, mountainous clouds of the finest jewels reflecting the appearances of all buddhas, mountainous clouds of jewels resounding with the practices of enlightening beings showing the images of the past efforts of all buddhas, and mountainous clouds of the finest jewels reflecting the summits of enlightenment of all buddhas, all these clouds as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands, filling all universes. 
These the great enlightening being and company brought and presented to the Buddha; they then went to the west and magically produced towers of the finest fragrances covered with nets of pearls, and lion thrones in lotuses made of jewels presenting the appearances of the lord of gods, and sat thereon, having covered their bodies with gold and jewels and put on crowns of wish-fulfilling gems. 
From the north, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Glorious Illuminator of the Space of the Cosmos, in the world Luminous Banner of Jewel Cloth, a great enlightening being named King of Unobstructed Splendor, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, producing in the sky ornamental clouds of diadems of all jewels, ornamental clouds of jeweled robes of yellow color, with a yellow glow, ornamental showers from clouds of jeweled robes emitting various fragrances, ornamental clouds of robes of the finest sunlike jewels, ornamental clouds of robes of jewels blazing with golden splendor, ornamental clouds of robes of fiery jewels, ornamental clouds of robes of various jewels reflecting all the stars, clouds of robes of jewels of pale radiance bursting into view everywhere, clouds of robes of the finest jewels blazing with radiant splendor bursting into view everywhere, and clouds of robes of the finest jewels illumining everywhere with a radiant glow bursting into view everywhere, causing the sky to appear veiled in clouds of robes of jewels in oceanic arrays. 
These the great enlightening being and company offered to the Buddha; they then went to the north and magically produced towers made of the finest pearls from the sea, as well as lion thrones inside jewel lotuses, and sat thereon, having covered their bodies with nets of majestic jewels and tied starlike pearls in their topknots. 
From the northeast, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Independent Eye, in the world Emanating Webs of Light Beams from All the Finest Jewels of the Earth, a great enlightening being named Supreme Moon of Vows Emanated through the Cosmos, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, causing all worlds to be completely covered with clouds of sandalwood towers, clouds of flower towers, clouds of pearl towers, clouds of diamond towers, clouds of gold towers, clouds of towers of robes, and clouds of lotus towers. 
The great enlightening being and company presented these to the Buddha, then went to the northeast and magically produced towers of enormous jewels, with turrets with doors looking on all things, and lion thrones in jewel lotuses of incomparable fragrance, and sat thereon, having covered their bodies with nets of the finest flowers and put on crowns of various interlaced jewels. 
From the southeast, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Dragon King, in the world Banner of Arrays of Clouds of Fragrance, an enlightening being named King of Fiery Energy of Truth, together with as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, covering the whole sky with clouds of spheres of golden light, clouds of spheres of light of jewels of infinite colors, clouds of spheres of light the color of the curl of hair between the Buddha’s eyebrows, clouds of spheres of light of various jewel colors, clouds of spheres of light the color of the inside of lotuses, clouds of spheres of light the color of superb jewels like circles of branches of jewel trees, clouds of spheres of light like the knot on the head of Buddha, clouds of spheres of light the color of fine gold, clouds of spheres of light the color of the sun, and clouds of forms of the discs of the sun and moon and stars. 
The great enlightening being and company brought and presented these to the Buddha, then went to the southeast and magically produced towers of flowers of coolly shining pearly radiance, and lion thrones in lotuses of excellent diamonds, and sat there, having covered their bodies with the finest pearls blazing with jewel light. 
From the southwest, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha King of Universal Light of Knowledge of the Moon of Truth, in the world Filled with Jewel Sunlight, a great enlightening being named Standard of Knowledge Scattering All Bands of Demons, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that world, came to this world Endurance, from every pore issuing, to the farthest reaches of space, shining clouds of flowers, shining clouds of all kinds of music, shining clouds of jewels, shining clouds of precious robes emitting aromatic vapors of various scents, shining clouds of lightning produced by water spirits, shining clouds of radiant jewels, shining clouds of blazing gold jewels, shining clouds of the blaze of diamonds from splendorous mines, and shining clouds of eye-jewels illumining the seeds of events of past, present, and future, like the ocean of memory of the enlightened. 
The great enlightening being and company presented these to the Buddha, then withdrew to the southwest and magically produced towers of great jewels illumining the cosmos, particles of a web of light beams radiating in all directions, and lion thrones in lotuses of shining jewels like fragrant lamps, whereon they sat, having covered their bodies with nets of the finest jewels from pure mines and put on crowns of the finest jewels reverberating with the sounds of the abodes of all beings. 
From the northwest, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Majestic King of Radiant Splendor, in the world Containing Vows of Illumination, a great enlightening being named Flame of Knowledge of Vows of Illumination, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, emanating from every physical characteristic, every pore, every part of the body, clouds of physical images of the buddhas of past, present, and future, clouds of physical images of the enlightening beings of past, present, and future, clouds of physical images of the audiences of the buddhas of past, present, and future, clouds of images of the spheres of emanations of the buddhas of past, present, and future, clouds of embodiments of images of the past efforts of the buddhas of past, present, and future, clouds of physical images of all hearers and individual illuminates of past, present, and future, clouds of images of the bodies of the buddhas of all times and the forms of the trees at their sites of enlightenment, clouds of embodiments of images of the miracles of the buddhas of past, present, and future, clouds of physical images of the rulers of the worlds of past, present, and future, and clouds of all the purified buddha-lands of past, present, and future, these all pervading space from moment to moment. 
The great enlightening being and company came to the Buddha, presented these, then withdrew to the northwest and magically produced towers containing the finest jewels illumining all quarters and lion thrones in lotuses made of jewels illuminating the world, and sat thereon, having covered their bodies with nets emanating unstoppable light and put on crowns of jewels whose radiance illumined everywhere. 
From the nadir, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha King of the Banner of the Torch of Unobstructed Knowledge, in the world Radiance of the Halos of All Buddhas, a great enlightening being named Valiant One with Knowledge to Dissolve All Barriers, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, emitting from every pore the sounds of utterances of the ocean of all incantations in the world, the sounds of the clouds of the oceans of instruction of the enlightening beings of past, present, and future, sounds of the ocean of vows, undertakings, and methods of all enlightening beings, sounds of the ocean of enlightening beings’ means of pervading all lands with their spheres of action, sounds of the clouds of the oceans of all enlightening beings’ means of purification and fulfillment of the ways of transcendence, sounds of the ocean of means of the accomplishments and spiritual effects of all enlightening beings, oceans of expressions of the spiritual transformations by means of which all buddhas go to the summit of enlightenment, disperse the opposition of demons, and realize enlightenment, clouds of sounds of the ocean of words used by all buddhas in turning the wheel of the teaching, expressions of the expedient means of teaching and training used to guide all people at the appropriate times, sounds of the ocean of means of teaching using methods appropriate to the aspiration, excellence of roots of goodness, and time, in order to lead to all-knowledge. 
Emanating these sounds, the great enlightening being and company came to the Buddha and offered them in respect, then withdrew to the nadir, magically produced towers of various mines of all kinds of jewels from the matrix of light of the palaces of all buddhas, as well as lion thrones in spaces held by lotuses inset with all jewels, upon which they sat, having put on crests of jewel emblems reflecting images of all sites of enlightenment and covered their bodies with nets of the finest jewels illumining all lands. 
From the zenith, beyond as many oceans of worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands, from the land of the buddha Voice Revealing the Sphere of Universal Knowledge, in the world Description of the Inexhaustible Lineage of Buddhas, a great enlightening being named Revealing the Base of Cosmic Aspiration, together with a company of as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold oceans of worlds, given leave by that buddha and having disappeared from that assembly, came to this world Endurance, from every physical feature, every pore, every part of the body, every limb and joint, every utterance, every article of clothing and adornment, showing images of the oceans of past efforts of all buddhas past, present, and future connected with transcendent giving which took place in all lands of the ten directions, as well as images of the receivers and the gifts, reflected in every mark and embellishment, every pore, every part of the body, every limb and joint, every utterance, every article of clothing and adornment of the company of enlightening beings as well as the buddha Vairocana; showing reflections of the oceans of their past efforts involved in transcendent morality, in transcendent tolerance—even involving showing amputation of limbs, in the transcendent energy of all enlightening beings, surging boldly forward, in the seeking and attainment of the ocean of meditations of all buddhas, in the seeking of the ultimate truth to which the wheel of teaching of all buddhas leads, in the manifestation of the embodiment of great determination which relinquishes all there is, in the joy of the vision of all buddhas, the path of all enlightening beings, and pleasing all beings, in the arrangements of purification of means of accomplishment of the ocean of vows of all enlightening beings, in the purification of the strength of the attainment of transcendent power of all enlightening beings; and showing images of the oceans of past efforts involved in the sphere of knowledge of all enlightening beings—all these reflected images bursting into plain view by clouds of all kinds of miraculous displays throughout the cosmos. 
The great enlightening being and company offered these to the Buddha, then went to the zenith, magically produced towers of various arrays of diamonds as well as lion thrones of the universally good enlightening being inside emerald lotuses, and sat thereon, having covered their bodies with nets of fiery jewels and put on crowns of jewels with crests of trailing strings of diamonds vibrating with the names of the buddhas of past, present, and future. 
All those enlightening beings, with their retinues, were born of the practices and vows of the Universally Good enlightening being; they had the pure eye of knowledge to see all buddhas face to face; they were endowed with the acute ears to hear the ocean of teachings of all buddhas; they had reached the ultimate transcendent attainment of the masteries of all enlightening beings; from moment to moment they issued manifestations of going to all buddhas; they were in the range of pervading all worlds with one body; they had luminous bodies appearing in the circles of the congregations of all buddhas; they were in the realm of showing the reflections of all worlds and one world contained in each other in a single atom; they had the power to guide and develop all people with appropriate timing; they were in the realm of emitting clouds of teachings of all buddhas from every pore; they had attained the knowledge that all realms of beings are like illusions; they had realized that all buddhas are like reflections; they knew that all existence, states of beings, and births are like dreams; they had pure knowledge that all developments of actions are like images in a mirror; they were intensely aware that all becoming is like a mirage; they perceived that all worlds are like emanations; they had attained the illumination of the knowledges of the ten powers of buddhas; they were fearless and mighty, able to roar the lion’s roar; they had entered the inexhaustible ocean of analytic knowledge; they had attained knowledge of expressions of principles of the ocean of instruments of thought of all people; they coursed in the knowledge of the unobstructed space of the reality realm; they had attained unimpeded knowledge of all things; they had purified the spheres of superknowledges of all enlightening beings; they had the rigor to roust out all bands of demons; they stood firm in the power of knowledge of past, present, and future; they had attained unobstructed omniscience; they coursed in the space of independence; they were powerful in the space of the effortless stage of omniscience; they coursed in knowledge of the ungraspability of all existence; they had exposed the knowledge of the ocean of principles of all realms of reality; they had entered the door of nondiscriminatory knowledge of all worlds; they demonstrated the mutual interpenetration of all worlds; they manifested incarnation in all realms of being; they knew the various forms of all worlds, subtle and gross, broad and narrow; they had attained knowledge of the interpenetration of minute objects and immense lands; they could reach all buddhas in a single moment of thought; they had the body of knowledge of all buddhas; they had attained unconfused knowledge of all regions; they could pervade the ocean of all locations in a single moment of thought by mystic metamorphosis. 
The whole Jeta grove became filled with enlightening beings of such immeasurable attainments, by the power of the buddhas. 
The great disciples, however—Shariputra, Maudgalyayana, Mahkashyapa, Revata, Subhuti, Aniruddha, Nandika, Kapphina, Katyayana, Purnamaitrayaniputra, and so so—did not see the transfiguration of the Buddha in the Jeta grove, the adornments of the Buddha, the majesty of the Buddha, the freedom of the Buddha, the magic of the Buddha, the mastery of the Buddha, the miracle performed by the Buddha, the light of the Buddha, the power of the Buddha, or the Buddha’s purification of the land; nor did they see the inconceivable sphere of the enlightening beings, the descent of the enlightening beings, the gathering of the enlightening beings, the descent of the enlightening beings, the approach of the enlightening beings, the miracle of the enlightening beings, the magic of the enlightening beings, the circles of the enlightening beings, the locations of the enlightening beings, the array of lion thrones of the enlightening beings, the mansions of the enlightening beings, the deportment of the enlightening beings, the enlightening beings’ mastery of concentration, the enlightening beings’ observation, the enlightening beings’ emergence, the enlightening beings’ vigor, the enlightening beings’ offerings to the Buddha, the enlightening beings’ bequest of enlightenment, the enlightening beings’ development, the enlightening beings’ strength, the enlightening beings’ clarification of the reality-body, the enlightening beings’ fulfillment of the body of knowledge, the enlightening beings’ manifestation of the body of vows, the enlightening beings’ perfection of the physical body, the enlightening beings’ purification of excellence of attributes, the enlightening beings’ array of spheres of light of eternal power, the enlightening beings’ radiation of networks of light beams, the enlightening beings’ emission of clouds of emanations, the enlightening beings’ pervasion of the network of all regions, or the transfiguration of the sphere of actions of enlightening beings. 
Why didn’t the disciples see any of this? 
Because of lack of corresponding roots of goodness. 
For they had not accumulated the roots of goodness conducive to vision of the transfiguration of all buddhas, and they had not had the purifications of the arrays of qualities of all buddha-lands in the ten directions described to them, and they had not had the various wonders of all buddhas described to them by the buddhas, and they had not established beings in supreme perfect enlightenment while they were involved in the world, and they had not instilled in others’ minds the determination for enlightenment, and they were not capable of perpetuating the lineage of buddhas, and they were not engaged in the salvation of all beings, and they had not exhorted enlightening beings to practice transcendent ways, and while they were involved in the world they had not focused their minds on the stage of knowledge superior to all worldlings, and they had not developed the foundations of goodness conducive to omniscience, and they had not perfected the transmundane roots of goodness of buddhas, and they had not realized the miraculous superknowledge to purify all buddha-lands, and they did not know the source of the great vow of enlightening beings, which is the good root of concentration on unique world-transcending enlightenment that represents the range of vision of enlightening beings, and they were not born of the magical essence emanating from the power of the enlightened, and because hearers and individual illuminates do not share in the knowledge of enlightening beings’ control over holding various perceptions as in dreams, the growth of the current of joy of enlightening beings, and the manifestations of the range of the eye of knowledge of the universally good enlightening being. 
Because of that, those great disciples, who were the best of the best, did not see the miracle of the Buddha, did not hear it, know it, realize it, penetrate it, did not fix their minds on it, did not notice it, did not focus their attention on it, did not observe it, did not examine it, did not reflect on it, did not contemplate it. 
Because that is the sphere of buddhas, not the sphere of disciples. 
Therefore even though the disciples were in the very same Jeta grove, they did not see those miracles of the Buddha. For indeed they did not have the corresponding roots of goodness, they did not have that purity of the eye of knowledge, whereby they could have seen the miracles of Buddha. They did not know the concentration whose minute point of focus would have given them access to those vast magical manifestations. They did not know that liberation or that spiritual capacity or that might or that power or that mastery or that state or that perception or that power of vision whereby they might recognize or see or penetrate or approach or discover or head for or observe or experience or reveal to others or explain or show or describe or make visible or arrive at or produce or lead beings into the cultivation and realization of the realities of the miracles of Buddha. 
That knowledge did not belong to them. 
Because they were emancipated by the vehicle of hearers, they had realized the path of hearers, they had fulfilled the sphere of practices of hearers, they were fixed in the fruit of hearers; they rested on the knowledge of the light of truth, they were fixed at the limit of reality, they had gone to the state of eternal peace, they had no thought of great compassion and had no pity for the beings of the world; they had accomplished what they had to do for themselves. 
They had gathered in the Jeta grove and were sitting there, in front of, behind, and to the left and right of the Buddha, in his presence, yet they did not see the miracles of the Buddha in the Jeta grove. 
The situation was like that of hundreds of thousands of ghosts gathered on the bank of the great river Ganges, hungry and thirsty, naked, without shelter, emaciated, dehydrated by the wind and heat, attacked by flocks of crows, terrorized by wolves and jackals—they do not see the Ganges River, or they may see it as dry, without water, or full of ashes, because they are shrouded by actions that blind them. 
In the same way the old great disciples there in the Jeta grove did not see or penetrate the transfigurations of the Buddha, because they rejected omniscience and their eyes were veiled by ignorance. 
It was like the case of a man who has dozed off in the daytime in the midst of a large group of people and while asleep sees a celestial city with beautiful mansions appearing there in his dream, and sees the whole summit of the polar mountain, with groves and gardens, with innumerable nymphs all around, innumerable godlings living there, and various celestial flowers scattered about, and sees wish-fulfilling trees providing various celestial garments, jewel ornaments, and flower garlands, and sees musical trees producing all kinds of sweet celestial sounds, and many kinds of forms of pleasure and diversion, and hears the sweet sounds of the music and singing of the heavenly nymphs, and perceives himself as being there, seeing the adornment of the celestial arrays all over the place. 
The group of people who are there in the same place do not see this, are not aware of it, do not observe it, because it is the vision of the man in his dream, not the vision of the group of people in the same place. 
In the same way the enlightening beings and the world rulers on the verge of enlightenment, by virtue of the tremendous power of the Buddha, by the attainment of their own roots of goodness, by their own undertaking of the vow for omniscience, by development of the qualities of all buddhas, by stabilization in the magnificent path of enlightening beings, by accomplishment of the outgrowths of the teachings of all aspects of omniscient knowledge, by fulfillment and purification of the higher aspirations of the acts of the Universally Good enlightening being, by entering the spheres of knowledge of all the stages of enlightening beings, by mastery of all the states of concentration of enlightening beings, and by unhindered contemplation of all the spheres of knowledge of enlightening beings, saw the inconceivable power and mastery of the Buddha, understood and comprehended, whereas the great disciples, the best of the best, did not see or understand, because they did not have the eye of enlightening beings. 
On the snowy king of mountains are many medicinal herbs, which someone who is expert in secret lore and medicine, knowing all the principles of herbal medicine, may go and pick, while herders and hunters on the same mountain, ignorant of herbal medicine, do not know the essence, energy, results, efficacy, or method of application of the herbs. 
In the same way, those enlightening beings who had entered the sphere of knowledge of buddhas and produced the transformed perceptions of enlightening beings were aware of the transfigured perceptions of the concentration of Buddha, while the great disciples, even though they were there in the same Jeta grove, being satisfied with their own task and having no desire to work for others, being indifferent, dwelt in the feeling of bliss because they were in a condition of bliss in their present state and so were not aware of the perceptions of the concentration and miraculous transfiguration of Buddha. 
Someone who has acquired knowledge of precious substances, sees where the deposits are, has thoroughly studied the appropriate science and technology, and is supported by immense virtue and strength, then can take jewels and enjoy himself as he wishes, properly honor his parents, support his wife and children, and also distribute them evenly to the old, the poor, the destitute, the unfortunate, those without food and clothing. 
Similarly, the enlightening beings in the Jeta grove who had clarified the eye of knowledge of the inconceivable sphere of Buddha and who had entered the sphere of the inconceivable knowledge of Buddha saw the miraculous transfigurations of Buddha, entered the oceans of principles of the Buddha teachings, attained oceans of concentrations, engaged in the service of the buddhas, took to embracing all truths, took all beings into their care with the four means of integration. The great disciples, however, did not see or notice the transfigurations of the Buddha or the great assembly of the enlightening beings. 
It was, again, as if a man came to a land of jewels with his eyes blindfolded by a rag: 
he might walk around, stand, sit, and lie there, but he would not see the masses of jewels, he would not see the jewel trees, jewel clothes, jewel fragrances, or any of the other jewels. 
In the same way, those enlightening beings, having come to the land of jewels of truth, where the unsurpassed jewel of the enlightened, adornment of all worlds, was right before them, standing in the Jeta grove, saw the Buddha displaying inconceivable miraculous transfigurations. 
They were inimical to omniscience, their eyes covered with the rag of ignorance, and they had not clarified the eye of unobstructed knowledge of enlightening beings, and they did not realize that all things interpenetrate, which is how they could have seen the miracle produced by the inconceivable power of the Buddha’s concentration. 
Again, it is as if there is an eye-purifier called “possessed of undefiled brilliance,” which is incompatible with any darkness or obscurity: suppose someone obtained it and with that eye-clarifier “possessed of undefiled brilliance” went in the dark of night among a huge crowd of people in various postures unable to see in the darkness, and walked around, stood there, sat down, and so on—those people would not see this person or distinguish what he was doing. On the other hand, this person would see the crowd of people, their various postures, positions, locations, appearances, and dress. 
In the same way, the Buddha, together with his company of enlightening beings, having the pure unobstructed eye of knowledge, discerns and sees all beings. 
Buddha shows the miracle emanated from the great concentration of Buddha, but the great disciples did not see the miracle emanated from the concentration of great knowledge of Buddha, or the great company of the assembly of enlightening beings. 
Also, it is as if a monk in the midst of a large group of people attained the concentration of total absorption in earth or water or fire or wind, or total absorption in blue, yellow, red, or white, or total absorption in heaven, or in the bodies of various beings, or in all sounds, or in all objects, that group of people would not see the body of water, would not see the realm of fire, would not see the various bodies or totality of objects in which the monk’s mind was absorbed, except for those who had themselves attained those states of concentration. 
In the same way, the great disciples did not see the Buddha’s revelation of the inconceivable wonder of the sphere of the concentration of Buddha, while the enlightening beings who had attained the path of the Buddha entered into the sphere of the Buddha. 
Again, it is as if there were an ointment, which simply by being applied to one’s eyes makes one invisible to others while one is able to see others. 
In the same way Buddha, beyond the world, beyond the spheres of all beings, having entered the sphere of omniscience, can be discerned by the eye of knowledge of enlightening beings, and sees all beings in the world, but the great disciples could not see those miracles of the Buddha. 
It is also like the case of the celestial spirit born together with a person and always associated with the person—the spirit sees the person, but the person does not see the spirit. 
In the same way, the Buddha, in the sphere of omniscience, manifested great miraculous transfigurations of Buddha in the midst of the great assembly of enlightening beings, but the great disciples did not see, did not notice, the miracle of the transfiguration of the Buddha or the magical manifestation of the circle of enlightening beings. 
Again, it is like the case of a monk who has attained perfect control of mind and has reached extinction of perception and sensation: he neither perceives nor cognizes and does nothing with his six sense organs, but still is not totally extinct. 
In the same way, the great disciples were in the Jeta grove and had the six sense faculties, but they did not see, penetrate, perceive, or discern the miracle of the power emanated from the concentration of the Buddha, nor did they gain access to, see, or cognize the great gathering of the enlightening beings, the miracle of the enlightening beings, the transfiguration of the enlightening beings. 
The sphere of Buddha is indeed profound, vast, immeasurable, difficult to see, difficult to realize, difficult to plunge into, completely beyond all worldlings: 
for all disciples and individual illuminates, the sphere of Buddha is unthinkable and ungraspable. 
At that time the enlightening being Light from the Origin of the Vows of the Illumination, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and then spoke these verses: See how inconceivable is the enlightenment of Buddha, the best of beings: In the Jeta grove he shows the Victor’s transfiguration of the enlightened. 
He exercises incalculable independent power, Whereat the world is confused, not knowing Buddha’s qualities. 
Profound is the miracle worked by the Spiritual Sovereign, Infinite, inconceivable, beyond the range of the world. 
The buddhas are adorned with infinite attributes, But the truths revealed by the buddhas are signless. 
The Victor shows transfigurations in the Jeta grove, Boundlessly deep, most hard to put into words. 
The enlightening beings do not look at the assembly of saints, Having come from innumerable lands to see the Buddha. 
They have attained the sphere of unobstructed, unattached action By their determination; no one in the world can know their will. 
All those enlightened on their own and the disciples all around Do not know their doings or their state of mind. 
The enlightening beings, great in wisdom, are invulnerable, invincible, Paragons of heroism, undefiled, certain of the stage of knowledge; Beyond measure, of great fame, they have attained concentration And display a miracle extending throughout the cosmos. 
Then the enlightening being King of Invincible Energy, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Full of virtue and great knowledge, gone to the goal of enlightening practice, Givers of security to all worlds—behold these, the offspring of Buddha, Intelligent, with boundless wisdom and well-concentrated minds, In the realm of boundlessly deep and broad knowledge. 
The great grove called Jeta, where the perfect Buddha sojourns, Is adorned with magnificent arrays and filled with enlightening beings. 
See the Great Oceans, nonreliant, independent, Sitting on lotus thrones, having come from the ten directions: 
Not resting on anything, not grasping, free from falsehood, without abode, With unattached minds, dispassionate, set on the reality realm. 
Exemplars of knowledge, great heroes, with unshakable adamant minds, In the midst of unperishing truths, they make a show of nirvana. 
They have come together from countless worlds in the ten directions, Come to the Buddha, without any notions of duality. 
They see the miraculous transfiguration of the autonomous Buddha, By the power of which these enlightening beings have come. 
They are nondiscriminatory in regard to Buddha teachings and the plane of realities; The offspring of Buddha have thoroughly realized that distinctions are merely mundane conventions. 
The buddhas stand in the undifferentiated ultimate limit of the reality realm, Yet show the differentiation of things by inexhaustible sayings. 
Then the enlightening being King of Fiery Energy of Universal Splendor, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: See the immense sphere of knowledge of the best of beings; Knowing when is the right time and when not, he teaches the truth to people. 
Destroying the various arguments marshaled by heretics, He shows beings’ spiritual transfigurations according to their dispositions. 
The great sage has transcended finitude and infinity. 
Like the sun coursing through the sky giving light every day, So does the sagacious guide appear, independent of past, present, and future. 
As the sphere of the full moon shines at night, So does one see the guide, full of pure qualities. 
As the globe of the sun courses through space without stopping, Such is the transfiguration of the Buddha. 
Just as space is independent of all land, So is the Buddha transfiguration of the Lamp of the World to be known. 
As the earth is the support of all corporeal beings in the world, In the same way is the wheel of teaching of the Lamp of the World steadfast. 
As the wind blows swiftly through the sky, not sticking to anything, In the same way does the nature of Buddha operate in the world. 
Just as all lands are founded on a mass of water, So are the buddhas of all times founded on a mass of knowledge. 
Then the enlightening being King of Unobstructed Splendor, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Like a lofty mountain made of diamond Does Buddha emerge in the world, savior of all beings. 
Like the water of the ocean, immeasurable, pure, Does the sight of Buddha stop the thirst of the world. 
Just as the polar mountain emerges from the ocean water, So does the Light of the World emerge from the ocean of truth. 
Like an ocean filled with deposits of jewels Is the Independent One’s instant awareness of endless knowledge. 
Profound is the Guide’s knowledge, incalculable, infinite, By which he shows infinite inconceivable Buddha transfigurations. 
As an expert magician shows illusory forms, Buddha, master of knowledge, displays transfigurations. 
As a pure wish-fulfilling jewel grants what is desired, The Victor fulfills the aspirations of those whose intentions are pure. 
Like a luminous jewel shining, Omniscience, pure, illumines beings’ minds. 
Like an octagonal jewel facing all directions, The Unobstructed Lamp illumines the cosmos. 
Like a water-clarifying light purifying water, Vision of Buddha purifies people’s senses. 
Then the enlightening being Supreme Moon of Vows Emanated throughout the Cosmos, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: As everywhere is made one hue by an emerald, Vision of Buddha makes beings the hue of enlightenment. 
In each atom Buddha shows transformation of various kinds, Beyond measure, purifying the enlightening beings. 
That is extremely profound, unlimited, hard to approach, In the realm of knowledge of the wise, inaccessible to worldlings. 
The full arrays of adornments purified by the works of Buddha Are perceived by enlightening beings entering the reality realm. 
The inconceivable buddha-lands where the Victor appears Are filled with buddhas surrounded by the wise, everywhere. 
The Teacher, master of all truths, the Hero of the Shakyas, has come forth: It is his immeasurable miracle that has appeared. 
The one of infinite splendor shows endless transformations. 
The Leader of the World teaches the offspring of Buddha about the reality realm; And they develop the range of knowledge unattached in all things. 
Buddha’s wheel of teaching turns by spiritual power, Filled with hundreds of miracles, purifying all worlds. 
In the realm of the Best of Beings, their sphere of knowledge purified, The Great Dragons, rich in wisdom, liberate all beings. 
Then the enlightening being King of Fiery Energy of Truth, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: The disciples trained in past, present, and future, foremost sages, Do not even know a footstep of a perfect buddha. 
Even all individual illuminates Do not know a footstep of the Protector. 
How much less could ordinary beings know the Guide, As they are bound in chains and wrapped in the dark of ignorance. 
Unquantifiable, the Victor cannot be known by any scales; Endowed with unobstructed knowledge, Buddha transcends the path of words. 
Radiant as the full moon, steady, adorned with a multitude of qualities, He passes infinite eons creating transformations. 
Thinking of the Buddha in every way with perfect concentration, Even after untold billions of eons Buddha would still be inconceivable. 
One cannot understand the limit of even a single attribute of the Independent, Even while gazing on Buddha, for the qualities of Buddha are inconceivable. 
Those who are intent on this, and whose minds delight therein, Will attain these realms, which are so hard to see. 
Valiant ones of great resources, intelligent, pure-minded, stable, Enter into this teaching, made of endless virtue and knowledge. 
Great is their aspiration, great their discipline of mind; They will attain great enlightenment, having arrived at the sphere of the Victor. 
Then the enlightening being Standard of Knowledge Scattering All Bands of Demons, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Being the body of unobstructed knowledge, the Independent is incorporeal; In the realm of inconceivable knowledge, that cannot be conceived. 
The buddha-body is realized by inconceivable pure deeds; Undefiled by the triple world, it shines with distinctive embellishments. 
Universal light of the world, having clarified the reality realm, It is also the door of enlightenment, the mine of all knowledge. 
Dispassionate, free from falsehood, having shed all hindrances, As the sun of the world Buddha radiates lights of knowledge. 
That which removes the fears of existence and purifies those in the triple world, The development of enlightening beings is thus the mine of buddhas’ enlightenment. 
Buddha shows infinite forms without sticking to any form, And shows those inconceivable forms through all living creatures. 
No one can reach the end of the knowledge of Buddha, By which inconceivable enlightenment is instantly clarified. Inexhaustible exposition of knowledge, wherein are the buddhas of all times, Is produced in a single instant, without any change in essence. 
The wise seeker of enlightenment, engaged in endless action, should always think— Although it be thought, no thought is born in this thought. The inconceivable elements of buddhahood realized by the perfectly enlightened Are profound beyond all telling, beyond the scope of words. 
Then the enlightening being Flames of Knowledge of Vows of the Illuminator, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Those of unerring recollection, pure, born of truth, of certain mind And inconceivable wisdom, are inexhaustible oceans of enlightenment. 
This is the sphere of action of those whose minds are resolved hereon; Their knowledge is unshakable, they have ended doubt. 
They do not become depressed or dejected; Their minds are on the way to buddhahood. 
Filled with good qualities realized over countless eons, The peerless seekers of knowledge dedicate them all. 
They think about the course of life but do not take refuge in it— They take refuge in the Buddha teachings, sporting in the realm of Buddha. 
Whatever mundane fortune takes place in the world of sentient beings, The resolute relinquish it all, for they are set on the attainment of buddhahood. 
Vainly clinging, the world is always fettered— There, those of unobstructed action are always set on the welfare of beings. 
Unequaled in their action, inconceivable to all beings, They consider the happiness of the world, whereby suffering is repelled. 
They have purified knowledge of enlightenment and are sympathetic to all beings, As lights of the world, emancipating all beings. 
Then the enlightening being Valiant One with Knowledge to Disperse All Barriers, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: The name of Buddha is hard to come by even in a billion eons— How much more so the sight of Buddha, supreme, which ends all desires. 
Buddha appears as the light of the world, gone to the goal of all truth, Worthy of the offerings of the three worlds, purifier of all beings. 
Those who regard the physical form of the impeccable best of beings Never tire of it even in countless eons. 
Offspring of the Victor looking at the form body of the Lord of Humans, Unattached, dedicate themselves purely to enlightenment, seeking the highest goal. 
This is the door to enlightenment, the corporeal embodiment of the Great Sage, Whence issue unhindered, inexhaustible analytic intellectual powers. 
Having illumined infinite beings, the Great Sage foretells their supreme Enlightenment, having led them into the Great Vehicle. 
The great field of blessings, a sphere of knowledge, has emerged And illuminates infinite beings, increasing the mass of virtue. 
There is no fear of evil ways for those who associate now with Buddha, The one who cuts through the net of misery and purifies the mass of knowledge. 
A great mind is born in those who see the Buddha, Immeasurable wisdom and power is born, radiant as the moon. 
They will be sure of enlightenment, having seen the Buddha, And will be certain that they will become buddhas themseļves. 
Then the enlightening being King of Superknowledge Discerning the Differentiations of the Plane of the Cosmos, by the power of Buddha, looked over the ten directions and spoke these verses: Having seen the Sage endowed with infinite virtues, The minds of those dedicated to the Great Vehicle are purified. 
The buddhas appear for the welfare of all beings, Universally compassionate, steadfast, turning the wheel of the teaching. 
How can all creatures requite the buddhas’ Countless eons of dedication to their welfare? 
It is better to burn in the fearsome three evils for eons Than not to see the Teacher, who quells all attachments. 
All the mass of suffering that takes place in all realms of being Is tolerable, but not deprivation of the sight of Buddha. 
It is better to live long in every miserable way in the world Than not to hear the buddhas. 
Each eon spent even in hell is better Then elsewhere apart from Buddha, distant from enlightenment. 
What is the reason for wanting to live long amid calamities? 
It is to see the Buddha and increase in Knowledge. All miseries are ended once the Buddha has been seen, And entry into knowledge takes place, into the sphere of the enlightened. 
All obstructions are removed when Buddha is seen, Increasing measureless virtue, whereby enlightenment is attained. 
Sight of Buddha severs all doubts of sentient beings And fulfills all purposes, mundane and transcendental. 
Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, having looked over the host of enlightening beings everywhere, to further analyze, discuss in detail, explain, reveal, elucidate, bring to light, illumine, and point out, by means of the cosmos of truths, equal to the realm of space, equal to past, present, and future, equal to the realm of realities, equal to the realm of beings, equal to the realm of all worlds, equal to all sets of actions, equal to the dispositions of beings, equal to the interests of beings, equal to the specific illustrations of truth, equal to the appropriate times for the maturation of beings, and equal to the faculties of all beings, elucidated this “lion emergence” concentration of Buddha by means of ten indications: 
indication of the succession of all buddhas and the succession of lands in the atoms of the buddha-lands throughout all universes; indication of the seeking and following of virtues of the buddhas in all buddha-lands in space throughout the future; indication of buddhas emerging in all buddha-lands and showing the ocean of infinitely various doors of enlightenment; indication of the hosts of enlightening beings in the circles of the buddhas in the buddha-lands throughout space facing the terrace of enlightenment; indication of pervading the cosmos in a moment of thought with emanations in the forms of the buddhas of past, present, and future, emitted from every pore; indication of the light of magical pervasion of all multitudes of lands in all the oceans in all directions equally with one body; indication of revelation of the power of concentration of all pasts, presents, and futures of the transfigurations of the state of buddhahood in the surfaces of all objects; indication of manifestation of the oceans of eons of various successive transfigurations of Buddha in the lands of past, present, and future, equal to the atoms in all lands; indication of the birth of enlightening beings from the endless power emanating from every pore by the ocean of vows of all buddhas of past, present, and future; indication of endless manifestation of varied expositions of truth amid equal adornments of sites of enlightenment with circles of enlightening beings around lion thrones equal in extent to the cosmos: 
“These ten, O offspring of the Victor,” said Samantabhadra, the Universally Good enlightening being, “are the first ten of as many expressions of the ‘lion emergence’ concentration as atoms in untold buddha-lands, which I follow. 
However, these are the sphere of knowledge of those who arrive at Thusness.” Then the enlightening being Universally Good, illuminating the expression of the meaning of the “lion emergence” concentration of Buddha, by the empowerment of Buddha, while gazing on the face of Buddha, observing the ocean of assemblies everywhere, observing the infinitely various transfigurations of the concentration of Buddha in the inconceivable sphere of the enlightened, observing the magical nature of inconceivable knowledge, and observing all teachings expressed in an inconceivably infinite variety of manners of speaking, then uttered these verses: 
Like the atoms of all lands are the oceanic buddha-lands on a single hairtip: 
Surrounded by a circle of enlightening beings, there Buddha rests on the throne of the enlightened. 
In the ocean of buddha-lands on a single hair, on a lotus throne at the site of enlightenment Extended throughout the cosmos, the Guide is seen at the trees of enlightenment. 
Like the atoms in all lands are the buddhas assembled on a single hair: Surrounded by a host of enlightening beings, they expound all good actions. 
Buddha sits in one land pervading all lands; Endless hosts of enlightening beings go there from everywhere. 
Like atoms in countless lands, enlightening beings, radiant seas of virtue, Should appear in the audiences of the Teachers, throughout the cosmos. 
Appearing like reflections in all lands, oceans of knowledge of buddhas, Established in good practices, they arrive in the assemblies of all buddhas. 
Assembled everywhere in all lands, in the realm of the joy of enlightening practice, Delighted in hearing the myriad teachings, they pass millions of eons in each land. 
Enlightening beings carry out their practices coursing in the ocean of truth, emanating light; They enter the oceans of vows, established in the sphere of buddhahood. 
Born of the teachings of the buddhas, acting with universal good in mind, They enter the oceans of qualities of buddhas, in vast transfigurations. Pervading the refuge of the reality realm, they constantly emanate a cloud of bodies, Many as atoms in all lands, with the rain of truth, for enlightenment. 
Then the blessed Buddha, wanting to establish those enlightening beings in this lion emergence concentration of buddhas, went on to emanate from the circle of hair between his brows a light called “illumining past, present, and future, showing all ways into the reality realm,” accompanied by as many beams of light as atoms in untold buddha-lands, with which he illumined all lands in all oceans of worlds in the ten directions. 
Then the enlightening beings who had gathered at the Jeta grove saw, in every buddha-land in all universes throughout the farthest reaches of space, in groups of buddha-lands within atoms of buddha-lands as numerous as atoms in all buddha-lands, in buddha-lands of various powers, various purities, various locations, and various conditions, an enlightening being at the summit of enlightenment sitting on a lion throne, attended by all world rulers, surrounded by a multitude of enlightening beings, attaining unexcelled supreme perfect enlightenment, here teaching in circles as vast as untold buddha-lands with a sphere of sound pervading the cosmos, there gone to the various realms of existence, or in the cities, towns, communities, and nations of the human world, teaching the truth by means of various miracles, various modes of conduct, various embodiments, various indications of ways of concentration, various superknowledges from concentration, appearing in various castes and races, with various auras of light, radiating various webs of light beams, with various spheres of sound, in various congregations, setting up various interlocutors, setting up various instructions, in various words and expressions. 
And, as those enlightening beings saw the transfigurations of the profound concentration of the Buddha in all those assemblies, they saw transfigurations of Buddha throughout the cosmos, in all worlds throughout space, in the arrays of the ten directions, in the sets of cycles in all places, in the confluence of all spaces, in the media of principles in the various regions, in the various realms of conception, in the conjunctions of the various regions, in the specific spaces of the various regions, in the oceans of all regions—that is, in the north, south, east, west, northeast, southeast, southwest, northwest, nadir, and zenith—in the places of the body of lands, in the places of the body of beings, in the places that are in the conceptions of beings, in the regions of past ages, in the regions of the present in the ten directions, in every point in all realms of space, in the locus of each and every atom of all lands, in the points of entry of all spaces, in the locations of occurrence of performance of various actions, in the conceptual locations of infinite surfaces of space in a point the size of a hairtip, those transfigurations reflected in the minds of all living beings, using their languages, in the perceptions of all living beings, without discrimination among beings, equal in past, present, and future, coming forth equally everywhere as a whole, with physical forms coming to all assemblies, descending into the presence of all bodies of beings, with the same knowledge in all ages, appearing to all beings according to their mentalities, equally, everywhere in all lands, elucidating the teachings of buddhas and guiding sentient beings ceaselessly. 
All of them were united by the blessed Vairocana Buddha, by the four integrative methods, by equality of past virtuous actions; they were fully developed by seeing, hearing, and remembering; they had already set their minds on supreme enlightenment; going to the buddhas here and there, they were united by fundamental virtues: 
in accord with the sameness of their roots of goodness and adoption of means of developing omniscience, the enlightening beings gained access to the projections of the concentration of the blessed Vairocana, which extended throughout the cosmos, to the farthest reaches of space. 
Some comprehended the reality-body, some the form-body, some the past attainment of Vairocana as an enlightening being, some the fulfillment of the ways of transcendence, some the pure adornment of the sphere of action, some the mystic projection of the stages of enlightening, some the mystical projection of perfect enlightenment, some the unconfused mystical projection of the concentrations in which buddhas sojourn, some the powers and fearlessnesses of buddhas, and some comprehended the ocean of analytic powers of buddhas—they entered into as many such oceans of mystical projections of Buddha as there are atoms in ten inexpressible numbers of buddha-lands. 
They entered those oceans of mystical projections of Buddha by way of various devotions, various paths, various doors, various entries, various penetrations, various methods, various approaches, various directions, various capacities, various places, various worlds, various attainments, various provisions, various transformations, various means, and various concentrations. 
Those enlightening beings gained access to the mystical projections, the miraculous transfigurations, of the blessed Buddha Vairocana by means of such enlightening beings; concentrations as these—adornment of the entire cosmos, illumination of the realm of unobstructed knowledge of all times, light of knowledge of the continuity of the planes of the cosmos, entry into the plane of the sphere of those who realize Thusness, illumination of the plane of space, free access to the ten powers of buddhas, bold emergence adorned by the fearlessness of the enlightened, whirlpool of the principles of the reality realm, moon pervading all universes with unhindered sound, and light of principles of universal order. 
Those enlightening beings also entered the oceans of mystical projections of buddhahood of the blessed Vairocana by way of such enlightening concentrations as those known as emblem of the king of truth crowned by nonattachment, seeing oceans of buddhas in all objects, emblem of reflection of the different bodies of all realms of being, entry into the unalloyed sphere of the body of those who arrive at Thusness, container of compassion going along with the whirl of all worlds, founded on the power based on all truths, sphere of revelation of ultimately quiescent indifferent equality, universally projected reflection emanated purely without attachment, occult manifestation of the unity of all lands, effectuation of the manifestation of attainment of enlightenment in all buddha-lands, comprehension of embodiment of all oceanic virtues, endless spiritual power to effect the mystical transfiguration of all objects, entry into the ocean of past practices of all buddhas, basis of eternal preservation of the lineage of buddhas, power of devotion to purification of the ocean of all lands in the ten directions of the present, illumination of the states of all buddhas in a single moment of thought, entry into ultimate freedom from attachment to all objects, causing all worlds to appear in one buddha-field, production of emanations of all embodiments of buddhas, adamantine knowledge of the ocean of all faculties, causing all buddhas to appear within a single body, instantaneous state of discovering the principle of all things in the point of a moment of thought, spiritual power of manifesting nirvana in all realms in the cosmos, power to roam on the highest plane, magical manifestation of the differentiation of the bodies of beings in all buddha-lands, entry into the presence of the whirl of all knowledge, complete knowledge and differentation of past, present, and future in a single instant, containing the body of principles of the cosmos in every moment of thought, lion following the lineage of all buddhas, sphere of the eye of wisdom seeing the cosmos in all objects, vigorous undertaking of approach to the ten powers, sphere of the eye of universal vision of all objects, illumination of beings in all spheres of form, space of an unmoving whirl, showing all things in one thing, verbal analysis of truth. 
Those enlightening beings also entered the oceans of mystic projections of Buddha made by Vairocana by way of such enlightening beings’ concentrations as exposition of truth setting up the standard of all buddhas, illumination unattached to the borders of past, present, and future, continuous knowledge of all ages, entry into the ten powers by subtle means, accomplishment of unbreakable practice of the essence of enlightenment through all ages, clouds swiftly appearing everywhere, creation of magical appearances of attainment of enlightenment, characterized by all pleasures of feeling, adornment of space with all kinds of magnificent arrays, moment to moment producing clouds of crested images like beings of the world, light of the moon of realization of Thusness pure as space, spacelike base of all who realize Thusness, radiance of all spiritual faculties, lamp revealing the meanings of all things, illumination of the sphere of the ten powers, characterized by the brilliance of the buddhas of all times, the unique source of all buddhas, accomplishing undertakings in every passing moment, source of inexhaustible blessing, illumination of guidance of endless vision of Buddha, supreme adamantine basis of all truths, production of universal manifestations of the emanations of all buddhas, consummating the course of the sun of all buddhas, instantly illuminating past, present, and future, sound of the voice emitting universal light illumining the natural quiescence of all things, march to the boundary of vision of all buddhas, aware of all things like a collection of lotuses, observation of phenomena as baseless like the sky, whirlpool of concentration of the ocean of all spaces in one space, entering directly into the ground of all phenomena, oceanic source of all things, tranquil body shining light on all beings, accomplishment of the will for all higher knowledge in a single moment of thought, eternal manifestation of the attainment of enlightenment equally everywhere, entering into all universes by comprehending them as one single array, illumination of the body of recollection of all buddhas, intuition of vast higher knowledge of all worlds, merging one’s being with the infinite cosmic principle in a single mental instant, illumination of the homologous order of all things in homologous universes, mystical manifestation of the fiery energy of the spheres of all Buddha teachings, basis of the determination and action taking all realms of beings into the net of Indra, continuity of the ground of all worlds, traveling everywhere by mystic projections of lotuslike splendor, intuitive knowledge of the cycles of the bodies of all beings, magical materialization in the presence of all beings, superknowledge of the means of analyzing mundane speech in the ocean of utterances of all beings, superknowledge of the distinctions of the seeds of all worlds, unalloyed incorruptible matrix of great compassion, entry of all buddhas into the goal of realization of Thusness, and lionlike emergence to behold the abode of liberation of all buddhas. 
By entry into as many of the concentrations of enlightening beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands, beginning with these, those enlightening beings entered into the ocean of the blessed Vairocana’s mystical projections of buddhahood, and they accordingly remembered equivalent transformations carried out in the past. 
Furthermore, by the mental-moment-to-mental-moment entry, pervading the whole cosmos, of those enlightening beings, who were in the presence of Buddha in the Jeta grove, sitting on lion thrones in lotuses of various jewels as vast as worlds as numerous as atoms in ten buddha-lands, born of the occult transformation of great knowledge and insight, having attained the stage of penetrating knowledge and insight, contemplating with universal knowledge, born of the source of wisdom, on the brink of omniscience, having unclouded eyes of knowledge, having arrived at the state of leaders of beings, having approached equality with all buddhas, always carrying out the principle of nondiscrimination, with specific knowledge of all objects, relating to all things as naturally calm, in the ultimate asylum of the quiescence and nirvana of all worlds yet upholding the variety of all worlds, going to all lands without attachment, in the midst of all things without reliance on anything, effortlessly establishing the measures of all teachings, knowing how to develop and guide all people, showing all beings the state of peace and serenity, risen to the realm of the abode of knowledge and liberation, embodying knowledge gone to the limit of dispassion, having emerged from the ocean of all existences, observing the limit of reality of all worlds, in the sphere of light of knowledge of the ocean of truths, with great compassionate minds perfectly unified by oceanic concentration, thoroughly aware of the principle of the illusoriness of phenomena, having comprehended that all worlds are like dreams, knowing the vision of all buddhas are like reflections, aware that all utterances are like echoes, knowing that the effects of all things are like magic productions, determined to reach the sphere of fulfillment, following skillful methods of purification of the sphere of universal knowledge, with ultimately peaceful and calm minds, with knowledge of all families of mystic spells, with fearless, even force of the the power of concentration, with the eye reaching the limit of the cosmos, in the stage of ungraspability of all things, contemplating the infinite ocean of wisdom, gone to the farther shore of transcendence by knowledge, having attained the sustaining power of transcendent wisdom, gone beyond all worlds by consummation of transcendent spiritual powers, masters of transcendent concentration, with correct knowledge of all buddhas’ skillfullness in respect to meanings, with knowledge of the means of skillful elucidation of truth, with extraordinary knowledge of expression, being clouds of teaching with inexhaustible power of eloquence, roaring the fearless, mighty lion’s roar, enjoying the unequaled bliss of nonreliance, having unclouded eyes seeing into all things, moons of knowledge of the state of intellect of all beings, beams of light of designations of principles of all truths from the sphere of wisdom, mountains of virtue with diamonds of knowledge, beyond all comparison, sprouting the knowledge of all spiritual faculties, heroic conquerors of all demons, full of the energy of the sphere of endless knowledge, physically beyond all worldlings, with unhindered insight into all things, aware of the bounds of finiteness and infinity, standing on the limit of reality, tallying with the universal limit, having the eye of knowledge observing signlessness, skilled in the causes of accomplishment of all practices of enlightening beings, coursing in nondualistic knowledge, observing all worldly trends, appearing in all buddha-lands without dwelling, free from obscurity in regard to all things, having reached the sphere of knowledge without darkness, engaged in the illumination of truth everywhere, excellent fields of blessings for all beings, moons of fulfillment of the wishes of all who see or hear of them, mountains of virtue rising above all worlds, bravely subduing all challengers, making their voices heard in all buddha-lands, tirelessly watching all the buddhas, able to control reflections of the bodies of all buddhas, adopting appropriate forms to guide all beings, pervading all lands with one body, having purified their spheres of accomplishment, having the capacity for the vehicle of great knowledge unobstructed as space, reflecting the bodies of all things in their sphere of knowledge, suns of knowledge appearing in all worlds, having the power to adapt to all worlds at will, having specific knowledge of the various dispositions and faculties of all beings, having arrived at all truths with unobstructed perspective, apprised of the inherent nature of all things being birthlessness, mature in the knowledge of the mutual interpenetration of the subtle and gross, resolved on the goal of the profound state of buddhahood, knowing the verbal designations of profound meaning, eloquently telling the meanings of endless words and expressions, expounding entry into the ocean of all scriptures by one word, supporting the vast body of knowledge of mystic formulae, having the power to hold them forever, knowing specifically their abodes over untold ages in a single moment of thought, having occult knowledge of all worlds, knowing past, present, and future in a single moment of thought, reflecting the infinite ocean of buddha-teachings in mystic formulae holding all principles, tirelessly turning the wheel of teaching leading all beings to knowledge, illumined with the knowledge of the sphere of buddhas, always in the concentration of good vision, having the superknowledge that discerns the differences among all things while being ultimately unattached, master of knowledge of the sphere of liberation, the highest of all states, causing all objects to appear in pure arrays, entering into the universes of the ten directions wherever they are, entering into the different universes in all directions, conscious of enlightenment in atomic particles subtle and gross, showing all colors beautiful in nature, concentrating the totality in one space, treasuries of knowledge and virtue mature in the knowledge of infinite qualities of one form, praised by all buddhas, having qualities that can never be fully told—those enlightening beings who had gathered at the Jeta grove and were sitting there immersed in the ocean of qualities of Buddha, illumined by rays of light from the buddhas, as they were in a state of great ecstasy, having attained the light of the inconceivable state of enlightening beings, from their ecstasy emanated great arrays of mystical projections pervading all universes, issuing from all of their bodies, their towers, their paraphernalia and their thrones, from everywhere in the Jeta grove: 
in each successive mental moment they emanated vast clouds of webs of light beams, pleasing to all worlds, suffusing the ten directions; they filled the ten directions with clouds of bells of all jewels ringing with sounds bespeaking the virtues and qualities of the buddhas of past, present, and future; they filled the ten directions with clouds of voices of all beings, issuing from all objects, making sweet sounds telling of the fruits of all beings’ actions; they filled the ten directions with clouds of forms showing the vows of all enlightening beings and the various practices of enlightening beings, emanating voices telling of the undertakings of all enlightening beings; they emanated clouds of beatified embodiments of enlightening beings filling the ten directions telling of the succession of buddhas in all lands; they emanated clouds of sites of enlightenment like those of all buddhas of past, present, and future, filling the ten directions, showing magnificent displays of the transcendent enlightenment and emancipation of all buddhas; from all objects they emanated clouds of bodies of ruling water spirits, showering rain of all fragrances throughout the ten directions; they emanated clouds of bodies like the rulers of all worlds, pervading the ten directions, telling of the conduct of the enlightening being Universally Good; from all objects they sent forth clouds of reflections of all perfectly pure buddha-lands, made of all jewels, filling the ten directions, showing the turnings of the wheels of teachings of all buddhas. 
They emanated as many such clouds of magical displays of great magnificent arrays as atoms in untold buddha-lands, by the mystic power of those enlightening beings, and by virtue of their state of attainment of illumination of the inconceivable ocean of truths. 
Then the enlightening being Manjushri, empowered by Buddha, observing all those mystical apparitions appearing throughout the ten directions, uttered these verses: Observe the infinite, vast power of Buddha arisen in the Jeta grove, Having emanated clouds of bodies as sense objects that pervade all directions. 
The vast, pure arrays of offspring of Buddha, various, of infinite forms, Are all seen reflected from the thrones, which contain the objects of sense. 
Clouds of jewel radiance, in various arrays, pervade the land, pouring forth From the pores of the offspring of Buddha, emitting the sounds of Buddha. 
Forms like Brahma and Indra, with pure bodies and tranquil deportment, Emerging from the trees and flowers, go forth telling of meditation. 
Enlightening beings like Universally Good, adorned with embellishing marks, Inconceivable, countless, are produced from the Buddha’s pores. 
Those clouds of adornments of the Oceans of Virtue bespeak the qualities Of the enlightening beings of all times, gathered in the Jeta grove. 
All the varied oceans of deeds of groups of beings in all directions Are heard, radiating from within the trees in the Jeta grove. 
Transfigurations of all buddhas of past, present, and future in every land Appear from the ground, in every single object, numerous as atoms. 
At each and every point various oceanic clouds of buddhas Continuously reveal the abodes of the Victors and the masses of buddhas there. 
As many as beings, pervading everywhere, as they develop beings by expedient means, From their auras emerge oceanic clouds of fragrant flames and masses of flowers. 
Precious mansions, measureless as the sky, adorned with all realities, Fill the lands in all directions, and all sites of enlightenment. 
All the lands of the offspring of Buddha in past, present, and future, great healers, Purified by means of the practice of universal good, Their various arrays, purified over oceans of eons, infinite as beings, Are all seen by reflection in the sky of the Jeta grove. 
At that point, each of those enlightening beings, illuminated by the light of the concentration of Buddha, entered as many gates of great compassion as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and attained even greater capability to treat all beings beneficially. 
Thus concentrated, from each of their pores came forth as many rays of light as atoms in untold buddha-lands; from each ray of light came forth as many multitudes of phantom enlightening beings, bodies like those of all world rulers, bodies appearing to all beings, bodies adapted to the development of all beings. 
Having pervaded the cosmos with their emanations, they enlightened, developed, and guided sentient beings, by means of showing descent from heaven; by means of showing birth in all worlds; by means of showing the sphere of practice of enlightening beings; by means of dreams bearing messages to the mind; by means of release through the vows of all enlightening beings; by means of perfect knowledge of the world; by means of showing the practice of transcendent giving; by means of the positive and negative spheres of the virtues of all buddhas, what they cultivate and what they efface; by means of showing transcendental forbearance, even if dismembered; by means of transcendent energy of the great spiritual metamorphosis of enlightening beings; by means of shining light of the sphere of the path of buddha-knowledge by the meditations, liberations, concentrations, and attainments of all enlightening beings; by means of showing the relinquishment of countless bodies in quest of the meaning of each phase of the teachings in order to find out all buddha-teachings; by means of approaching all buddhas and asking about all the teachings; by means of communicating the light of the ocean of methods and principles of approaching and guiding beings according to the right timing and according to their mentalities, fulfilling omniscience; by means of showing the light of power of the stores of knowledge and virtue of all enlightening beings, which are invulnerable to demons and disputers; by means of showing the stage of knowledge which includes knowledge of all practical arts and mystic knowledge; by means of showing the stage of knowledge which includes knowledge and mystic knowledge of the differences among all beings; by means of showing the stage of knowledge which includes knowledge and mystic knowledge of the differences in the mentalities of all beings; by means of showing the stage of knowledge which includes knowledge and mystic knowledge of the faculties, procedures, and practices of all beings and the destruction of their various afflictions and habits; by showing the stage of knowledge which includes knowledge and mystic knowledge of the various results of deeds of all beings—with as many such means of developing and guiding beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands, those enlightening beings were seen to have come to the abodes of all sentient beings in all states of existence; with nondiscriminatory great compassion, with nondiscriminatory commitment, with nondiscriminatory knowledge, with nondiscriminatory effort to save all beings, for the purpose of fully developing beings according to their mentalities, beings who could be guided by seeing them, by hearing them, by their halos, by the sound of their names, by their auras, by radiating nets of light beams, the enlightening beings in the Jeta grove were seen by various arrays of projections pervading all realms of beings in all oceans of worlds, yet without leaving the presence of the Buddha: 
some appeared pervading the ten directions, their bodies on their thrones in their towers surrounded by their associates, yet without becoming absent from the presence of Buddha; some appeared emanating clouds of apparitions to develop beings, yet without becoming absent from the assembly around the Buddha; some appeared in the form of mendicants, some in the form of priests, some in bodies adorned head to foot with particular emblematic signs, some in the forms of scholars, scientists, doctors, some in the form of merchants, some in the form of ascetics, some in the form of entertainers, some in the form of pietists, some in the form of bearers of all kinds of arts and crafts—they were seen to have come, in their various forms, to all villages, cities, towns, communities, districts, and nations. 
With mastery of proper timing, proceeding according to the time, by modification of adapted forms and appearances, modifications of tone, language, deportment, situation, carrying out the practices of enlightening beings, which are like the cosmic network of all worlds, illumine the spheres of all practical arts, are lamps shedding light on the knowledge of all beings, are arrays of mystical displays of all realities, radiate the light of all truths, purify the establishment of vehicles of liberation of all places, and light up the spheres of all truths, they were seen to have come to all villages, towns, cities, districts, and nations for the purpose of leading sentient beings to perfection. 
At that time Manjushri, in the form of a youth, was in his tower together with enlightening beings of equivalent practice, perpetually attendant thunderbolt bearers, physical deities who had undertaken the making of power for all worlds and were willingly committed to attendance on all buddhas, footstep-following deities committed to past vows, earth deities intent on hearing the Teaching, greatly compassionate deities of springs, lakes pools, reservoirs, and rivers, deities of fire shining with the radiance of the power of the light of wisdom, crowned deities of wind, area deities with knowledge illumining all regions, night deities involved in dispelling the darkness of ignorance, day deities involved in bringing forth the day of those who arrive at Thusness, sky deities engaged in the adornment of the space of all elements of reality, ocean deities involved in rescuing all beings from the ocean of existence, mountain deities involved in gathering the store of all knowledge with a mind based on transcendentally lofty virtue, river deities engaged in adorning the bodies of all beings with the vow to cause all the qualities of buddhas to appear, city deities engaged in protecting the city of the mind of all beings, and with dragon chiefs devoted to the city of all truths, spirit chiefs able to protect all beings, celestial musician chiefs engaged in increasing the bliss of all beings, demon chiefs engaged in repulsing all ghostlike tendencies, bird chiefs committed to taking all beings up out of the ocean of existence, titans resolved to perfect the power of the body of those who arrive at Thusness, which is beyond all worlds, serpent chiefs with bowed bodies who had attained the joy of the vision of Buddha, celestial chiefs appalled by the whirl of birth and death who looked to what is higher, and most respectful Brahma chiefs in attitudes of reverence; with a parade of such enlightening beings, the enlightening being Manjushri came forth from his place, circled the Buddha hundreds of times to his right, made many offerings to Buddha, then left the presence of the Buddha and went south on a journey in the human realm. 
Then the venerable Shariputra, by the power of Buddha, seeing the young Manjushri with this transfigured array of enlightening beings having left the Jeta grove and going south, conceived the desire to go on the journey to the human world with Manjushri. 
With a group of sixty monks he went forth from where he was and approached the Buddha. 
Going up to the Buddha, he bowed his head to the Buddha’s feet, then gazed at the Buddha; given permission by the Buddha, he circled the Buddha three times to his right, and went to Manjushri, accompanied by those sixty monks, who were staying with him and who were novices, having but recently left home. 
Among those sixty monks were Sagarabuddhi, Mahasudatta, Punyaprabha, Mahavatsa, Vibhudatta, Vishuddhacarin, Devashri, Indramati, Brahmottama, Prashantamati, and others. 
All those monks had served past buddhas, had planted roots of goodness, had far-reaching zeal, had thoroughly purified faith and reason, were great in understanding and action, were capable of viewing the realm of Buddha and comprehended the inherent nature of things, were intent on the welfare and development of others, and sought the qualities of those who arrive at Thusness. 
They were guided by the teaching of Manjushri. 
At that point the venerable Shariputra, on the way, looked at all the monks and said to Sagarabuddhi, “See the inconceivable purity of form of Manjushri, along with the celestial and earthly beings, his variety of marks and embellishments, the purity of his sphere of radiance, his web of light beams developing countless beings, extinguishing all miseries, his wealth of followers, embraced by past virtues, arraying the path, which is eight steps wide. 
See the magnificent arrays of the procession on the path, facing the realms in all directions as they go, with overflowing great treasuries, auspicious and fair arrays, on the left and right; magnificent arrays of adornments emerge from within all the trees growing out of the roots of goodness of attendance on past buddhas; all the world chiefs are showering clouds of offerings in respect; from the curl of hair between the eyebrows of all buddhas from the ten directions, spheres of networks of light beams emanate, uttering all teachings of buddhas, and enter Manjushri’s head.” Beginning with these, Shariputra revealed and described to the monks measureless arrays of qualities of the procession of Manjushri, and as Shariputra spoke of the qualities of Manjushri, the minds of the monks were purified, calmed, and delighted; they were thrilled, their mental states became suitable for religious practice, their senses became clear and tranquil, their gladness increased and their depression vanished, all obstructions disappeared, they came face to face with the vision of Buddha, they dedicated their minds to the buddha-teachings, their enlightening faculties were clarified, the power of faith of enlightening beings rose in them, great compassion developed in them, they entered the sphere of the transcendences, they conceived great vows and came to perceive the oceans of buddhas in the ten directions: 
with this supreme power of faith in omniscience, they said to Shariputra, “Teacher, lead us to the presence of that wise person.” Then Shariputra went together with the monks to Manjushri and said, “O Manjushri, these monks want to see you.” Then Manjushri, who was together with a great host of transfigured enlightening beings, turned with the gaze of an elephant and looked at the monks. 
The monks then bowed their heads to the feet of Manjushri, saluted him, and said, “By this root of goodness, witnessed by the blessed Shakyamuni Buddha—by the root of goodness may we become like you, may we attain bodies, voices, embellishments, and spiritual transfigurations like you.” To this Manjushri replied, “A man or woman setting out on the Great Vehicle imbued with ten indefatigable determinations will enter the stage of realization of Thusness, to say nothing of the stage of enlightening beings. 
What are the ten? 
The indefatigable resolution to see, attend, and serve all buddhas; to build up all roots of goodness without retreating; to seek all truths; to practice all the transcendent ways of enlightening beings; to fully accomplish all concentrations of enlightening beings; to enter successively into all ages; to thoroughly purify all oceans of buddha-lands in the ten directions; to lead all realms of sentient beings to perfect development; to carry out the practices of enlightening beings in all lands and ages; to fully attain each power of buddhas by maturing all beings through the process of practicing as many transcendent ways as atoms in all buddha-lands to mature each being. 
Men or women with faith who are imbued with these ten indefatigable determinations grow in all roots of goodness, leave all compulsive, routine mundane tendencies, drop out of all social castes, go beyond all stages of individual emancipation, are born in the family of all buddhas, fulfill the vows of enlightening beings, become pure with the attainment of all qualities of the enlightened, become clarified in all the practices of enlightening beings, develop all the powers of buddhas, overcome all demons and challengers, progress through all the stages of enlightening beings, and reach buddhahood.” Then the monks, having heard this teaching, attained a concentration called sphere of the unobstructed eye of vision of all buddhas, by the experience of which they saw the circles of assemblies of the buddhas in all worlds throughout the ten directions. 
They also saw all the beings in those worlds, and they also saw the various differentiations in those worlds. 
They also knew how many atoms were in these worlds. They also saw all the dwellings and furniture of those beings, made of various precious substances. 
They also heard the oceans of the qualities of the voice and the buddhas in those worlds, and understood the various statements, allusions, expressions, mystic formulae, terminology, and concepts of their teachings. 
They also discerned the minds, faculties, and dispositions of the beings in those worlds, and called to mind the events of ten lives past and future. 
They also comprehended the utterance of ten cycles of teaching of those buddhas. They also comprehended ten states produced by mystical powers, ten productions of guiding principles, and ten productions of instructive statements. They also comprehended ten accomplishments of analytic knowledge of those buddhas. 
When they attained this concentration, they developed ten thousand qualities of the determination of enlightenment, entered ten thousand concentrations and purified ten thousand aspects of transcendence; having attained great illumination, being illumined by the sphere of great wisdom, they attained ten mystic knowledges of enlightening beings. 
Manjushri exhorted and led them, now with soft and delicate sprouts of mystic knowledge and firm determination for enlightenment, into the practice of the universally good enlightening being. 
Based on the practice of the universally good enlightening being, they entered into the oceans of great vows and began to carry them out. 
By undertaking the oceans of great vows, and by purification of mind, they attained purity of body; by physical purity they gained physical lightness, by which physical purity and lightness they opened wide the doors to mystic knowledge and attained undiminishing mystic knowledge. 
By this attainment of mystic knowledge they appeared in multitudes of bodies to all the buddhas in the ten directions for the sake of accomplishing all Buddha teachings, yet without leaving the presence of Manjushri. 
Then Manjushri, having set those monks on the foundation of unexcelled true enlightenment, continued his journey to the human realm and came to a great city in the south named Dhanyakara. 
There he stayed with his retinue in a forest called Array of Various Standards of Strength, to the east of the city, at a shrine where past buddhas had dwelt, established by buddhas for the sake of perfecting sentient beings, the repute of which resounded in infinite lands, a place where the Buddha, in the past, carrying out the practice of an enlightening being, relinquished many things that are difficult to relinquish, a place where gods, dragons, goblins, nymphs, titans, birds, centaurs, serpents, humans, and nonhumans always presented offerings to the earth. 
There Manjushri expounded a scripture called Illumination of the Principles of the Cosmos, whence flowed ten hundred thousand trillion scriptures. 
As he was expounding the scripture, many tens of hundreds of thousands of trillions of dragons came to him from the ocean; having heard this teaching, disdaining the condition of dragons and desiring the qualities of buddhahood, they left the state of dragons and gained birth as celestial or human beings. 
There ten thousand dragons became irreversible in their progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment. And during his exposition of the teaching, innumerable beings were edified through the Three Vehicles. 
Now the people of the city heard that Manjushri had come and was staying at the shrine in the forest. 
Having heard this, pious men and women, boys and girls, each a company of five hundred, led by Mahaprajna, the foremost of the pious men, went from the city to where Manjushri was. 
Then the pious man Mahaprajna, with a company of five hundred pious men such as Sudatta, Vasudatta, Punyaprabha, Yashodeva, Somashri, Somanandi, Sumati, Mahamati, Rahulabhadra, and Bhadrashri, went to Manjushri, bowed their heads to his feet, circled him three times, and then sat to one side. 
Then a pious woman named Mahaprajna, with a company of five hundred pious women including Suprabha, Sugatra, Subhadra, Bhadrashri, Candraprabhasa, Ketuprabha, Shribhadra, and Sulocana, went to Manjushri, bowed to him and circled him, and then sat to one side. 
Then Sudhana, an outstanding boy, together with a company of five hundred outstanding boys including Suvrata, Sushila, Svacara, Suvikrami, Sucinti, Sumati, Subuddhi, Sunetra, Subahu, and Suprabha, went to Manjushri, bowed to him and circled him, and then sat to one side. 
Then the girl Subhadra, daughter of the householder Mahaprajna, together with a group of five hundred girls including Bhadra, Abhiramavarta, Drdhamati, Brahmadatta, Shribhadra, Shriprabha, and Suprabha, went to Manjushri, bowed to him and circled him, and then sat to one side. 
Then Manjushri, seeing that the women, men, boys and girls from the city had gathered and were seated, according to their dispositions overwhelmed them with his power over appearance, soothed them with his power of great benevolence, undertook to teach them with his power of great compassion, considered their mentalities with his power of knowledge, and, imbued with great analytic intelligence, wishing to expound the truth, he observed the outstanding boy Sudhana: 
“Why is Sudhana called Sudhana, which means ‘Good Wealth’? When Sudhana was conceived in his mother’s womb, there appeared in the house sprouts of seven precious substances, evenly distributed throughout the house. 
Beneath those precious sprouts were seven great treasuries, from which those sprouts emerged, splitting the surface of the earth as they grew, treasuries of gold, silver, sapphire, crystal, ruby, emerald, and coral. 
When his limbs were perfectly formed and he was born after ten months, those treasuries, which were seven spans high, wide, and long, rose to the surface of the earth, opened, glittered, and shone. 
Five hundred vessels made of precious substances also appeared in the house—vessels of clarified butter, sesame oil, honey, and fresh butter, each equipped with all the necessary utensils; there also appeared diamond vessels filled with all kinds of perfumes, fragrant vessels filled with various cloths, crystal vessels filled with various foods and drinks, pearl vessels filled with various jewels, gold vessels filled with silver powder, silver vessels filled with gold powder, gold and silver vessels filled with agates, crystal vessels filled with sapphires, sapphire vessels filled with crystal jewels, emerald vessels filled with rubies, ruby vessels filled with emeralds, star sapphire vessels filled with water-clarifying jewels, water-clarifying jewel vessels filled with star sapphires. 
Five hundred such precious vessels appeared in the storerooms of the house simultaneously with the birth of Sudhana, raining money, grain, gold, and various other valuables. 
Because of this great prosperity that appeared in the house by his mere birth, the fortune-tellers and priests and his parents and kin called him Sudhana, ‘Good Wealth.’” Sudhana, furthermore, having served past buddhas and planted roots of goodness, imbued with great zeal and devotion, intent on following spiritual benefactors, impeccable in word, thought, and deed, engaged in clarification of the path of enlightening beings, heading for omniscience, having become a vessel of the Buddha teachings, his course of mind purified, had achieved an unhindered, unattached determination for enlightenment. 
At that point Manjushri, having regarded Sudhana, greeted him in a friendly manner and expounded the Teaching to him, dealing with all elements of buddhahood, the cultivation and attainment of all elements of buddhahood, the infinity of all buddhas, the successive appearance of all buddhas in the world, the purification of the congregations surrounding all buddhas, the achievement of the reality-body of all buddhas, the magnificent arrays of wisdom and eloquence of all buddhas, the purification of the array of spheres of light of all buddhas, and the equality of all buddhas. 
Then Manjushri, having edified, inspired, sharpened, and delighted Sudhana and the great crowd of people with his talk on the Teaching, having caused them to set their minds on perfect enlightenment and made them remember their past roots of goodness, stopped his teaching there, given as it was to the people in accord with their mentalities, and left. 
Then Sudhana, having heard from Manjushri of such magnificence of the qualities of Buddha, with the quest for supreme perfect enlightenment uppermost in his mind, uttered these verses as he watched Manjushri going: By your power, Great Sage, I am set on enlightenment for the good of all beings, Resolved on this, with an endless vista; hear what is on my mind. Moats filled with the water of delight, with high walls of conceit and pride, Its doors the conditions of all beings—that is how the great city of existence is. 
Shrouded in the great darkness of ignorance, burnt by the fire of lust and hate, Ever under the sway of the lord of demons, the abode of the unenlightened. Completely bound by the ropes and chains of craving, made desolate by the wastelands of deceit, Blinded by doubt and confusion, standing on the ground of falsehood. Bound up in envy and jealousy, becoming ghosts, animals, and fiends, Oppressed by birth, sickness, age, and death, they wander lost in the wheel of transmigration. 
May the pure orb of your compassion for them, a sun radiating the light of knowledge, Risen to evaporate the sea of afflictions, shine on me like the sun. 
Orb full of the power of love, radiating moonbeams of virtue, grant happiness; You give light like the full moon appearing in the abodes of all beings. 
Endowed with all virtues and powers, your mind is in the sky of the reality realm; Instruct me, O King, with the jewel of the wheel of the teaching. 
Boldly advancing, resolute, on the vehicle of enlightenment, having developed great virtue and knowledge, O Caravan Leader arising to benefit all beings, protect me. 
Girt with the armor of forbearance, strength, and firmness, wielding the sword of knowledge in the hand of compassion, Facing the band of demons in battle, lead me to safety, O Hero. 
Dwelling on the peak of the polar mountain of truth, surrounded by the archangels of concentration, Destroyer of the titans of affliction, look upon me, O Mighty One. 
In the city of existences, the abode of the unaware, your guidance out of afflictive action is definitive; Amid the confusion of the cycle of transmigration on the ground of cause, as a lamp reveal to me the Way. 
Turning away from the paths of woe, purifying the paths of bliss, Transcender of all worldly states, lead me to the door of liberation. 
I am stuck to the notions of permanence, self, and pleasure, blocked by falsehood and grasping— With the sharp eye of truth, knowledge, and power, quickly open the door of liberation for me. 
Knower of the paths of truth and falsehood, fearless in the varied knowledge of the Way, Certain of the guidance of all paths, show me the Way to enlightenment. 
Tree of right insight standing firm on the ground, nourished by the water of the virtues of all buddhas, Showing flowers of virtues of buddha-teaching, show me the Way to enlightenment. 
O teacher of the Way, show me the buddhas of the past, future, and present, Makers of light, best of beings, gone to bliss. 
Familiar with the various mechanics of action, expert in the mechanics of the vehicle of religion, Sure of the various vehicles of knowledge, show me the vehicle of enlightenment. 
Put me on the vehicle of enlightenment, driven by faith, studded with jewels of virtue, A globe with wheels of prayer and vows, steeled by forbearance, resting on the axle of compassion. 
Orb of all memory, purified, with a roof of kindness, well adorned, And a beautiful bell-garland of analytic powers—put me in this supreme vehicle. 
Adorned with a couch of pure conduct, filled with millions of concentration-ladies, With the drum of truth resounding—bring me to this royal vehicle. 
With an infinite chamber of the four integrative methods, adorned with jewels of knowledge and pearls of virtue, Harnessed with the finest rope of modesty—show me the chief of vehicles. 
It has the radiance of the pure sphere of light of relinquishment, the sandalwood of morality, the perfume of compassion, With the lance of forbearance, and is held together by firmness—place me on the supreme vehicle. 
It guides all beings, never turning back; its frame of meditation is set up on concentration, It is drawn by the team of wisdom and means—place me on that eminent vehicle of truth. 
Vows set the course and alignment of its wheels; it holds the truth steadfastly, having great power; It is well made by the dynamics of knowledge, expertly—lift me onto the vehicle of truth. It is refined by Universally Good action, proceeding slowly with concern for beings: 
Bring me to that vehicle of knowledge, of valor in pure conduct everywhere. 
Put me on that vehicle which cuts through all obstructions, Steady and firm as the finest steel, adorned with garlands of knowledge. 
It is spacious, clean, impartial toward people, a refuge for all beings, bringing happiness: Put me on that vehicle of enlightenment, which sheds light throughout the cosmos. 
Its advance cuts through the mass of suffering, clears the sphere of dust of afflictions of action, And subdues all demons and challengers—put me on that vehicle of truth. 
Its scope is universal knowledge, it arrays the sky of the reality realm; Bring me to that vehicle of truth, which fulfills the aspiration of all beings. 
Put me on that spiritual vehicle, pure and infinite as space, Unstained by the ignorance and obscurity of views, serving all sentient beings. 
Put me on that spiritual vehicle, swift as the wind, Sustaining the world by the wind-power of vows, establishing the ground of all citadels of peace. 
Put me on the supreme vehicle, unshakable as the earth, carrying its cargo By the intense power of compassion, full of knowledge, beneficial to the world. 
It is like the sun, giving life to the world, a concentrated orb of great lights, Radiant with supreme purity of mental command; show me the sun of knowledge. 
Give me that mighty thunderbolt of knowledge, O Noble One, which is learned over many eons, Knows the reasons and grounds of all causes, and smashes the fortress of conditioning. 
As you have highly developed vision and are graced with the crown of the king of knowledge, Your head wrapped in the turban of truth, look into the city of the spiritual sovereign. 
Then Manjushri, gazing like an elephant, said to Sudhana, “It is good that you follow spiritual benefactors, having set your mind on supreme enlightenment, that you think you should inquire into the practice of enlightening beings, wishing to fulfill the path of enlightening beings. 
Attending and serving spiritual friends is the beginning, the logical course, for the accomplishment of omniscience. 
Therefore you should tirelessly attend spiritual benefactors.” Sudhana said, “Noble One, please give me a full explanation of how an enlightening being is to study the practice of enlightening beings, how an enlightening being is to accomplish it. 
How is an enlightening being to initiate the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to carry out the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to fulfill the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to purify the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to comprehend the practice of enlightening beings? How is an enlightening being to effect the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to follow the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to keep to the practice of enlightening beings? 
How is an enlightening being to expand the practice of enlightening beings? 
How can an enlightening being fulfill the sphere of the universally good practice?” Then Manjushri spoke to Sudhana in verse: Bravo, ocean of pure virtues, who has come to me; With a mind of vast compassion, you seek supreme enlightenment. 
You are committed to the peerless course of conduct for the sake of the liberation of all beings; You will become a savior of the world—this is the principle of enlightening beings’ practice. 
Enlightening beings who are steadfast and indefatigable work within the mundane— They attain universal good, invincible and unobstructed. 
Light of virtue, star of virtue, mine of virtue, ocean of virtue, pure— You are committed to universal good in practice, for the welfare of the world. 
You will see infinite buddhas, in the worlds of the ten directions: And you will hold their clouds of teachings by the power of memory. 
As you see the buddhas in the buddha-lands of the ten directions, You will clarify their ocean of vows in enlightenment practice. 
Those who enter this ocean of principles and stand on the ground of buddhahood Will become all-seers, learning from the Guides of the world. 
Having practiced the conduct of universal good throughout all lands, for as many eons as there are atoms in the lands, You will reach enlightenment, the abode of peace and bliss. 
You should practice for boundless oceans of eons in all lands And fulfill this undertaking of the conduct of universal higher good. 
Behold the millions of beings who are happy to hear your vow, Who seek enlightenment by the knowledge of universal good. 
Then Manjushri, having uttered these verses, said to Sudhana, “It is good that you think, having set your heart on supreme enlightenment, that you should find out the practice of enlightening beings. 
South of here is a country called Ramavaranta; there is a mountain there called Sugriva, where a monk named Meghashri lives. 
Go to him and ask how an enlightening being should learn the conduct of enlightening beings, and how to apply it; how one is to fulfill, purify, enter into, carry out, follow, keep to, and expand the practice of enlightening beings, and how an enlightening being is to fulfill the sphere of universally good action. 
That spiritual friend will tell you about the sphere of universally good conduct.” Then Sudhana, pleased, enraptured, transported with joy, delighted, happy, and cheerful, laid his head at the feet of Manjushri in respect, circled Manjushri hundreds and thousands of times, and looked at him hundreds and thousands of times, with a mind full of love for the spiritual friend, unable to bear not seeing the spiritual friend, with tears streaming down his face as he wept, and left Manjushri. 
Meghashri Then Sudhana proceeded by stages to the country of Ramavaranta. 
Having reached Ramavaranta, reflecting on and tasting the mentally pleasing enjoyments based on higher action born of past roots of goodness, he went to Mount Sugriva, climbed the mountain, and looked in every direction for the monk Meghashri. 
Finally, after seven days, he saw the monk walking on the plateau of another peak. 
He went to Meghashri, paid his respects, and said, “O noble one, I have determined to seek supreme enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being should learn the conduct of enlightening beings, or how one should accomplish it, or how to begin the practice of enlightening beings, how to carry it out, fulfill it, purify it, comprehend it, realize it, follow it, keep to it, and expand it, or how an enlightening being is to fulfill the sphere of universally good action. 
I hear that you give instruction for enlightening beings, so please tell me how enlightening beings proceed to supreme perfect enlightenment.” The monk Meghashri replied to Sudhana, “It is good that you ask about the practice of enlightening beings, having set your mind on supreme perfect enlightenment. 
It is difficult, most difficult, to seek the practice of enlightening beings, to seek the sphere of enlightening beings, to seek the purification of emancipation of enlightening beings, to seek the purification of the path of enlightening beings, to seek the far-ranging purification of the conduct of enlightening beings, to seek the purification of the accomplishment of mystic knowledge of enlightening beings, to show the liberation of enlightening beings, to show enlightening beings’ exercise of compassion for the world, to oblige people according to their mentalities in the manner of enlightening beings, to show enlightening beings’ mundane and transcendental faces, to seek the thought and action of enlightening beings undefiled by the ills and fears of the created and the uncreated. 
Son, by virtue of mastery of the power of devotion, purity of the eye of perceptive faith, illumination of the light of knowledge without aversion, purity of the universal eye looking in all directions with unobstructed universal perspective and unobstructed vision skillfully observing, skillfulness in obeisance, bowing in all directions in a state of physical purity, and the power of memory command perfectly holding the masses of teachings of all buddhas, I see the buddhas in all the lands of the ten directions. 
That is, in the east I see one buddha, two buddhas, three buddhas, a hundred buddhas, a thousand buddhas, a hundred thousand buddhas, a million buddhas, a hundred million buddhas, a billion buddhas, a hundred billion buddhas, a quintillion buddhas—I see incalculable, immeasurable, uncountable, inconceivable, incomparable, incomprehensible, unlimited, ungraspable, inestimable, unutterable numbers of buddhas. 
I see as many buddhas as atoms in this continent; I see as many buddhas as atoms in the land masses of the four continents; I see as many buddhas as atoms in thousand-world, million-world, and billion-world buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in ten buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a hundred buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a thousand buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a hundred thousand buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a million buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a hundred million buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a billion buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a hundred billion buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in a quintillion buddha-lands; I see as many buddhas as atoms in untold numbers of buddha-lands. 
As in the east, in the same way I see untold buddhas in all the other directions as well; looking in each direction, I see buddhas with various appearances, I see buddhas with various forms, various transfigurations, various exercises of power, various congregations, radiating light in networks of rays of many colors, with various arrays of states of purity in their buddha-lands, various life spans, showing magical projections of various ways of purification of enlightenment to beings according to their mentalities, roaring the mighty lion roar of buddhas. 
“Son, from this universal light in which is concentrated the information of all sense objects, I have attained mindfulness of the buddhas: 
but how can I know the practice, or tell of the virtues, of the enlightening beings who have purified the sphere of endless knowledge, who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in the sphere of universal illumination, by seeing right before their eyes the pure arrays of abodes in all buddha-lands in the spheres of all buddhas; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in which the ten powers are developed, by following the infinite ten powers of the enlightened; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in which the truth is displayed, by observation of the clouds of bodies of all buddhas as sources from which the truth is heard; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas which is the seed of illumination of all realms, by plunging into the undivided ocean of buddhas in all oceans of realms; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas throughout the ten directions, by comprehending the majesty of projections of all buddhas in all microcosms; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in all ages, by communication of the inseparable vision of Buddha in all ages; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in all times, by seeing buddhas according to the time in all times and living with them inseparably; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in all fields, by communication of the vision of the transcendent, unsurpassed body of buddhas in all buddha-fields; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in all sense objects, by communication of vision of successive emergence of buddhas in all objects; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas by which peace is developed, through revelation of the ultimate extinction of all buddhas in all worlds in a single instant; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas by which detachment is developed, by revelation of all buddhas going forth from all abodes in one day; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in the past, by revelation of the bodies of buddhas, each buddha sitting cross-legged filling the cosmos; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in the minute, by entering into the service of untold buddhas appearing in a single point; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in supernal manifestations, by communication of visions of mystical displays of attainment of enlightenment in all worlds in one instant; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in religious actions, by attainment of the illumination of knowledge of the miracle of all buddhas coming forth and teaching; who have attained the means of projected mindfulness of buddhas, by apprehending appearances of all buddhas seen as they wish; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in deeds, by showing reflected images according to the deeds that all beings have done; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in mystic projections, by means of the ubiquitous manifestation of visions of tremendous projections of buddhas on lotus blossoms blooming in all phenomenal and noumenal realms; who have attained the means of mindfulness of buddhas in space, by vision of the space of the cosmos adorned by clouds of images of buddhas? 
“Go, son—south of here is a place called Sagaramukha, where there lives a monk named Sagaramegha. 
Go to him and ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and accomplish the conduct of enlightening beings. 
He will reveal to you a spiritual benefactor; he will introduce you into the cause of accumulation of roots of goodness; he will get you to develop the vast ground of provisions for enlightenment; he will tell you of the immense, intense power of roots of goodness; he will inform you of the great cause of preparation of the determination for enlightenment; he will establish in you the great cause of the illumination of the vehicle of universal salvation; he will cause you to develop the great power of the set of transcendent ways; he will get you to purify extensive means of entry into the ocean of religious practice; he will get you to purify the vast sphere of vows; he will get you to develop extensive systems of all-sided emancipation; he will get you to develop the immense power of compassion.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to the monk Meghashri and left. 
Sagaramegha Then Sudhana, reflecting on the instructions of that spiritual benefactor, pondering that enlightening liberation, polishing that enlightening method of concentration, peering into that conductor into the ocean of the essence of enlightenment, intent upon the sphere of buddhahood, seeking that direction to the vision of Buddha, thinking about that ocean of buddhas, remembering the succession of buddhas, following that approach to the means of enlightenment, looking throughout that sky of the enlightened, went gradually to the monk Sagaramegha in the region of Sagaramukha. 
When he got there, he paid his respects to Sagaramegha and said, “O noble one, I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment and want to enter the supreme ocean of knowledge; but I do not know how enlightening beings get out of the host of worldlings and into the host of the enlightened, emerge from the ocean of the mundane whirl and enter the ocean of omniscience, die away from the state of ignorant sentient beings and are born in the family of buddhas, withdraw from the stream of the mundane whirl and follow the stream of enlightening practice, escape from the wheel of transmigration in the mundane whirl and turn to the wheel of practice and vows of enlightening beings, destroy the gang of all demons and make manifest the light of the host of all buddhas, evaporate the ocean of craving and increase the water of great compassion, close all doors of decadence and miserable states and evils which are inopportune for enlightenment and open the door of heaven and nirvana, break through the door of the city of the mundane and enter the door of the city of omniscience, give up craving for all luxuries and give rise to the determination to care for all being.” To this Sagaramegha replied, “It is good that you have set your mind on supreme perfect enlightenment. 
The will for enlightenment is not developed by people who have not planted roots of goodness; the will for enlightenment is produced by those who have attained the illumination of all-sided roots of goodness, who are illumined by the light of knowledge of concentration on the path containing the means of enlightenment, who have accumulated a vast ocean of virtue as provisions for the path to enlightenment, who ceaselessly practice all that is pure and good, who tirelessly apply the methods set up by all spiritual benefactors, who are not worried about their physical subsistence, who are free from clinging to material things, whose minds are equanimous as the earth, without high or low, who are by nature compassionate and friendly, who face up to all states of being, who seek the sphere of those who realize Thusness. 
In such people arises the mind of enlightenment—the mind of great compassion, for the salvation of all beings; the mind of great kindness, for unity with all beings; the mind of happiness, to stop the mass of misery of all beings; the altruistic mind, to repulse all that is not good; the mind of mercy, to protect from all fears; the unobstructed mind, to get rid of all obstacles; the broad mind, to pervade all universes; the infinite mind, to pervade all spaces; the undefiled mind, to manifest the vision of all buddhas; the purified mind, to penetrate all knowledge of past, present, and future; the mind of knowledge, to remove all obstructive knowledge and enter the ocean of all-knowing knowledge. 
“Son, I have been living here in Sagaramukha for twelve years, having focused my mind on the ocean and kept it present in my awareness, reflecting on the measureless vastness of the great ocean, its pure clarity, its unfathomable depth, its gradual deepening, its variety of deposits of precious substances, the measurelessness of its body of water, its infinity, its being the dwelling place of various immense creatures, its being covered by great clouds, and how it neither increases nor decreases. 
I think: 
is there anything else in the world as vast as the great ocean, as broad, as measureless, as deep, as various? 
While I was engaged in these thoughts, an enormous lotus from the bottom of the ocean appeared before me. 
Its stem was of unsurpassed jewels, sapphires, and diamonds, with a wreath of agate; its broad leaves of pure gold, with an array of buds of yellow sandalwood and filaments of emerald, as measureless in breadth as the ocean; its calyx was on a stem held by a million titan chiefs, it was covered by a net of a million various jewels, sprinkled by rain from clouds of fragrant water by a million chief water spirits, with a million bird chiefs trailing silks and strings of jewels over it, a million centaur chiefs gazing at it benevolently, a million serpent chiefs bowing to it in respect, a million goblin chiefs honoring it with bowed bodies, a million celestial musician chiefs celebrating it with music and song, a million celestial leaders raining on it clouds of heavenly flowers, fragrances, garlands, incenses, perfumes, aromatic powders, cloths, parasols, banners, and pennants, a million Brahma chiefs bowing their heads in respect, a million celestial beings of the pure abodes paying respect with joined palms, a million human rulers making offerings of precious substances, a million ocean deities emerging to pay respect; it was illumined by arrays of light beams from a million luminous jewels, adorned with a million pure jewels in orderly arrays, containing a million radiant jewels, blazing with the great splendor of a million dazzling jewels, shining endlessly with a million jewels from various sources, adorned with a million jewels symbolic of earth arrayed all around, incomparably arrayed with a million of the finest diamonds, brilliantly covered with a million sun-containing jewels, decorated with a million beautiful jewels in various colors, blazing with the light of an endless array of a million wish-fulfilling jewels. 
That great lotus is born from the transcendental roots of goodness of the enlightened; it appears everywhere, directed to the will of enlightening beings; it comes forth from the principle of illusoriness; it is produced by pure deeds; it is adorned by the principle of the state of noncontention; it is a presentation of the nature of being equal to a dream; it is marked by the principle of nonfabrication; it accords with the principle of nonattachment; it pervades all universes everywhere; it is in the realm of illumination by the light of the sphere of Buddha. 
It would be impossible to reach the end of the array of characteristics, qualities, forms, and appearances of that lotus even in countless hundreds of thousands of eons. 
Also I saw an embodiment of Buddha clearly manifest sitting cross-legged on that great lotus, completely filling it; I saw that embodiment of Buddha reaching from here to the very summit of being. 
I also saw the inconceivable adornments of the Buddha’s throne, the inconceivable adornments of the Buddha’s congregation, the inconceivable adornments of his aura of light, his inconceivable marks of greatness, various embellishments, and inconceivable majesty, the inconceivable projection of Buddha, the inconceivable purity of appearance of the Buddha; I heard the Buddha’s inconceivable eloquence and drew near to the inconceivable infinity of Buddha’s power, the inconceivable purity of his adornments of expertise, and his inconceivable accomplishment of the power of analytic knowledge; I recalled his past consummation of practices as an enlightening being, I saw the inconceivable transformation of the attainment of enlightenment, I heard of the inconceivable array of senses conveying universal insight and saw the inconceivable infinite division of his body into left and right and his consummate attainment of physical being beneficial to all creatures. 
“Then the Buddha extended his right hand, rubbed my head, and revealed to me a teaching called universal eye, which is the sphere of all buddhas, revealing the practice of enlightening beings, showing the differentiation of the planes of all universes, showing the spheres of all truths together, the light purifying all lands, dispersing all challengers, crushing all demons and devils, making all beings happy, illumining the hidden recesses of all beings’ minds, communicating to all beings in accord with their mentalities, illuminating the turning of the wheels of the senses of all beings. 
And I have taken up that teaching of the universal eye, keep it in mind, apply it, and contemplate it, taking it in this way—even if it were being written by a collection of pens the size of the polar mountains with as much ink as water in the oceans, it could never be finished; it would be impossible to finish even a part of a single line of a single formula of a single principle of a single doctrine of a single chapter of the teaching—it cannot be even partially exhausted, let alone fully exhausted or comprehended. 
“So, son, having taken up this teaching of the universal eye for a full twelve years—taking it up in this way: 
in one day I master countless chapters by the light of mental command to retain what is heard; I penetrate countless chapters by the light of mental command that is a way of access to tranquillity; I plunge into countless chapters by the light of mental command that progresses endlessly; I contemplate and investigate countless chapters by the light of mental command that is imbued with fiery energy; I put countless chapters into practice by the light of mental command adorned with lotuses; I elucidate countless chapters by the light of mental command that is beyond words; I analyze countless chapters by the light of mental command that is a mass of brightness; I arrange countless chapters in order by the light of mental command containing the ocean—whatever beings come to me from the ten directions, I direct and introduce them all into this teaching of the universal eye, the manifestation of the practice of enlightened and enlightening beings; to all of them I elucidate, represent, illumine, describe, show, analyze, expound upon, open up, explain, unlock, and clarify the teaching of the universal eye. 
“I know this teaching, son, but how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who have entered into the ocean of all enlightening beings’ practices in accord with pure vows; who have entered into the ocean of all vows, to remain in the world through all ages; who have entered into the mundane whirl of all beings, to act appropriately according to their mentalities; who have entered the ocean of minds of all beings, to communicate knowledge; who have entered the ocean of all virtues, to produce the vision of the knowledge of the ten powers without obstruction; who have entered the ocean of all beings’ faculties, to guide them to maturity and perfection with appropriate timing; who have entered the ocean of all lands, by carrying out the vow to purify all lands; who have entered the ocean of all buddhas, by the power of the vow to honor and attend all enlightened ones; who have entered the ocean of all truths, for the communication of knowledge; who have entered the ocean of all virtues by pursuing their realization; who have entered the ocean of languages of all beings, to carry out the turning of the wheel of the teaching in all languages? 
“Go, son, to a place called Sagaratira, in the region of Sri Lanka, sixty leagues south of here. 
A monk named Supratishthita lives there; go to him and ask how a great enlightening being is to purify enlightening practice.” Then Sudhana, paying his respects, departed from the presence of Sagaramegha. 
Supratishthita Then Sudhana, remembering that spiritual benefactor’s teaching of the universal eye, reflecting on that projection of buddhahood, keeping in mind those multitudes of statements of the Teaching, entering into those oceans of entries into the Teaching, pondering that method of teaching, plunging into the principles of that whirlpool of teaching, entering fully into the space of that teaching, clarifying that sphere of teaching, and contemplating that treasure island of teaching, gradually made his way to Sagaratira in Lanka, where he looked in all directions, desiring to see the monk Supratishthita. 
He saw Supratishthita walking in the sky, surrounded by countless hundreds of thousands of celestial beings. 
He also saw the sky covered with clouds of celestial flowers, with the sound of countless clouds of heavenly music and countless streamers and banners offered by the chief celestials to the monk Supratishthita as tokens of respect. 
He also saw inconceivable clouds of black aloe-scented water thundering in the sky, raised on high by the chief water spirits. 
He also heard countless sounds of pleasing celestial music and song coming from the sky with words of reverence and hymns of praise, performed by supernatural beings; he also saw inconceivable clouds of fine cloths spread out in the sky by joyous serpent chiefs out of respect for Supratishthita. 
He also saw inconceivable clouds of jewels set in the sky by the chief titans, with the light of the magnificent array of their inconceivable qualities. 
He also saw inconceivable hosts of bird girls, standing in the sky with their hands joined in gestures of respect, with noninjury uppermost in their minds. 
He also saw inconceivable hundreds of thousands of goblin chiefs in the sky with their retinues, their bodies transfigured, directed there by goodwill toward the monk Supratishthita. 
He also saw inconceivable numbers of demigod chiefs with their retinues circling in the sky to protect Supratishthita. 
He also saw inconceivable hundreds of thousands of Brahma chiefs in the sky making salutations, uttering pleasant words of respect and songs of praise. 
He also saw inconceivable hundreds of thousands of celestial beings of the pure abodes in their palaces in the sky, paying their respects to the monk Supratishthita. 
Then Sudhana, seeing the monk Supratishthita walking in the sky, was pleased, enraptured, transported, overjoyed, happy; he saluted and greeted Supratishthita and said to him, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to seek the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to acquire the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to accumulate the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to cultivate the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to actualize the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to act in accord with the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to assemble the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to contemplate the qualities of buddhas, how an enlightening being is to clarify the qualities of buddhas in order to accomplish all the tasks of enlightening beings, how an enlightening being is to approach and follow the qualities of buddhas. 
Noble one, I hear that you give instructions to enlightening beings: 
please tell me how an enlightening being is to set to work on the Buddha teachings, not to lose sight of Buddha whatever one is doing, not to lose sight of enlightening beings so as to be always in contact with reality, always to be involved with the Buddha teachings so as to be at one with the roots of goodness of all enlightening beings, always to be involved with the vows of enlightening beings so as to accord with knowledge, always to be involved in the practices of enlightening beings so as to accomplish the task of all enlightening beings, always to be pervading all buddha-fields so as to live continuously through all ages, to remain in the conditional for the manifestation of the projections of all buddhas, always to be hearing the Teaching in order to visit in one’s own body the places of death and birth of all buddhas by the emanationlike action of enlightening beings, and to always be in contact with the light of knowledge so as to receive the teachings of all buddhas and accord with knowledge of past, present, and future.” To this, Supratishthita replied, “It is good that you have set your mind on supreme perfect enlightenment and ask about the qualities of buddhahood, the qualities of omniscience, the qualities of independence. 
I have attained the enlightening liberation ‘unobstructed door.’ Going in and out of this ‘unobstructed door’ liberation, practicing it, analyzing it, examining it, investigating it, and clarifying it, I have attained a light of knowledge called ‘ultimate nonobstruction,’ whereby I am free from obstruction in awareness of the mental actions of all sentient beings, knowing where all sentient beings die and are born, entries into the channels to memory of past states, associations with all beings in future ages, communications to all sentient beings of the present time, knowledge of the conventions of languages of all sentient beings, cutting off the doubts of all sentient beings, comprehending the differences in the faculties of all sentient beings, approaching all sentient beings at appropriate times to guide them to full development, comprehension of time divisions as being conceptual, and in noncorporeal pervasion of the buddha-fields in the ten directions, all by the attainment of nonbeing, nonabiding, and nondoing. 
Being one, I become many; being many, I become one. 
I become now visible, now invisible. 
I go through walls unhindered, as through empty space. 
While sitting cross-legged I travel in space, like a bird on the wing. 
I walk on water unhindered as on the earth. 
I envelop even up to the Brahma world in my body. 
Emanating clouds of webs of light of infinite colors, I go forth in all directions: 
in each moment of thought I pass one world to the east, I pass two worlds, three worlds, a hundred worlds, a thousand worlds, a hundred thousand worlds, a million worlds, a hundred millions worlds, a billion worlds, a hundred billion worlds, a quintillion worlds, countless, measureless, endless, incomparable, inconceivable, incalculable, untold, unspeakably unspeakable numbers of worlds; and in those worlds are buddhas living, in each of those oceans of worlds, in each of those streams of worlds, in each region of those worlds, in each age of those worlds, in each set of those worlds, in each occurrence of those worlds, in each expression of those worlds, in each medium of those worlds, in each particular of those worlds, in each sacred place in those worlds, in each site of enlightenment in those worlds, in each assembly in those worlds—I go to each of the buddhas teaching in those worlds with as many bodies as atoms in endless buddha-lands, each body raining as many clouds of offerings as atoms in endless buddha-lands. 
Going to the buddhas, I ceaselessly make offerings of all kinds of flowers, fragrances, garlands, unguents, robes, banners, pennants, canopies, nets, and ornaments. 
Those buddhas explain, reveal, and elucidate, and I acknowledge and take up all that they teach. 
I also remember the purity of the buddha-lands of those buddhas. 
Also, all the beings who see me, to whom I come, are assured of supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Also, whatever beings I see, small or large, underdeveloped or well developed, happy or unhappy, I adopt a corresponding physical form, in order to guide them to maturity and perfection in the appropriate time. 
And all beings who come to me I establish in this enlightening liberation, which is everywhere at once and which is the consummation of unerring power. 
How can I know the practice, or tell the virtues, of the great enlightening beings who act on great compassion, who act in accord with the practice of the Great Vehicle, whose conduct never deviates from the path of enlightening beings, whose conduct is free from attachment, whose conduct always embodies the will of enlightening beings, who always act with the thought of enlightenment, whose action is focused on the way of the enlightened, who always act with the thought of omniscience, whose way of action is like the sky, whose conduct is independent of all mundane realms, whose conduct is flawless, whose conduct is uncorrupted, whose conduct is consistent, whose conduct is faultless, whose conduct is pure, whose conduct is unblemished, whose conduct is free from evil, whose conduct is honest, whose conduct is dispassionate, whose conduct is undefiled? 
“Go south, son, to the Dravidian city Vajrapura. 
There lives a grammarian named Megha. 
Go to him and ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and practice the conduct of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana again paid his respects to the monk Supratishthita and left. 
Megha Then Sudhana, mindful of the light of the Teaching, steeped in intensity of faith in the Teaching, his attention focused on thoughts of Buddha, intent on perpetuating the lineage of the three treasures, remembering spiritual friends, his mind having illumined the worlds of past, present, and future, thinking of great vows, striving for the salvation of all beings, his mind unattached to enjoyment of any created things, praising the tradition of dispassion, intent upon contemplation of the instrinsic essence of all things, firm in the commitment to purify all worlds, sojourning without attachment in the congregations of all buddhas, gradually approached the Dravidian city Vajrapura, looking for the grammarian Megha. 
He saw Megha at a crossroads in the middle of the city, sitting on a lion seat to talk about the Teaching, elucidating a scripture called Manifestation of Turning of the Wheel of Letters. 
Sudhana went up to him, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
How is an enlightening being to preserve the determination for enlightenment? 
How does one develop a will that is firm in all states of existence and is indefatigable? How does one purify one’s intent, in accord with invincibility? 
How is the power of great compassion produced so that it never flags? 
How does one acquire mental command that is totally purified? 
How is the light of wisdom produced, light free from obscurity in regard to meaning, principle, expression, and presence of mind? 
How does one acquire the power of recollection, keeping in mind the teachings of all buddhas without confusion? 
How is the power of migration purified, illumining all states of existence with the truth? 
How is an enlightening being’s power of concentration perfected, intent on the ascertainment and discernment of the meanings of all principles?” Now Megha, out of respect for an enlightening being, got off his seat and prostrated himself before Sudhana, then showered Sudhana with golden flowers, precious jewels, and the finest sandalwood powders, covered him with hundreds of thousands of robes dyed in various colors, showered him with beautiful flowers of many various colors with pleasant scents, and honored him with various other offerings, then said to him, “It is good that you have set your mind on supreme perfect enlightenment; one who arouses the determination for supreme perfect enlightenment becomes engaged in the perpetuation of the lineage of buddhas, intent on correctly communicating the tradition of dispassion, engaged in purifying the family of all lands, directed toward guiding the family of all sentient beings to perfection, engaged in properly accomplishing all the teachings and transcending all things, intent on harmony of all actions, engaged in the fulfillment of all practices of enlightening beings, directed toward preserving the continuity of all religious vows, engaged in following knowledge of all times, active in making devotion steadfast, the focus of attention of all buddhas, near to equality with all buddhas, appreciated by all enlightening beings, praised by all sages, honored by all the chief Brahmas, protected by all the chief gods, respected, welcomed, and praised by the chiefs of the various supernatural beings, sought out by all world rulers; one becomes very well suited for putting an end to the three kinds of bad conditions in all worlds, getting rid of all difficult conditions inopportune for attaining enlightenment, getting beyond all states of destitution, attaining birth in celestial or human states, always seeing spiritual benefactors, consistently listening to the lofty buddha-teaching, purifying the will for enlightenment, cultivating the cause of the thought of enlightenment, gaining the illumination of the path of enlightening beings, following the knowledge of enlightening beings, and dwelling in the stages of enlightening beings. 
“This is what I think of such a one: 
enlightening beings do what is difficult to do; it is hard to get to actually see them; they are comforts to the world; enlightening beings are the mothers and fathers of all sentient beings; enlightening beings are an adornment to the world with its gods; enlightening beings are a refuge for those oppressed by suffering; enlightening beings are a place of rest for the protection of all sentient beings; enlightening beings are the breath of life to those suffering all kinds of terrors and calamities; enlightening beings are a wind protecting all sentient beings from the heat of the three evils; enlightening beings are earth, causing the roots of goodness of all sentient beings to grow; enlightening beings are an ocean, a repository of endless treasures of virtue; enlightening beings are a sun, producing the light of knowledge; enlightening beings are the polar mountain, by virtue of the height of their roots of goodness; enlightening beings are a moon, the moon of knowledge of the essence of enlightenment having risen in them; enlightening beings are warriors crushing the armies of all demons; enlightening beings are heroic, having reached the city of the state of independence; enlightening beings are fire, annihilating the self-love of all sentient beings; enlightening beings are clouds, causing vast clouds of true teaching to shower; enlightening beings are rain, causing the sprouts of faculties such as faith to grow; enlightening beings are navigators, showing the way on the ocean of truth; enlightening beings are bridges conveying all sentient beings across the sea of mundane life; enlightening beings are a pathway to the holy for all sentient beings.” Thus praising enlightening beings to Sudhana in such terms, Megha applauded Sudhana. 
While he was saying these words pleasing to enlightening beings, there issued from his mouth a mass of flames that made a thousand worlds clearly visible; and all the sentient beings who perceived that light came to Megha, illumined by the light; to them, their attention commanded by Megha, their hands held forth in respectful supplication, their bodies and minds cooled, enraptured, inspired with reverence, divested of conceit, freed from deception, senses tranquil, Megha expounded and conveyed the teaching of the manifestation of the turning of the wheel of letters, upon hearing which they became irreversible in their progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Megha sat back down on the seat of teaching and said to Sudhana, “I have attained the light of the spell of eloquence: 
I know the speech of all kinds of beings in a billion-world universe; I know the variety of speech of each kind of being; I know the unity of speech of each kind of being; I know the mixture of speech of each kind of being; I know the terms, speech, and concepts of all creatures; I know the ideas of all sages; I know the ideas of all ignoble people; I know the speech of enlightening beings, expressed according to the mentalities and languages of sentient beings; I enter into and focus on the oceans of utterances addressed to all sentient beings by the buddhas of past, present, and future. 
As in this billion-world universe in each moment of thought I enter into the oceans of all terms, expressions, speech, and concepts of sentient beings, I do the same in untold worlds in each of the ten directions. 
“I know this light of the spell of eloquence of enlightening beings, but how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who have entered the ocean of what is in various conceptions, who have entered the ocean of the various conceptions and languages of all people, who have entered the ocean of the various conventions of verbal designation used by all people, who have entered the ocean of logical connections of all statements, who have entered the ocean of literalism, who have entered the ocean of designation of all objects of past, present, and future in one object, who have entered the ocean of teaching which is beyond verbal expression, who have entered the ocean of the teaching of the Buddha, who have entered the ocean of explanations of distinct types of statements, who have entered the ocean of explanation guiding the analysis of statements of all truths, who have entered the ocean of speech of all beings, who have gone into the pure arrays of all spheres of sound, who are conversant with the ultimate distinctions of the wheel of phonemes? 
“Go, son—there is a country south of here called Vanavasin, where there lives a distinguished man named Muktaka. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to undertake the practice of enlightening beings and become familiar with it, and how the mind is to be observed.” Then Sudhana, having bowed to Megha and paid respect to the teaching, describing the faith rooted in him, observing that all-knowledge comes from following good spiritual benefactors, reluctantly took his leave and went on. 
Muktaka Then Sudhana, reflecting on that array of light of the spell of eloquence of enlightening beings, plunging into that enlightening beings’ ocean of principles of speech, remembering that enlightening beings’ mental purification, undertaking that enlightening beings’ production of inclination to goodness, clarifying that enlightening beings’ method of perfecting sentient beings, purifying that enlightening beings’ knowledge of how to take care of sentient beings, making firm that enlightening beings’ purity of willpower, establishing that enlightening beings’ power of supreme resolve, clarifying that body of interest of enlightening beings, producing that goodness of intent and thought of enlightening beings, evoking that effort of enlightening beings, equipped with a mind of firm commitment and tireless consistency, with unrelenting energy and determination, imbued with unshakable power of faith, with an indestructible mind, follower of the instructions of all spiritual benefactors, with the perspective of sane knowledge, on the verge of all-sided purity, coursing in the purity of unobstructed knowledge, imbued with the light of the principle of the universal eye, illumined by the mystic formulations of all stages of enlightenment, his mind directed to the differentiations of the planes of the cosmos, aware of the pure essence of forms unfixed anywhere, intent on the sphere of absolute unity with no attachment, having purified the medium of powerful knowledge of all ideas, having broken through the boundaries of all spaces, progressively distinguishing the realms of worldly planes, progressively distinguishing the realms of planes of reality, intent on the manifestation of the vision of the varieties of abodes of Buddha, knowing about the distinctions of realms of time, his intellect bearing the radiant wheel of the teaching, his mind illumined by the light of the treasury of concentration of universally radiant knowledge, mentally and physically according with the stage of universal perspective, his mind illumined by the lightning of knowledge of those who realize Thusness, realizing the exaltation of faith in omniscience, never without the exaltation of faith in the buddha-teaching, filled with the exaltation of the empowerment of Buddha, illumined by the inherent mental light of all buddhas, hearing the vow to penetrate all networks of worlds with his own body, intent on putting all universes at once into his own body, made his way gradually to the country Vanavasin, arriving there after twelve years. 
He looked for the noble Muktaka, saw him, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have made gains, having met the spiritual benefactor Megha. 
Spiritual benefactors are hard to get to see, hard to get to encounter, hard to visit, hard to attend, hard to approach, hard to stay with, hard to be perfected by, hard to associate with. 
But I have met the spiritual benefactor Megha. 
Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, to attend all buddhas, to be on good terms with all buddhas, to see all buddhas, to know all buddhas, to approach equality with all buddhas, to follow the vows of all buddhas, to fulfill the vows of all buddhas, to view the knowledge attained by all buddhas, to produce all buddhas in my own body, to accomplish the realization of all buddhas in my own practice, to directly know the mystical transformations of all buddhas, to purify the powers and confidences of all buddhas, to hear all true teachings tirelessly, to listen to and take up the teachings of all buddhas, to hold the teachings of all buddhas, to distinguish the teachings of all buddhas, to preserve the instructions of all buddhas, to be one being with all buddhas, to be equal to all enlightening beings, to purify the practice of all enlightening beings, to fulfill the transcendent ways of enlightening beings, to purify the accomplishment of the vows of all enlightening beings, to attain all enlightening beings’ store of mystical power of buddhas, to be illumined by the endless knowledge of the treasury of truths of all enlightening beings, to approach the treasury of enlightening beings, to produce the infinite treasury of enlightening beings, to realize the ultimate consummation of guidance of sentient beings with the treasury of great compassion of all enlightening beings, to know the treasury of spiritual transformations of all enlightening beings, to command in my own body the treasury of powers of all enlightening beings, to be fully arrayed with the treasury of purities of all enlightening beings. 
“Noble one, I have come in such a spirit, with such desires, such wishes, such intentions, such thoughts uppermost in my mind, aiming for such a realm, determined to follow such principles, intent on such purity, seeking such adornments, with such a humble mind, applied to such good, my faculties oriented in this way. 
Noble one, I hear you give instructions to enlightening beings, explain principle and clarify procedure, explain the Path, take them across the bridge, open the door of the Teaching, cut off doubts, dispel craving, pull out the arrow of confusion, clear away the grime of uncertainty, light up the obscurity in the mind, remove defilement from the mind, calm the mental flow, remove deviousness from the mind, cool the fever of the mind, foster nonattachment, turn back the mind revolving in the mundane whirl, turn enlightening beings away from evil, separate them from hells, free them from attachments, direct them toward omniscience, lead them into the city of truth, establish them in great compassion, settle them in great kindness, introduce them into the practice of enlightening beings, cause them to enter into the development of ways of concentration, establish them in means of realization, fill them with contemplation of inherent nature, and explain mind according to power for the sake of attainment of equanimity toward all beings. 
Noble one, please tell me how an enlightening being is to learn, commence, and carry out the practice of enlightening beings, and how one so engaged can quickly purify the sphere of practice of enlightening beings.” At that juncture Muktaka entered an enlightening concentration medium called “collection of all buddha-fields,” led by a mystic formula of endless progression, accomplishing entry into this concentration by the power of his past roots of goodness, by the empowerment of the Buddha, and by Manjushri’s attention and gift of the light of knowledge. 
As soon as Muktaka had entered that state, his body became pure, and by that purity of body as many buddhas in the ten directions as atoms in ten buddha-lands were visible within his body, along with the adornments of their pure lands, their congregations, their pure lights, their past actions and abodes, their mystical projections, their vows, their pure arrays of liberative practices, their manifestations of attainment of perfect enlightenment, their turnings of the wheel of teaching, their developments of sentient beings, and the ultimate consummation of their teaching. 
All these were visible within Muktaka’s body without mutual confusion, without mutual obstruction, clearly distinct, showing the various individual ages accurately defined, the various arrays of the buddha-lands, the various adornments of the congregations of enlightening beings, and the various miracles of the buddhas. 
Some buddhas were seen to be in the heaven of happiness in a world setting forth various means of liberation and illumining various undertakings; some were seen descending from the heaven of happiness doing the duty of buddhas; some were seen in the womb of the mother displaying various miracles; some were seen being born and showing a child’s play; some were seen at home, some leaving home, some gone to the summit of enlightenment defeating the army of demons; some were seen surrounded by deities, spirits, and cherubim, being asked by Brahma and Indra to turn the wheel of the teaching; some were seen turning the wheel of teaching; some were seen in the abodes of all beings; some were seen passing away; in some cases the division of the relics of deceased buddhas in a world was seen, and in some cases people and celestial beings in a buddha-land were seen adorning a buddha’s shrine. 
And what those buddhas said, in various groups of beings, in various beings’ worlds, in various realms of existence, in various assemblies of beings, in various situations according to beings’ virtues, states, inclinations, beliefs, and faculties, in various periods of time, amid various kinds of beings’ activities, in various manifestations of worlds of beings carrying out various intentions, in the midst of beings with various degrees of purity of senses and various afflictions, habits, and propensities, teaching by various manifestations of buddhas’ transfigurations and projections, by various expressions, various utterances, various enunciations of doctrine, various mystical mnemonic formulae, various intellectual analyses of principles, various stirrings of the ocean of names of truth, various roarings of the mighty lion’s roar of buddhas, various manifestations of magical performances teaching beings bases of goodness, mystic projections showing various facets of memory, various lion roars foretelling the buddhahood of enlightening beings, various manifestations of the wheel of teaching of the enlightened, in infinite assemblies of infinite varieties, all interdependent, in groups variously purified, in large groups contained in small groups, in groups a league deep, ten leagues deep, up to groups the size of as many worlds as atoms in untold buddha-fields—all that those buddhas taught, Sudhana heard, took in, remembered, undertook, and contemplated. 
He also saw the mystic projection and the inconceivable power of concentration of the enlightening being. 
Then Muktaka, mindful, perfectly cognizant, arose from that concentration and said to Sudhana, “I go in and out of a liberation of buddhas which is called ‘unobstructed manifestation.’ As I go in and out of the ‘unobstructed mainfestation’ liberation of buddhas, to the east I see in the world Golden Light a buddha named Supreme Savior, along with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by the enlightening being Child of Radiance. 
To the south I see in the world Possessed of All Powers a buddha named Universal Spread of Fragrance, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by King of Thought. 
To the west I see in the World Possessed of All Fragrances and Beauties a buddha named Supreme Lamp, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Unobstructed Mind. 
To the north I see in the world Vestment Banner a buddha named Diamond Crusher, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Boldly Advancing on Indestructible Feet. 
To the northeast I see in the world Beauty of All Jewels a buddha named Radiance of the Independent Eye, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Independent Emanation. 
To the southeast I see in the world Glow of Fragrant Flames a buddha named Fragrant Lamp, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Supreme Intellect Differentiating the Planes of All Realms of Reality. 
To the southwest I see in a world Sunny Golden Shining a buddha named Illuminating Voice of Universal Knowledge, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Hanging Crest of Radiant Flowery Flames. 
To the northwest I see in the land Brilliant Shining Treasury with Fragrant Adornments a buddha named Light of a Measureless Ocean of Virtue, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Mind Blazing with Light in a Body Free from Attachments. 
In the nadir I see in the world Blaze of Lights from Jewel Lions a buddha named Beam of Light Illumining the Cosmos, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Mind Born of the Light of the Cosmos. 
In the zenith I see in the world Radiant with Splendor of Appearance a buddha named Light of Liberation of Indestructible Virtue and Glory, with the whole group of enlightening beings there, led by Mind of Energy of Unobstructed Power. 
Beginning with these, I see as many buddhas in the ten directions as atoms in ten buddha-lands: 
and yet those buddhas do not come here and I do not go there. 
Also, whenever I want to see the buddha Infinite Light in the world Blissful, I see the buddha Diamond Light in the world Like Sandalwood, I see the buddha Jewel Light in the world Fragrant, I see the buddha Jewel Lotus Light in the world Lotuslike, I see the buddha Silent Light in the world Golden, I see the buddha Imperturbable in the world Joy, I see the buddha Lion in the world Standing Well, I see the buddha Moonlike Awareness in the world Mirror Globe Light, I see the buddha Luminous in the world Pure Clarity of Jewellike Splendor. 
In this way I see whatever buddha I wish in whatever world in whichever direction. 
I see whatever buddha I wish to see in whatever time in whatever abode involved in whatever past practice, whatever buddha I wish to see in whatever miraculous performances, in whatever teaching activity: 
and yet the buddhas do not come here, nor do I go there. 
Without discerning any coming from anywhere on the part of the buddhas, without discerning any going on the part of my own body, knowing the buddhas as like a dream, knowing my own mind as dreamlike thought, knowing the buddhas as like a reflection, knowing my own mind as like a vessel of clear water, knowing the buddhas as like magically produced forms, knowing my mind as like magic, knowing the nature of voices of the buddhas as the reverberation of the sound of echoes in the mountains, knowing my own mind as like an echo, I realize, I am mindful, that all enlightenment principles of enlightening beings are based on one’s own mind, that all their purification of buddha-lands, all enlightening practices, all development and guidance of sentient beings, all undertaking of the vows of enlightening beings, all attainment to the ocean of omniscience, roaming in the inconceivable liberation of enlightening beings, attainment of the enlightenment of buddhas, spiritual communion with the cosmos, and knowledge of subtle communion with all ages, all are based on one’s own mind. 
“In this connection, I think that one’s own mind should be supported by roots of goodness, moistened by the clouds of the Teaching, purified by principles that should be focused on, made firm by vigor, made calm by forbearance, guided by following knowledge, clarified by wisdom, developed in spiritual powers, expanded to equality with the buddhas, illumined by the ten powers of the enlightened. 
“I know this buddha-liberation of unobstructed manifestation, and go in and out of it; how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of enlightening beings whose minds are unobstructed, whose sphere is a state free from obstruction, who have attained concentration focused on the teachings of all buddhas of the present, who have attained concentration leading into enlightenment that does not become ultimately extinct, who have realized the equality of past, present, and future, who know the science of the sphere of concentration on the continuity of all planes, who distribute their bodies throughout all buddha-lands, who abide in the unfragmented state of buddhas, whose perspective faces in all directions, who observe the sphere of all-inclusive knowledge, who know the becoming and disintegration of all worlds in their own bodies, without any dualistic notions regarding their bodies or the worlds. 
“Go south, to Milaspharana, on the tip of the continent. 
A monk named Saradhvaja lives there. 
Go to him and ask how an enlightening being is to learn and undertake the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana, paying his respects to Muktaka, eulogizing, contemplating, desiring, and dwelling on Muktaka’s countless virtues, with love for spiritual benefactors, taking refuge in spiritual benefactors, seeking to please spiritual benefactors, not contesting the knowledge of spiritual benefactors, seeing omniscience as realized by following spiritual benefactors, obedient to spiritual benefactors, to be spiritually healed by the techniques of spiritual benefactors, his thoughts following the direction of spiritual benefactors, thinking of spiritual benefactors as a mother because they get rid of all that is not beneficial, thinking of spiritual benefactors as a father because they produce all good qualities, Sudhana left Muktaka. 
Saradhvaja Then Sudhana, reflecting on the instruction of the eminent Muktaka, following Muktaka’s direction, remembering the inconceivable liberation of enlightening beings, remembering the inconceivable light of knowledge of enlightening beings, following the inconceivable entrance into the realm of reality, entering into the inconceivable principle of the communion of enlightening beings, observing the inconceivable transformation of those who realize Thusness, intent on the inconceivable communion of buddha-fields, clarifying the inconceivable manifestation of the magical power of buddhas, contemplating the magnificence of the inconceivable order of the concentrations and liberations of enlightening beings, following the steadfast determination to perform the inconceivable work of enlightening beings, conforming to the stream of undertaking of the inconceivable deeds of enlightening beings, gradually proceeded to Milaspharana on the tip of the continent, where he looked all over for the monk Saradhvaja. 
He saw Saradhvaja by the side of a place for walking at a retreat, sitting in concentration, following his breath, not stirring, not thinking, his body straight, his mindfulness on the immediate present, by the inconceivable power of concentration producing to the left, right, and above an inconceivable infinite body in each successive mental moment manifesting an infinite variety of bodies. 
He also saw priests and householders going throughout the ten directions caring for the poor with all kinds of food and drink, services, supplies, clothing, flowers, garlands, fragrances, ointments, acts of love, jewels, dwellings, vessels, and implements, restoring life to the miserable world, satisfying sentient beings, purifying sentient beings’ minds, developing sentient beings for enlightenment. 
Sudhana saw forms of warrior sages, priestly sages, worldly sages, scholars versed in various crafts, humanistic scholars, scholars expert in knowledge of the sciences of mundane and transmundane activities, sages considered teachers of the world, emanate from the circles on Saradhvaja’s knees and go throughout the ten directions in many forms and guises, speaking pleasant words, cheering up dejected sentient beings, taking care of spiritually and materially poor beings, comforting beings in distress, uplifting the fallen, reviving the shipwrecked, rescuing the imperiled, causing the voice of goodness to be heard, preaching rejection of evil, exhorting beings to virtuous practices, directing beings to beneficial actions, producing joy, uttering kind words, and showing the world the nature of cooperation. 
Sudhana saw various forms of wizards, as many as there are living beings, emanating from Saradhvaja’s navel and going throughout the ten directions, wearing leather, rags, and bark, carrying staffs and pitchers, their deportment extremely calm, up on the sky extolling the qualities of buddhas, causing the voice of the Teaching to be heard, speaking the voice of Buddhas, showing the community of enlightening beings, praising religious conduct, directing sentient beings to guard their senses, describing the meaning of the voidness of intrinsic essence, introducing sentient beings into the meaning of knowledge, teaching worldly science, showing the science of the Path to omniscience and emancipation, guiding beings in gradual practice. 
Sudhana saw as many water spirit girls as all worldly events, in inconceivably many forms, emerging from Saradhvaja’s sides, pervading all universes moment to moment, showing the miracle of water spirits, adorning the sky with inconceivable fragrant clouds, adorning the whole sky with inconceivable clouds of flowers, arraying the whole realm of space with inconceivable adornments of clouds of garlands, covering all universes with inconceivable adornment of bejeweled parasols, adorning the sky with inconceivable clouds of jeweled banners, inconceivable clouds of jeweled pennants, rain from inconceivable endless clouds of great jewels, rain from inconceivable clouds of jewel necklaces and various flowers, inconceivable clouds of jewel seats with enlightening beings sitting on them teaching the ways of enlightenment, inconceivable clouds of troves of celestial jewels, rain of clouds of sounds of goddesses singing praises of the Teaching, inconceivable raining clouds of jewel lotuses adorned with nets of pearls crowned with diamonds, inconceivable clouds of jewel crowns and rain of clouds of endless lights adorned by all jewels, inconceivable clouds of celestial beings graced with flowers, garlands, parasols, and banners, inconceivable clouds of goddesses, adornments of rain produced by clouds of songs of praise of buddhas’ qualities sung by the goddesses on high standing with joined palms or scattering golden flowers, also covering all buddhas’ assemblies with clouds of heaps of fragrances the colors of all jewels and clouds of smoke of the finest incense, adorning all worlds, delighting all beings, honoring all buddhas. 
Sudhana saw as many titan kings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerging from the auspicious mark on Saradhvaja’s chest and pervading the cosmos moment to moment, displaying the inconceivable magic transformations of titans, agitating the oceans, causing hundreds of thousands of worlds to quake, causing all the highest mountains to crash together, shaking up all celestial abodes, eclipsing all hordes of demons, crushing all armies of demons, causing all people to destroy intoxication, conceit, and arrogance, restraining and purifying corrupt minds, restraining malicious minds, extinguishing being’s bad qualities, shattering the mountains of afflictions, quieting grasping for pleasure, frightening sentient beings by exercises of titanic magical powers and scaring them away from evil, making them wary of the mundane whirl, getting them to leave all states of conditioned existence and enter into nondwelling, leading sentient beings to the thought of enlightenment, getting them to purify the conduct of enlightening beings, establishing enlightening beings in the transcendent way, causing them to enter the stages of enlightening beings, causing them to produce enlightening beings’ light of the way to buddhahood, defining various principles and methods. 
Sudhana saw as many bodies of Buddhist disciples and individual illuminates as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge from Saradhvaja’s spine and pervade the cosmos, telling sentient beings attached to self and suited to guidance by disciples or individual illuminates about selflessness and the voidness of the being, clarifying the impermanence of all conditioned states to those attached to eternity, telling the lustful about the contemplation of impurity, telling the hostile about love, telling the deluded about causality and interdependent origination, illumining principles connected with the sphere of knowledge to those who are equally lustful, hostile, and deluded, telling those attached to objects about nondwelling, causing those inclined to stick to tranquillity to like the superiority of undertaking vows, showing actions beneficial to beings, in all places, in the beginning of all turnings of the ocean of ways to truth. 
Sudhana saw as many demigods and supernatural beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerging from Saradhvaja’s shoulders and pervading the cosmos, with various physical forms, colors, and sizes, in various attitudes, riding various vehicles, surrounded by various retinues, striving to protect sentient beings, showing various powers, uttering various sounds, going everywhere employing various different means to guard the good actions of all sentient beings, to guard all circles of sages, to assist all enlightening beings, to protect those who are rightly oriented, to attend and honor all buddhas with the work of thunderbolt bearers, to remove all fallen sentient beings from evil ways, striving to annihilate all worldly calamities and perils such as disease, anxious to preserve the light of actions beneficial to beings, filling the stores of knowledge and virtue, causing the wheel of the teaching to roll along, restraining controversy. 
Sudhana saw as many centaur chiefs as atoms in countless buddha-fields surrounded by countless hundreds of thousands of centaur princesses, and as many celestial musician kings as atoms in countless buddha-fields surrounded by countless hundreds of thousands of celestial musician princesses emerge from Saradhvaja’s abdomen and pervade the cosmos, performing music and songs in praise of Buddha dealing with the essence of things, illumining the thought of enlightenment, describing the conduct of enlightening beings, eulogizing all ways to attainment of enlightenment, fostering understanding of all ways of presenting the Teaching, causing attraction to all ways of spiritual transformation, illumining all ways into ultimate release, publicizing all buddhas’ teachings, gladdening all beings, purifying all buddha-fields, illuminating all ways to truth, removing all obstructions, begetting all roots of goodness. 
Sudhana saw as many emperors as atoms in countless buddha-fields, each surrounded by seven treasures and four armies, emerge from Saradhvaja’s face, pervading the cosmos, radiating arrays of light beams of great relinquishment, spewing forth masses of all kinds of jewels, distributing multitudes of all kinds of jewels, enriching the poor, causing people to desist from killing, fostering kindness in sentient beings, causing them to give up stealing, giving them countless beautifully adorned maidens, causing them to give up sexual misconduct, establishing them in chastity, causing them to desist from lying, enjoining on them supreme honesty, causing them to desist from slander, causing them to speak words of ultimate kindness and consideration, causing them to desist from harsh words and speak pleasantly, causing people to desist from all meaningless statements, statements connected with what is not beneficial and what is not right, urging them to certainty of distinction of statements of profound meaning, causing people to desist from all evils of speech and speak compassionately, removing mental defilements from people, enjoining the excellent state of having few desires and being content, causing people to desist from malice and urging them to be peaceful in their relations with others, extracting people from the web of all views, causing them to break up all kinds of uncertainties, throwing off all masses of doubts, taking away the darkness of all confusion and hesitation, definitively analyzing the truth for people, telling them about causality and interdependent origination, directing them to the principle of the truth about inherent existence, dispelling all obstacles, leading into the way of nonobstruction, illuminating the meaning of enlightenment. 
Sudhana saw as many hundreds of thousands of suns as atoms in countless buddha-fields emanate from Saradhvaja’s eyes, lighting up all the great hells, dispersing the great darkness in the world, removing the darkness of sentient beings’ delusions, relieving the beings in the frigid hells from the pains of cold, shining clear light in lands made of lotus fibers, shining lapis-lazuli-colored light in gold lands, shining golden light in lands of lapis lazuli, shining golden light in silver worlds, shining crystal light in gold lands, shining golden light in crystal lands, shining coral light in gold lands, shining golden light in coral lands, shining golden light in ruby lands, shining ruby light in gold lands, shining golden light in emerald lands, shining emerald light in gold lands, shining light the color of sun-filled jewels in sapphire lands, shining sapphire light in lands made of sun-filled jewels, shining light the color of jewels containing networks of moonbeams in red pearl lands, shining light the color of red pearls in lands made of jewels containing networks of moonbeams, shining light the colors of various jewels in lands made of one jewel, shining light the color of one jewel in lands made of various jewels, thus involved in the infinite tasks of sentient beings, in the assemblies of all enlightening beings, pervading the universes of all beings. 
From the circle of hair between Saradhvaja’s eyebrows Sudhana saw as many moons as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge, outshining all the celestial chiefs, turning all worldlings away from lust to enjoyment of the vision of Buddha, pervading the cosmos engaged in the guidance of infinite beings. 
From Saradhvaja’s forehead Sudhana saw as many great Brahmas as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge, their deportment extremely tranquil, murmuring prayers, asking all buddhas for instruction, praising all buddhas, gladdening all enlightening beings, pervading all universes in the ten directions, involved in the infinite tasks of sentient beings. 
From Saradhvaja’s head Sudhana saw emerge as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields, manifesting bodies of various appearances, forms, adornments, and embellishments, emanating infinite spheres of light, taking up the past enlightening practices of all buddhas and projecting from every pore multitudes of forms practicing charity without attachment to giver, receiver, or gift, showing oceans of past efforts involved in the various ways of transcendence, commending the act of giving to the world, getting rid of the filth of envy, directing beings to give up all grasping, causing the world to appear adorned with all kinds of jewels, establishing sentient beings in the practice of transcendent giving and in command over material things, praising all virtues, and teaching the cause of the characteristics of buddhas. 
He also saw as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge praising transcendent morality, manifesting from every pore oceans of past efforts of all buddhas involved in transcendent morality, turning all beings away from the spheres of all mundane states and turning them toward the sphere of the enlightened, disdaining the world of desire, dispersing the veil of error from the world, stopping untrue thoughts and enjoining the way of life of enlightening beings, commending the ethic of great compassion and leading beings into the conduct of the practice of the path of buddhas to attain the conduct of the enlightened, showing sentient beings that the state of existence is like a dream and guiding them into power over afflictions caused by grasping sense objects so that they may fully enter into the way of acting as in a dream. He also saw as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge, lighting up the world with golden light, guiding beings to a state of mind without hatred or malice, free from all corruption and defect, emanating from every pore multitudes of past efforts of buddhas involved in transcendent tolerance in order to cut off all brutal tendencies, leading sentient beings into the power of tolerance, showing sentient beings mastery over phenomena. He also saw as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge, engaged in miraculous displays showing the endless power of energy of enlightening beings, commending tireless quest for the ocean of learning by the power of nonregression in progress toward omniscience, guiding beings to honor and attend all buddhas, leading beings to arouse great energy to get rid of the mass of all suffering, emanating from all their bodies multitudes of past efforts involved in enlightening beings’ perfection of transcendent energy, shattering sentient beings’ mountains of sloth, leading sentient beings into transcendent energy, guiding sentient beings to mastery over action. 
He also saw as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge guiding sentient beings into the path of mindfulness, dissolving the darkness of all obstructions, causing sentient beings to desist from all intoxication and leading them into sobriety, taking down the flags of pretentiousness, arrogance, and pride, telling of the ocean of branches of meditation of buddhas, describing transcendent meditation to people, emanating from every pore multitudes of past efforts involved in perfection of transcendent meditation, guiding sentient beings to mastery of mind, pervading the cosmos moment to moment. 
He also saw as many enlightening beings as atoms in countless buddha-fields emerge and fill the cosmos in every thought illuminating the sphere of knowledge of sentient beings, emanating from every pore multitudes of past efforts involved in purification of consummate knowledge, manifesting in the world the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge of all buddhas’ virtues and knowledges, showing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge of all buddhas’ perceptions, illuminating the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge of the undertaking of all vows, revealing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge of the undertaking of the vow to save all sentient beings, revealing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge penetrating the lack of self or independent existence in all beings, illumining the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge observing the ocean of minds of all sentient beings, analyzing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge discerning the faculties of all sentient beings, describing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge observing the inclinations and interests of all sentient beings, disclosing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge comprehending the ocean of actions of all beings, showing the stage of knowledge characterized by mystic knowledge penetrating the ocean of commitments of all sentient beings, guiding sentient beings into the perfection of knowledge. 
From Saradhvaja’s topknot of flesh Sudhana saw emerge as many embodiments of buddhas as atoms in countless buddha-fields, adorned with the finest characteristics and embellishments, appearing like mountains of gold, with immeasurable auras of blazing light illumining everything in the ten directions and voices pervading the cosmos, suffusing all universes, showing endless miraculous transformations of Buddha, showering rain from clouds of teaching on all without discrimination—showering rain from a cloud of teaching called knowledge confronting the distinction of all planes of the cosmos on enlightening beings on the verge of enlightenment, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called the ground of universality on coronated enlightening beings, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called entry into the ground of universality on enlightening beings ordained as princes of the great teaching, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called universal arrangement on enlightening beings of youthful nature, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called steadfast head of great compassion on nonregressing enlightening beings, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called diamond of knowledge distinguishing the intrinsic essence of all phenomena on enlightening beings of purified intent, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called arrangement taking in all beings on enlightening beings accomplished in preparatory practices, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called cloud of communication with the assemblies of all buddhas of past, present, and future on regenerated enlightening beings, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called voice of the ground of intrinsic essence of all phenomena on enlightening beings engaged in concerted practice, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called source of clouds containing the ways and means of great compassion on enlightening beings engaged in primary practices, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called store of kindness on enlightening beings newly determined to see enlightenment, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called inexhaustible treasury of kindness of the buddhas’ commitment to liberation on enlightening beings of great zeal, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called inexhaustible treasury of the universal ground on beings in the world of form, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called sound produced by the measureless ocean of principles on Brahma body deities, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called inexhaustible treasury of power producing spiritual methods on controlling deities, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called sound cleaning variously represented provisions for omniscience on demon-body deities, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called varied cargo of jewels of knowledge on the deities who enjoy emanations, showering rain from a cloud called varied representation of the vows of enlightening beings on deities in the heavens of happiness, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called treasury of recollection of all buddhas on deities in the heavens of timely portion, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called source of the rapture of the vision of Buddha on the abodes of the chief deities, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called multitude of transformations of Buddha pervading the space of the cosmos on the abodes of the chief demigods, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called sound of eulogies of the qualities of all enlightened ones on the abodes of the chief celestial musicians, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called indestructible sphere of ways to knowledge on the abodes of the chief titans, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called multitude of means of development of all enlightened ones on the abodes of the chief birds, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called source of the magical utterances of enlightening beings traveling swiftly through the states of existence on the abodes of the chief dragons, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called speed of increase of the ocean of joy on the abodes of the chief serpents, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called sphere of the highest knowledge of all beings on the realms of humans, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called ornament bearing the words of the holy path bespeaking the extinction of all the pains of mundane existence on the hells, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called round body of clouds of remembrance of buddhas bespeaking the practice of impeccable action on the realms of animals, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called declaration of the transcendence of all buddhas producing a mind of nonattachment in all sentient beings on the ghost realms, showering rain from a cloud of teaching called comforting sound effecting the cessation of all pains on beings in distress. 
From some orbs of webs of light beams he saw scenes of the practice of pure giving, relinquishing everything; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw scenes of the procedures of all past, present and future enlightening beings’ investiture with ethical precepts; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw scenes of all enlightening beings of past, present, and future practicing forbearance, enduring dismemberment, beatings, having their hearts and eyes gouged out, and he saw magically produced images of the practices of forbearance of all enlightening beings by the oppressed enlightening beings of past, present, and future with bodies sundered in the search of omniscience, enduring, forgiving, and overlooking all physical and mental harassment, out of great compassion; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw scenes of different forms of the immensity of the practice of vigor of all enlightening beings, scenes of the great prowess of enlightening beings shaking the world, agitating the seas, startling sentient beings, scaring all heretics; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw embodiments of all deeds of enlightening beings, the forms taken on, the perfections of physical bodies to be born in good families, the acceptance of instructions of spiritual benefactors, the states of practice of the teachings of spiritual benefactors, the abandonments of home, country, and city for suitable abodes to accomplish the branches of meditation of the enlightened, the seers, the meditation adepts, the kings, the recluses, the manners of disciplined conduct; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw embodiments involved in seeking all truths in the station of practice of transcendent wisdom; from the orbs of webs of light beams from each and every pore Sudhana saw the bodies by which each statement of the Teaching was sought from the midst of all beings by relinquishing all that exists, sought from all spiritual benefactors through attendance and service, sought from buddhas with all the strength generated by faith and respect, and all the statements of the Teaching related to transcendent wisdom similarly sought by bodies manifested in the forms of all sentient beings; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw all enlightening beings entering the ocean of states of being with means of development, endeavoring to save all sentient beings; from orbs of webs of light beams from every pore he saw enlightening beings saving sentient beings, engaged in the practice of skill in means taken on by their original bodies, approaching each and every being in a form resembling those beings; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw the conduct of the Buddha’s undertaking of vows in all past ages, the conduct of the undertaking of the vow to perfect all beings, the conduct of the undertaking of the vow to purify all lands, the spheres of accomplishment of all vows effected by each buddha by the specific cures for each of the ills of the mundane whirl. 
Sudhana saw all this from orbs of lights from each pore; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw oceans of past efforts involved in the practice of transcendent power; from some orbs of webs of light beams he saw oceans of past efforts involved in the contemplations of the practice of omniscience and the awakening of sentient beings asleep in the slumber of ignorance. 
Then, observing the monk Saradhvaja thus concentrated in meditation, mindful of that sphere of concentration and liberation, contemplating the inconceivable power of concentration of enlightening beings, entering into that inconceivable ocean of ways of benefiting sentient beings, remembering that inconceivable medium of the performance of supernal manifestations confronting all the senses, strongly focusing his attention on it, entering that door of knowledge of purity of arrangement of the cosmos, aspiring to that enlightened power, expanding in knowledge, recognizing that controlling power of enlightening beings, stabilizing the power of vows of enlightening beings, extending the power of practice of enlightening beings, Sudhana stood before Saradhavja for a day and a night, for two days and nights, seven days and nights, a fortnight, a month, six months, and then six more days and nights. 
After six months and six days and nights, the monk Saradhvaja rose from concentration. 
Sudhana said, “It is marvelous, noble one, how profound this concentration is, how vast, how measureless its scope, how inconceivable its arrays of projections, how incomparable its light, how innumerable its manifestations, how unsurpassable its range, how pure its sphere, how it illumines everywhere equally, how it works for the benefit of infinite beings, in that it is directed to the extinction of the measureless mass of suffering of all sentient beings, to extinguish the sufferings of the destitute, to end hellish states, to rescue beings from brutish states, to close the door on all conditions inopportune for enlightenment, to lead the way to heavenly states, to produce human and celestial pleasure and happiness, to foster experience of the pleasure of meditation, to increase happiness in the conditioned world, to show the way out of the mundane. 
It is set forth to illumine the cause of production of the aspiration of enlightenment, to develop the cause of production of provisions of virtue and knowledge, to increase the intensity of vast great compassion, to generate the power of great vows, for the attainment of the light of the path of enlightening beings, for the arrangement of the great vehicle of the transcendent ways, for the accomplishment of the supreme attainment of the Great Vehicle, for the vision of the knowledge of universally good action, for the attainment of the light of the knowledge of the stages of enlightening beings, for accomplishment of the purification of the array of means of emancipation in the practice of the vows of all enlightening beings, for the empowerment of accession to the sphere of omniscience. 
Noble one, what is the name of this concentration?” Saradhvaja said, “There is a perfection of wisdom called equanimity of the universal eye, and this concentration is its light, called manifestation of universal purification. 
By the perfect accomplishment of the concentration of manifestation of universal purification, which springs from the light of the perfection of wisdom of equanimity of the universal eye, countless tens of hundreds of thousands of complete concentrations, beginning with the manifestation of universal purification, are born.” Sudhana said, “Is this the greatest range of this concentration?” Saradhvaja said, “One who has fully accomplished this concentration has the power to discern worlds, to enter worlds, to travel freely in worlds, to adorn worlds, to purify worlds, to beautify worlds, to see buddhas, to observe the grandeur of buddhas, to know the emanations of buddhas, to enter the powers of buddhas, to plunge into the ocean of virtues of buddhas, to receive the teachings of buddhas, to follow the knowledge of the unity of all buddhas’ teachings, to enter the ocean of congregations of buddhas, to go anywhere in the ten directions, to observe the teaching activity of the buddhas, to see the realms of the buddhas, to embrace all with great compassion, to pervade everywhere with love, to plunge tirelessly into the vision of buddhas everywhere, to enter into the ocean of all beings, to know the ocean of faculties of all beings, to know the distinction of faculties of all beings. 
“I know this state of perfection of wisdom; but how can I know the practice, tell of the virtues, show the realm, reveal the sphere, describe the power of great vows, illumine the way of emancipation, elucidate the attainment, shed light on the path, follow the stream of concentration, know the range of mind, or reach equality with the knowledge, of the enlightening beings who have entered the ocean of states of perfection of wisdom, who have clarified the cosmic perspective, who know where all teachings lead, who pervade an infinite sphere with vast awareness, who command the light of great mental control, who have purified the light of all spheres of concentration, who issue from the magical power of mystic knowledge, who have entered the inexhaustible ocean of intelligence, who speak pleasantly of the stages of enlightenment, who are refuges for all beings? 
“Go south, to a place called Samudravetadin, where there is a park called Samantavyuha, in front of the city Mahaprabha, where a lay woman named Asha, wife of king Suprabha, dwells; go to her and ask her how an enlightening being is to learn and apply the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana, pleased, uplifted, transported, overjoyed, joyful and happy, invigorated and sustained by Sarasdhvaja, having entered the realm of concentration, having attained illumined knowledge, having attained the light of concentration, his consciousness illumined by the light of the principles of teaching pursuant to purifications of interest, seeing the way to purity, with knowledge emanating light in all directions, paid his respects to Saradhvaja and left, looking at him again and again, bowing to him, thinking and meditating on him, praising him, recalling his virtues and keeping them firmly in mind, joining in with his vow, seeking his vision, remembering his words, recalling his appearance, contemplating the excellence of his knowledge, plunging into his sphere of concentration, fixing his mind on his sphere of undertaking, reflecting on the scope of his experience, illumined by his knowledge. 
Asha Then Sudhana, uplifted by the virtues of the spiritual benefactor, sent forth by the spiritual benefactor, having gained access to the vision of the spiritual benefactor, putting the instructions of the spiritual benefactor into practice, remembering the words of the spiritual benefactor, kindly disposed toward spiritual benefactors, seeing spiritual benefactors as mines of the vision of buddhas, seeing spiritual benefactors as those who show the teachings of buddhas, seeing spiritual benefactors as teachers of the elements of omniscience, seeing spiritual benefactors as eyes to see the sky of buddhahood, gradually made his way to Samantavyuha Park in Samudravetadin. 
He saw the park surrounded by fences made of all kinds of jewels, in the midst of rows of all kinds of jewel trees, adorned throughout with beautiful delicate flowers like sets of all kinds of jewels releasing pollen, adorned by all kinds of jewel trees, strewn with the various blossoms of the flowers of all kinds of jewel trees, with rows of trees of all kinds of fragrances giving off their scents in all directions, trees of garlands of all jewels with their flower buds bursting forth streaming a rain of garlands of various jewels, the ground beautifully spread with various decorations made of jewels from trees of all kinds of diamonds, the area well distributed with cloths of various colors hanging down from trees of flowers of various forms, with trees of all kinds of musical instruments making beautiful sounds surpassing the heavens when stirred by the wind, the ground level throughout, neither high nor low, adorned with various trailing streamers of ornaments welling forth from the flower buds of trees of all ornaments. 
In the park, furthermore, were ten hundred thousand arrays of turrets adorned with all kinds of precious jewels, extremely pure; ten hundred thousand towers covered with gold, ten hundred thousand mansions adorned with radiant jewels, ten hundred thousand lotus ponds made of all kinds of jewels, inlaid with jewel bricks, with varied stairways made of seven precious substances, surrounded by benches made of various gems, fragrant as pools of water scented with celestial sandalwood, the bottoms covered with golden sand, spread with ten layers of pure gold and jewels, stairways set on four sides, filled with water of eight qualities, vibrant with the beautiful sounds of the calls of various birds, surrounded by rows of jewel palms, covered by nets of gold bells chiming sweetly when stirred by the wind, with canopies of great jewels above, surrounded by enclosures of trees of various jewels, with banners and streamers flying from jewel nets. 
There were also ten hundred thousand pools, lined with sandalwood clay, covered with lotuses of various colors made of all kinds of jewels, with pure water shining with lotuses of huge gems. 
In the middle of the park was a large mansion called Multicolored Banner standing on a ground of jewels, adorned with pillars of sapphire, roofed with gold, surfaced with arrays of world-illumining jewels, its base blazing with webs of countless jewels, graced by the scent of unsurpassed jewels of fragrance, perfumed by jewels of compounded fragrances, filled with jewels of awakening fragrance extinguishing the heat of the senses. 
In that mansion were arranged infinite seats—the calyxes of lotuses, luminous jewel lotuses, radiant jewel lotuses, world-illumining jewel lotuses, lotuses of various treasures, lotuses of pure jewels, lotuses inlaid with jewels, lotuses of omnifaceted jewels, lotuses of jewels with auras of light, lotuses of jewels shining with the radiant lights of arrays of pure jewels of the ocean, jewel lotuses covered with diamond lions. 
The many turrets of the mansion were made of inconceivably many jewels, arrayed with varicolored jewels, their forms resplendent with light of inconceivably many colors. 
The park was also covered above by ten hundred thousand canopies, such as canopies of cloth, canopies of plant tendrils, canopies of flowers, canopies of garlands, canopies of fragrances, canopies of jewels, golden canopies, canopies of jewels glittering like diamonds, canopies of nymphs magically produced by the chief of the water spirits, canopies of jewels prized by the king of gods. 
It was also covered by ten hundred thousand precious nets such as nets of bells with jewels inside, nets of jeweled streamers, nets of jewel figures, nets of pearls, nets of sapphires, nets of moonlike jewels, nets emanating fragrance, nets of jeweled crowns. 
It was also illumined by ten hundred thousand great lights, such as starlight-jewel light, sun-filled-jewel light, moonlike-jewel light, scenting-flame-jewel light, luster-filled-jewel light, lotus-calyx-jewel light, starry-jewel light, great blazing jewel light, radiant jewel light, and the light of jewels like wreaths of lightning emitting great clouds of fragrance. 
Innumerable living beings in all states of existence came from the ten directions to the laywoman Asha, who was seated on a golden throne, adorned with a net of pearls from the ocean, wearing a tiara, her wrists adorned with bracelets of gold more beautiful than that of the heavens, her arms resplendent with jewels of glorious light, wearing earrings of pure deep blue gems, her head adorned with a veil of all kinds of jewels, her neck draped with a string of wish-fulfilling jewels. 
Those who came to her, affected with various sicknesses, filled with various afflictions, immersed in various views, covered by obstructions caused by actions, had their sicknesses alleviated when they saw Asha. 
Their minds freed from the defilement of afflictions, the thorns of views removed, the mountains of obstructions disintegrated, they entered the sphere of unobstructed purity, in which sphere of purity all their roots of goodness were clarified, the sprouts of spiritual faculties grew, and they entered the ocean of principles of omniscience, they recited the ocean of all mystic spells leading to mental command, came face to face with the ocean of all concentration media, began all holy vows, set all means of practice into operation, purified the means of accomplishing all virtues, proceeded according to wisdom characterized by all higher knowledges with unregressing breadth of mind, and became physically unattached and unobstructed, able to go everywhere. 
Then Sudhana entered the park, looking all over till he saw Asha sitting there. 
He went up to her, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I am not visible to those who have not developed the bases of goodness, who are not under the tutelage of spiritual benefactors, who are not in the care of the perfect buddhas. 
Those who see me thereupon become irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Furthermore, the buddhas of the ten directions come here and sit on this jewel seat and expound the truth to me. 
I am always seeing buddhas, hearing the truth, and meeting enlightening beings. 
The eighty-four thousand quadrillion beings who live here in this park are all irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment, having performed the same practices as I have. 
Any others who live here too will all be irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment, as enlightening beings of the same practice as I who have entered the community of those who cannot regress.” Sudhana said, “Noble one, how long ago did you set your mind on supreme perfect enlightenment?” She said, “I remember a past state when I cultivated religious practice in the company of the buddha known as the Lamp, whom I served and from whom I received teaching. 
Before that was a buddha named Undefiled; I went forth from society into the tutelage of that buddha and held the wheel of teaching of that buddha. 
Before that was a buddha named Splendor of the Polar Mountain; before that was a buddha named Lotus Calyx; before that was a buddha named Illuminating; before that was a buddha named Universal Eye; before that was a buddha named Purified by Spiritual Knowledge; before that was a buddha named Diamond Navel; before that was a buddha named Deifying the Universe. 
Remembering back in this way lifetime to lifetime, age to age, as successive buddhas appeared in the world, I remember as many buddhas as grains of sand in thirty-six Ganges Rivers whom I propitiated, attended, served, and honored, from whom I heard spiritual teaching, under whose tutelage I carried out spiritual practice. Beyond this, only the buddhas know how many buddhas I propitiated. 
Enlightening beings are infinite because of the aspiration of enlightenment, because of pervading all universes; enlightening beings are infinite because of the guidance of great compassion, because of entry into the midst of all beings; enlightening beings are infinite because their great vows go to the end of all universes; enlightening beings are infinite because of great love, because of suffusing all beings with love; enlightening beings are infinite because of the practice of enlightening beings, because of entering into all ages in all lands; enlightening beings are infinite because of the power of concentration, because of not regressing on the path of enlightening beings; enlightening beings are infinite because of the power of mental command, because of attainment of the method of mystic spells able to hold the memory of truths for all beings; enlightening beings are infinite because of the power of the light of knowledge, because of retaining the realization of the knowledge and wisdom of past, present, and future; enlightening beings are infinite because of the power of mystic knowledge, because of ability to produce wheels of nets of light pleasing beings according to their mentalities; enlightening beings are infinite because of the power of intelligence, because of satisfying all beings with one utterance; enlightening beings are infinite because of purity of body, because of pervading all buddha-fields with their own body.” Sudhana said, “Noble one, when will you realize supreme perfect enlightenment?” Asha said, “Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment with the object of leading just one sentient being to perfection, nor for the sake of a hundred or a thousand or a million or a billion sentient beings, nor for any number of beings, nor for all the sentient beings in as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressibly vast numbers of billion-world universes. 
Enlightening beings aspire to enlightenment for the sake of all sentient beings in all worlds, to lead them to perfection. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to propitiate, honor, and attend one buddha, or even as many buddhas as atoms in untold worlds, or to propitiate, honor, and attend the lineage of buddhas in one world or the lineage of buddhas in as many worlds as atoms in untold buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to purify one buddha-land, or even to purify as many buddha-lands as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of worlds. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to preserve the teaching of one buddha, or even to preserve the teachings of as many buddhas as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of worlds. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to enter into the diversity of vows which are the point of departure of one buddha, nor even to enter into the diversity of vows which are the points of departure of as many buddhas as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to enter into the array of the buddha-field of one buddha, nor even to enter into the arrays of buddha-fields of as many buddhas as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to take part in the assembly of one buddha, nor even to take part in the assemblies of as many buddhas as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to preserve the wheel of teaching of one buddha, nor to preserve the wheels of teaching of even as many buddhas as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to penetrate the ocean of mind of one sentient being, nor to penetrate the oceans of mind of even as many sentient beings as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to know the sphere of faculties of one sentient being, nor to know the faculties of even as many sentient beings as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to penetrate the ocean of faculties of one sentient being, nor to penetrate the oceans of faculties of even as many sentient beings as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to enter into the succession of ages in one world, nor to enter into the succession of ages in even as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to comprehend the continuity of actions and habits of the sentient beings in one world, nor to comprehend the continuity of actions and habits of the sentient beings even in as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to comprehend the ocean of afflictions of sentient beings in one world, nor to comprehend the oceans of afflictions of the sentient beings even in as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to comprehend the ocean of all actions of the beings in one world, nor even to comprehend the oceans of all actions of beings in as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. Enlightening beings do not aspire to enlightenment to comprehend the ocean of all modes of behavior of all beings in one world, nor even to comprehend the ocean of all modes of behavior of all beings in as many worlds as atoms in untold, inexpressible numbers of buddha-fields. 
Rather, enlightening beings aspire to enlightenment to lead all sentient beings without exception to full development—they wish to propitiate and honor and attend all buddhas, to propitiate and honor and attend the successions of buddhas in all worlds; they are determined to purify all buddha-lands; they strive to hold the teachings of all buddhas; they are zealously devoted to following the variety of vows which are the points of departure of all buddhas; they are determined to enter into the arrays of all buddha-lands; they wish to enter the oceans of assemblies of all buddhas; they seek to go deeply into the ocean of mind of all sentient beings; they wish to know the spheres of faculties of all sentient beings; they aspire to penetrate the ocean of faculties of all sentient beings; they wish to enter into the succession of ages in all worlds; they are inspired with courage to cut off the continuity of afflictions and habit energies of all sentient beings; their sun of knowledge rises to evaporate the ocean of afflictions caused by actions of all sentient beings; their light of wisdom becomes manifest to know the ways of behavior of all sentient beings; their cloud of great compassion gathers to extinguish the mass of fire of suffering of all sentient beings. 
“To put it briefly, there are ten hundred thousand incalculable numbers of such aspects of the conduct of the practice of enlightening beings, which are to be accomplished by an enlightening being. 
Furthermore, the practice of enlightening beings enters into all things, for the attainment of knowledge; the practice of enlightening beings enters into all lands, to thoroughly purify them. 
Because of this vow of mine, when the purification of the realm of desire is finished, my commitments will be finished; when the purification of the world is finished, my commitments will be finished; when all sentient beings’ propensities to continue afflictive habits are ended, my commitments will be ended.” Sudhana said, “What is the name of this liberation?” Asha said, “This liberation is called ‘characterized by sorrowless well-being.’ I know this enlightening liberation, but how can I know the practice, tell of the virtues, convey the inconceivable enlightening skills, or show the infinite varieties of enlightening vows of the enlightening beings who have oceanic minds because of seeking all the buddha-teachings, who are like the polar mountain because of steadfast will, who are like the medicine ‘good to see’ because they free all sentient beings from the sicknesses of afflictions, who are like the sun because they eliminate the darkness of ignorance of all sentient beings, whose minds are like the earth because they are a refuge for all sentient beings, who are like air because they benefit all sentient beings, who are lamps producing the light of knowledge for all sentient beings, who are like clouds raining truth with a quiet sound, who are like the moon because they radiate a web of light beams of virtue, who are like gods because they protect all sentient beings? 
“Go south—there is a district in Samudravetalya called Nalayur where a seer named Bhishmottaranirghosha lives. 
Go ask him, and he will instruct you in the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana left Asha, after paying his respects, reflecting on the extreme rarity of enlightening beings, on how hard it is to get on good terms with spiritual benefactors, on how very difficult it is to get to meet people of truth, on how hard it is to attain the faculties of enlightening beings, how hard it is to attain the purity of intent of enlightening beings, how hard it is to find colleagues, how hard it is to focus the mind accurately on enlightenment, how hard it is to apply the teachings leading to the state of freedom from distress, how hard it is to find ways to develop invincible goodness of mind, and how hard it is to get to see ways to quickly develop omniscience. 
Bhishmottaranirghosha Then Sudhana, his mind on the instruction of the enlightening being, his mind on the purification of the conduct of enlightening beings, his mind developing the power of virtue of enlightening beings, his mind lit by the energy of the vision of Buddha, with mental energy arising from receiving a treasury of teaching, his mental energy increased by the undertaking of great vows, all things apparent to his mind, his mind aware of the intrinsic essence of things, his mind free from all obstructions, his mind viewing the reality realm without obscurity, his pure will indestructible, his mind invulnerable and immune to the power of all demons, gradually made his way to Nalayur and sought out the seer Bhishmottaranirghosha. 
At that time Bhishmottaranirghosha was sojourning in a retreat, a pleasant place with countless diverse trees and plants, shaded by the leaves of various trees, with flowering trees perpetually blooming in various colors and fruit trees perpetually bearing, the ground made of the finest jewel-fruits from various jewel trees, well distributed with great sandalwood trees, graced with fragrance constantly coming from pleasant aloes wood trees, adorned with trumpet-flower trees distributed in the four directions, with beautifully formed fig trees, with perpetually ripe fruits raining from rose apple trees, beautified by fresh water lilies and lotus blossoms. 
Sudhana saw the seer Bhishmottaranirghosha wearing matted hair, sitting on a seat of bark, rags, fragrant grass, and antelope skin on a layer of straw in a hut built at the foot of a sandalwood tree, surrounded by ten thousand seers. 
Seeing Bhishmottaranirghosha, Sudhana went up to him, and thinking he had found a true spiritual benefactor, looking upon spiritual benefactors as the door to omniscience because they guide one on the true path, looking upon omniscience as coming from the teaching of spiritual benefactors because they lead to the stage of all-knowledge, looking upon omniscience as coming from the guidance of spiritual benefactors because they lead to the jewel land of the knowledge of the ten powers, looking upon omniscience as illumined by the torch of spiritual benefactors because they produce the light of knowledge of the ten powers, looking upon spiritual benefactors as the path to omniscience leading unbroken to the city of omniscience, looking upon spiritual benefactors as lamps on the way to omniscience because they show the level and the uneven, looking upon spiritual benefactors as a bridge to omniscience because the peril of falling is eliminated, looking upon spiritual benefactors as parasols of omniscience because they produce coolness by the power of great love, looking upon spiritual benefactors as streams of omniscience because they give rise to great compassion, looking upon the satisfaction of the vision of omniscience as coming from spiritual benefactors because they illumine the principle of the inherent nature of phenomena, Sudhana paid his respects to the seer and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I have heard you give enlightening beings instruction; please tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” The seer Bhishmottaranirghosha looked at the ten thousand people surrounding him and said, “This youth has set his mind on supreme perfect enlightenment and has invited all sentient beings to fearlessness. 
He is aiming for the welfare and happiness of all beings; he is facing the ocean of knowledge; he wants to spread the clouds of teaching of all buddhas; he wants to plunge into the ocean of all principles of the Teaching; he wants to live by the light of knowledge; he wants to bring the cloud of great compassion near; he wants to cause the rain of the great Teaching to shower; he wants to have the moon of great knowledge rise in the world and extinguish the burning of all afflictions; he wants to develop the roots of goodness of all sentient beings.” Then those ten thousand people scattered beautiful fragrant flowers over Sudhana, bowed to him, and circled him in respect, and said, “This person will be a savior; he will extinguish all the hellish torments of all beings, he will stop all brutish ways, he will get rid of the ways of the underworld, he will shut the door of all conditions inopportune for enlightenment, he will evaporate the ocean of craving, he will sever the bonds of craving, he will remove the mass of suffering, he will dispel the darkness of ignorance, he will surround the world with mountains of virtue, he will reveal the mine of jewels of knowledge, he will cause the sun of knowledge to rise, he will clarify the eye of truth, he will show what is good and bad in the world.” Then the seer Bhishmottaranirghosha said to those people, “Whoever aspires to supreme perfect enlightenment promotes the happiness of all sentient beings, carrying out the practice of enlightening beings, and will eventually attain omniscience. 
This youth has set his heart on supreme perfect enlightenment; he will fulfill the stage of complete buddhahood.” Then the seer said to Sudhana, “I have attained an enlightening liberation called ‘unsurpassed banner.’” Sudhana said, “What is the scope of this liberation?” Bhishmottaranirghosha stretched forth his right hand and rubbed Sudhana’s head, then took Sudhana by the right hand. 
At that moment Sudhana saw in the ten directions as many buddha-lands as atoms in ten hundred thousand buddha-lands, and in them he perceived himself at the feet of as many buddhas as atoms in ten hundred thousand buddha-lands. 
He also saw the innumerable features in the pure adornments of those buddha-lands, and he saw the various arrays of the oceans of audiences surrounding the buddhas therein. He also saw the radiant mass of the marks and embellishments of the buddhas’ bodies in the midst of the congregations. He also heard teaching from the buddhas without missing a single word, and he remembered the cycles of teachings of those buddhas in order without confusion, and he received the rain of those clouds of teaching as they showered on beings of various mentalities. He also entered the oceans of past vows of those buddhas, purified by zealous application of various kinds. 
He also saw the forms of buddhas manifested so as to please all sentient beings according to their mentalities. He also saw the nets of light rays of the buddhas, their various cool, pure halos. 
He also entered into those buddhas’ powers by following the light of unobstructed knowledge. 
He seemed to be with one buddha for a day and a night, with another for seven days and nights, another for a fortnight, another for a month, another for a year, another for a century, another for a millennium, another for a hundred millennia, another for a million years, another for a hundred million years, another for a billion years, another for a hundred billion years, another for a trillion years, another for half an eon, another for an eon, another for a hundred eons, another for a thousand eons, another for a hundred thousand eons, another for a million eons, another for a hundred million eons, another for a billion eons, another for a hundred billion eons, another for a trillion eons, up to untold, inexpressible numbers of eons, or as many eons as atoms in the continent, or as many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
Thus did he perceive himself with the buddhas, illumined by the light of knowledge of the liberation “unsurpassed banner,” imbued with the light of the concentration filled with sunlike radiance, reaching absorption in liberation of endless knowledge, imbued with the light of the mystic formulation of the structure of the universe, his mind illumined by the mystic formulation of the indestructible sphere, abiding in absorption in the realm of well-ordered bodies of knowledge, intent on the state of transcendent wisdom of the path of adornment of all planes, illumined by the light of concentration on the sphere containing the space of the enlightened, his mind illuminated by concentration on the circumference of the wheel of teaching of all buddhas, imbued with the light of absorption in the inexhaustible sphere of jewels of knowledge of past, present, and future. 
Then the seer let go of Sudhana, who found himself once again standing before the seer Bhishmottaranirghosha. 
The seer said, “Do you remember?” Sudhana said, “I remember, noble one, by the empowerment of the spiritual benefactor.” Bhishmottaranirghosha said, “I know this enlightening liberation known as the unsurpassed invincible banner, but how can I know the practice, or tell the virtues, or accurately express the excellence of vows, or know the structure of the lands, or plunge into the sphere of knowledge, or enter into the realm of concentration, or attain the mystic powers, or attain to the freedom of liberation, or take up the various physical manifestations, or reveal the purity of voice, or show the light of knowledge of the enlightening beings who have attained absorption in the mystic knowledge supreme among all creatures, who are masters of all wheels of time, who are skilled in achievement of the knowledge of the characteristics of buddhas, who are supernal manifestations of the incarnation of the buddhas, who have comprehended the knowledge of all objects of past, present, and future as of one characteristic, whose bodies are distributed throughout all worlds, who are embodiments of knowledge in which all realms of reality are revealed, who appear to all sentient beings according to their inclinations, who benefit sentient beings according to their ways of thought and action, who glow with a brightness that illumines everywhere, who have purified the sphere of pure, vast, radiant knowledge? 
“Go south to a land called Ishana, where there lives a priest named Jayoshmayatana. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and apply the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana, pleased, uplifted, transported, overjoyed, happy, paid respects to the seer Bhishmottaranirghosha and departed, looking back at him again and again. 
Jayoshmayatana Then, illumined by the light of knowledge of the enlightening liberation “unsurpassed banner,” directly witnessing the inconceivable miracles of the realm of buddhas, endowed with mystic knowledge directly aware of the inconceivable liberation of enlightening beings, his mind illumined by the inconceivable knowledge of concentration of enlightening beings, imbued with the light of knowledge of concentration comprehending all times at once, illumined by the realm of concentration comprehending that all is in perception, having attained the light of the highest knowledge in all worlds, approaching the state whose scope reaches everywhere in past, present, and future, intent on the knowledge showing nondual equality in differentiation, with the light of knowledge extending to all objects, with skillfulness rich in zeal for the purification of tolerance in the face of people’s beliefs, having attained the light of certain knowledge of acceptance of things in terms of their inherent nature, his mind constantly involved in enlightening beings’ practice of mystic knowledge reaching everywhere, which is meditation on inherent nature, his mind progressing rapidly and irreversibly toward omniscience, illumined by the lightning of knowledge of the ten powers, his mind tirelessly seeking the sound of the reality realm, determined to enter the realm of omniscience, intent on accomplishing the infinite array of practices of enlightening beings and purifying the infinite sphere of great vows of enlightening beings, his mind directed toward endlessly ongoing knowledge of the infinite network of all worlds, his mind not shrinking from guiding infinite beings to complete development, beholding the infinite sphere of practice of enlightening beings, seeing the variety of conditions in infinite worlds, seeing the variety of differentiations of infinite worlds, seeing infinite worlds within microcosms and macrocosms, seeing the variety of the webs of perceptions and conceptions on which infinite worlds are based, seeing the variety of conventional terminology in infinite worlds, seeing the variety of interests of infinite beings, seeing the variety of differentiations of infinite beings, seeing the following of developmental teachings of infinite beings, seeing the variety in perceptions of place and time of infinite beings, Sudhana, his attention on spiritual benefactors, gradually made his way to the priest Jayoshmayatana in the land of Ishana. 
At that time the priest was practicing an ascetic exercise of enduring fierce heat, with his mind on omniscience; on four sides were huge bonfires like mountains ablaze. 
Rising above appeared a great mountain precipice, a razor-edge path. 
Sudhana went up, paid his respects to the priest, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction; please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” The priest said, “Climb this razor-edge-path mountain and jump from there into the fire—thus will your enlightening practice be purified.” At that point Sudhana thought, “It is hard to avoid the situations that are inopportune for enlightenment; it is hard to get to be human; it is hard to remove error and doubt about the right opportunity; it is hard to find a buddha in the world; it is hard to have all one’s faculties in order; it is hard to get to hear the truth; it is hard to meet people of truth; it is hard to find genuine spiritual benefactors; it is hard to get genuine guidance and instruction; it is hard to live right in the human world; it is hard to carry out truth in all respects. 
Might this not be a demon, or someone possessed by a demon, or a cohort of the devil, or an imitation spiritual teacher, or a false enlightening being, who has undertaken to impede my roots of goodness, who is out to destroy my life? 
Does he not want to prevent me from attaining buddhahood?” While he was involved in these thoughts, ten thousand Brahma gods appeared in the sky and said to him, “Do not get fixed on such thoughts. 
This sage has attained the light of the concentration of adamantine flame. He has unrelenting energy and has begun the great undertaking of salvation. 
He has set out to end the emotional attachments of all sentient beings. 
He is striving to dissolve the webs of all views. 
He is determined to burn up the deadwood of all afflictions and their actions. He is working to shed light in the wilderness of all kinds of knowledge that is not conducive to enlightenment. 
He is resolved upon eliminating all beings’ fears of old age and death. He is intent on dispersing the darkness of past, present, and future. He has undertaken to shine beams of light of all truths. 
As he mortifies himself with four fires under the blazing sun, even the Brahma gods, who think themselves creators and lords and supreme beings, and are engrossed in various views, do not take pleasure in their own states because of the light given off by this priest’s peerless practice of heat austerity. 
Not enjoying the pleasure of meditation, they come to the priest, and he overwhelms them by mystic power, and through fierce austerity teaches them to get rid of all their views and destroy all pride and arrogance. 
He also teaches them so that they may suffuse all worlds with great love and compassion, make their will for enlightenment firm, enlarge their determination for enlightenment, turn to the vision of all buddhas, fully receive the voice of the buddhas, and hear the voice of buddhas everywhere without resistance or obstruction.” Ten thousand demons also stood in the sky, showered celestial jewels, and said, “The light emitted from the flames used by this priest in his heat mortification obscures our abodes, our ornaments, and our paraphernalia. 
Terrified, we and our cohorts go to the priest, who teaches in such a way that, coming to ourselves and getting back our right minds, we aspire to enlightenment and become irreversible on the way to supreme perfect enlightenment.” Also, ten thousand controlling gods, scattering celestial flowers, said, “While he is mortifying himself with four fires under the fiery sun, we find no pleasure in our own abodes. 
We and our cohorts go to him, and he teaches us so that we attain control of our own minds, control of afflictions, ability to be born in any state we wish, power to clear away obstructions caused by action, mastery of all concentrations, control of paraphernalia to purify our arrangements, and control conforming to our wishes.” Ten thousand gods of pleasant emanations also stood in the sky, presented sweet sounds of celestial music and song, and said, “The fire of the priest is producing such light that our palaces are glowing, being purified and becoming more radiant, and so are the decorations and nymphs here. 
We and our cohorts of godlings and nymphs no longer find pleasure in desires, and we do not enjoy sensual pleasures. 
Our minds and bodies cooled, we go to the priest, who teaches us so that our minds will be purified, so that our minds will be radiant, so our minds will be good, so our minds will be malleable, so we will become joyful, so we may purify the realization of the knowledge of the ten powers, so we may grow in enthusiasm for the great Teaching, so we may purify our bodies and produce measureless buddha-bodies, so we may purify our voices and attain the voice of Buddha, so we may purify our minds and attain omniscience.” Ten thousand gods of the heaven of satisfaction, along with their companies of celestial boys and girls, also stood in the sky, showered all kinds of fragrant powders, paying honor and respect, and said, “While he mortifies himself with fire there is no pleasure in our abodes. 
Being freed from attachment, we go to the priest and he teaches us so that we will be indifferent to all objects of sense, so that we will be perfectly and completely satisfied in mind, so that we will produce roots of goodness, so that we will aspire to enlightenment, and so that we will eventually fulfill all qualities of buddhas.” Ten thousand gods of the heaven of timely portion, along with their celestial sons and daughters, showered a rain of flowers and said, “While this priest is mortifying himself with fire, we have no pleasure in our celestial song. 
Freed from attachment, we go to the priest and he teaches us so that we will become detached from all sensuality and eventually attain all qualities of buddhahood.” Ten hundred thousand celestial beings of the thirty-three-fold heavens, each with thirty-two siblings, along with their celestial sons and daughters, showered rain from clouds of celestial cloths, jewels, ornaments, and flowers, then said, “While this priest is mortifying himself with fire, we have no pleasure in our palaces, parks, and groves, or in such enjoyments as music, dance, and song. 
Freed from attachment, we go to the priest, and he teaches us to remove all sensuality. 
He tells us this is all impermanent, unstable, bound to perish. He teaches us to thoroughly cut off all arrogance and heedlessness, to increase our desire for supreme enlightenment. 
Furthermore, at the sight of this priest, these peaks of the polar mountain quake. 
Terrified, we commit ourselves to reach omniscience, that we may be firm in our aspiration for omniscience.” Also, ten thousand rain spirits in the sky showered rain from clouds of celestial sandalwood, along with the sweet sounds of the songs of nymphs, producing clouds of celestial fragrance, and said, “The light emitted from this priest’s fires, illumining the abodes of all the water spirits, removes fears of the hot rain of sand. 
It also extinguishes anger, and the water spirits become cool and clear in mind. Then, once our minds are clear, the priest teaches us to reject our low state as dragons and to stop all obstructive actions. 
Having taught us to overcome evil, he inspires us to supreme perfect enlightenment and leads us to omniscience.” Also, ten thousand spirit chiefs, standing in the sky, honored the priest Jayoshmayatana and the youth Sudhana with various offerings, then said, “Son, as this priest mortifies himself with fire, goodwill toward human beings is born in our minds, and all spirits, goblins, and demons also become benevolent. 
Benevolent, now harmless, they come to us; overcome by the dominant power of goodwill, we find no pleasure in our various estates. 
We all go with our respective companions to the priest; he radiates light from his body, which shines on us and fills our bodies with bliss. 
Our bodies and minds blissful, he teaches us in such a way that many spirits, goblins, demons, and ghosts are inspired to seek enlightenment.” Ten thousand chief celestial musicians also stood in the sky and said, “While we are in our abodes too, our abodes are illumined by the light of the priest’s fires; touched by that light, we are filled with inconceivable bliss and we go to the priest, who then teaches us in such a way that we become irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment.” Ten thousand titan kings rose from the ocean, knelt on their right knees, joined their palms in salutation, and said, “As this priest mortifies himself by fire, all our titan worlds, including the oceans, mountains, and land spheres, quake: 
we are all thereby divested of arrogance, heedlessness, and conceit; overwhelmed by the heat of his religious practice, we go to him, and he teaches us so that we may do away with all deceitfulness and guile, enter into acceptance of the profound truth, abide in the state of imperturbability, and perfect the knowledge of the ten powers.” Also ten thousand bird kings, assuming splendid human forms, said, “Son, the light from the flames of the priest’s fires, shining on our abodes, causes them to quake. 
Frightened and agitated, we go to him, and by teaching us he exhorts us to great benevolence and compassion, he urges us to plunge into the ocean of mundane life to serve sentient beings sunk in the mud of desire, he urges us to purify our will for enlightenment, he exhorts us to keenness of wisdom and skill in means, and gets us to work at guiding sentient beings according to their maturity.” Ten thousand centaur kings also stood in the sky and said, “As this priest mortifies himself by fire, the voice of Buddha comes forth from the rows of palms, the trees hung with nets of bells, strings of jewels, garlands, and musical instruments, and the houses and furniture with all kinds of musical instruments and jewelry in our abodes as they are blown by the wind; the voice of the Teaching, the voice of the host of nonregressing enlightening beings, and the voice of the vows on which enlightening beings act also emerge, saying that in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so is vowing to attain enlightenment, in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so is giving up that which is difficult to give up, in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so is purifying the sphere of universally aware knowledge, in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so is going to the summit of enlightenment, in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so has conquered the demon hordes and is becoming supremely and perfectly enlightened, in such-and-such a world the buddha so-and-so is turning the wheel of the teaching, in such-and-such a world the buddha so-and-so has finished all the tasks of buddhas and is passing away into absolute nirvana. 
There may be an end to the particles of every tree and plant, limb and leaf, on this continent, but there is no end to those names of the buddhas and the vows of enlightening beings, the lofty points of departure of the conduct of enlightening beings, which are heard to sound from the rows of palms and all the musical instruments, jewelry, houses, and furniture in our abodes as they are blown by the wind, producing the voices of Buddha, the Teaching, and enlightenment. 
Ecstatically joyful at the sound of the names of the buddhas and the community of enlightening beings and the vows and practices they proceed upon, we go to the priest, and he teaches us so that we and the many beings around us become irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment.” Innumerable gods of the realm of desire with magnificent appearances also stood in the sky, presented mental offerings, and said, “As this priest mortifies himself with heat, his bonfires give off such light that it illumines all the hells all the way to the uninterrupted hell, and the pains of all the creatures in hell cease. 
He also is visible to us by the same light. 
We above him, our minds clarified, have been born in the heavens of the realm of desire we wished for. 
Grateful to him, never tired of seeing him, we give up all sensuality and go to him, and he teaches us in such a way that innumerable sentient beings resolve to realize enlightenment.” Then Sudhana, pleased, enraptured, transported, overjoyed, happy, having heard this teaching, considered the priest Jayoshmayatana to be a true spiritual benefactor, and prostrated himself at the priest’s feet and said, “I confess my error, noble one, in not recognizing you as a spiritual benefactor.” Thereupon the priest spoke a verse to Sudhana: 
An enlightening being who follows instructions Has no doubts, his mind at one with the teachers. 
All benefits will be his, and they will be auspicious; Sure of buddha-knowledge too, he awakens at the foot of the enlightenment tree. 
Then Sudhana climbed the path up the cliff of the mountain, a mass of razor edges, and threw himself into the fire. 
As he was falling he attained an enlightening concentration called “well established.” On contact with the fire he attained an enlightening concentration called “mystic knowledge of the bliss of tranquillity.” He said, “How wonderful is the pleasant feeling of this fire and this razor-edge mountain.” The priest said, “I have attained the enlightening liberation in which one is not overcome. 
I know this liberation, but how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings whose resolve is like rays of fiery energy, determined to end all beings’ afflictions and views, who are eminent leaders who never turn back, whose hearts are never exhausted or overcome, whose minds are never depressed, whose spirits never cringe or cower, whose resolve is adamant, who are never dejected in carrying out their great undertakings, who never slacken in their efforts, who are like whirlwinds, who work for the benefit of all beings, whose vigor never recedes? 
“Go south, to a city called Simhavijurmbhita, where there lives a girl named Maitrayani, daughter of the rajah Simhaketu; go ask her how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects and left the priest Jayoshmayatana. 
Maitrayani Then, with inconceivable respect for spiritual benefactors, the great zeal purified, ready for the Great Vehicle, seeking enlightened knowledge, absorbed in the way to enlightenment, seeking association with spiritual friends, dwelling in the sphere of the Teaching, approaching unhindered knowledge, certain of the supreme truth, intent on ultimate knowledge, realizing that past, present, and future are ultimately one instant, aware of ultimate nonduality like space, sure of the ultimacy of nonduality, dwelling in the ultimate nondifferentiation of the reality realm, devoted to discipline whose goal is freedom from obstruction, intent on ultimate harmony in action, dwelling on the ultimate nondifference of those who realize Thusness, intent on the knowledge to tear apart the net of conceptions of all sentient beings, free from attachment to any land, his mind not attached to the congregations of the buddhas or to the purities of the buddha-lands, perceiving all sentient beings as void of self or inherent identity, realizing that all sounds are like echoes and eminently aware that all forms are like reflections, Sudhana gradually made his way to the city Simhavijurmbhita, looking for the girl Maitrayani. 
He was told, “The girl Maitrayani, daughter of the rajah Simhaketu, with a retinue of five hundred girls, is up on the roof of a palace of radiant jewels, sitting on a seat set on sandalwood legs and draped with nets of strings of jewels and arrayed with celestial cloth, expounding spiritual teaching.” Hearing this, Sudhana entered the city, went to the house of the rajah, and stood at the outer foyer, desirous of seeing the girl Maitrayani. 
There he saw hundreds of thousands of people going in. 
He asked them where they were going and why they had come, and they told him they were going to Maitrayani to hear the Teaching. 
He thought to himself, “No one is prevented from going in.” So he went in. 
Having gone in, he saw the palace of radiant jewels set on a crystal base, with pillars of lapis lazuli and walls of diamond, ornamented with a hundred thousand projections of gold, furnished with countless jewel mirrors, arrayed with world-illumining jewels, spread with countless jewel nets, graced with inconceivable arrays of beautiful sounds from a hundred thousand golden bells shaken by the breeze. 
He also saw the girl Maitrayani, with dark eyes, black hair, and golden skin. 
Sudhana paid his respects to her and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” She said, “Look at the adornments of my palace.” Looking all around, in each wall, each pillar, each mirror, each figure, each formation, each jewel, each golden bell, each jewel tree, each girl’s body, each jewel necklace, he saw reflected images of the buddhas in the cosmos, with their first inspirations, spheres of practice and vows, manifestations of emergence in the world, mystical transformation on attainment of enlightenment, turnings of the wheel of teaching, and displays of ultimate extinction. 
This he saw in each and every object. 
Just as the sun, moon, and stars in the sky are seen reflected in a clear, limpid pool of water, so did all the buddhas of the cosmos appear reflected in each object of the luminous jewel palace, this as a result of the girl Maitrayani’s past roots of goodness. 
Having viewed this, holding in mind the features of this supernal array of visions of Buddhas, Sudhana joined his hands in a gesture of respect and turned his attention to Maitrayani’s words. 
I sought this from buddhas as numerous as grains of sand in thirty-six Ganges Rivers, and those buddhas introduced me to the means of access to perfect wisdom by way of the arrangement of the totality through various ways of entry into it, each different.” Sudhana said, “What is the sphere of this means of access to perfect wisdom by way of the arrangement of the totality?” She said, “Focusing my attention on this means of access to perfect wisdom by way of the arrangement of the totality, meditating on it, following it, pondering it, contemplating it, making it familiar, keeping it in mind, putting it in order, putting it into effect, perfecting it, thoroughly examining it, I developed a mental control called ‘facing in all directions,’ in the sphere of which mental control incalculable tens of hundreds of thousands of media of the Teaching operate, assemble, become visible, become accessible, and develop—for example, the medium of buddha-lands, the medium of buddhas, the medium of doctrines, the medium of all beings, the medium of the past, the medium of the future, the medium of the present, the medium of the limit of duration, the medium of virtue, the medium of provisions of virtue, the medium of knowledge, the medium of provisions of knowledge, the medium of vows, the medium of differentiation of vows, the medium of practices, the medium of purification of practices, the medium of accumulation of practices, the medium of fulfillment of practices, the medium of actions, the medium of harmony of actions, the medium of streams of actions, the medium of performance of actions, the medium of fields of actions, the medium of rejection of evil actions, the medium of undertaking of proper actions, the medium of control of actions, the medium of morality, the medium of guidance to right ethics, the medium of concentration, the medium of practice pursuant to concentration, the medium of contemplation in concentration, the medium of spheres of concentration, the medium of emerging from concentration, the medium of mystic knowledge, the medium of the ocean of mind, the medium of ways of thought, the medium of clearing away entanglements of mind, the medium of illumining the obscure recesses of the mind, the medium of calming and clearing the pool of the mind, the medium of capacities of the mind, the medium of the actions of the mind, the medium of the occurrence of sentient beings’ afflictions, the medium of defiling habit energies, the medium of the acting out of afflictions, the medium of interests, the medium of the conduct of sentient beings, the medium of the variety of conduct of sentient beings, the medium of the productions of the world, the medium of the inclinations of sentient beings, the medium of what is in the conceptions of sentient beings, the medium of places, the medium of the realms of phenomena, the medium of great compassion, the medium of great kindness, the medium of tranquillity, the medium of speech, the medium of reason, the medium of attainments, the medium of distinctions, the medium of unity, the medium of ultimate nonattachment, the medium of totality, the medium of the principles of buddhas, the medium of the principles of enlightening beings, the medium of the principles of disciples, the medium of the principles of individual illuminates, the medium of worldly principles, the medium of principles of formation of worlds, the medium of principles of disintegration of worlds, the medium of principles of the existence of worlds, the medium of purification of worlds, the medium of defilement of worlds, the medium of worlds with purity amid defilement, the medium of worlds with defilement amid purity, the medium of wholly defiled worlds, the medium of wholly pure worlds, the medium of levelness of worlds, the medium of inverted worlds, the medium of upside-down worlds, the medium of entry into the network of the cosmos in which everything is interrelated, the medium of revolving of worlds, the medium of being based on thoughts, the medium of the microcosmic found in the macrocosmic, the medium of the macrocosmic in the microcosmic, the medium of vision of buddhas, the medium of variety of embodiments of buddhas, the medium of variety of auras of buddhas, the medium of differences in the voices of buddhas, the medium of the production of the wheels of teaching of buddhas, the medium of the continuity of the wheels of teaching of buddhas, the medium of expressions of the wheels of teaching of buddhas, the medium of the turning of the wheels of teaching of buddhas, the medium of embodiments of buddhas, the medium of the audiences of buddhas, the medium of the differences in audiences of buddhas, the medium of entry into the oceans of audiences of buddhas, the medium of illumination of the powers of buddhas, the medium of concentrations of buddhas, the medium of mystic emanations from the concentrations of buddhas, the medium of the states of buddhas, the medium of the magic powers of buddhas, the medium of the projected forms of buddhas, the medium of buddhas’ knowledge of what is on the minds of others, the medium of spiritual transformations of buddhas, the medium of abiding in the state of satisfaction, the medium of the works of buddhas up to the manifestation of ultimate extinction, the medium of works for the benefit of infinite beings, the medium of the profound doctrine of emptiness, the medium of various doctrines, the medium of forms of the practices of enlightening beings, the medium of the forms of the production of the aspiration for enlightenment, the medium of the forms of provisions of the aspiration for enlightenment, the medium of the forms of vows, the medium of the forms of practices, the medium of the forms of mystic knowledge, the medium of the forms of emancipation, the medium of the forms of purification of mental control, the medium of the forms of purification of the sphere of knowledge, the medium of the forms of purification of wisdom, the medium of the infinite forms of enlightenment, the medium of forms of purification of mindfulness. 
“I know this means of access to perfect wisdom which is the array of total mindfulness; how can I know the practice orteil the virtues of the enlightening beings whose minds are like space, whose intellects are broad as the cosmos, whose mental flow is based on accumulated virtue, who have attained transmundane understanding, who do not practice worldly ways, who have attained the eye of the light of knowledge without obscurity, who clearly discern all realms of reality, whose awareness is infinite as space, whose eyes are mindful of all objects, who are filled with the light of the state of nonobstruction, who are skilled in analyzing all doctrines, meanings, and statements, who are not overcome by any world, who conduct themselves well according to worldly standards and are irreproachable in any worldly state, who are intent on the well-being of all worlds, who are a refuge for all beings, who know the manners and courtesies of speech of all worlds, who can give the appearances of dress and habitation of all worlds as they wish, and who are masters of all wheels of time? 
“Go south, to the land called Trinayana, where a monk named Sudarshana lives. Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to Maitrayani and left. 
Sudarshana Then, contemplating the profound discernment of enlightening beings’ knowledge, the profound attainment of the base of the reality realm, the profound knowledge of all subtleties, the profundity of the conceptuality of the world, the profundity of the base of nondoing, the profundity of the base of the mental stream, the profundity of the base of interdependent origination, the profundity of the plane of truth in terms of inherent nature, the profundity of the plane of truth in terms of the conventions of sentient beings, the profundity of the ground of adornment of the cosmos, the profundity of the plane of observation of the operation of the body, and the profundity of the ground of the world of action and thought, Sudhana made his way to the land of Trinayana. 
Looking for the monk Sudarshana in towns and cities, marketplaces and villages, in herding stations, in hermitages, in the provinces, in mountains, caves, and forests, he saw Sudarshana walking around in a certain woods, young and handsome, with the physical marks and embellishments of a great man, his gaze steady, mindful, of vast intelligence, intent on the sphere of insuperable knowledge, his mind free from all vacillation, vain imagination, idle fancies, and false ideas, abiding in pure knowledge, aware of the vast range of enlightened knowledge, firmly resolved to guide all beings to full development, with a vast sphere of great compassion, aiming to bear the eye of the teachings of all buddhas, aiming to produce the light of knowledge in all sentient beings, ever-mindful of the way of the enlightened, treading it for the sake of all sentient beings, walking quietly and steadily, neither quickly nor slowly, dressed like the deities of the pure abodes, surrounded by all kinds of beings. 
Furthermore, in front of Sudarshana as he walked were deities of direction who caused the world to turn; footstep-following deities received his steps on jewel lotuses; fire deities with inexhaustible spheres of light dispelled the darkness; forest deities showered rain of flowering plants; earth deities, the source of stability, revealed jewel mines; sky deities, their splendor illumining everywhere, adorned the sky; glorious ocean deities scattered great jewels over him; polar mountain deities, full of purity, folded their hands in respectful salutation; wind deities of unobstructed power gave off a fragrant flowery breeze; springlike night deities prostrated their beautifully adorned bodies in respect; ever-awakening daylight deities hovered in the sky holding banners of radiant jewels to produce light. 
Sudhana went up to the monk Sudarshana, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment and seek the practice of enlightening beings. I have heard you give enlightening beings instruction, and I ask you to tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Sudarshana said, “I am young, and have only recently become a monk. 
At that, in one life I have performed religious practice in the company of as many buddhas as grains of sand in thirty-eight Ganges Rivers. With some I performed spiritual practice for a day and a night, with some for a week, with some for a fortnight, with some for a month, with some for a year, with some for a century, with some for a millennium, with some for a hundred millennia, with some for a million years, with some for a trillion years, with some for untold, inexpressible numbers of years, with some for an intermediate eon, with some for half an eon, with some for an eon, with some for as long as untold, inexpressible numbers of eons, and from all those buddhas I heard explanation of the Teaching and received instruction. 
My vows were purified, my sphere of practice entering into the realm of realization was purified, the oceans of transcendent ways were fulfilled, I perceived their mystical transformations on attainment of enlightenment, I remembered their successive cycles of teaching without confusion, I realized the equality of their powers, and I preserved their instructions till the end of the right doctrine. 
“I also realized all those buddhas’ past vows for the purification of their buddha-lands, by the power of accomplishment of concentration on the sphere of vows. 
I also realized all those buddhas past enlightening practices for the purification of their own practice, by the power of attainment of concentration entering into all practices. 
I realized all those buddhas’ purification of the transcendent ways, by the power of setting out on universally good practice. 
“Furthermore, as I walk here, all realms flow toward me because of keenly observant knowledge being brought to the fore: 
all worlds flow away from me for the purification of passing over untold worlds in a single thought, by the power of accomplishment of great vows. 
In a single thought untold practical principles for sentient beings appear to me, for the fulfillment of the knowledge of the ten powers, by the power of carrying out the vows of practice of universally good enlightening beings. 
In a single thought the purities of visions of untold buddha-lands appear to me, so I may honor, attend, and serve as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands, by the power of carrying out the vow to serve former and future buddhas. 
In a single thought the teachings of untold buddhas occur to my mind, by the power of carrying out the vow to remember wheels of teaching accompanied by countless ways of proceeding with the teachings in action. 
In a single thought, untold oceans of enlightening practices appear to me, for the purification of all spheres of practice, by the power of carrying out the vow to fulfill the practices of enlightening beings, which are all interrelated. 
In a single thought, untold oceans of concentrations become manifest to me, for the purification of all spheres of concentration, by the power of carrying out the vow to comprehend all ways of concentration in one way of concentration. 
In a single thought untold oceans of faculties appear to me, for adaptation to all faculties and times, by the power of carrying out the vow to attain the faculty of ultimate mindfulness. 
In a single thought, untold wheels of time are manifest to me, for conveying timely teachings, by the power of carrying out the endless vow to continue till the end of sentient beings. 
In a single thought, untold oceans of all pasts, presents, and futures appear to me, for the definition of past, present, and future in all worlds, by the power of carrying out the vow for illumination of comprehensive knowledge. 
“So I know the enlightening liberation ‘the lamp of knowledge which is never extinguished.’ How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings with adamantine will, who are born in the families of all buddhas, who have undying life-roots, whose light of knowledge is never extinguished, who have indestructible bodies, whose magical forms are without end, who embody the principle of relativity, who appear to sentient beings according to their mentalities, whose bodies appear like those of all beings in color, form, and size, whose bodies are not harmed by fire, poisons, or weapons, whose beings are invulnerable as adamantine mountains, who vitiate the power of all demons and opponents, who shine like mountains of gold, whose bodies stand out among all beings, whose bodies are perceived by all beings, who are heard of everywhere, who are looked up to by all sentient beings, who are mines of the earth of all truths, who illumine all quarters, who are seen without opposition because they have destroyed the mountains of obstructions, who are seen as supreme heroes because they extirpate all roots of evil, who are a welcome sight because they are products of many virtues, who are like udumbara flowers because they very rarely appear? 
“South of here, in the land of Shramanamandala, is a city called Sumukha, where a boy named Indriyeshvara lives. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then, intent on purifying attainment of the valor of enlightening beings, his mind illumined by the light of the power of enlightening beings, with the invincible energy of enlightening beings in his heart, his mind girded with the armor of the steadfast vows of enlightening beings, the breadth of the firm basis of intent of enlightening beings on his mind, determined to maintain the multitude of practices of enlightening beings, never tiring of the ways of enlightening beings, resolved to attain all qualities of enlightening beings, desiring to offer himself as a charioteer for all beings, desiring to bring all beings across the wasteland of the mundane whirl, never tiring of seeing, listening to, and attending spiritual benefactors, with immeasurable respect for the Teaching, Sudhana paid his respects to the monk Sudarshana and left. 
Indriyeshvara Thinking about the instruction of Sudarshana, applying it, passing it on, investigating it, talking about it, revealing it, contemplating it, approaching it, following it, reflecting on the principle of his teaching, entering into it, bringing it near, analyzing it, explaining it, elucidating it, pondering it, Sudhana, surrounded by celestial beings, spirits, and cherubim, made his way to the city of Sumukha in the land of Shramanamandala, looking for the boy Indriyeshvara. 
Then, when Sudhana got to the city Sumukha, near a river junction, he saw Indriyeshvara, surrounded by ten thousand boys, playing in the sand. 
He went up to Indriyeshvara, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Indriyeshvara said, “I have been taught writing and mathematics by Manjushri, and have been led into the door of knowledge encompassing higher knowledge of all practical arts. 
So I know all the various arts and crafts and sciences in the world dealing with writing, mathematics and symbols, physiology, rhetoric, physical and mental health, city planning, architecture and construction, mechanics and engineering, divination, agriculture and commerce, conduct and manners, good and bad actions, good and bad principles, what makes for felicity and what for misery, what is necessary for the vehicles of buddhas, disciples, and individual illuminates, what is necessary for buddhahood, and behavior linking reason and action. 
I know all these sciences, and I also introduce and teach them to people, and get people to study and practice them, to master and develop them, using these as means to purify, refine, and broaden people. “I myself know enlightening beings’ method of reckoning, which goes like this: a hundred hundred thousand is a koti; a koti squared is an ayuta; an ayuta squared is a niyuta; a niyuta squared is a bimbara; a bimbara squared is a kinkara; a kinkara squared is an agara; an agara squared is a pravara; a pravara squared is a mapara; a mapara squared is a tapara; a tapara squared is a sima; a sima squared is a yama; a yama squared is a nema; a nema squared is an avaga; an avaga squared is a mrgava; a mrgava squared is a viraga; a viraga squared is a vigava; a vigava squared is a samkrama; a samkrama squared is a visara; a visara squared is a vibhaja; a vibhaja squared is a vijangha; a vijangha squared is a vishoda; a vishoda squared is a vivaha; a vivaha squared is a vibhakta; a vibhakta squared is a vikhata; a vikhata squared is an ilana; an ilana squared is an avana; an avana squared is a thavana; a thavana squared is a viparya; a viparya squared is a samaya; a samaya squared is a viturna; a viturna squared is a hetura; a hetura squared is a vicara; a vicara squared is a vyavasta; a vyavasta squared is an abhyudgata; an abhyudgata squared is a vishishta; a vishishta squared is a nilamba; a nilamba squared is a harita; a harita squared is a vikshoba; a vikshoba squared is a halita; a halita squared is a hari; a hari squared is an aloka; an aloka squared is a drshvanta; a drshvanta squared is a hetuna; a hetuna squared is an ela; an ela squared is a dumela; a dumela squared is a kshemu; a kshemu squared is an eluda; an eluda squared is a bhaluda; a bhaluda squared is a samata; a samata squared is a visada; a visada squared is a pramatra; a pramatra squared is an amantra; an amantra squared is a bhramantra; a bhramantra squared is a gamantra; a gamantra squared is a namantra; a namantra squared is a nahimantra; a nahimantra squared is a vimantra; a vimantra squared is a paramantra; a paramantra squared is a shivamantra; a shivamantra squared is a delu; a delu squared is a velu; a velu squared is a gelu; a gelu squared is a khelu; a khelu squared is a nelu; a nelu squared is a bhelu; a bhelu squared is a kelu; a kelu squared is a selu; a selu squared is a pelu; a pelu squared is a melu; a melu squared is a sarada; a sarada squared is a bherudu; a bherudu squared is a kheludu; a kheludu squared is a maludu; a maludu squared is a samalu; a samalu squared is an athava; an athava squared is a kamala; a kamala squared is an agava; an agava squared is an ataru; an ataru squared is a helura; a helura squared is a mirahu; a mirahu squared is a carana; a carana squared is a dhana; a dhana squared is a pramada; a pramada squared is a nigama; a nigama squared is an upavarta; an upavarta squared is a nirdesha; a nirdesha squared is an akshaya; an akshaya squared is a sambhuta; a sambhuta squared is a mamama; a mamama squared is an avada; an avada squared is an utpala; an utpala squared is a padma; a padma squared is a sankhya; a sankhya squared is a gati; a gati squared is an upama; an upama squared is an aupamya; an aupamya squared is incalculable; an incalculable to the fourth power is measureless; a measureless to the fourth power is boundless; a boundless to the fourth power is incomparable; an incomparable to the fourth power is uncountable; an uncountable to the fourth power is unequaled; an unequaled to the fourth power is inconceivable; an inconceivable to the fourth power is immeasurable; an immeasureable to the fourth power is unspeakable; an unspeakable to the fourth power is unspeakably unspeakable; and unspeakably unspeakable squared is untold.” He counted out the grains of sand in the miles-wide mass of sand before him, telling how many grains of sand there were, and how many unspeakable numbers of grains of sand there were; then, having indicated this by these conventions of enumeration, he said, “This counting device serves enlightening beings for the succession of worlds; by this method of counting they count the multitudes of worlds in the ten directions. This method of counting serves enlightening beings in indicating the worlds in the ten directions in an orderly continuum. 
By this method of counting, enlightening beings count the string of names of the worlds in the ten directions. 
As in the case of indications of the string of names of worlds, in the same way this method of counting serves enlightening beings in indicating the successions of names of eons, buddhas, doctrines, sentient beings, actions, and indeed everything in the ten directions. 
“I know this light of knowledge of enlightening beings which is characterized by higher knowledge of all arts and sciences. 
How can I know the practice, tell of the virtues, indicate the range, show the sphere, describe the power, show the will, elucidate the preparation, explain the commitment, show the conduct, illumine the purity of transcendent ways, expound the purity of accomplishment, tell of the sphere of concentration, or approach the light of knowledge of the enlightening beings who know the number of all worlds, who know the number of all modes of spiritual practice, who know the number of pasts, presents, and futures, who know the number of all sentient beings, who know the number of all bodies of doctrine, who know the number of enlightenments of all buddhas, and who command the wheel of names of all the teachings?” “South of here is a city called Samudrapratishthana, where lives a lay devotee named Prabhuta. 
Go ask her how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Having heard the words of the spiritual benefactor, Sudhana was thrilled and overjoyed; he paid his respects and took leave of Indriyeshvara, having obtained the treasure of will that is rare and most difficult to obtain, setting out to act benevolently toward all, freely able to perceive the succession of emergence of buddhas, intent on the wisdom to clarify the sphere of the Teaching, intent on showing the various means of emancipation everywhere, aware of past, present, and future without confusion, his mind an inexhaustible ocean of virtue, in control of the light of great knowledge, having broken open the doors of confinement in the city of mundane existence. 
Prabhuta Then, receiving the multitude of teachings of spiritual benefactors as the ocean receives torrential rains without being filled, the sprouts of his faculties raised from clear ground and developed by the rays of light of knowledge of sunlike spiritual benefactors, his body and mind cooled by the aura of light of teaching of the full moon of spiritual benefactors, having drunk the water of the teachings of spiritual benefactors like a herd of animals burnt by the heat of the summer sun, the lotuses of his mind opened like a blooming lotus pond by the instructions of spiritual benefactors like water flowing from the snowy mountains, his being illumined by the practice of the precious instructions of spiritual benefactors, like a treasure island covered with jewels, successful in accumulating knowledge and virtue according to the instructions of spiritual benefactors, like a great tree laden with flowers and fruits, having an abundant store of learning of instructions of spiritual benefactors, like a great cloud in the sky produced by the sport of dragons, a radiant mountain peak of various virtues arising from the instruction of spiritual benefactors like the wonderful peak of the world of the thirty-three heavens, full of pure qualities produced by the instructions of spiritual benefactors, overpowering and invincible like the god Indra surrounded by the deities of the thirty-three heavens who conquers the leaders and hordes of titans, Sudhana made his way to the city Samudrapratishthana, looking for the devotee Prabhuta. 
He was told by the people there that Prabhuta was in her house in the middle of town. 
Sudhana went to Prabhuta’s house and stood before the entrance with his hands joined in respectful salutation. 
He saw that her house was very large, covered with precious ornaments, with doors on all four sides, arrayed with countless jewels, the result of the development of inconceivable virtues. 
Entering the house and looking around, he saw the devotee Prabhuta in a jeweled chair, young, slim, fresh, in the blossom of youth, radiantly beautiful, her hair hanging loose, wearing no ornaments on her body, clothed in pure white garments. 
Except for buddhas and enlightening beings, no one came to that house whom she did not overwhelm by her appearance, her mastery of mind, her radiance, her voice, or her splendor. 
Also, in her house were arrayed ten million seats, superior to those of celestials and humans, perfected by the deeds of enlightening beings. 
There were no provisions of food or drink, or clothing or jewelry or other accoutrements to be seen in the house, except for a vessel placed before her. 
He also saw ten thousand ladies like goddesses standing before her, wearing celestial clothing and ornaments, with pleasing voices like goddesses. Those ladies, her attendants, responding to her word, waited on her, watched her, kept their attention on her, respectfully saluted her, looked at her, bowed to her, and expressed their reverence for her. 
The fragrance from their bodies perfumed the whole city, and all who smelled the fragrance became free from malice, free from hostility, nonviolent, free from envy and jealousy, free from guile and deceitfulness, disciplined, mentally unobstructed, free from depression and elation, even-minded, kind, altruistic, restrained in mind, charitable. And whoever heard their voices became happy, joyful, and humble in mind. And whoever saw them felt themselves freed of lust. 
Then Sudhana paid his respects to Prabhuta and politely said to her, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
From this one vessel I satisfy sentient beings of various tastes with food conforming to their wishes, with various sauces and spices, of various colors and aromas. From this one vessel I satisfy even a hundred beings with whatever food they wish, even a thousand beings, a hundred thousand, a million, a billion; I satisfy untold numbers of sentient beings of various tastes with whatever foods they wish, gratifying and pleasing them and making them happy—and yet this vessel does not diminish or run out. In this way, even if as many sentient beings as atoms in a continent, or four continents, or a thousand-world universe, or a million-world universe, or a billion-world universe, or even if as many sentient beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands come to me with various tastes, I satisfy, please, and delight them with foods according to their wishes, with various sauces, spices, colors, and aromas—yet this vessel never diminishes or runs out, it is never depleted or exhausted. Even if all the beings in all worlds in the ten directions, with various tastes and desires, should come to me, I would satisfy them all with whatever food they wished. 
And as with food, so also would I satisfy and please them with various kinds of drinks, various delicacies, various couches, various clothing, various flowers, various garlands, various fragrances, various incenses, various unguents, various aromatic powders, various jewels, various ornaments, various conveyances, various parasols, various banners, various pennants, and various kinds of utensils. 
“Furthermore, any Buddhist disciples or individual illuminates in their last embodiment in one world in the east who attain the fruit of discipleship or individual illumination all do so after having eaten my food. And as this is true in one world in the east, so it is true in a hundred worlds, a thousand, a million, a billion, a trillion, a quadrillion, in as many worlds as atoms in a continent, as many worlds as atoms in four continents, as many worlds as atoms in a thousand-world universe, as many worlds as atoms in a million-world universe, as many worlds as atoms in a billion-world universe, up to as many worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands—all those who realize the fruit of discipleship or individual illumination do so after having eaten my food. 
And as this is true in so many worlds to the east, so it is true in the worlds in all ten directions. “The enlightening beings in one world in the east who are bound to attain enlightenment in one life all sit on the site of enlightenment, conquer the demons, and realize supreme perfect enlightenment after having eaten my food. 
The same is true of the enlightening beings to realize enlightenment in one life in up to as many worlds as atoms in untold buddha-lands in each of the ten directions—they all sit on the site of enlightenment, conquer the demons, and realize supreme perfect enlightenment after having eaten my food.” “Do you see these ten thousand women, my companions? Beginning with these, there are countless tens of hundreds of thousands of women whose practice is the same as mine, who are one in vows, one in roots of goodness, one in ways of emancipation, one in purity of devotion, equal in purity of mindfulness, one in purity of deportment, equal in infinity of understanding, equal in attainment of spiritual faculties, equal in pervasive awareness, equal in range of sphere of action, equal in penetration of spiritual principles, equal in ascertainment of meanings, equal in elucidation of doctrines and meanings, equal in purity of form, equal in infinity of power, equal in unsurpassed energy, equal in voicing truth, equal in purity of voice, equal in purity of qualities in all manners by manifesting infinite virtues, equal in purity of action by virtue of purity of results of irreproachable actions, equal in pervasive kindness by virtue of saving all sentient beings, equal in pervasive compassion by virtue of tirelessly developing all sentient beings, equally pure in physical action by virtue of appearing to all sentient beings in forms that please them, equally pure in speech in usage expressing the realm of realities, equal in going to the assemblies of all buddhas, equal in speeding to all buddha-lands to attend all the buddhas, equal in direct knowledge in understanding the principles of all doctrines, equal in purity of practice in attainment of all the stages of enlightening beings. “These ten thousand women pervade the ten directions in a single instant to present food to the enlightening beings who are bound to become enlightened in one lifetime, giving them food from this same vessel. They pervade the ten directions to give food and drink to the saints and individual illuminates who are in their last existence. 
I also satisfy all the celestial beings with celestial food from this same vessel: 
Come here and in a moment you shall see with your own eyes.” No sooner had Prabhuta said these words than immeasurable numbers of such beings came in through the four doors of her house, invited by Prabhuta’s standing vow. 
Then Prabhuta said to Sudhana, “I know this enlightening liberation, which is an inexhaustible treasury of manifestations of good; how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of enlightening beings whose goodness is inexhaustible because of the endlessness of the ocean of good, who are like the sky in that they have produced a vast store of good, who are like wish-fulfilling jewels in that they fulfill the wishes of all sentient beings, who are mountains of good because they protect the roots of goodness of all beings, who are great clouds of good as they shower jewel rain on all beings, who are superintendents of the great treasury of good in that they open the door of the city of truth, who are great lamps of good in that they dispel the darkness of destitution for all sentient beings? 
“South of here is a city called Mahasambhava, where a householder named Vidvan lives. Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana, paying his respects to the devotee Prabhuta, looking at her again and again without tiring of the sight of her, took his leave and departed. 
Vidvan Then, having gained the illumination of that enlightening liberation which is an inexhaustible treasury of goodness, reflecting on that ocean of good, gazing into that sky of good, climbing that mountain of good, gathering that mass of good, plunging into that stream of good, crossing that bridge of good, purifying that sphere of good, viewing that treasury of good, recalling that principle of good, contemplating that eye of good, purifying that multitude of good, Sudhana made his way to the city of Mahasambhava and looked all around for Vidvan, seeking a spiritual benefactor. 
Looking for Vidvan, his whole being perfumed by the sight of spiritual benefactors, finding strength in spiritual benefactors, relying on spiritual benefactors, striving to follow spiritual benefactors, with tireless vigor in attending spiritual benefactors, all his roots of goodness due to spiritual benefactors, all his stores of virtue sustained by spiritual benefactors, his practice of skill in means developed by spiritual benefactors, all his roots of goodness growing by skill in attendance of spiritual benefactors without depending on others, his will for enlightenment becoming purified, his enlightening faculties developing, all his roots of goodness maturing, his accomplishments of great vows growing, his great compassion broadening, seeing himself near omniscience, receiving the light of teaching of all buddhas by the practice of Universally Good enlightening beings, the manifestations of the ten powers of buddhas increasing, Sudhana saw Vidvan at a crossroads in the middle of the city, on a seat on a high pedestal made of innumerable jewels, set on legs of diamonds and emeralds, with a web of white cowries on golden strings, set in pure jewels, with five hundred ornamental jewel figurines, arrayed with multicolored celestial cloth, with celestial banners and pennants flying above, covered with many nets of jewels, overspread with a great canopy of jewels, with garlands of gold and jewels hanging from it. 
A golden parasol with a handle of pure lapis lazuli was held over Vidvan, and he was being fanned by plumes made of pure white goose feathers while various incenses perfumed the air around him. 
He was attended by ten thousand people of equally virtuous past conduct, finer in appearance than celestials or humans, perfect in the will of enlightening beings, adorned with ornaments superior to those of the gods, playing music sweeter than that of the heavens to please all the people in the city, and showering celestial flowers. 
Seeing Vidvan, Sudhana went up to him, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment for the benefit of all beings—to extinguish the sufferings of all beings, to lead them to ultimate happiness, to rescue them from the ocean of the mundane whirl, to deliver them to the island of jewels of truth, to evaporate their cravings, to produce great compassion in them, to divert their craving for sensual pleasure and arouse in them craving for enlightened knowledge, to help them all cross over the wildness of the mundane whirl, to develop in them a taste for the way of buddhahood, to lead them out of the city of mundane states and lead them to the city of omniscience. 
Rare are those who aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment, and rare are those who, having aspired to enlightenment, are tireless in seeking the practices of enlightening beings by meeting spiritual benefactors, who do not weary of going to spiritual benefactors, who are not pained by attendance on spiritual benefactors, who are not depressed by the difficulty of approaching spiritual benefactors, who do not give up seeking spiritual benefactors, who do not turn away from the sight of the countenance of spiritual benefactors, who do not get discouraged in the path taught by spiritual benefactors, who do not tire in the service of spiritual benefactors. 
Do you see my companions? 
I inspired them all to seek supreme perfect enlightenment; I caused them to be born in the family of buddhas; I nourished them by providing them with the ways of transcendence; I got them to live in good ways; I developed them in the ten powers of buddhas; I lifted them out of worldliness; I established them in the ranks of the enlightened; I removed them from the circle of mundane states; I started them in the cycle of enlightening teaching; I saved them from falling into bad conditions; I led them to realization of equality of things: 
for thus do enlightening beings become saviors of all sentient beings. 
to those who need food I give food, to those who need drink I give drink, to those who need clothing I give clothing, to those who need flowers I give flowers, to those who want garlands I give garlands, To those who need perfumes or incenses I give perfumes or incenses, to those who need ornaments I give ornaments, to those who need jewels I give jewels, to those who need gold I give gold, to those who need silver I give silver, to those who need pearls I give pearls, to those who need chairs I give chairs, to those who need beds I give beds, to those who need means of transportation I give means of transportation, to those who need medicine I give medicine, and so on—whatever the needs, I provide them. 
Come here, and in a moment you will see for yourself.” As soon as Vidvan had spoken these words, innumerable beings gathered at his house, summoned by his past vows. 
Seeing them gathered there begging, Vidvan thought for a moment, then looked at the sky. 
From the sky various kinds of food and drink streamed into his hand, and this Vidvan gave to the beggars according to their various tastes and desires, satisfying and delighting them with the food and drink they wanted, with the best kinds of all means of subsistence. 
that is, he elucidated means of accumulating a great store of knowledge, means of eliminating all poverty, means of producing all enjoyments, means of finding ways to knowledge of truth, means of accumulating a vast store of virtue, means of being able to feed on joy, means of attaining a body adorned with the marks and embellishments of greatness, means of attaining purity of invincible power, means of attaining knowledge of uninterrupted livelihood, and means of attaining inexhaustible good powers overcoming the power of all demons. 
Those who came for delicacies he satisfied with sweets, and then taught them to attain the refined characteristics of great people. 
How can I know the practice, tell the virtues, or show the miracles of the enlightening beings who have attained control over paraphernalia, who have treasure-producing hands, who cover all worlds with their hands, as treasuries of offerings to buddhas, and shower rain from clouds of various jewels in the assemblies of all buddhas, various clouds of ornaments, towers, clothing, celestial music and song, fragrances, incenses, unguents, aromatic powders, robes, parasols, banners, pennants, and all kind of paraphernalia, raining all kinds of offerings for buddhas, in the assemblies of all buddhas, in the abodes of all beings, to serve all buddhas and to develop and guide all sentient beings? 
“South of here is a city called Simhapota. 
An eminent person named Ratnachuda lives there. 
Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Sudhana, pleased, elated, uplifted, overjoyed, expressing his respect for the householder Vidvan as a disciple for a teacher, in honor of the Teaching, seeing all qualities of buddhahood as being fostered by him, seeing omniscience as coming from him, showing undying regard for spiritual benefactors, showing the inconceivability of unlimited knowledge in spiritual friends, acting in accord with the mastery of spiritual benefactors, heeding the instructions of spiritual benefactors, meditating on the faculty of faith deriving from spiritual benefactors, in quest of the instruction of spiritual benefactors, his mind on propitiation of spiritual benefactors, paid his respects to Vidvan and left. 
Ratnachuda Then, resorting to that water of goodness, watching that field of goodness, clearing off that mountain of goodness, plunging into that channel of goodness, opening that treasury of goodness, looking into that mine of goodness, clarifying that sphere of goodness, gathering that mass of goodness, generating that power of goodness, increasing that stream of goodness, Sudhana made his way to Simhapota city. 
Looking all over for the religious eminent Ratnachuda, he saw him in the middle of the marketplace. 
Sudhana went up to him, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn or carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
Please teach me the path of enlightening beings, on which path I may set out for omniscience.” Ratnachuda took Sudhana to his house and showed it to him, saying, “Look at my house.” Looking it over, Sudhana saw that the house was radiant, made of gold, wide and high, surrounded by silver walls, adorned with crystal terraces, embellished with hundreds of thousands of lapis lazuli turrets, on coral pillars; there was a lion seat arrayed with red pearls, flying lion banners made of starry jewels, covered with a canopy of radiant jewels, draped with a net of wish-fulfilling jewels, arrayed with countless gem-stones. 
There was a lotus pond, with cool water, made of emeralds. 
Surrounded by trees of all kinds of jewels, the house was large, ten stories high, with eight doors. Entering the house, Sudhana looked around. 
On the first floor he saw supplies of food and drink being given away. 
On the second floor he saw all kinds of clothing being given away. 
On the third floor he saw all kinds of jewelry being given away. 
On the fourth floor he saw royal concubines, the most talented women on earth, being given away. 
On the fifth floor he saw a gathering of enlightening beings of the fifth stage, celebrating the Teaching in song, thinking and acting for the welfare and happiness of the world, practicing all sciences, putting into effect the method of mystic spells, the ocean of concentration, emergence from concentration, contemplation in concentration, and the light of knowledge. 
On the sixth floor he saw a gathering of enlightening beings who had attained transcendent wisdom, who had profound wisdom, who had mystic knowledge of the quiescence of all phenomena, who were completely familiar with the comprehensive method containing the method of concentration spells of the stages, whose sphere of action was unimpeded, who practiced nondualism, who were making songs of the Teaching following the process of transcendence by wisdom, analyzing and opening it up—a door of transcendent wisdom called matrix of equality, a door of transcendent wisdom called orderly analysis of the knowledge of all sentient beings, a door of transcendent wisdom called unmoving, a door of transcendent wisdom called light of dispassion, a door of transcendent wisdom called invincible matrix, a door of transcendent wisdom called world-illumining sphere, a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of ways to attainment, a door of transcendent wisdom called oceanic matrix, a door of transcendent wisdom called attainment of equanimity of the universal eye, a door of transcendent wisdom called arrival at the inexhaustible treasure, a door of transcendent wisdom called ocean of all ways to truth, a door of transcendent wisdom called entry into the ocean of all beings, a door of transcendent wisdom called unobstructed intelligence, a door of transcendent wisdom called site of gradual descent of the clouds of the Teaching—he saw enlightening beings in untold numbers of orderly groups singing in chorus of countless tens of hundreds of thousands of such doors of transcendent wisdom. 
On the seventh floor he saw a gathering of enlightening beings who had attained acceptance of the fact that all sounds are like echoes, who were completely familiar with ascertainment of knowledge of means, and who took in the multitude of teachings of all buddhas. 
On the eighth floor he saw a gathering of enlightening beings who had attained undiminishing mystic knowledge, who observed all worlds, who were able to appear reflected in all communities, whose bodies were distributed evenly throughout all universes, who perceived the presence of all buddhas as a unified sphere, who were united with the body of all buddhas, who were chief interlocutors in the audiences of all buddhas. On the ninth floor he saw a gathering of enlightening beings who were to attain buddhahood in one lifetime. On the tenth floor he saw the oceans of first inspirations, practices, emancipations, and vows of all buddhas, mystic displays of all ways of enlightenment, the audiences of all buddhas, the sounds of the teachings of all buddhas, magical displays to edify all sentient beings. 
Having seen this, Sudhana said to Ratnachuda, “Noble one, how did you achieve this? 
Where did you plant roots of goodness resulting in such an attainment?” Ratnachuda said, “I remember that in the past, eons ago, more than as many eons ago as atoms in a buddha-land, in a world called Wheel of Many Colors, a buddha named King of Teaching Adorning the Cosmos with Infinite Rays of Light emerged in the world, tamer and leader of people, teacher of celestials and humans, accomplished in knowledge and action, blissful, supreme knower of the world, enlightened, blessed. 
I played music for that buddha in the middle of the marketplace of the city and burned one ball of incense as an offering to the buddha and the enlightening beings and disciples. 
I dedicated the root of goodness in that miraculous vision of the Buddha’s power to three points: to forever ending all poverty, to always hearing truth, and to meeting all enlightened and enlightening spiritual benefactors. 
How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of enlightening beings who are mines of inconceivable, immeasureable virtues, who have entered the indivisible ocean of buddha-bodies, who take in the indivisible multitude of truths, who have attained an indivisible ocean of virtues, who have spread the net of the practice of universal good, who have entered the realm of indivisible absorption, whose roots of goodness are one with those of all enlightening beings, who abide in the pure nondiscrimination of buddhas, who have entered the indivisible equality of past, present, and future, who live continuously through all ages without tiring, who are in the stage of the sphere of the unfragmented universal eye? 
“South of here is a land called Vetramulaka. A perfumer named Samantanetra lives in a city there called Samantamukha. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to Ratnachuda and left. 
Samantanetra Immersed in the endless vision of buddhas, in communication with the endless congregation of enlightening beings, illumined by the endless means of the way of enlightening beings, his mind broadened and made sure by the endless principles of enlightening beings, pure in the endless path of devotion of enlightening beings, imbued with the infinite light of the faculties of enlightening beings, secure in the infinite willpower of enlightening beings, consciously following the infinite practice of enlightening beings, generating the infinite power of vows of enlightening beings, characterized by the infinite invincibility of enlightening beings, abiding in the infinite light of knowledge of enlightening beings, aware of the infinite law of enlightening beings, Sudhana made his way to the land called Vetramulaka, where he looked for the city Samantamukha, searching all over, here and there, in the highlands and the lowlands, over level and rough terrain; with tireless determination, unceasing, single-minded, with unflagging vigor and an inexhaustible mind, never forgetting the instructions of spiritual benefactors, wishing always to speak with spiritual benefactors, his senses fully aware, rid of all heedlessness, his eyes and ears open, he searched all over for the city of Samantamukha, and finally saw it, in the middle of the country of Vetramulaka, surrounded by ten thousand towns, with strong, high walls, adorned in forty-eight ways. 
He saw the perfumer Samantanetra in a perfumers’ shop in the city. 
Seeing Samantanetra, Sudhana went up to him, paid his respects, and said, “I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Samantanetra said, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
I know the maladies of all sentient beings and how to cure those maladies. 
All who come to me from the ten directions, I cure of their maladies. 
Once they are cured, bathed, and anointed, I satisfy them with suitable ornaments, clothes, and food, and furnish them with immeasurable wealth. After that I teach them, presenting impurity to rid them of lust, praising great love to rid them of hatred, showing them analysis of elements to rid them of delusion. 
I teach them to get rid of the afflictions of action equally combining lust, hatred, and delusion by illuminating the ways to higher knowledge. 
I clarify the means of producing the determination for enlightenment by talking about the virtuous qualities of all buddhas. I elucidate the means of producing great compassion by showing the immeasurable miseries of the mundane world. 
I elucidate the means of attaining immeasurable virtuous qualities by describing the accumulation of vast stores of goodness and knowledge. 
I elucidate the means of producing the vows of the Great Vehicle by showing the development and guidance of all sentient beings. 
I elucidate the means of attaining a buddha-body of amassed distinguishing marks and embellishments by praising transcendent generosity. 
I elucidate the means of producing the inconceivable purity of appearance of buddhas by explaining transcendent tolerance. 
I elucidate the means of producing the invincible body of buddhas by explaining transcendent vigor. 
I elucidate the unsurpassed purity of body of buddhas by explaining transcendent meditation. 
I elucidate the purity of the reality-body by explaining transcendent wisdom. I elucidate the purity of the body of Buddha appearing before all beings by explaining transcendent skill in means. 
I elucidate the purity of body involved in entering the minds of people in all eras and times by explaining transcendent commitment. 
I elucidate the purity of body appearing in all buddha-lands by explaining transcendent power. 
I elucidate the purity of body pleasing all sentient beings according to their inclinations by explaining transcendent knowledge. 
I elucidate the purification of the body of supremely pure appearance by explaining the removal of all unwholesome elements. 
Thus taking care of them with this giving of teaching, I provide them with the support of endless treasures and let them go. 
“I also know how to compound all scents, incenses, perfumes, and unguents. Moreover, I know the ball of fragrance making offerings on meeting buddhas everywhere, pleasing to all beings. 
By this ball of fragrance all wishes are fulfilled; by it I produce multitudes of dwelling places, and so on, including multitudes of all kinds of offerings for buddhas. 
Whenever I want to make offerings to buddhas, I produce clouds of towers of fragrance and cause them to appear in all universes, in the assemblies of all buddhas. 
I adorn all universes with purification of buddha-lands, palaces of fragrance, walls of fragrance, turrets of fragrance, arches of fragrance, windows of fragrance, penthouses of fragrance, crescents of fragrance, parasols of fragrance, banners and pennants of fragrance, canopies of fragrance, webs of fragrance, lights of fragrance, immaculate adornments of fragrance, and rain showering from clouds of all fragrances. 
“I know this medium of the Teaching, the ball of fragrance making offerings on meeting buddhas everywhere, pleasing all sentient beings; how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who are like great medicines, whom it is beneficial to see, to hear, to associate with, to remember, to follow, and to recall their names, with the sight of whom all sentient beings are relieved of afflictions, with the sight of whom sentient beings leave all evil ways, with the sight of whom sentient beings find a way to buddhahood, with the sight of whom the sufferings of sentient beings are relieved, with the sight of whom sentient beings are freed from fear of all mundane states, with the sight of whom sentient beings become fearless because of being near the abode of omniscience, with the sight of whom sentient beings no longer fall into the abyss of old age and death, with the sight of whom sentient beings attain the bliss of tranquillity through cosmic equanimity? 
“South of here is a city called Taladhvaja, where there lives a king named Anala. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to the eminent perfumer Samantanetra and left. 
Anala Recalling those spiritual benefactors one after another, focusing his attention on the instructions of those spiritual benefactors, rejoicing in himself at being in the care of spiritual benefactors, reflecting that through the protection of spiritual benefactors he would never lose the way to supreme perfect enlightenment, Sudhana became joyful, serene, pleased, happy, calm, broadminded; he attained adornment of mind, nonattachment of mind, nonobstruction of mind, aloofness of mind, unification of mind, control of mind, extraordinary power of mind, mental conformity with the Teaching, mental pervasion of lands, mental beatification by the vision of Buddha, and constant mental focus on the ten powers. 
He made his way from country to country, village to village, place to place, searching, till he came to the city of Taladhvaja, where he asked after the whereabouts of King Anala. 
He was told, “King Anala is on the throne carrying out his royal duties for the welfare of the populace. 
He governs the communities, punishes those who should be punished, promotes those who deserve promotion, chastises criminals, settles disputes, comforts and encourages the wretched and dejected, subdues the wild and arrogant; he puts a stop to the injury of living beings, theft, desire for others’ spouses, falsehood, slander, harsh or violent talk, and divisive talk; he frees us from craving, malice, and false ideas.” Then Sudhana went to King Anala and saw him sitting on a great jeweled lion throne brilliant with diamonds, set on legs of countless varieties of luminous jewels, with beautiful figurines inlaid with jewels, arrayed with cowrie shells on golden threads, lit by many jewel lamps, in a lotus calyx made of magic gems, spread with many precious celestial robes, perfumed with various celestial incenses, embellished with a hundred thousand jeweled parasols, adorned with a hundred thousand jeweled banners, beautified by trailing flower garlands made of varicolored jewels, covered by a canopy of various celestial jewels. 
The king was young and handsome, with the marks and embellishments of a great man, wearing a crown of wish-fulfilling jewels, his forehead adorned with golden crescents, pure blue sapphire earrings hanging from his ears, a breastplate radiant with jewels on his chest, bracelets of the finest celestial gems on his arms, shaded by a large precious parasol with a cane of pure lapis lazuli and a thousand ribs of jewels with a gold covering, a wreath of jewel bells sweetly ringing, illumining all directions with its luster. 
The king had great regal power; his rule was invincible to enemy armies, his sovereignty was free of danger from enemy armies. 
Sudhana saw ten thousand ministers gathered around the king conducting the affairs of state. 
by the king’s order, some had their hands and feet cut off, some had their ears and noses cut off, some had their eyes gouged out, some had their limbs or heads cut off, some had their whole bodies burnt by fire, some were being dismembered, crippled, burnt, sprinkled with acid. Sudhana watched them undergoing such harsh, injurious, and deadly punishments and saw a mountainous heap of rendered body parts on the execution ground and a tremendous torrent of blood. He also saw animals and birds eating the mutilated corpses there. He also saw some of the corpses hideously decomposing. 
He also heard the screams and cries of those being mutilated and killed, as terrifying as hell. 
Seeing that dreadful, horrifying butchery, Sudhana thought, “I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment for the sake of the welfare and happiness of all beings and am devoted to pursuing the practice of enlightening beings; I ask spiritual benefactors what good an enlightening being should do and what evil one should avoid. 
This King Anala, though, is devoid of goodness, an evildoer, malicious, a killer and oppressor, without regard for others, doomed to a miserable fate: 
Indeed, the practical knowledge of skill in means of enlightening beings is inconceivable. 
The knowledge of how to benefit sentient beings is inconceivable. 
The knowledge of how to restrain sentient beings is inconceivable. 
The knowledge of how to further sentient beings is inconceivable. 
The knowledge of how to purify sentient beings is inconceivable. The knowledge of how to liberate sentient beings is inconceivable. The knowledge of how to perfect sentient beings is inconceivable. The knowledge of how to guide sentient beings is inconceivable. 
Go ask the king about the practice of enlightening beings.” Hearing the words of the celestials, Sudhana went to King Anala, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
Entering his own residence, the king seated Sudhana on a seat of honor and said to him, “Look at the furnishings of my house.” Sudhana looked and saw that the house was large, with walls of seven precious substances, adorned with terraces of various jewels, embellished with hundreds of thousands of jewel towers, blazing with the radiance of inconceivable numbers of jewels, with pillars made of various jewels. 
He also saw the king’s hundred million ladies, all extremely beautiful, versed in all the arts, diligent, kindhearted, and attentive. 
Then King Anala said to Sudhana, “What do you think—could such fruits of action come to a villain? 
Could a villain attain such a condition, with such a retinue, such riches, such power?” Sudhana said, “No indeed, noble one.” The king said, “I have attained enlightening beings’ magical liberation. 
The people in my realm are given to all sorts of evildoing—murder, theft, rape, falsehood, slander, vilification, divisive talk, covetousness, malice, false views, villainy, violence, cruelty. I am unable to turn them away from evildoing by any other means, so in order to subdue them, mature them, guide them, and secure their welfare, out of compassion I have illusory executioners kill and maim illusory criminals, making a display of intense suffering and pain; seeing this, the people in my realm become afraid to do evil. Seeing the people alarmed by this device, I have them give up evildoing and conduct themselves virtuously; then I establish them in ultimate security, the end of all suffering, the bliss of omniscience. 
I do not harm anyone by thought, word, or deed. 
I would sooner go to the deepest hell than so much as think of hurting even a dumb animal or an insect, much less a human being, who has potential for virtuous conduct. 
“I have attained this magical enlightening beings’ liberation. 
How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who have attained acceptance of the truth of nonorigination, who relate to all states of being as illusions, who understand that the practices of enlightening beings are like magical creations, who know that all worlds are like reflections, who comprehend that the nature of things is like a dream, who conform to the principle of the reality realm by nonattachment, who accomplish the network of interrelated practices, who are in the sphere of unimpeded knowledge, who know the way of universally comprehensive concentration, who are masters of endlessly progressing mental command, who are intent on the sphere of buddhahood?” “South of here is a city called Suprabha, where a king named Mahaprabha lives. 
Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects and left King Anala. 
He asked where King Mahaprabha was, and people pointed out the great city Suprabha and told him the king lived there. 
So then Sudhana went to the city and was delighted upon seeing it. 
He thought, “Where does the spiritual benefactor live? 
I shall see the spiritual benefactor today and hear from him about the practice of enlightening beings, the way of emancipation of enlightening beings, the inconceivable nature of enlightening beings, the inconceivable range of virtues of enlightening beings, the inconceivable majesty of enlightening beings, the inconceivable concentration of enlightening beings, the inconceivable freedom of enlightening beings, and the inconceivable purity of accomplishment of great undertakings of enlightening beings.” With these thoughts in mind Sudhana went into the great city Suprabha. 
Once he was there, Sudhana looked around the city: 
it was beautiful, made of seven precious substances—gold, silver, lapis lazuli, crystal, red pearl, emerald, and coral. It was surrounded by deep moats made of the seven precious substances, with gold sand on the bottom, their surfaces covered with heavenly lotuses, and particles of sandalwood suspended in the water. The city was also surrounded by rows of palm trees made of the seven precious substances, and enclosed by walls made of seven kinds of diamonds—majestic, insuperable, indestructible, invincible, without obstacle, blazing with light, free from impurities. 
Each of the diamond walls was also inlaid with countless jewels, inset with gold posts and adorned with garlands of ivory and jewels. The gates of the city, at intervals of ten leagues on eight sides, were beautifully constructed of the seven precious substances. 
The city was large, a symmetrical octagon, set on a ground of blue lapis lazuli. 
There were ten million streets in the city, each one lined on both sides with hundreds of thousands of mansions made of various precious substances and adorned with arrays of many kinds of gems, flying jeweled banners and flags, fully furnished, with millions of people living in them. 
The city was also adorned with countless temples of gold and jewels, countless gold towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of lapis lazuli, countless silver towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of red pearls, countless lapis lazuli towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of varicolored jewels, countless crystal towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of diamonds, countless luminous jewel towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of sunny jewels, countless sapphire towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of radiant jewels, countless diamond towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of unsurpassed jewels, countless sandalwood towers arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of celestial flowers, countless towers of incomparable fragrances arrayed with innumerable jewels and covered with nets of heavenly flowers, all adorned with turrets of many jewels, encircled with balconies of seven precious substances, surrounded by rows of jewel trees. 
The turrets of the towers and the nets of jewels were also interconnected by jewel strings, and those strings were adorned with garlands of golden bells, to each of which were fastened strings of various jewels, from each of which hung circlets of small bells. 
The house of King Mahaprabha was built in the middle of the city. 
Made of the seven precious substances, it was surrounded by arbors made of these seven precious substances in various combinations, decorated with nets of precious bells making pleasant sweet sounds. 
It was surrounded by seven rows of palm trees made of the seven precious substances and adorned with a hundred thousand towers made of inconceivable numbers of various jewels. 
The house was embellished with lotus ponds, made of jewels, their surfaces covered with celestial flowers, their floors spread with gold sand, with steps made of jewel bricks arrayed on four sides, graced with trees with jewel flowers and fruits. 
Pleasant sounds of birds warbling filled the air. It was like the palace of a celestial king. 
In the middle stood a tower of world-illumining jewels, wonderful, beautiful, brilliant with its inconceivable arrays of countless jewels, built by the King Mahaprabha as a treasury of good law. 
Then Sudhana, not drawn by the jewel moats, not amazed by the jewel walls, not attracted by the jewel trees, not relishing the sound of the jewel bells, unattached to the sweet sounds of celestial songs, not paying any attention to the various precious furnishings of the apartments and towers, while in the midst of the joyful crowds of people enjoying the pleasure of the way of enlightenment, detached from pleasures of the senses, intent on contemplation of the truth, constantly asking everyone he met about spiritual benefactors, made his way to a crossroads in the city. 
Looking around at the crossroads, he saw King Mahaprabha there, not far from his venerable abode, seated on a magnificent throne. The throne had legs of blue lapis lazuli and was set on a lion made of white lapis lazuli. It was arrayed with nets of cowries on gold strings and varicolored precious cloths surpassing those of the gods, and ornamented with countless jewel figures. 
It was covered with a network of inconceivable numbers of jewels, and above was a beautiful gold silk canopy with multicolored decorations of celestial jewels. 
The throne of the great law was in the shape of the calyx of a lotus made of wish-fulfilling gems, and the king sat cross-legged thereon, graced with the thirty-two marks of a great person, adorned with the various embellishments of the virtuous. 
He was like a mountain of gold, brilliant as a mine of jewels, blazing with light like the orb of the sun, of placid appearance like the full moon, an oceanic accumulation of endless virtues of the profound Teaching, like a great cloud thundering the sound of inherent nature, like the sky studded with stars of maxims of the Teaching, like the polar mountain appearing to the minds of the ocean of sentient beings, like an island of jewels covered with various gems of knowledge. 
Sudhana also saw heaps of jewels, pearls, conch shells, camphor, coral, gold, and silver, heaps of celestial robes, heaps of celestial jewelry, heaps of food, and heaps of the finest delicacies arrayed before the king. 
He also saw millions of celestial chariots, celestial musical instruments, mounds of celestial incenses, many medicinal preparations, and many collections of all kinds of utensils, suitable and proper for people to enjoy as they wish. 
He also saw hundreds of thousands of milk cows with golden horns and hooves, provided to care for the poor. 
He also saw many millions of beautiful girls, adorned with all kinds of jewelry, dressed in heavenly clothes, limbs anointed with sandalwood perfume, versed in all the arts and skilled in all manners of love play. 
All the kinds of goods that were before the king were also set out in countless numbers on the street corners, in front of every house, along both sides of every street, to support the population, to make everyone happy, joyful, serene, and comfortable, to extinguish their afflictions, to introduce them to the meaning of the nature of all things, to get them all to have omniscience as their common aim, to rid them of malice toward others, to stop them from all evil action and talk, to extract the thorns of views, and to purify their course of action. 
At that point Sudhana went up to King Mahaprabha, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practices of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, and ask you to tell me how to study and accomplish the practice of enlightening beings.” The king said, “I purify and fulfill the enlightening beings’ practice, which is characterized by great benevolence. 
This practice I have asked about, purified, ordered, observed, carried out, pursued, entered into, diversified, and expanded in the company of hundreds, thousands, millions—indeed, untold numbers—of buddhas. 
Based on this enlightening practice of great benevolence, I command kingship justly, I treat the world justly, I pass through the world justly, I lead the people justly, I bring justice to people and turn them to the sphere of right, I give them right guidance, I saturate them with justice, I direct them to attainment of what is right, I get them to contemplate the nature of things. 
I establish people in kindness, in the command of great kindness, in the power of kindness, in altruism, in goodwill, in sympathy, in friendliness, in hospitality, in determination to get rid of all suffering, in conduct conducive to ultimate happiness. 
I cool their minds and remove their mental tangles by producing the bliss of cessation. I divert their continuity of mind attached to delight in mundane routines and purify it in enjoyment of the pleasures of truth. I purify them of all unwholesome qualities and turn them away from what is not good. 
I turn back the flow of the mundane whirl. I destroy their ignorance in the ocean of principles of the reality realm, to cut off rebirth in all states of being. 
I inspire them to attain omniscience. I calm the ocean of their minds, to generate the indestructible power of faith. 
“Furthermore, no one goes away from me intimidated, threatened, or frightened. 
If any poor people lacking in means of subsistence come to me seeking food or drink or clothing or any other need, I open the royal storehouse to them and allow them to take from there, or from the streets and crossroads of the city, whatever they need, things they would otherwise get involved in wrongdoing to get. “All the inhabitants of this city are enlightening beings established in the Great Vehicle. They see this city according to the purity of their minds. Some see it small, some large; some see a ground of earth, some see a ground spread with lapis lazuli; some see clay walls, some see it surrounded by walls covered with the finest cloth, banners, and jewels; some see it full of gravel and sand, uneven, with a lot of ravines; some see the ground spread with large jewels, decorated and flat as the palm of the hand; some see it beautifully arrayed with mansions and palaces, with round windows, nets, crescents, jewels, and various other adornments. 
Even among those who live outside the city, those whose minds are pure, who have made roots of goodness, who have attended many buddhas, who are aiming for omniscience, and who make omniscience their ultimate goal, see it as made of jewels. Those whom I took care of in the course of past enlightening practice by means of charity, kindness, assistance, and cooperation see it this way, while others see it as made of clay. 
“Whenever the inhabitants of my domain want to do anything wrong in the degenerate world, their natures disturbed by the times, in order to save them I go into an enlightening concentration guided by great benevolence called ‘adapting to the faculties of the world,’ whereupon their fears, misfortunes, animosities, quarrels, agitations, and hostilities cease. 
Come here and you shall see for yourself in a moment.” At that point the king entered that concentration, whereupon the whole city as well as the provinces of the kingdom quaked. As they shook, the jewel walls, jewel temples, jewel treasuries, jewel houses, jewel mansions, jewel palaces, jewel towers, jewel windows, jewel balconies, jewel arches, jewel crescents, jewel domes, jewel statues, jewel canopies, jewel bells, jewel banners, and jewel trees gave off beautiful, pleasant sounds and bowed toward King Mahaprabha. 
The inhabitants of the city Suprabha, ecstatic, prostrated themselves in the king’s direction. The inhabitants of the rest of the domain, refreshed and joyful, bowed toward the king. 
Even the animals, in friendship and harmony with each other, bowed toward the king. 
Even the mountains and hills all bowed toward the king. All the trees and plants also bowed toward the king. 
All the lakes, ponds, streams, and rivers in the domain flowed toward the king. 
Ten thousand water spirits sent subtly aromatic rains from clouds of fragrant water, with thunder and lightning. 
Ten thousand celestial beings adorned the sky with countless clouds of celestial music, goddesses sweetly singing, clouds raining celestial jewel flowers, clouds raining various celestial fragrances, garlands, aromatic powders, jewelry, robes, parasols, banners, and pennants blazing with the radiance of jewels, presenting these to the king as tokens of respect. 
The chief of the water spirits also adorned the sky with a covering of countless clouds of celestial jewel lotuses, countless trailing ornaments of celestial jewel necklaces, streamers, garlands, ornaments, and leis, countless clouds of all-pervading celestial fragrances, countless clouds raining celestial cloths, incense balls, and aromatic powders, and countless clouds of nymphs playing sweet music and singing hymns of praise, producing these in the sky by the inconceivable power of the chief water spirit. 
Also, countless hundreds of thousands of sea and land goblins, malevolent beings who feed on flesh and blood and consume the vitality of fish, birds, animals, and humans, all became benevolent, placid, intent on not harming any creatures, and sympathetic to other beings; they joined their hands in respect and most joyfully bowed to the king, experiencing mental and physical bliss. Hundreds of thousands of other kinds of fiends and malevolent spirits, also becoming benevolent, placid, intent on not harming any creature, and sympathetic to other beings, joined their hands in respect and most joyfully bowed to the king, experiencing physical and mental bliss. In this way all the fears, misfortunes, animosities, quarrels, agitations, and hostilities of all creatures on earth ceased. 
And as this happened on earth, so did it also happen throughout the galaxy, in as many as ten duodecillion worlds. This was by the achievement of the nature of the enlightening concentration adapting to the faculties of the world, which is guided by great benevolence. 
Then King Mahaprabha came out of that concentration and said to Sudhana, “I know this medium of the light of knowledge of practice of enlightening beings which is characterized by great benevolence. 
How can I know the practice, tell the virtues, measure the mountain of merit, view the myriad stars of virtuous qualities, encompass the atmosphere of great vows, measure the power of impartiality toward things, clarify the forms of arrangements of the vehicle of universal salvation, express the excellences of the principles of universally good practice, open the doors of cultivation of great enlightening concentrations, or describe the clouds of great compassion, of the enlightening beings who are like immeasurable umbrellas of great benevolence, filling all beings with happiness; who are inseparable companions to all beings; who have set out to save all beings, working equally with the superior, inferior, and middling; whose benevolence is as impartial as the earth, supporting all beings; who are impartial as the full moon, shining the light of virtue and knowledge equally on all beings; who are impartial as the sun, illumining the world with knowledge of all that can be known; who are like great lamps, dispelling the darkness in the recesses of all beings’ minds; who are like water-clarifying jewels, removing the turbidity of deceit and guile from the water of beings’ minds; who are like wish-fulfilling jewels, fulfilling the aspirations of all beings; who are like a gale, driving all beings into the citadel of omniscience with its houses of concentration and equilibrium? 
“South of here is a kingdom called Sthira where a devotee named Achala lives. Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects to King Mahaprabha and left. 
Achala Then Sudhana left Suprabha city and shortly set forth on the road; reflecting on the teaching of King Mahaprabha, remembering the principle of enlightening practice of great benevolence, thinking of the light of that method of great concentration adapting to the faculties of the world, developing the inconceivable power commanding the goodness of the vows of enlightening beings, stabilizing the inconceivable wisdom of enlightening beings, knowing how to develop and perfect sentient beings, contemplating the inconceivable unique greatness of experience of enlightening beings, aiming for the inconceivable measurelessness of enlightening beings, remembering enlightening beings’ inconceivable purity of development of sentient beings, thinking of the inconceivability of the purity of company of enlightening beings, focusing on enlightening beings’ inconceivable way of considering and seeing what to do for sentient beings, Sudhana became joyful and happy, his mind became clear, light, steadfast, broad, and invincible. 
Weeping as he thought of his memories of spiritual benefactors, he thought, “Meeting spiritual benefactors is a mine of jewels of all virtues; it brings about the purification and fulfillment of all enlightening practices; it purifies the mindfulness of all enlightening beings; it purifies all enlightening beings’ sphere of mental command; it generates the light of concentration of all enlightening beings; it fosters accomplishments of the vision of all buddhas; it causes the clouds of teachings of all buddhas to rain; it reveals the principles of the vows of all enlightening beings; it generates the inconceivable light of wisdom and knowledge; it strengthens and develops the sprouting faculties of enlightening beings. 
Spiritual benefactors save me from falling into evil ways; they guide me according to the principle of equality of things; they show me which paths are safe and which dangerous; they elucidate the way of universal enlightenment; they explain to me universally good enlightening conduct; they tell me the way to the citadel of omniscience; they lead me into the stronghold of omniscience; they plunge me into the ocean of principles of the cosmos; they illumine for me the way into the ocean of what can be known in past, present, and future; they show me the multitude of spheres of all goals; they cause me to develop all good qualities.” As Sudhana wept, a group of celestial enlightening beings in the sky, envoys of the buddhas who were always following Sudhana to inspire him, said, “The buddhas are pleased with an enlightening being who puts the instruction of spiritual benefactors into practice. 
An enlightening being who obeys the word of spiritual benefactors is close to omniscience. 
An enlightening being who does not doubt the word of spiritual benefactors becomes near to spiritual benefactors. 
An enlightening being who always pays attention to spiritual benefactors is within sight of all goals. 
Go to the devotee Achala in the kingdom of Sthira, and you will hear from her of the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana emerged from the light of concentration knowledge and made his way to the kingdom of Sthira, looking for the devotee Achala. 
People told him, “The devotee Achala is a girl living at home with her parents and relatives; she gives spiritual teaching to a large group of people.” Filled with joy, Sudhana went to Achala’s house. 
Standing in the door, he saw the whole house lit up with a soothing golden light. 
The moment Sudhana was touched by the light, five hundred subtle trances descended upon him, beginning with a trance characterized by power over all sensations, trance absorption in the realm of tranquillity, absorption in the welfare of all beings, absorption in the equanimity of the universal eye, and absorption in the matrix of realization of Thusness. 
The feeling of those trances was as subtle as the consciousness of a half-day old embryo. 
He also smelled a scent more beautiful than that of any gods or goddesses or humans or any other creatures of the world, and there was to be found in all the world no one even equal to, much less more beautiful than, that girl Achala. 
The radiance of her complexion, the proportions of her body, and the magnificence of her aura were such that none in the world, save buddhas and coronated enlightening beings, even equaled, much less surpassed them. 
Her scent was unequaled and unsurpassed by any celestial, preternatural, or human beings. 
The furnishings of her abode were unequaled and unsurpassed in all the world, except by the accoutrements of buddhas and coronated enlightening beings. 
Her company was also unequaled and unsurpassed by any in the world, except for the companies of buddhas and coronated enlightening beings. 
There was no one in all the world who could look upon Achala with lust—there was no one in the world whose afflictions did not cease the moment he beheld her. 
Just as gods with controlling power who live in the realm of desire do not activate afflictions, similarly people who saw Achala did not act on afflictions. 
There was no one in the world who became satiated with the sight of Achala, except those who were sated with wisdom. 
Then Sudhana, in an attitude of reverence, seeing Achala’s inconceivable physical majesty, her inconceivable appearance, and her inconceivable aura of light, which could not be blocked by all the cities and mountains on the face of the earth, sensing the inconceivable beneficial fragrance coming from her pores, looking over her endless company of followers, noticing the matchless adornment of her abode, immersed in the measureless ocean of her virtues, eulogized Achala with this verse: 
Then Sudhana said to her, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear that you give instruction to enlightening beings, so I ask you to tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” In the affectionate, pleasing, charming words of an enlightening being, Achala greeted Sudhana and said, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
I have an enlightening liberation containing invincible knowledge, and I cultivate enlightening beings’ way of practice of firm resolve. I have also attained mental command of the stage of equanimity in all things, and I am imbued with the light of knowledge to clarify the true state of all phenomena. 
I have also attained concentration of tireless search for truth.” Sudhana asked her about the sphere of these attainments, and she said her state was hard to believe. 
Sudhana urged her to tell him, assuring her that by the power of Buddha and the help of spiritual benefactors he would believe in it, enter into it, investigate, contemplate, follow, and cultivate it, and would not quarrel or make up arbitrary ideas or assumptions about it, but would strive to equal it. 
Achala then said to Sudhana, “A long time ago, in a past eon called Undefiled Light, a buddha named Arms Extended Downward appeared in the world. 
I was the daughter of a king named Vidyuddatta. 
One quiet night, as my parents slept in the inner apartments of the palace, and the men and women of the court were fast asleep, and the sounds of music had all stopped, and my five hundred girl companions were all in bed, as I gazed up at the starry night sky I saw up there the Buddha, like the polar mountain, surrounded by many celestial beings, spirits, preternatural creatures, and countless enlightening beings, his body pervading everywhere with an aura of unobstructed light. 
From his pores came a fragrance that soothed my body and mind and made me happy. 
Getting up from bed, I saluted the Buddha; looking at him, I found I could not determine any limit to the extent of his height and breadth. 
As I reflected on his marks and embellishments of greatness, I thought, ‘By performing what kind of action is such a body obtained? How are the marks and embellishments of greatness attained? How is the aura of light attained? How does the retinue of followers develop? 
How do the mentally produced dwelling and furniture appear? 
How are the inconceivable meditative projections accomplished? 
How is mental command perfected? 
How is eloquence mastered?’ “Reading my mind, that Buddha said to me, ‘Daughter, you should produce an invincible mind to destroy afflictions, an indomitable mind to get rid of all clinging, an intrepid mind to enter into the profound truth, a mind unshakable while descending into the whirlpool of the ocean of sentient beings who are attached to objects, a mind undeluded in the midst of all states of being, a mind tireless in seeking vision of all buddhas, a mind receiving the multitudes of teachings of all buddhas without complacence, a contemplative mind to attain the light of wisdom of all buddha-teachings, a retentive mind remembering the cycles of teaching of all buddhas, a mind free from forgetfulness even in regard to conventional terms, to say nothing of knowledge arising from the word of buddhas; and you should develop a mind of sharing, to distribute the jewels of the Teaching to all sentient beings according to their mentalities.’ “Having heard such principles of the Teaching from the Buddha, desiring omniscience, aiming for the development of the ten powers, seeking the eloquence of a buddha, wishing to purify in myself the aura of light of a buddha, wishing to perfect a body like a buddha, desiring the purity of marks and embellishments of greatness of a buddha, aiming to gain a congregation like a buddha, seeking purification of a buddha-land, wishing to accomplish the deportment of a buddha, wanting to attain the span of life of a buddha, developing a mind that neither afflictions nor anyone concerned with self-liberation alone could break down, like indestructible adamant, I do not remember the arising of a single thought of enjoyment of desires—much less engaging in sexual intercourse—for as many eons thereafter as atoms in this continent. 
I do not remember a single thought of anger toward my relatives, much less toward innocent others. 
I do not remember a single thought related to the idea of self, much less having considered anything my own. 
I do not remember any confusion, or any notion of difference, or yet any indifference, even while in the womb between death and birth, much less while focusing my attention. 
In all those eons I did not forget a single vision of a buddha, not even a dream vision, much less those appearing to the ten eyes of an enlightening being. 
Ever since that original inspiration I have been imbibing the ocean of the Teaching, contemplating and reflecting on every single statement, even in the context of worldly phenomena. 
There is not a single facet of the Teaching that I have not become absorbed in, even in the context of worldly arts and sciences. 
Ever since that first inspiration, while holding the wheel of teaching of the buddhas, I have never omitted even a single word as I learned it, even in following logic, except to regulate the guidance of others. 
There is not a single vow I have not undertaken in the presence of the buddhas I have met since then to purify the ocean of all sentient beings, even carrying out vows made to phantom buddhas. 
There is not a single enlightening practice from the ocean of past enlightening practices of the oceans of buddhas that I have not undertaken to purify my own practice. 
There is not a single sentient being I have seen since then that I have not established in the determination for supreme enlightenment. I do not remember even having a thought of individual liberation since then. 
I do not remember ever conceiving any doubt, any notion of duality, any false discriminations, any notion of variety, any idea of grasping or rejection, any concept of inferior or advanced, or any thought of attachment or resistance, in regard to so much as even a single word or letter of the Teaching, for as many eons as atoms in this continent. “Ever since then I have never been apart from buddhas, enlightening beings, and true spiritual benefactors. 
I have always been hearing of the vows of buddhas, the practices of enlightening beings, the transcendent ways of enlightening beings, the light of knowledge of the stages of enlightening beings, the inexhaustible treasury of mental command and concentration of enlightening beings, the way to enter the infinite network of worlds, the original causes of the infinite realms of sentient beings. 
I have never left the light of knowledge removing the web of afflictions of all beings. 
I have always been acquiring knowledge of the productive causes of the roots of goodness of all beings. I have always been appearing to all beings according to their mentalities. 
I have always been purifying the verbal range to instruct all beings. 
“Having attained this enlightening liberation containing invincible knowledge and this concentration of tireless searches for all truths, accumulating this enlightening way of practice of firm resolve, contemplating this method of mental command of the stage of equanimity in all things and this medium of the light of knowledge clarifying the basis of all things, I am capable of inconceivable miracles. 
Do you want to witness them?” Sudhana said, “I do.” Then, as she sat there, Achala looked into, passed through, followed, and meditated on ten hundred thousand doors of concentration, beginning with the door of enlightening liberation containing invincible knowledge, the door of concentration of tireless searches for all truths, the door of concentration on the arrangement of the sphere of efficacy, the door of concentration on the sphere of the ten powers, and the door of liberation through concentration on the inexhaustible source of all buddhas. 
As soon as Achala had reach these concentrations, Sudhana saw as many worlds as atoms in ten inexpressible numbers of buddha-lands quaking, and appearing made of clear lapis lazuli. 
He also saw in each world a billion sets of four continents and a billion buddhas. 
He also saw the aura of light of each buddha pervading all universes, and he saw the orderly congregations of each buddha. 
Then Achala emerged from concentration and said to Sudhana, “Did you see? 
Did you hear? 
Did you understand?” Sudhana said, “I saw, I heard, I understood.” Achala said, “In this way, learning enlightening beings’ practice of firm resolve, absorbed in tireless search for all truths, established in enlightening beings’ way of liberation by invincible knowledge, I satisfy all sentient beings with good explanation by following mental command of the stage of equanimity in all things, using the skill of the light of knowledge of how to elucidate the basis of all things. 
How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who are imbued with inconceivable, measureless virtues, who are like eagles soaring independently through the sky, who plunge into the sea of sentient beings to take out the mature enlightening beings, who search the treasure island of omniscience for the jewels of knowledge of the ten powers, who go like strong fishers into the sea of the mundane whirl with the net of the Teaching to mature beings born amid craving and pull them out of it, who go like titan kings throughout all realms of existence quelling the titanic disturbances and agitations of afflictions, who rise like the sun in the sky of the reality realm to evaporate the water of beings’ cravings and dry up the mud of afflictions, who rise like the full moon in the sky to awaken the water lilies of the minds of the teachable, who support all beings equally, whether friendly or hostile, high or low, to plant and grow the sprouts of roots of goodness in all sentient beings, who go everywhere unhindered like the wind to uproot the afflictions and views of all sentient beings, who go through the world like sovereigns uniting all beings with generosity, kindness, assistance, and cooperation? 
“South of here is a city called Tosala in a land called Amitatosala. There is a mendicant named Sarvagamin living there. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to Achala and left. 
Sarvagamin His mind on the devotee Achala, remembering her teaching, absorbing what she had shown him, what she had told him, what she had described to him, what she had enjoined on him, what she had shared with him, what she had disclosed to him, what she had set forth to him, following it, reflecting on it, entering into it, cultivating it, embodying it, contemplating it, clarifying it, living up to it, Sudhana made his way from place to place, finally reaching the land of Amitatosala. 
Entering the city at sunset, he went from block to block, street to street, looking for the mendicant Sarvagamin. 
In the still of the night, he saw a mountain called Sulabha, north of the city. The mountain peak was adorned with thickets and groves of various plants and trees and was as bright as the sun. Seeing that light, Sudhana was ecstatic: 
he thought to himself, “I will undoubtedly see the spiritual benefactor on this mountaintop.” Sudhana went out of the city to the mountain and climbed to the shining peak, where he saw the mendicant Sarvagamin from afar. The appearance of the mendicant was superior to that of the great god Brahma, glorious and radiant; he was walking around surrounded by ten thousand brahmic gods. 
Sudhana went up to Sarvagamin, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear that you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Sarvagamin said, “It is good that you have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment. 
In wandering through all worlds of living beings and inanimate objects, in wandering through the realms of existence of all beings, in the occasions of death of all sentient beings, in the occasions of birth of all sentient beings, in all kinds of conditions of existence, in the various places of birth, the worlds and abodes, of sentient beings of various appearances, forms, and sizes, bound to various kinds of existence, with various aims, wedded to various views and courses of action, believing in various forms of religion, I work for the benefit of sentient beings by various means and various applications of knowledge. 
Some I help by teaching various worldly arts, by means of the light of mental command of all kinds of arts. 
Some I help by charity, kindness, assistance, and cooperation, to lead them to omniscient knowledge. 
Some I help by describing the ways of transcendence, generating the light of knowledge of dedication to omniscience. 
Some I help by praising the aspiration for enlightenment, producing a basis for preservation of the seed of enlightenment. 
Some I help by describing all facets of the practices of enlightening beings, fostering the commitment to purify all buddha-lands and perfect all beings. 
Some I help by frightening them, showing them the misery and pain resulting from evil actions. 
Some I help by delighting them, telling them about the fruit of omniscience ultimately developing from giving gifts to all buddhas. 
Some I help by describing the virtues and qualities of all buddhas, to generate desire for the qualities of buddhas and determination for omniscience. 
Some I help by eulogizing the greatness of buddhas, to generate the desire to embody buddhahood and be constantly engaged in spontaneous, ceaseless buddha-work. 
Some I help by showing the mastery of buddhas, to generate the desire to attain supreme buddhahood. 
“Furthermore, in every street, every block, every house, every district, every family and group, I assume forms like the men and women, boys and girls, and expound the Teaching to them according to their dispositions, aims, powers, and thoughts; they do not know who is teaching them or where I am from; they just practice truthfully what they have heard. 
And I go everywhere on this continent to those who are immersed in the views of false doctrines, in order to mature those who cling to various views. 
And just as I do so throughout the continent, so also do I work for the benefit of all beings on earth, in the galaxy, in the universe, in infinite worlds, in the paths of all beings, in the abodes of all beings, in the thoughts in which all beings rest, in the groups of all beings, in the masses of all beings, in all races of beings, among all types of beings, wherever they be, helping them according to their mentalities and inclinations, through various means, various methods, various approaches, various efforts, various devices, various expedients, various activities, assuming various forms, and speaking in various languages. 
“I know this enlightening practice of going everywhere. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings with bodies equal to all beings, who have attained concentration in which their own bodies and all bodies are indivisible, whose vast sphere of emanation adapts to all states of existence, who pass through existence in all worlds in their own bodies, who are intent on mystical projections pleasing to the sight of all beings, who appear to be born in all races, who carry out their vows unimpeded in all ages, who can manifest the interrelated cosmic network of practices, who are devoted to working for the welfare of all beings while living together with them without becoming defiled, who realize the basic equality of the worlds of past, present, and future, who are imbued with endless great compassion appearing in the realm of selfless knowledge, who aim to foster good in all beings? 
“South of here is a land called Prthurashtra, where there lives an eminent perfumer named Utpalabhuti. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects to the mendicant Sarvagamin and left. 
Utpalabhuti Unconcerned with body and life, unconcerned with any material things, unconcerned with enjoyment of any people or places, unconcerned with objects of the senses, unconcerned with enjoying the experiences that go along with having followers, unconcerned with kingship, dominion, or power, concerned with developing, guiding, and purifying all sentient beings, with achieving supreme purity of a buddha-land, with tirelessly attending and serving all buddhas, with knowing and according with the inherent nature of all things, with permanently attaining the virtues of all enlightening beings, with carrying out the vows of enlightening beings through all ages, with entering the ocean of congregations of all buddhas, with entering all concentrations of enlightening beings in each particular mode of concentration by mystic transformation, with tirelessly receiving the light of knowledge of all truths through the cycles of teachings of all buddhas, pondering these and other virtues of all enlightening beings, Sudhana made his way to Prthurashtra, where he sought and found the eminent perfumer Utpalabhuti. 
Seeing the perfumer, Sudhana went up to him, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment, seeking the knowledge common to all buddhas, wishing to fulfill the vows fulfilled by all buddhas, wishing to see the embodiments of all buddhas, wishing to attain the reality body of all buddhas, wishing to know the body of knowledge of truths of all buddhas, wishing to purify all enlightening practices, wishing to manifest the sphere of concentration of all enlightening beings, wishing to master the sphere of mental command of all enlightening beings, wishing to disperse all obstructions, wishing to travel through all lands. 
How does an enlightening being gain access to omniscience?” Utpalabhuti said, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
I also know the sources of all fragrances. I know celestial fragrances, and I also know the fragrances of other types of beings, human and nonhuman. Indeed, I know various kinds of fragrances. I know fragrances that cure illness, I know fragrances that remove depression, I know fragrances that produce mundane joy, I know fragrances that incite passions, I know fragrances that extinguish passions, I know fragrances that produce pleasure in enjoyment of various created things, I know fragrances that produce rejection of all created things, I know fragrances that remove arrogance and heedlessness, I know fragrances that produce thoughts of Buddha, I know fragrances that accord with the principles of the Teaching, fragrances enjoyable to sages, the variety of fragrances of enlightening beings, and the fragrances of the arrangement of all stages of enlightening beings. 
I also know the external appearance of all these fragrances, as well as their source, production, manifestation, perfection, purification, removal, application, use, sphere of action, efficacy, nature, and root. 
“In the human world there is a fragrance said to come from the agitation of water spirits: one grain the size of a sesame seed will cause this whole country to be covered with fragrant clouds that shower fine fragrant rain for seven days. 
Those on whose bodies or clothing that fragrant water falls become as brilliant as golden flowers, and any houses or buildings on which it falls become as brilliant as golden flowers. 
And any who smell the scent of that fragrant water wafting in on the breeze become ecstatic for seven days and experience many kinds of physical and mental pleasure and delight. Furthermore, no illness—whether due to constitutional upset or external trauma—occurs in their bodies, nor do they suffer any mental distress or depression, nor do they have any fear, anxiety, fright, agitation, or ill will. They become kind to one another, happy, and joyful. 
When they have become happy and joyful, I begin to purify their minds and teach them in such a way that they become certain of supreme enlightenment. 
“There is a kind of sandalwood that comes from the mountains which will protect those anointed with its essence from burning even if they fall into a fire. 
The sound of kettledrums or conches smeared with it will drive away all enemy armies. 
There is a kind of aloe called ‘lotus calyx’ from the banks of the lake Heatless; a grain of it the size of a sesame seed will fill the whole continent with fragrance such that all who smell it gain a disciplined mind rejecting evil. 
There is a kind of fragrance from the Himalaya Mountains which is such that all who smell it become dispassionate; then I teach them in such a way that they attain a concentration called ‘sphere of dispassion.’ There is a kind of fragrance from the world of spirits called ‘ocean storehouse’ which is produced for the use of sovereign rulers; perfumed by it, the ruler and the ruler’s armies stand in the sky. 
There is a kind of incense called ‘beautiful array’ originating in the celestial hall of the good doctrine; when it is burned, celestial beings gain awareness of the scent of enlightenment. 
There is a kind of incense from the pure treasuries in the palace of the heaven of timely portion; when it is burned, inhabitants of that heaven all go to the ruler of the heaven of timely portion, who then talks to them about the Teaching. 
There is a kind of incense in the heaven of satisfaction which, when burned before an enlightened being destined to become a buddha in one lifetime who is sitting on the throne of the Teaching, fills the whole cosmos at once with a great fragrant cloud and causes rain from the great cloud of the Teaching to shower in many arrays on the audiences of all buddhas. 
There is a kind of incense called ‘fascinating’ in the palace of the king of the heaven of beautiful emanations which, when burned, causes rain to shower from the cloud of the inconceivable Teaching for seven days. 
“I know this art of perfuming. 
How can I know the practice, tell of the virtues, elucidate the method of purification of conduct, convey the irreproachable action, or explain the malice-free words, thoughts, and deeds of the enlightening beings who are free from foulness, who are void of lusts, who are free from the snares of the demon of afflictions, who have transcended all conditions of existence, who proceed with material form as being something in the magic of knowing, who are unstained by any world, whose way of life is free from attachment, who have purified the sphere of unobstructed knowledge, who are in the realm of unimpeded knowledge, who do not take refuge in any abode or rely on anything in existence? 
“South of here is a city called Kutagara, where there lives a mariner named Vaira. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to Utpalabhuti and left. 
Vaira On the way to the city Kutagara, Sudhana observed where the road was variously low and high, even and uneven, dusty and dust-free, safe and perilous, impassable and unobstructed, crooked and straight. 
As he went along he thought, “My going to that spiritual benefactor will be a means of accomplishment of the path of enlightening beings, a means of accomplishment of the path of knowledge to assist sentient beings; it will be a means of accomplishment of the path of transcendence, a means of accomplishment of the path of knowledge to assist sentient beings. 
It will become a means of stopping all beings from falling into attachment and rejection, arrogance and servility; a means of turning all beings away from bad inclinations; a means of ridding all beings of the dust of afflictions; a means of removing the thorns and grit of wrong views from all sentient beings; a means of absorption in the unobstructed reality realm; a means of leading to the eternal citadel of omniscience. 
Why is that? 
Spiritual benefactors are mines of all that is good, sources of omniscience.” With these thoughts in mind, with a purpose rarely encountered, he made his way to Kutagara city looking for the mariner Vaira. 
When he got there, he saw the mariner surrounded by hundreds of thousands of merchants and hundreds of thousands of other people who wished to hear him talk, explaining to them the oceans of virtues of buddhas by talking about the ocean. 
Sudhana went up to Vaira, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear that you give enlightening beings instruction, and I hope you will tell me how one is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Vaira said, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment and ask about the means of attaining great knowledge, about the cause of the various miseries of the mundane whirl, about the means of arriving at the island of omniscience, about the means of producing the indestructible vehicle of universal salvation, about the means of attaining the path leading away from the danger of falling into the state of individual liberation, about the source of the path of knowledge of the way to attain all kinds of tranquil concentrations, about the source of the unobstructed path of the chariot of vows carrying the practice of enlightening beings which goes everywhere, about the means of development and purification of the path guided by the nature of enlightening practice adorned with all waves of energy, about the means of development and purification of the endless path facing all things, the means of development and purification of the path into the ocean of omniscience. 
“I live in this coastal metropolis of Kutagara, purifying enlightening practice characterized by great compassion. Observing those on this continent who are poor, I practice such spiritual exercises as will cause their wishes to be fulfilled: I will take care of their mundane needs, and I will satisfy them with spiritual enjoyments; I will teach them the way to accumulate virtue, I will foster knowledge in them, I will promote the growth of the power of roots of goodness, I will inspire them to seek enlightenment, I will purify their aspiration for enlightenment, I will firmly establish their power of great compassion, I will get them to extinguish the misery of the mundane whirl, I will firmly establish their power to act in the mundane world without tiring, and I will get them to care for all living beings. 
I will set them at the gate of entry into the ocean of virtue, I will produce in them the light of knowledge of the ocean of truths, I will turn them toward the ocean of all buddhas, and I will plunge them into the ocean of omniscience. 
“With these thoughts in mind I roam this city on the edge of the ocean. 
Thus committed to the welfare and happiness of the world, I know all the treasure islands in the ocean. I know all the deposits of precious substances, all the types of precious substances, and all the sources of precious substances. 
I know how to refine, bore out, extract, and produce all precious substances, and I know all precious vessels, tools, and objects, and the light of all precious substances. 
I know the abodes of all water spirits, the agitations of all water spirits, the abodes of all sprites, the agitations of all sprites, the abodes of all goblins, how to alleviate the danger of goblins, the abodes of all ghosts, and how to put an end to obstacles caused by ghosts. 
I know how to avoid all the whirlpools and billows, and I know the colors and depths of all the waters. I know the cycles of the sun, moon, stars, and planets, and the lengths of the days and nights. 
I know when to travel and when not to; I know when it is safe and when it is dangerous. 
I know the performance and soundness of the hull and rigging of ships. 
I know how to control and steer ships, I know how to catch the wind, I know where the winds rise from, I know how to direct the ship and how to turn it around, I know when to anchor and when to sail. “With this knowledge, always engaged in working for the benefit of beings, with a sturdy ship, safe, peaceful, without anxiety, I convey merchants to the treasure islands of their choice, pleasing them with spiritual conversation. Having enriched them with all kinds of jewels, I bring them back to this continent. And I have never lost a single ship. 
All who see me or hear my spiritual instruction are freed from all fears of sinking in the ocean of the mundane whirl; they become aware of the knowledge of how to go into the ocean of omniscience, they learn how to evaporate the ocean of craving, they are illumined with knowledge of the ocean of past, present, and future, they become capable of annihilating the ocean of suffering of all sentient beings, they undertake to clear the turbidity of the ocean of minds of all sentient beings, they begin the heroic effort to purify the ocean of all lands, they never turn back from going throughout the ocean of all places, they penetrate the variety in the ocean of faculties of all sentient beings, they adapt to the ocean of actions of all sentient beings, and they appear in the ocean of the world intentionally according to the mental set. 
“I have attained this enlightening liberation which is characterized by great compassion and the sound of flowing water, and it is beneficial to see me, hear me, live with me, and remember my name; but how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who traverse all the oceans of the mundane whirl, who are unaffected by the ocean of afflictions, who are free from the danger of being engulfed by the ocean of views, who travel the water of inherent nature of the ocean of all phenomena, who travel the ground of inherent nature of the ocean of all beings, who hold the net of means of salvation of all creatures from the oceans of the mundane, who abide in the ocean of omniscience, who pull all sentient beings out of the ocean of attachments, who remain continuously through the ocean of all times, who have true higher knowledge to perfect the ocean of all sentient beings, who do not miss the right occasions to guide the ocean of all sentient beings? 
“South of here is a city called Nandihara. An eminent man named Jayottama lives there. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects and reluctantly left the mariner Vaira. 
Jayottama His mind filled with great love for the infinite realm of life, overflowing with great compassion, having amassed immense stores of virtue and knowledge, freed from the defilement of ignorance, passion, and all afflictions, realizing the equality of all things, proceeding equanimously on the path of omniscience, having eradicated the entryways into countless bad tendencies, proceeding heroically by the power of steadfast energy immune to all evils, filled with great calm by the inconceivable concentrations of an enlightening being, having thoroughly dispelled the darkness of ignorance by the light of the sun of wisdom, adorned with flowers of knowledge vivified by the moon of bliss and the breeze of means, according with the principles of knowledge of liberation through the ocean of great vows, imbued with knowledge pervading the reality realm unimpeded, facing the entrance of the imperishable city of omniscience, seeking the path of enlightening beings, Sudhana made his way to the city of Nandihara and sought out the eminent Jayottama, whom he saw in a grove at the eastern edge of the city, surrounded by thousands of elders, giving instructions regarding the various affairs of the city, in the course of which he was also talking about spirituality in order to get rid of all egoism, possessiveness, acquisitiveness, clinging to material things, dependency, binding cravings, impeding views, obscuring doubts, beclouding deceit and guile, defiling envy and jealousy, in order to clear and purify everyone’s minds, in order to inspire them to delight in the vision of buddhas by fostering the power of pure faith in them, in order to get them to accept the buddha-teachings by bringing forth the powers of enlightening beings in turn, in order to generate the power of concentration of enlightening beings by revealing to them the practices of enlightening beings, in order to purify enlightening beings’ power of recollection by showing them the power of wisdom of enlightening beings. 
Sudhana went up to the grandee Jayottama, bowed to him, and with respect for the Teaching said, “I am Sudhana, O noble one, and I seek the practice of enlightening beings. 
Please tell me how to learn the practice of enlightening beings, how to orient myself to the disciplines that will perfect all sentient beings while I am learning, how to see all buddhas, how to hear the teaching of all buddhas, how to remember the multitudes of teachings of all buddhas, how to carry out the principles of the teachings of all buddhas, how to perform the practice of enlightening beings in all worlds, how to be indefatigable living in all ages by the practice of enlightening beings, how to perceive the transformation of all who have gone to Thusness, how to receive the empowerment of all buddhas, how to attain knowledge of the powers of all buddhas.” Jayottama said to Sudhana, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
I am purifying the method of enlightening practice that goes everywhere, by the power of attainment of nondoing based on nonbeing. 
By this method of purification of enlightening practice going everywhere, I expound the Teaching in all realms of being in the universe, I oppose untruth, I stop controversy, conflict, strife, combat, and hostility. 
I cut through bonds and break prisons apart. I eliminate fears. I put an end to evildoing, I turn people away from killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, falsehood, slander, harshness, divisive talk, longing, malice, and false views. I get them to stop all compulsive activity and to pursue all right and good actions. 
I teach everyone all arts and crafts that bring benefit to the world. I elucidate, articulate, explain, and promote all sciences for the happiness of the world. 
I go along with all false doctrines in order to develop the people involved in them. 
In order to show the excellence of higher knowledge, to put a stop to all views, to inspire interest in the teaching of all buddhas, I approach all the celestial beings in the realm of form all the way up to the world of Brahma and expound the Teaching to them. 
And as I teach in this universe, so also do I teach in as many worlds as atoms in ten unspeakable numbers of decillions of buddha-lands. I teach the ways of buddhas, the ways of enlightening beings, the ways of Buddhist disciples, and the ways of individual illuminates. I teach about the hells, what leads to hell, and the motives and actions of beings in hell. I teach about animality, the types who tend toward animality, what leads to animality, and the misery of animalistic life. 
I teach about the underworld, what leads to the underworld, and the misery of the underworld. I teach about heavens, what leads to heaven, and the enjoyments of heaven. I teach about the human world, what leads to the human world, and the variety of pleasant and unpleasant experiences in the human world. 
“Thus I teach about the law of the world, the formation of the world, the decline of the world, the pain of the world, and emancipation from the world; I expound the Teaching in order to explain the path of practice of enlightening beings, to remove the ills of the mundane world, to show the virtues of omniscience, to extinguish the pain of infatuation with states of being, to elucidate the unimpeded nature of reality, to clarify the ordinary conduct of the world, to point out the happiness and misery of the conduct of all beings in the world, to show the notions on which all worlds are based, to elucidate the independent state of those who realize Thusness, to fend off all active afflictions, and to show the progress of the wheel of teaching of the enlightened. 
“I know this method of purification of enlightening practice that goes everywhere, an undefiled manifestation of nondoing based on illumination. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of enlightening beings who have all mystic knowledges, who go throughout all lands with the body of knowledge of illusoriness, who have attained the stage of knowledge of the universal eye, who hear all utterances, who have attained control of the light of the way to truth that pervades past, present, and future, who are heroic masters of knowledge comprehending all things, who speak with the voice of totality communicating to infinite sentient beings according to their mentalities, who have phantom bodies the same as all enlightening beings pleasing to the masses of sentient beings with their various wishes, who are intent upon one and the same inconceivable body of all buddhas, whose body of knowledge pervades past, present, and future, whose sphere is as vast and measureless as the sky? 
“South of here, in the land of Shronaparanta, is a city called Kalingavana, where a nun named Sinhavijurmbhita lives. Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to Jayottama and left. 
Sinhavijurmbhita Then Sudhana made his way to the city called Kalingavana in the land of Shronaparanta, where he asked everyone he met the whereabouts of the nun Sinhavijurmbhita. 
As he was looking for the nun, everywhere he went hundreds of boys and girls came together from the streets and intersections and blocked the way. 
There were also hundreds of men and women, who told him, “the nun Sinhavijurmbhita is in this city, staying in Sunlight Park, which was donated by Jayaprabha, where she is expounding the Teaching for the benefit of countless beings.” So then Sudhana went to this Sunlight Park and looked all around. 
In the park he saw trees called “moon-risen,” which were covered like pavilions, of flamelike color and blazing radiance, lighting up the space of a league all around. 
He also saw leafy trees called “completely covering,” which are shaped like parasols, their clustered leaves providing shade, shining like blue crystal clouds. 
He saw flowering trees called “treasury of flowers,” which had various pleasing forms like the Himalaya Mountains and showered endless streams of varicolored flowers, like the trees of paradise adorning the heavens. 
He also saw ever-ripe sweet fruit trees called “gathering of fruits of indescribable sweetness,” which had the appearance of golden polar mountains and were always bearing fruit. 
He also saw jewel trees called “treasury of radiance,” which looked like incomparable jewels and bore riches in buds producing garlands and ornaments of celestial jewels and wish-fulfilling gems, and were adorned by jewels of countless colors. 
He also saw trees of cloth called “soothing,” from which hung precious celestial cloths of various colors. 
He also saw trees of musical instruments called “pleasing,” which produced music more sweet and pleasant than that of the heavens. 
He also saw trees of fragrance called “gracing everywhere,” which pervaded everywhere with all kinds of pleasing fragrances. 
There were also cool lotus ponds, with steps made of bricks of seven precious substances arrayed on four sides, surrounded by benches of various jewels painted with sandalwood fragrance, set in ground made of blue lapis lazuli, the bottom covered with gold sand, the ponds filled with water pleasantly scented with celestial fragrance, the surface of the water covered with varicolored lotuses of heavenly scent and texture, the air around them filled with the songs of birds, more lovely than the heavens, all surrounded by rows of beautiful trees of various celestial treasures. 
At the foot of each of those treasure trees were arranged jewel lion seats of various pleasing forms, adorned with innumerable jewels of various kinds, spread with various precious celestial cloths, perfumed with incenses of all kinds of celestial fragrances, covered with canopies of various jewels hung with precious silks surpassing those of the heavens, enveloped in nets of gold adorned by various jewels, with circlets of bells giving forth pleasant sounds, surrounded by hundreds of thousands of celestial seats. 
At the foot of one precious tree he saw a lion seat in the calyx of a jewel lotus; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a fragrant diamond lotus; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a diamond lotus ornamented with dragons; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a diamond lotus with clusters of jewel lions; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a lotus of luminous jewels; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a lotus of the finest diamonds; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a lotus of world-illumining jewels; at another, a lion seat in the calyx of a lotus of jewels of white light. 
He saw that the ground of the whole park was scattered with various jewels, just as the ocean is scattered with jewel islands. 
The earth, studded with blue lapis lazuli and inlaid with all kinds of jewels, was soft and pleasant to the touch, and would give way and spring back as one walked on it. 
The sweet sounds of the calls of various birds were heard, and the park was graced with well-arrayed stands of heavenly precious sandalwood trees. 
There were endless streams of jewel blossoms raining from clouds of various jewel flowers in a magnificent array surpassing the pleasure garden of Indra, chief of gods. 
There were well-spaced towers with various incomparably fragrant incenses always burning, more magnificent than Indra’s hall of justice, covered above with nets of various jewels surpassing those of the heavens, hung with garlands of pearl flowers spread all over with nets of shining gold arrayed with jewel bells. 
Trees of various musical instruments, jewel palm trees with nets of bells, played sweet music as they were stirred by the breeze, and the singing of goddesses was also heard. 
He saw Sunlight Park adorned with hundreds of thousands of towers arrayed with inconceivable, innumerable jewels, beautiful as the castle of the god Indra. 
Sudhana saw this Sunlight Park by the strength of the mystic power of the nun Sinhavijurmbhita. 
Sudhana looked all over and saw these magnificent adornments of the park, replete with infinite, inconceivable qualities, perfected by the maturation of the work of the enlightening being, born of vast supramundane roots of good, deriving from making offerings to inconceivably many buddhas, unsurpassed by all worldly goodness, sprung forth from the illusory nature of phenomena, composed of the results of extensive pure good works, without contamination, produced by the power deriving from the past virtuous actions of the nun Sinhavijurmbhita, unique, beyond the individually liberated, immune to the destructive influence of false teachers, imperceptible to maniacs and ignoramuses. 
In all of those lion seats under the various precious trees he saw the nun Sinhavijurmbhita sitting, surrounded by a great company of followers, calm, composed, her senses and mind quiet, well controlled, her senses subdued, as restrained as an elephant, her mind pellucid and clear as a deep pool, granter of all desires like a wish-fulfilling jewel, unaffected by worldly things as a lotus is not clung to by water, fearless as a lion, with polished expertise, unshakable as a mountain, pure in conduct, soothing the minds of beings like intoxicating perfume, extinguishing the burning of afflictions like sandalwood from the snowy mountains, alleviating the pains of all sentient beings like the medicine “good to see,” beneficial to all who behold her, producing the physical and mental bliss of quiescence like the light of a buddha free from the ills and delusions of passion, clearing the minds of sentient beings polluted by afflictions like the water-purifying crystal, promoting the growth of roots of virtue like a good field. 
He saw her sitting in those seats, with various audiences in the surrounding seats. 
In one setting he saw the nun surrounded by gods of the heaven of pure abodes, expounding a doctrine called unity with endless liberation; in another he saw her surrounded by gods of Brahma’s heaven, expounding a purity of the sphere of the voice called division of the universal ground; in another he saw her surrounded by gods and goddesses of the heaven of control of others’ emanations, expounding a doctrine called array of powers of purification of mind of enlightening beings; in another he saw her surrounded by gods and goddesses of the heaven of enjoyable emanations, expounding a doctrine called pure array of all phenomena; in another he saw her surrounded by gods and goddesses of the heaven of satisfaction, expounding a doctrine called resorting to the treasury of one’s own mind; in another he saw her surrounded by gods and goddesses of the heaven of timely portion, expounding a doctrine called endless array; in another he saw her surrounded by gods and goddesses of the thirty-three-fold heaven, expounding a doctrine called the method of rejecting; in another he saw her surrounded by water spirits, nymphs, and sprites, expounding a doctrine called array of lights of the sphere of buddhas; in another he saw her surrounded by demigods and demigoddesses and their children, expounding a doctrine called treasury of salvation of the world; in another he saw her surrounded by celestial musicians, expounding a doctrine called endless giving of delight; in another he saw her surrounded by titans, with their wives and children, expounding a doctrine called manifestation of power of reason in the knowledge of the reality realm; in another he saw her surrounded by fantastic birds, expounding a doctrine called the sphere of action concerned with alarming those in the ocean of existence; in another he saw her surrounded by centaurs expounding a doctrine called the range of manifestation of the action of Buddha; in another he saw her surrounded by great serpents, expounding a doctrine called production of the joy of the enlightened; in another he saw her surrounded by hundreds of thousands of women, men, boys and girls, expounding a doctrine called higher reaches of knowledge; in another he saw her surrounded by goblins, expounding a doctrine called production of compassion; in another he saw her surrounded by people devoted to the vehicle of listeners, expounding a doctrine called higher power of knowledge; in another he saw her surrounded by people devoted to the vehicle of individual illumination, expounding a doctrine called splendor of the illustrious virtues of buddhas; in another he saw her surrounded by people devoted to the Great Vehicle of universal enlightenment, expounding a medium of light of knowledge of concentration called door to totality; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings who had just been inspired to seek enlightenment, expounding a medium of concentration called multitude of vows of all buddhas; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the second stage, expounding a medium of concentration called sphere of dispassion; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the third stage, expounding a medium of concentration called sphere of tranquillity; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the fourth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called production of the field of action of the energy of omniscience; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings of the fifth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called treasury of flowers of the tendrils of the mind; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the sixth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called filled with light; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the seventh stage, expounding a medium of concentration called adornment of the stage of totality; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the eighth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called realm of the body distributed equally throughout the structure of the cosmos; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the ninth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called array of the abode of the power of nonacquisition; in another he saw her surrounded by enlightening beings in the tenth stage, expounding a medium of concentration called sphere of nonobstruction; in another he saw her teaching an audience of thunderbolt bearers a doctrine called mighty array of thunderbolts of knowledge. 
Thus he saw the mature, the teachable, the capable among those in all states of being gathered in this park, each type in a separate assembly, with various inclinations and interests, firmly intent and deeply faithful, with the nun Sinhavijurmbhita teaching them each in such a way that all became certain of supreme perfect enlightenment. 
How was that so? 
Because the nun Sinhavijurmbhita had gone into countless tens of hundreds of thousands of doors of transcendent wisdom, beginning with the equanimity of the universal eye, exposition of all buddhas’ teachings, differentiation of the planes of the reality realm, dispersing all obstructions, production of good thoughts in all sentient beings, supreme adornment, matrix of the principle of nonattachment, sphere of the realm of reality, treasury of mind, and source of miracles pleasing to all. 
And all the enlightening beings and others who came to this park to see the nun Sinhavijurmbhita and hear her teach were guided by her, from the beginning accumulation of virtues, until she had made them irreversible on the way to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Then Sudhana, having seen the nun Sinhavijurmbhita with such an abode, such furnishings, such an audience, such mastery, such mystic power, and such eloquence, and having heard her teaching, his mind drenched by the immense cloud of the Teaching, his thoughts toward Sinhavijurmbhita pure, he prostrated himself and then circled her in respect hundreds of thousands of times. 
At that time the whole park and the congregations were suffused with a glorious light from the nun. 
Having made hundreds of thousands of circumambulations, he noticed that as he circumambulated he saw the nun whichever way he faced. 
He stood before her and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instructions, so please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” She said, “I have attained the enlightening liberation of removal of all vain imaginings.” Sudhana asked her about the sphere of this liberation, and she said, “It is the light of knowledge whose nature is instantaneous awareness of the phenomena of past, present, and future.” Sudhana asked about the compass of this light of knowledge, and she replied, “As I go in and out the door of this light of knowledge, there is born in me a concentration called ‘possessed of all phenomena,’ by the attainment of which concentration I go to all worlds in the ten directions with mentally produced bodies to present offerings as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands with bodies as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands to each of the enlightening beings in the heavens of satisfaction who are bound to attain buddhahood in one lifetime. 
In the forms of all sorts of beings, bringing all sorts of gifts, I go to make offerings to the enlightening beings in the heavens of satisfaction who are going to become buddhas in the next life, and I go to all the buddhas, be they in the womb, being born, at home, leaving home, going to the heights of enlightenment, at the pinnacle of enlightenment, having become supremely perfectly enlightened, gone to various realms of existence, or entering final extinction after having satisfied the minds of all beings, making such offerings with such mentally produced bodies. 
Those sentient beings who know my work of making offerings to buddhas all become certain of supreme perfect enlightenment. 
And to all those sentient beings who come to me I give instruction in this same transcendent wisdom. 
“I see all beings with the eye of knowledge, yet I do not conceive any notion of ‘sentient being,’ and do not imagine so. 
I hear all beings’ verbal signals, yet I do not imagine so, because I do not enter into the spheres of any discourses. 
I see all buddhas, yet I do not imagine so, because I know their body is reality. 
I remember the cycles of teachings of all buddhas, but I do not imagine so, because I am aware of the true nature of things. 
I pervade the cosmos in every moment of awareness, but I do not imagine so, because I know the nature of things as existing in illusion. 
“Thus, I know the enlightening liberation of removal of all vain imaginings; but how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who penetrate the infinite cosmos of realities, who are free from vain imaginings about all things, who pervade all realms of reality while sitting cross-legged in one body, who see all buddha-lands in their own bodies, who go to all buddhas in a single instant, in whose own beings the miracles of all buddhas are taking place, who lift up untold buddha-lands with a single hair, who show the eons of becoming and dissolution of untold worlds in their own pores, who in a single instant enter into the commonality of coexistence in untold eons, who enter untold eons in a single instant? 
“South of here, in the land of Durga, is a city called Ratnavyuha, where Vasumitra, a worshiper of the god of light, is living. Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So, paying his respects to the nun Sinhavijurmbhita, Sudhana left her and went on his way. 
Vasumitra His mind illumined by the lightning of great vision, meditating on the light of omniscience, observing the manifestation of power of essential nature, making firm the mnemonic command of the treasury of verbal communications of all beings, extending the mnemonic command to retain the cycles of teachings of all buddhas, establishing the power of great compassion as a refuge for all sentient beings, examining the power of omniscience which is the source of the means of perceiving the principles of all laws, following the purity of vows extending throughout the cosmos, clarifying the light of knowledge illumining all things, developing the power of mystic knowledge pervading all phenomena arraying the worlds of the ten directions, fulfilling the vow to remember, undertake, and accomplish all the deeds of enlightening beings, Sudhana made his way to the city of Ratnavyuha in the country of Durga, where he sought out Vasumitra. 
People there who did not know of Vasumitra’s virtues or the scope of her knowledge said to Sudhana, “What has someone like you—with senses so calm and subdued, so aware, so clear, without confusion or distraction, your gaze focused discreetly right before you, your mind not overwhelmed by sensations, not clinging to appearances, your eyes averted from involvement in all forms, your mind so cool and steady, your way of life profound, wise, oceanic, your mind free from agitation or despondency—what have you to do with Vasumitra? 
You should not have any lust for her, your head should not be turned by her, you should not have any such-impure thoughts, you should not be ravaged by such desires, you should not be under the power of a woman, you should not be so bewitched, you should not enter the realm of temptation, you should not sink into the mire of sensuality, you should not be bound by the snares of the devil, you should not do what should not be done.” Those who knew the excellence of the virtues of Vasumitra, however, and who were aware of the scope of her knowledge, said, “Good, good! 
You have really made gain if you ask about Vasumitra. 
You surely seek buddhahood; you surely want to make yourself a refuge for all sentient beings; you surely want to extract the barbs of passion from all sentient beings; you surely want to transform the notion of purity. 
Vasumitra is in her house, north of the town square.” Hearing this, Sudhana was delighted. 
He went to Vasumitra’s house and saw that it was surrounded by ten jewel walls, ten circles of jewel trees, and ten moats filled with fragrant water covered by celestial jewel lotuses of various colors, with gold sand spread on the bottom, the rippling waters producing an intoxicating fragrance, the banks adorned by many jewels. The house had well-arranged apartments and towers made of all kinds of precious substances; it had high arched doorways and circular windows, draped with nets and blazing with jewels. 
It was adorned with fences of countless various jewels, and its base was composed of masses of jewels studded with lapis lazuli. 
It was perfumed with all kinds of fragrant oils. The walls were studded with all kinds of jewels, and the roof was inland with various gems and covered with a gold net. 
A hundred thousand webs of gold bells gave off sweet, pleasant sounds as they rustled in the breeze. 
The house was adorned with sprays of jewel flowers from clouds of flowers of all kinds of jewels. 
The doors were decorated with multicolored banners of all kinds of jewels. 
The house had diamond beams made from the limbs of gigantic brilliant jewel trees, and it was an inexhaustible treasury of hundreds and thousands of riches in full view; it was also adorned with ten large gardens set around it. 
There he saw Vasumitra, who was beautiful, with golden skin and black hair, her limbs and body well proportioned, more beautiful in form than all celestial and human beings in the realm of desire, her voice finer even than that of the god Brahma. 
She knew the language of all beings; she had a pleasant voice that could pronounce any sound, and was skilled in freedom of phonetic organization. 
She was well versed in all arts and sciences, she had learned to use the magic of true knowledge, and she had mastered all aspects of the expedient means of enlightening beings. 
She wore a tiara of large wish-fulfilling gems, her waist was adorned with diamonds, and she had a lapis lazuli necklace on. 
She had a large, attractive retinue, all with the same virtues, the same practice, and the same vow. 
She was an inexhaustible treasury of goodness and knowledge. 
He also saw the whole house, with all its jeweled apartments and furnishings lit up by the lovely, refreshing, pleasant, blissful, enrapturing light that emanated from her body. 
Sudhana went up to Vasumitra, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
And all who come to me with minds full of passion, I teach them so that they become free of passion. 
Those who have heard my teaching and attain dispassion achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘realm of nonattachment.’ “Some attain dispassion as soon as they see me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘delight in joy.’ Some attain dispassion merely by talking with me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘treasury of unimpeded sound.’ Some attain dispassion just by holding my hand, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘basis of going to all buddha-lands.’ Some attain dispassion just by staying with me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘light of freedom from bondage.’ Some attain dispassion just by gazing at me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘tranquil expression.’ Some attain dispassion just by embracing me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘womb receiving all sentient beings without rejection.’ Some attain dispassion just by kissing me, and achieve an enlightening concentration called ‘contact with the treasury of virtue of all beings.’ All those who come to me I establish in this enlightening liberation of ultimate dispassion, on the brink of the stage of unimpeded omniscience.” Sudhana asked her, “Where did you plant roots of virtue, and what kind of deeds did you accumulate, that you got to be this way?” She replied, “I recall that in a past age a buddha named Reaching the Heights appeared in the world. 
When the buddha went to the royal capital out of compassion for the people, as he crossed the threshold the whole city quaked and appeared to-be vastly extended and made of jewels, adorned with the luster of many jewels, strewn with flowers of various jewels. A variety of celestial musical instruments played, and the sky appeared covered by high, immeasurable clouds of celestial beings. 
At that time I was the wife of a grandee. Impelled by the miracle of the buddha, I went with my husband in a state of exalted serenity and presented a coin to the buddha on the street. 
At that time Manjushri was an attendant of that buddha; it was by him that I was inspired to seek supreme perfect enlightenment. 
“I know this enlightening liberation of ultimate dispassion, but how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who are endowed with the skill of endless means and knowledge, who are vast, inexhaustible treasuries of good, who are in the realm of invincible knowledge? 
“South of here is a city called Shubhaparamgama, where a householder named Veshthila is presenting offerings to the shrine of the buddha Sandalwood Throne. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects to Vasumitra and left. 
Veshthila Then Sudhana went to Veshthila’s house in the city of Shubhaparamgama. 
Paying his respects to the householder, he said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear that you give enlightening beings instruction; please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Veshthila said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation called ‘not ultimately exhausted.’ To my way of thinking, no buddha in any world ever has, does, or will become finally extinct, except as a docetic device. 
When I opened the door of the shrine of the buddha Sandalwood Throne, I attained an enlightening concentration called ‘manifestation of the endless lineage of buddhas.’ I enter this concentration in each mental moment, and every moment understand many kinds of excellence.” Sudhana asked, “What is the sphere of this concentration?” Veshthila replied, “When I am in this concentration, all the successive buddhas of this world-system—beginning with Kashyapa, Kanakamuni, Krakucchanda, Vishvabhuj, Shikhin, Vipashyin, Tishya, Pushya, Yashottara, and Padmottara—appear to me. 
In the continuity of vision of buddhas, by the continuity of the succession of buddhas, in one mental moment I see a hundred buddhas; in the next moment of awareness I find a thousand buddhas, then a hundred thousand buddhas, a million buddhas, a hundred million, a billion, a trillion, a quadrillion, a quintillion; I immediately become aware of the succession of appearance of untold numbers of buddhas, of as many buddhas as atoms in the continent, as many as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
I also comprehend the order of preparations of those buddhas’ initial aspiration, their spiritual transformation on achieving the aspiration for enlightenment, the purity of execution of their various vows, their purification of action, their fulfillment of the transcendent ways, their attainment of all the stages of enlightening beings, their perfection of attainment of tolerance, their conquering of demons, the supernal manifestation of their spiritual transfiguration on becoming perfectly enlightened, the variety of purity of their buddha-lands, the variety of their development of sentient beings, the variety of their audiences, the variety of their auras of light, the majesty of their teaching activities, and their accomplishment of the miracles of buddhas. I also distinctly remember their teachings, take them up mindfully, examine them in action, analyze them, follow them with discernment, and elucidate them with wisdom. “I also perceive the successive buddhas of the future, beginning with Maitreya, seeing a hundred buddhas in a single mental instant, then a thousand, and so on, uninterruptedly seeing as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands. I also see the order of their aspiration and preparation and so on, and distinctly remember their teachings, take them up mindfully, examine them, follow them, and elucidate them. 
And just as I see the succession of past, future, and present buddhas in this world-system, so do I also comprehend the succession of all buddhas in as many past and future world-systems in the ten directions as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
I also comprehend the order of the aspiration and preparations of those buddhas, and I comprehend the unbroken continuity of the successive incarnations of those buddhas. 
“I am also aware of the succession of buddhas of the present in all worlds in the ten directions, beginning with Vairocana, incomparable, accessible to faith and the vigorous resolution of enlightening beings, increasing the energy of enlightening beings, unsurpassed by any worldlings, individual illuminates, or enlightening beings who have not reached that sphere. 
In a single mental instant I see a hundred buddhas; in the next instant of awareness I see a thousand buddhas, continuing thus without interruption until I meet as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
“I know this enlightening liberation of ultimate nonextinction; how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who have attained instantaneous knowledge of past, present, and future, who dwell in all concentrations in the space of an instant, who are imbued with the light of those who realize Thusness, who realize the equality of all thoughts and imaginations, who are focused on the equality of all buddhas, who abide in the nonduality of self, sentient beings, and buddhas, whose realm is the manifestation of principles, whose nature is clarity, whose workings of knowledge pervade the network of worlds, who dwell unwavering on the seal of the teaching of all buddhas, who are in the range of knowledge making known all realms of reality, who are in the range of knowledge conveying the teachings of all buddhas? 
“South of here is a mountain called Potalaka, where an enlightening being named Avalokiteshvara lives. Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Veshthila said in verse, Go, Sudhana, to Mount Potalaka in the ocean, a pure abode of the valiant, Made of jewels, covered with trees, scattered with flowers, complete with gardens, ponds, and streams. On the mountain the steady, wise Avalokiteshvara dwells for the benefit of the world. Go ask him the virtues of the Guides—he will teach you great, wonderful means of attainment. 
So Sudhana paid his respects to Veshthila and went on. 
Avalokiteshvara Reflecting on the teaching of Veshthila, entering the treasury of zealous application of enlightening beings, remembering the power of mindfulness of enlightening beings, remembering the power of the succession of enlightened guides, realizing the unbroken continuity of buddhas, remembering the progression of the hearing of the names of buddhas, following the principles of the teachings of the buddhas, entering into the array of collective practice of the buddha-teachings, intent on the the exclamation made by buddhas on becoming perfectly enlightened, focusing his attention on the inconceivable action of buddhas, Sudhana made his way to Mount Potalaka. 
Climbing the mountain, he looked around for Avalokiteshvara and saw him on a plateau on the west side of the mountain, which was adorned with springs, ponds, and streams, sitting wakefully on a diamond boulder in a clearing in a large woods, surrounded by a group of enlightening beings seated on various jewel rocks, to whom he was expounding a doctrine called “light of the medium of great love and compassion,” which concerns the salvation of all sentient beings. 
Transported with joy on seeing Avalokiteshvara, his eyes fixed on him, his mind undistracted, full of the energy of faith in the spiritual benefactor, thinking of seeing spiritual benefactors as at once seeing buddhas, thinking of reception of the multitudes of all truths as originating in spiritual benefactors, thinking of the attainment of all virtues as deriving from spiritual benefactors, thinking of how hard it is to meet spiritual benefactors, thinking of spiritual benefactors as the source from which the jewels of knowledge of the ten powers are obtained, thinking of spiritual benefactors as the source of vision of inexhaustible knowledge, thinking that the growth of the sprouts of goodness depends on spiritual benefactors, thinking that the door of omniscience is revealed by spiritual benefactors, thinking that the way to enter the ocean of great knowledge is pointed out by spiritual benefactors, thinking that the accumulation of the store of omniscience is fostered by spiritual benefactors, Sudhana went up to Avalokiteshvara. 
The enlightening being Avalokiteshvara, seeing Sudhana approaching in the distance, said, “Welcome, you who have set out on the incomparable, lofty, inconceivable Great Vehicle, intending to save all beings who are oppressed by various firmly rooted miseries and have no refuge, seeking to directly experience all the teachings of buddhas, which are beyond all worlds, incomparable, and immeasurable; you are filled with the energy of great compassion, determined to liberate all sentient beings, directed toward practice of the vision of universal good, intent on purifying the sphere of great vows, born of the ocean of knowledge of Manjushri, correctly proceeding on the instructions of spiritual benefactors, with the tireless will to build up roots of goodness, seeking to retain the multitudes of teachings of all buddhas; a mine of lotuses of virtue, fit to receive the empowerment of buddhas, imbued with the energy of the light of concentration, seeking to keep in mind the teachings of all buddhas, thrilled with the joy of the vision of buddhas, your mind expanded by the incalculable energy of achievement of virtue, wishing to reveal to others the power of the measure of omniscience to which you have access through your own mystic knowledge, determined to sustain the energy of light of knowledge of buddhas, firmly rooted in the power of great compassion.” Then Sudhana went up to Avalokiteshvara, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, and I ask you to tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Avalokiteshvara said, “It is good that you aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Established in this method of enlightening practice undertaking great compassion without delay, I appear in the midst of the activities of all sentient beings without leaving the presence of all buddhas, and take care of them by means of generosity, kind speech, beneficial actions, and cooperation. 
I also develop sentient beings by appearing in various forms: 
I gladden and develop them by purity of vision of inconceivable forms radiating auras of light, and I take care of them and develop them by speaking to them according to their mentalities, and by showing conduct according to their inclinations, and by magically producing various forms, and by teaching them doctrines commensurate with their various interests, and by inspiring them to begin to accumulate good qualities, by showing them projections according to their mentalities, by appearing to them as members of their own various races and conditions, and by living together with them. 
“Perfecting this practice of unhesitating compassion, I have vowed to be a refuge for all sentient beings, to free them from fears of calamity, threat, confusion, bondage, attacks on their lives, insufficiency of means to support life, inability to make a living, ill repute, the perils of life, intimidation by the crowd, death, miserable conditions, unknown hardships, servitude, separation from loved ones, living with the uncongenial, physical violence, mental violence, sorrow, and depression. I have undertaken a vow to be a refuge for all beings from all these fears and perils. I have also caused a way of remembrance to appear in all worlds, to extinguish the fears of all beings; I have caused my name to be known in all worlds to drive away the fears of all beings. 
I have caused the tranquillity of all beings, in endless forms, to appear in my body, to communicate to all beings individually according to the time. By this means I release beings from all fears, inspire them to seek supreme enlightenment, and cause them never to regress in the attainment of the qualities of buddhas. 
“I have only attained this way of enlightening practice through unhesitating great compassion. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the universally good enlightening beings, who have perfected the vows of all enlightened ones, who have gone the way of the practice of the universally good enlightening being, who are uninterrupted streams of performance of good works, who are always focused on the perception of the concentrations of enlightening beings, who continue their practice without deviation or regression through all ages, who continuously adapt to the times everywhere, who are familiar with the changing currents in all worlds, who continuously work to extinguish all sentient beings’ bad thoughts and to increase their good thoughts, who continuously work to turn all sentient beings away from the repetitious circles of the mundane whirl?” Then this was said: Having respectfully rendered honor and praise, Sudhana, well controlled, went south. On a cliff of a mountain he saw Avalokiteshvara, the seer who abides in compassion. On a diamond slope, adorned with jewels, Sitting on a lion seat in a lotus calyx, the Steadfast, Surrounded by various creatures and enlightening beings, Expounds the Teaching to them. 
“By this and infinite other means I guide sentient beings in the world; I have developed one liberation, And cannot know all the virtues of the virtuous. 
“Sudhana has attended spiritual benefactors In the worlds of the ten directions And has not tired of hearing the teaching of the offspring of Buddha; Why would joy not arise while hearing the Teaching?” At that moment an enlightening being named Ananyagamin descended from the eastern sky and stood on the top of the mountain range surrounding this world. 
As soon as he set foot on the mountain, the whole world quaked and appeared to be made of jewels. 
The body of that enlightening being gave off such a light that the sun and moon were overwhelmed, the lights of all realms of being, fire, jewels, and stars were obscured, the great hells were lit up, the dark recesses of the realms of animals and ghosts were illumined, all ills and miseries were allayed, sentient beings were not bound by afflictions, and all sorrows ceased. 
He also appeared to go to the buddha, causing clouds of all kinds of offerings—jewels, flowers, perfumes, garlands, robes, parasols, banners—to rain all over the buddha-land, and he also appeared reflected in the abodes of all beings, appearing to them so as to please them according to their inclinations, and he also appeared to have come to the enlightening being Avalokiteshvara on the peak of Mount Potalaka. 
Then Avalokiteshvara said to Sudhana, “Do you see the enlightening being Ananyagamin in this assembly?” Sudhana said, “Yes.” Avalokiteshvara said, “Go to Ananyagamin and ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to Avalokiteshvara and went. 
Ananyagamin Then Sudhana, with Avalokiteshvara’s verse of knowledge in mind, had not seen enough of Avalokiteshvara but obeyed his words and went to the enlightening being Ananyagamin. 
Paying his respects, Sudhana said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Ananyagamin said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation ‘speeding forth in all directions.’” Sudhana asked, “What buddha did you learn it from? 
How far away is that buddha’s world, and when did you leave that world?” Ananyagamin said, “This point is hard for celestial, human, and titanic beings, for monks and priests, to know, being the power of an enlightening being, the unregressing energy of an enlightening being, the accomplishment of the energy of an enlightening being. 
It cannot be heard or retained or believed in or comprehended by those who are not under the tutelage of spiritual benefactors, who are not under the attention of buddhas, who have no accumulated roots of goodness, who have not purified their intentions, who have not attained the faculties of enlightening beings, who do not have the eye of wisdom.” Sudhana said, “Please tell me, noble one—I will believe, I will have faith, by the empowerment of buddhas and the assistance of spiritual benefactors.” Ananyagamin said, “I come from the buddha-land of a buddha named Born of Universal Light in a world to the east called Full of Light. 
I attained the enlightening liberation ‘speeding forth in all directions’ at the feet of that buddha. 
As many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands have passed since I left that world Full of Light. 
With each thought I take as many steps as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and with each step I pass as many buddha-lands as atoms in untold buddha-lands, in all of which are buddhas. 
I go to all those buddhas, and honor each buddha with the finest mentally produced offerings, stamped with the cosmic seal that has no formation, approved by the buddhas, pleasing to all enlightening beings. 
I also observe the oceans of sentient beings in all the worlds, penetrate their minds, discern their faculties, and appear to them bodily in accord with their inclinations and interests, speak of the Teaching, radiate auras of light, and provide them with various material necessities. I adapt my form for them, ceaselessly striving to guide them to perfection. 
“I only know this enlightening liberation speeding in all directions. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtue of the enlightening beings who go everywhere, who face in all directions, who are in the realm of unfragmented knowledge, whose bodies are distributed evenly throughout all universes, who adapt their action to all sentient beings according to the inclinations and interests of those beings, whose bodies pervade all lands, who act in accord with the way things really are, who have realized the equality of past, present, and future, who accord with the equality of all places, who illumine the paths of all beings, who do not have arbitrary notions of buddhahood, who go along all paths without attachment or obstruction, who stand on the path of nonreliance? 
“South of here is a city called Dvaravati, where the celestial Mahadeva lives. 
Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects to the enlightening being Ananyagamin and went on. 
Mahadeva His mind following the far-reaching practice of enlightening beings, eager to embody the sphere of knowledge of the enlightening being Ananyagamin, seeing the excellence of the qualities of the realm of exercise of great mystic knowledge, girding himself with the armor of steadfast vigor, full of joy, his mind on the freedom of inconceivable liberation, accomplishing the virtues of enlightening beings, practicing concentration, establishing mental command, entering into vows, learning powers of analysis and expression, bringing forth power, Sudhana went to the city of Dvaravati and asked for Mahadeva. 
The people of the city told Sudhana, “This Mahadeva is in a temple at a crossroads in the city expounding the Teaching in a giant body.” Sudhana then went to Mahadeva, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear that you give enlightening beings instruction, and wish you would tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then the celestial Mahadeva extended four hands in four directions, brought water from the oceans with extreme speed and washed his face; he scattered golden flowers over Sudhana and said, “Enlightening beings are hard to get to see, extremely hard to get to hear. 
They are supreme lotuses of humanity, saviors of the world, refuges for the world, reliances for the world. 
They are great suns, makers of light for sentient beings, the ones who show the path of safety and peace to those on the path of delusion. 
They are guides to the truth, leaders on the way to the citadel of omniscience. 
I think ‘killer of wrong views’ is the name for enlightening beings, in that they manifest themselves to those whose minds are undefiled, they appear before those whose deeds are pure, they imbue those who are free from evils of speech with the light of eloquence, and at all times they stand before those whose intentions are purified. 
Son, I have attained an enlightening liberation called ‘cloud net.’” Sudhana asked, “What is the sphere of this ‘cloud net’ liberation?” At that moment the celestial Mahadeva manifested a heap of gold the size of a mountain before Sudhana, as well as a heap of silver, a heap of lapis lazuli, a heap of crystals, a heap of coral, a heap of emeralds, a heap of starry jewels, a heap of clear jewels, a heap of radiant jewels, a heap of jewels with facets facing in all directions, a heap of crown jewels, a heap of varicolored jewels, a heap of necklaces, a heap of earrings, a heap of bracelets, a heap of belts, a heap of anklets, a heap of various kinds of flowers, fragrances, incenses, garlands, unguents, aromatic powders, robes, parasols, banners, pennants, musical instruments, and all objects of desire. 
He then said to Sudhana, “Take of these and give gifts, do good works, make offerings to buddhas, take care of beings by generous giving, get them to practice transcendent relinquishment, teach the world by giving, show relinquishment, which is hard to do. 
In the same way as I give you all these goods, so also do I make relinquishment habitual in countless sentient beings whose sense of generosity is not repressed. Having gotten them to plant roots of goodness with the Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, and spiritual benefactors, I get them to aspire to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
“Furthermore, to those who are intoxicated with the enjoyment of objects of desire, who are very greedy for the enjoyment of objects, I make objects appear impure. 
To those filled with anger, those who are arrogant, conceited, proud, and haughty, those who should be led away from strife, I show terrors like fiends and ghouls who feed on flesh and blood, and show them that it is all the vehemence of arrogance. 
To those who are lazy and negligent I show the dangers of fire, water, kings, and brigands, to stir them to vigor and diligence. 
Thus with various appropriate means I turn them away from bad conduct and get them to develop good qualities, to destroy all impediments to the transcendent ways, to make the necessary preparations for the transcendent ways, to cross over all the precipitous paths on the mountains of barriers to enlightenment, and to enter the unobstructed state. 
“I only know this ‘cloud net’ enlightening liberation. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who are like the celestial chief Indra, crushing the titans of affliction, who are like water, extinguishing the fire of suffering of all beings, who are like heat, evaporating the water of craving of all beings, who are like wind, shattering the mountains of all attachments, who are like thunderbolts, rending asunder the mountain of the congealed notion of self? 
“South of here, at the site of enlightenment in the region of Magadha in Jambudvipa, lives an earth goddess named Sthavara. 
Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to Mahadeva and went on. 
Sthavara Then Sudhana went to the earth goddess Sthavara at the site of enlightenment in Magadha. 
Ten hundred thousand earth goddesses said to one another, “Someone comes who will be a refuge for all sentient beings; a vessel of enlightenment comes who will break the shell of ignorance of all sentient beings; one who springs from the family of spiritual sovereigns comes who will put on the turban of unattached supreme purity of a spiritual sovereign; a hero bearing the mighty thunderbolt of knowledge comes who will destroy the weapons of all false teachers.” Then those earth goddesses, led by Sthavara, caused the earth to tremble, made the ocean roar, illumined the whole universe with a glorious light, and with bodies adorned with all kinds of jewelry, like bundles of lightning bolts descending from the sky, emerged from the surface of the earth, with all tree sprouts growing, all flowering trees blooming, all rivers flowing, all lakes and ponds rising, fragrant rains showering, great winds bearing flowers, billions of musical instruments playing, celestial palaces, ornaments, and tiaras appearing, bulls, elephants, tigers, and lions roaring, the lords of the gods, titans, serpents and spirits thundering, mountains crashing together, and hundreds of billions of treasuries surfacing. 
Then the earth goddess said to Sudhana, “Welcome. 
This is a spot of ground where you have planted roots of goodness, which I have witnessed. 
Do you want to see the results in one place?” Sudhana paid his respects to the goddess and said, “I do.” Then the goddess, touching the earth with the sole of her foot, caused it to appear adorned with hundreds of billions of deposits of countless jewels, and said to Sudhana, “These billions of treasuries of jewels accompany you and are at your service, to be used as you wish; they have been produced as a result of your good works and are preserved by the power of your good works. 
Take of them and do whatever should be done. 
Since then I have observed the enlightening being’s mental activity, entered his sphere of knowledge and all his vows, followed his purification of enlightening practice, gone along into all concentrations, pervaded the vastness of the mind of the mystic knowledges of all enlightening beings, and have comprehended, remembered, and taken in his mastery of the powers of all enlightening beings, his insuperability like that of all enlightening beings, his pervasion of the network of all lands, his reception of the prediction of enlightenment from all buddhas, his manifestation of attainment of enlightenment in all times, his way of activating all the cycles of the Teaching, the doctrines expounded in all the scriptures, his way of revealing the vista of the great Teaching, his way of knowing how to lead all sentient beings to perfection, and his way of manifesting all the miracles that buddhas perform. 
“I attained this ‘unassailable asylum of knowledge’ enlightening liberation from the buddha Skillful Guide in the world Moon Banner eons ago, more eons than the number of atoms in the polar mountain, in an eon called Supernal Manifestation of Light. 
Going in and out of this ‘unassailable asylum of knowledge’ liberation and causing it to expand and broaden, I have always been seeing buddhas, continuing up to this eon of virtue in the present, and now I have propitiated as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and I have seen the spiritual transformations of all those buddhas when they came to the site of enlightenment, and I have witnessed all those buddhas’ roots of goodness. 
“I know only this enlightening liberation ‘unassailable asylum of knowledge.’ How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who attend all buddhas, who remember the tales of all the buddhas, who have entered the recondite knowledge of all buddhas, who speed throughout the cosmos in a moment of thought, who are physically equal to the buddhas, who are undefiled receptacles of the mind of all buddhas, who have always effected the birth of all buddhas, who are envoys physically indivisible from all buddhas? 
“In this country Magadha in Jambudvipa is a city called Kapilavastu, where a night goddess named Vasanti lives. 
Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to the earth goddess Sthavara and went on. 
Vasanti Then Sudhana went to the great city Kapilavastu, remembering the teaching of the earth goddess Sthavara, remembering that enlightening liberation “unassailable asylum of knowledge,” extending the cultivation of that enlightening concentration, contemplating that enlightening doctrine, roaming in the freedom of that enlightening liberation, looking into the subtleties of knowledge of that enlightening liberation, entering into the ocean of knowledge of that enlightening liberation, focusing on the unity of the knowledge of that enlightening liberation, pursuing the accomplishment of the endless knowledge of that enlightening liberation, plunging into the ocean of knowledge of that enlightening liberation. 
Going around the city from left to right, he went in by the eastern gate and stood in the middle of the crossroads of the city. 
Before long the sun set, and, skillfully grasping the instructions of spiritual benefactors, he longed to see the night goddess Vasanti, considering spiritual benefactors a sure source of attainment of enlightened knowledge, based concretely on the sphere of the eye of universal knowledge, turning in all directions, wishing to see the spiritual benefactor, thinking of her with great respect as the abode of knowledge, his eye of knowledge extending to all objects, looking over the ocean of all that is knowable with the eye of concentration reaching throughout the ocean of knowledge of principles of all reality realms, intent on extension of the eye of great knowledge. 
He saw the night goddess Vasanti in the sky over Kapilavastu, in a tower of brilliant, incomparable jewels, sitting on a great jewel lion throne in the calyx of a lotus of all the finest fragrances. She was beautiful, with a golden complexion, soft, rich black hair, and dark eyes. 
Her body was adorned with all kinds of ornaments, and she was wearing a red robe. 
She wore a sacred crest adorned with the orb of the moon, and her body showed reflections of all the stars and constellations. He also saw in her pores all the sentient beings who had been liberated by her from the calamities of unfavorable circumstances, evils, and miserable conditions. 
He also saw in her pores all the sentient beings whom she had settled in heaven, and all whom she had perfected in the enlightenment of hearers and individual illuminates, and in omniscience. He also saw in her pores all the various means, embodiments, and appearances she assumed to perfect them. He also heard coming from her pores the various utterances she used to teach and develop them. 
He also perceived in her pores the timing, the adaptation to sentient beings’ inclinations and interests, the enlightening practices, forceful means, ways of mystic transformation through concentration, powers, states, observations, contemplations, mystic projections, powerful expansions of the great person, and free masteries of liberation by which they were perfected. 
Having seen and heard those oceans of teachings involving various means, Sudhana was transported with joy; he paid his respects to the night goddess Vasanti and said to her, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment. 
Seeing all qualities of buddhahood as based on spiritual benefactors, I rely on spiritual benefactors. Please show me the way of omniscience whereon an enlightening being sets forth to the stage of the ten powers.” Vasanti answered Sudhana, “It is good that you are so devoted to spiritual benefactors and desire to hear the words of spiritual benefactors. 
Carrying out the instructions of spiritual benefactors, you will surely arrive at supreme perfect enlightenment. 
I have attained an enlightening liberation, a means of guiding sentient beings by the light of truth, which dispels the darkness for all sentient beings. 
I am kind to the evil-minded, compassionate to evil-doers, pleased with those who do good, impartial toward the good and the bad; I am determined to purify the defiled, to set the misguided straight, to inspire higher aspirations in those with low aspirations, to increase the energy of those with inferior faculties, to free those attached to the mundane whirl from its repetitious circles, and to set those oriented toward the vehicles of individual salvation onto the path of omniscience. 
I am concentrating on these concerns and am imbued with the enlightening liberation through which I guide sentient beings with the light of truth that dispels the darkness for all sentient beings. “Any people who travel on a dark night, where ghosts, thieves, and thugs lurk, when the sky is covered with black clouds, when it is misty, windy, and raining, when there is no moonlight or starlight, when there is no visibility, if they go on the sea, or on land, or in the mountains, or over deserts, or through forests, or through provinces or villages, or on the roads, if they are shipwrecked at sea or held up on land, or fall in the mountains or run out of provisions in the desert, or if they get stuck in the underbrush in the forest or run into trouble, or if they get scattered in the darkness, or if they get mugged in a town, or if they get lost or confused and cannot tell which direction they are going in, or if they run into disaster on the road, I rescue them by various means. 
For those traveling on the sea I quell hurricanes, get them past bad waters, stop unfavorable winds, quiet the raging billows, free them from the perils of whirlpools, clarify the directions, lead them on the right sea lanes, show them the channels, guide them to the isles of treasure, show them the way in the form of a navigator. Through various forms of being I act as a support and reliance. This root of goodness, furthermore, I dedicate in this way: 
‘May I be a refuge for all sentient beings, to put an end to all suffering.’ “For those on land on a dark night, where there are thickets and brambles, gravel and grit, on uneven terrain, battered by vicious wind and rain, painfully cold or hot, where savage beasts lurk, where killers and bandits roam, I save those who have lost their way on the earth, by means of the forms of the sun, the risen moon, meteoric showers, planets, the light of the stars, celestial beings, and enlightening beings. 
And I think: By this root of goodness may I become a savior of all sentient beings. 
“For those on precipitous mountain paths, in danger of death, so that they may live, and for those who are dominated by the desire for fame, those who wish for renown, those who seek enjoyment, those who are avaricious, those who strive to get material things, those whose foremost desire is worldly success, those who are wrapped up in affection for their families, those who are lost in the jungle of views, and those who are oppressed by various miseries and fears, I become a refuge by various means: 
for example, by producing caves in the mountains for shelter, by producing fruits and roots for food, by producing streams for drinking water, by producing shelter against cold and heat, by showing the right path, by the songs of birds, by the luster of medicinal plants, by the glow of mountain spirits. I become a refuge for those in mountain caves and crevices, those oppressed by various pains, dispelling the darkness, producing level ground for them. 
And I resolve that just as I rescue these people in the mountains, so will I become a refuge for those fallen on the precipitous trails of the mountain of mundane existence, who are in the grip of old age and death. 
And I resolve that by this root of goodness I will free those in the thicket of views, caught in the web of craving, oppressed by the various pains and perils of the mundane whirl, liberating them from all miseries. “And as for those in the desert, in the darkness, by various means I comfort them, show them the way, and lead them to safety, resolving that by this root of goodness I shall liberate those who are in the desert of the mundane whirl, who have fallen into evil ways, freeing them from all suffering and setting them on the road of omniscience, where there is eternal safety. “As for those in inhabited areas who are experiencing the trouble of owning a home, I draw them away from their attachments to their abodes by various means and resolve by this root of goodness to remove all sentient beings from attachment to the elements of body and mind and establish them in nonreliant omniscience. “As for those in villages who are attached to their house and relatives, beset by various family troubles, their minds agitated by various anxieties, I take care of them by material gifts and please them in a proper manner, establish them in the state of nonattachment, and resolve by this root of goodness to remove those who cling to the village of their senses from the sphere of mundane objects and set them in the sphere of omniscience. 
“As for those who lose their sense of direction on a dark night, who think level ground is uneven, who think high ground is low, who think low ground is high, I light the way for them by various means. 
To those who want to go out I show the door, to those who want to travel I show the road, to those who want to cross over I show the bridge, to those who want to go in I show the house, to those who want to look around I show the directions. 
I show travelers the villages, cities, towns, provinces, and capitals. 
I show those who are hot and thirsty streams and ponds and groves and parks. 
To those grieving at separation from their loved ones I show their family and friends, advisers, acquaintances, and kin, and various pleasing forms. 
And I resolve that just as I light the way for those in the dark who cannot see and have lost their way, as I create light to make various forms manifest, in the same way I will use the light of great wisdom to destroy the darkness of ignorance of those in the long night of the mundane whirl, who have no sense of direction at all, who are in the darkness of ignorance, whose eye of knowledge is covered by the veil of nescience, who are perverted in concepts, thoughts, and views, who think the impermanent is permanent, who think the painful is painless, who think the selfless has self, who think the impure is pure, who cling to a definite self, being, life, soul, individuality, and personality, who are attached to sense faculties, sense consciousnesses, and sense data, who are confused about cause and effect, who do what is not good, who take life, who steal, who abuse sexuality, who tell lies, who slander others, who speak harshly, who sow dissension, who are covetous, who are malicious, who hold erroneous views, who do not honor their parents or mendicants or priests, who do not recognize the blameworthy or the good, who do not take pleasure in what is right, who are dominated by ill-gotten gain, who pervert what is right by erroneous views, who falsely impugn the enlightened, who try to suppress true teaching, who fly the banner of demons, who injure or kill enlightening beings, who are hostile to the Great Vehicle, who cut off the aspiration for enlightenment, who defame enlightening beings, who injure or kill their mothers, who are hostile, who revile the wise, who consort with the corrupt and unjust, who damage the relics of saints and the goods of the religious community, who oppose their parents, who act in hellish ways, who are on the brink of disaster—having destroyed the darkness of their ignorance by the light of great wisdom and directed them toward supreme perfect enlightenment, by the Great Vehicle of universal good I shall show them the path to the stage of knowledge of the ten powers; I shall show them the stage of the enlightened, the realm of the enlightened, the ocean of wisdom of omniscience, the sphere of enlightened knowledge, the consummation of the ten powers, the power of mental command of buddhas, and the unity of all bud-dhas. 
“As for those who are sick, who are worn out from long illness, whose bodies are weakened, who have wasted away, those who have grown old and are overcome by old age, those who are wretched and poor, those who have come to the end of their lives, those who are in bondage, those who are being tortured, and convicts who have been imprisoned, I stand by them to save them from the danger of injury to their lives. 
I employ all means to remove the illnesses of those who are sick. Those who are wasted away and overcome by old age I take care of by constant attendance. I provide protection for the helpless, I enrich the poor, I take care of those who have fallen into misfortune by regarding their welfare as my own. 
I resolve that just as I am a refuge saving these beings from various perils and afflictions, so shall I take care of them with the supreme protection of the truth and liberate them from all mental afflictions. I shall enable them to transcend birth, old age, sickness, death, grief, lamentation, misery, depression, and mental disturbance. I shall free them from all fears of falling into bad conditions. I shall establish them in the care of spiritual benefactors. 
I shall take care of them by giving them jewels of true teaching. I shall get them to act impeccably. I shall direct them to the purity of the body of the enlightened. I shall establish them in the knowledge of the realm where there is ultimately no old age or death. 
“As for those on wrong paths, those in the tangles of various views, those acting on erroneous conceptions, those doing evil in thought, word, and deed, those uncontrolled in action, those devoted to various pious observances and ascetic practices, those who think the unenlightened are enlightened, those who think the enlightened are unenlightened, those who practice self-torture, those who worship bodies of water, mountains, or particular places, and those who are under the control of bad companions, I become a refuge for them by various means and thence turn them away from evil, from immersion in views, from all bad conditions. 
I establish them in right seeing in the world and place them in celestial and human states. 
I resolve that just as I liberate these sentient beings from the miseries of such bad behavior, so shall I establish all sentient beings in the transmundane path of transcendence, make them irreversible in progress toward omniscience, and lead them to omniscience by the great vow of universal good; and I shall not fall from the stages of enlightening beings, while not turning away from the realm of all sentient beings.” At that point, further revealing the realm of the enlightening liberation which guides the world by the light of truth that dispels the darkness for all sentient beings, the goddess looked over the ten directions by the power of Buddha and spoke these verses to Sudhana: 
My kindness is vast and pure, Developed over boundless eons past; Dispelling evil, I illumine the world— Realize this wisdom, O Sudhana, steadfast one. 
Measureless is my ocean of compassion for the world; Herein the buddhas of all times are born, Hereby the pains of the world are soothed— Realize this wisdom, O Sudhana, steadfast one. 
Producing worldly happiness, both the joys Which are conditional and those of the sages, Thereby I am delighted, uplifted, pleased— Realize this wisdom, O son of Buddha. 
Forever turned away from the ills of the conditional, As well as the knowledge and liberation of individual salvation, Perfecting the power of buddhas— Realize this wisdom, O son of Buddha. 
Vast and pure is my eye, by which I see The lands of the ten directions— I see the buddhas in those lands Sitting under the enlightenment tree. 
I see thousands of buddhas with their circles, The buddhas’ bodies adorned with marks of greatness, Emanating multifold glorious lights, Radiating oceans of light from their pores. 
I see the sentient beings in those lands, How they die and are born; I see the ignorant in the ocean of transmigration as they go Round in circles experiencing the results of their own deeds. 
My ocean of hearing is pure, And all sounds enter therein: Hearing the words of all sentient beings, I keep them in mind. 
The infinite expressions of the teachings of buddhas I also hear and remember. 
My sense of smell is far-reaching and pure, Unobstructed in the midst of all things, An entry into all states of liberation; You should realize this wisdom. 
My tongue is broad and long, coppery red, Shiny like a jewel, pure; With it I communicate to beings according to their mentalities: 
You should realize this wisdom. My reality body is transcendentally pure, Omnipresent in all times; The physical body beings see according to their mentalities, By the power of their devotion. 
My mind is free from attachment and taint, Resonant with thunderous sound; Therein are all buddhas assembled, Yet I have no discrimination. 
Innumerable are the beings on the face of the earth; I know the oceans of their minds, I know their faculties and inclinations, But I have no discrimination. 
My occult power is vast and consummate, I shake innumerable worlds And produce an aura of light Whereby I tame the intractable. 
My virtue is vast and pure, An endless treasury, adorning everywhere; With it I make offerings to buddhas And sustain the life of all beings. 
I have entered the ocean of buddhas, Realizing the wisdom of all time, And I enter into their vows— This wisdom is peerless and perfect. 
In every atom I see oceans of worlds Of past, present, and future; And I see oceans of buddhas therein, And their universal ground of wisdom. 
See Vairocana, enlightened, Pervading all lands in the ten directions, Sitting at the foot of the enlightenment tree In each atom expounding the teaching of peace. 
Then Sudhana said to the night goddess Vasanti, “How long ago did you set out for supreme perfect enlightenment? 
How long ago did you attain this liberation, by the at tainment of which you have come to perform all beneficial actions in this way?” Vasanti replied, “As many eons ago as atoms in the polar mountain, there was an eon called Tranquil Light, in which five billion buddhas were born. 
There was then a world system called Born of the Light of Jewels, in which there was a central world of four continents called Jewel Moon Lamp Light, the capital city of which was called Lotus Light. 
In that capital city was a king named Bridge of Good Law, who was a just ruler, a sovereign with all the attributes of kingship. 
He had conquered that trouble-free earth by justice and ruled it righteously. 
At that time, in a forest called Source of Radiance of Peace, to the east of the city of Lotus Light, a buddha named Supreme Thunder of All Truths attained supreme perfect enlightenment at a great enlightenment site made of the finest jewels, with the lights of all supernal manifestations, radiating the lights of the magical displays of all buddhas. 
That buddha lit up the whole world-system Born of the Light of Jewels clearly with a great multicolored light. 
“Also in that capital city Lotus Light was a night goddess named Pure Moonlight. She went to the wife of the king, awakened her by the sound of her jewelry jingling, and said to her, ‘Know, O queen, that in the forest Source of Radiance of Peace, a buddha named Supreme Thunder of All Truths has attained supreme perfect enlightenment.’ And she gave the queen an extensive explanation of the virtuous qualities of the buddha, the spiritual transformation of the buddha, and the vow practices by universally good enlightening beings. The queen, illumined by the light of the buddha, set out for supreme perfect enlightenment with overpowering resolve. She made great offerings to that buddha and to his group of enlightening beings and disciples. 
“Do not suppose that queen was anyone other than me myself—I was that queen Moon of Understanding of Right in that time. 
By virtue of that aspiration, and the roots of goodness I planted with that buddha, I was not born in any bad states for as many eons as atoms in the polar mountain, nor did I have defective faculties, nor did I suffer. 
I always attained celestial greatness among celestials, and human greatness among humans, and never was apart from spiritual benefactors—that is buddhas and enlightening beings. I never came upon bad times. So I passed as many eons as atoms in the polar mountain happily, peacefully, safely, and rightly, planting roots of goodness with the enlightened: yet after all that time my enlightening faculties were not yet perfectly developed. 
“After those eons had passed, ten thousand eons before this eon of Virtue, there was an eon called Sorrowless Dispassion, in a world called Blazing Light Undefiled by Passion. 
That world was both defiled and pure. 
I was an outstanding girl named Light of Wisdom, daughter of an eminent man named Resounding Fame, and I was beautiful and robust. 
The night goddess Pure Moonlight, by the power of a vow, became a night goddess named Light of Purified Eyes. 
In the still of the night when my parents were in bed, she made our house tremble, showed her body to me with a great light, told me about the qualities of the buddha, and then showed me the buddha sitting at the enlightenment site in the first week after his enlightenment. 
“I went with my parents and a large group of relatives to that buddha, led by the night goddess Pure Moonlight. 
I made great offerings to that buddha, and when I saw the buddha, I attained a concentration called ‘born of the world-guiding vision of Buddha,’ and I attained a concentration called ‘sphere of light of knowledge of the ground of past, present, and future,’ whereby I remembered those eons as many as atoms in the polar mountain; and my aspiration for enlightenment came to the fore. Having heard the Teaching from that buddha, I attained this enlightening liberation called ‘the means of guiding sentient beings by the light of truth which dispels the darkness for all sentient beings,’ by the attainment of which I physically pervade as many worlds as atoms in ten buddha-lands, and see the buddhas in those worlds, and perceive myself at the feet of those buddhas. 
I also see all the sentient beings in those worlds, and I know their vocal signals, and their thoughts, inclinations, faculties, and interests, and their previous development under the tutelage of spiritual benefactors; and I manifest a body to them which will please them according to their inclinations. “Also, this liberation grows in each mental moment: 
in an unbroken succession of mental moments I pervade as many buddha-lands as atoms in a hundred worlds, as many buddha-lands as atoms in a thousand worlds, as many buddha-lands as atoms in a hundred thousand worlds; in each mental moment I go on like this to pervade up to as many buddha-lands as atoms in untold unspeakable numbers of worlds: 
I also enter into the oceans of past vows of those buddhas, and the purifications of the buddha-lands of those buddhas. I also undertake to purify a buddha-land. I also see the sentient beings in those oceans of worlds, and I transform my body to accord with the measures of the inclinations, faculties, and interests of those sentient beings, in order to develop and guide them. 
Thus this liberation expands in each mental moment, by working to expand it to pervade everywhere in the cosmos. 
“I only know this enlightening liberation that is a method of guiding the world by the light of the truth which dispels the darkness of all sentient beings—how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues or comprehend the sphere or show the freedom of liberation of the enlightening beings who are completely versed in the infinite vow of enlightening practice of universal good, who command the power to enter into every principle in the ocean of the cosmos, who have mastered the adamantine concentration of knowledge realized by all enlightening beings, who have undertaken the vow to preserve the lineage of buddhas in all worlds, who have perfected great goodness purifying all worlds in each mental moment, who command the knowledge to develop and guide all universes in each mental moment, whose eyes are suns that dispel the darkness of all obstructions for all sentient beings in all worlds, who strive to inform all sentient beings about the Great Vehicle of universal liberation, who are moons of wisdom dispelling the darkness of doubt and confusion for all sentient beings, whose pure voices obliterate attachment to existence, who have the power to show miracles in each atom of all phenomena, who have unfragmented knowledge of the ground of past, present, and future? 
“In this very enlightenment site in Magadha lives a night goddess named Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha, who inspired in me the determination for enlightenment and has encouraged me time and again. 
Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana praised the night goddess with these verses: 
I see your body now, pure, with various characteristics, Like the polar mountain. Above the world, you illumine the world, With a body like Manjushri. 
Your reality body is transcendentally pure, Equal in all times, without distinction: Therein all worlds are gathered, And form and dissolve without obstruction. 
I see your body in all realms, In a variety of manifestations: And in your pores I see The moon and stars. 
Your mind is broad and pure, pervading Like space in all directions; Therein are assembled all buddhas, Yet your knowledge is free from the taint of discrimination. 
Brilliant clouds, as many as atoms in lands, Issue from your pores; They reach the buddhas in the ten directions, Raining all kinds of ornaments. 
Infinite bodies, as many as living beings, Emerge from your pores; They fill all the worlds in the ten directions, And purify beings by various means. 
I see inconceivably many lands in your pores, Adorned in various ways, Which you have purified, Produced according to the minds of the beings. 
Happy are those who hear your name, Great is their gain; And people who see you Are near the path of enlightenment. 
One should endure inconceivable eons of misfortune In order to see you; For those who are happy to hear of you, You will extinguish their afflictions on sight. 
Even if one were to speak Of your qualities for as many eons As atoms in a thousand lands, There is no exhausting them. 
Having praised the night goddess Vasanti with these verses, Sudhana paid his respects to her, looking at her again and again, never tired of attending spiritual benefactors, and left her. 
Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha Realizing the purity of the sphere of the night goddess Vasanti’s initial stage of determination to be an enlightening being, contemplating the origin of the embryo of enlightenment, entering into the ocean of vows of enlightening beings, purifying the path of transcendent ways of enlightening beings, going into the sphere of stages of enlightening beings, extending the sphere of practice of enlightening beings, remembering the ocean of ways of emancipation of enlightening beings, looking over the vast ocean of light of omniscience, extending the cloud of great compassion of enlightening beings intent on the salvation of all sentient beings, putting Vasanti’s vow of practice of universally good enlightening action into effect throughout all lands forever, Sudhana went to the night goddess Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha, paid his respects to her, and said, “Noble goddess, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being acts in the stage of enlightening practice, or how one proceeds, and how one perfects it.” She said, “It is good that, aspiring to enlightenment, you ask how to proceed and how to fully accomplish the stages of enlightening beings. 
By the fulfillment of ten things is the practice of enlightening beings accomplished: 
by purification of attainment of concentration in which all buddhas are seen face to face; by purification of the eye viewing the infinite body of all buddhas resplendent with marks of distinction; by entering into the manifestation of the infinite ocean of qualities of buddhas; by realizing the cosmic dimensions of the ocean of spheres of the infinite manifestations of the teaching of buddhas; by entering the emanation of multitudes of beams of light, as many as beings, from the pores of all buddhas, aiding sentient beings in various ways; by seeing oceans of flames the colors of all jewels coming from each pore; by penetrating the my stical manifestation of oceans of emanations of buddhas pervading all universes and guiding sentient beings in each mental moment; by penetrating the sounds of thunder of all the scriptures proclaimed in the past, present, and future cycles of teachings of the buddhas, using the myriad languages of all sentient beings; by entry into the infinite ocean of buddha-names; by penetrating the guidance of sentient beings by manifestation of inconceivable miraculous transformations of buddhas. 
By attainment of these ten things, enlightening beings become fully accomplished in enlightening practice. 
“I have attained the enlightening liberation ‘bliss of tranquil meditation boldly going everywhere.’ By this I see the buddhas of past, present, and future, and enter into their oceanic congregations, their oceanic projections by concentration, their oceanic efforts in the past, and the oceans of their names. 
I also comprehend the differences of the teaching cycles of those buddhas, the variety of their life spans, the differences in their voices, and their embodiment of the infinite realm of reality. 
Yet I do not become attached to those buddhas in terms of state of being. 
Because those buddhas do not go, having stopped all worldly courses of action; they do not come, because of the nonbecoming of intrinsic nature; they are not present, being physically equal to the unoriginated nature of reality; they are not extinct, being characterized by nonorigination; they are not real, because they convey the vision of phenomena as in illusion; they are not false, because of accomplishing the welfare of all beings; they do not pass from one condition to another, because they are free from death and birth; they do not perish, because of the imperishable nature of things; they are uniform, because they are beyond all manner of speech; they are formless, because of being done with the forms and natures of things. 
“Furthermore, while thus understanding all buddhas, by the light of the sphere of meditation of buddhas I expand this enlightening liberation ‘bliss of tranquil meditation boldly going everywhere’; I extend it, enter into it, follow it, live up to it, accomplish it, make it consistent, delve into it, develop it, meditate on it, contemplate it, internalize it, make it my sphere of action, stabilize it, make it manifest, illumine it, order it, analyze it, fulfill its requirements, and effect it. 
“Therein, based on great compassion without any false conceptions, to focus my mind solely on carrying out the salvation of all beings, I cultivate the first stage of meditation. 
To cease all mental action and focus my mind solely on joy and happiness in taking care of all sentient beings with the power of knowledge, I cultivate the second stage of meditation. 
To realize the purity of inherent nature of all beings with equanimity detached from the mundane world, I cultivate the third stage of meditation. 
To extinguish the burning of the pain of afflictions of all sentient beings I cultivate the fourth stage of meditation. 
To extend the sphere of the vow for omniscience, for skill in producing the ocean of all concentrations, to enter the means of access to the ocean of liberation of all enlightening beings, to know the science of occult powers of all enlightening beings, to effect the mystic projection of practices of all enlightening beings, I cultivate the enlightening liberation that goes everywhere through tranquil meditation, purifying the knowledge that enters into every realm of reality. 
“Furthermore, as I cultivate this liberation, I develop sentient beings to maturity by a variety of means. 
In people engrossed in sex play in the still of the night I induce the thought of impurity, the thought of disappointment, the thought of weariness, the thought of trouble, the thought of bondage, the thought of bedevilment, the thought of impermanence, the thought of pain, the thought of selflessness, the thought of ownerlessness, the thought of offense, the thought of old age and death, and the thought of indifference to all objects of desire. And those people, developing this state of mind, indifferent to all pleasures, coming to enjoy spiritual pleasure, go forth from home to homelessness. When they have gone into the forest and are following spiritual principles, I foster faith in them. I cause a lull in all disturbing, frightening, loud sounds, and in the quiet of the night I reveal to them the profundity of the buddha-teaching. 
I provide them with circumstances conducive to effort, open the door of renunciation, show the path, provide light, dispel darkness, put a stop to fear, praise renunciation, speak of the qualities of the Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, and of spiritual benefactors, and praise going to spiritual benefactors. 
I put a stop to the ideas and thoughts of those dominated by wrongful gain, those who act on false notions. 
For those in whom thoughts of roots of goodness have not yet arisen, I motivate thoughts of the ways of transcendence, spiritual practice, achievement of the aspiration for omniscience and release, the principle of kindness, suffusing all sentient beings with great compassion, and producing the various bases of celestial and human happiness. 
“I know only this enlightening liberation of the bliss of tranquil meditation boldly going everywhere. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who are completely conversant with the vows of practice of universally good enlightening beings, who have attained knowledge of the cosmos with its endless forms, in whose minds all roots of goodness are developed, who have attained awareness of the knowledge and powers of all buddhas, whose minds abide in the sphere of all buddhas, whose minds are unhindered wherever they may be, who have fulfilled the resolve for omniscience, whose minds have entered the ocean of all lands, whose minds see all buddhas and take in the teachings of all buddhas, who dispel the darkness of all ignorance, whose minds generate the light of omniscience as the way to effect the final destruction of craving for repetitious mundane enjoyment? 
“Right by me, on the right side of the site of enlightenment of Vairocana, there lives a night goddess named Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana. 
Go ask her how an enlightening being should work on the deeds of enlightening beings.” Then the night goddess Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha spoke these verses to Sudhana, further revealing the enlightening liberation of the bliss of tranquil meditation boldly going everywhere: 
The buddhas, supreme in all times, Appear to those with faith. Their eye is vast and pure; Thereby they enter the oceans of buddhas. 
See the undefiled body of Buddha, Beautifully adorned with distinctive marks; And see the miracle of the Buddha Pervading the cosmos in every moment. 
The felicitous one Vairocana has become enlightened Sitting at this enlightenment tree; Throughout the vast cosmos, He teaches according to mentality. 
The Buddha has realized true nature As bodiless, utterly quiet, nondual; His physical body, adorned with marks of distinction, He manifests throughout the world. 
The body of Buddha is vast, inconceivable, Filling the entire cosmos: It is seen everywhere equally, Showing all the buddhas everywhere. 
The Buddha’s auras of light, Numerous as atoms in all lands, Reflecting each other’s radiant colors, Pervade the cosmos every moment. 
Inconceivable, vast clouds of light Stream endlessly from the Buddha’s pores; They pervade all worlds and extinguish The heat of afflictions of all beings. 
Infinite oceans of emanations of Buddha, Emerging from Buddha’s pores, Go throughout the cosmos and stop the suffering Of all miserable states of being. 
Buddha’s voice thunders pleasantly, And the light of the ocean of good sayings Showers the widespread rain of truth And produces the will for enlightenment in sentient beings. 
Those who have been guided by him in the past And practiced the ways of enlightenment for eons See Vairocana Buddha’s features Reflected in all lands. 
The Buddha, appearing in all worlds, Stands before all beings: I cannot know all Their various realms of attention. 
All the exalted enlightening beings Are together in one pore of Buddha: That way of liberation, which is inconceivable, I cannot know in full. 
My neighbor goddess Stands rapt before the Buddha, Her eyes like starry fire— Go ask her how to practice enlightenment. 
Then Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha and took leave of her. 
Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana Immersed in the teachings of the spiritual benefactors, with practice of the words of the spiritual benefactors in mind, desirous of the sciences of spiritual benefactors, his attention focused without distraction by seeing spiritual benefactors, his mind illumined through seeing spiritual benefactors with a light that destroys all obstructions, his mind immersed, through seeing spiritual benefactors, in the ocean of great compassion that saves all beings, his mind illumined, through seeing spiritual benefactors, by the light of knowledge of the ocean of principles of the cosmos, Sudhana went to the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana. 
The goddess, in order to further mature the development of Sudhana’s roots of goodness based on visiting spiritual benefactors, showed him visiting spiritual benefactors as made possible by great provisions of virtue and knowledge, as great heroic effort, as energy that is hard to attain, as longterm perseverance, as entry into infinite realms, as connected with long association, as connected with manifestation of fulfillment of endless tasks, as undertaking the provision of the endless equipment of the path, as made possible by indomitably going everywhere, as coming and going without departure. 
Then Sudhana went to the night goddess in the manner of one going to a spiritual benefactor energetically proceeding to provide for omniscience, striving to carry out the ocean of great vows, determined to endure endless suffering for the sake of even one single sentient being, proceeding with perseverance to traverse the cosmos in a single atom wearing the armor of great energy, speeding everywhere in all directions, associating with the practice of enlightening beings of endless eons at a single point, every moment of thought in enlightening practice entirely based on omniscience, determined to tread the path mystically projected by the buddhas of all times, treading the path flowing through all spheres of reality, keeping the attention on the principles of all realms of reality, pervading the whole cosmos of reality. 
He saw the night goddess sitting in a lion seat in a flower calyx in the circle of the Buddha, in an enlightening concentration characterized by the vast, pure energy of the joy of universal good. 
He also saw emerging from all her pores multitudes of emanations illumining all sentient beings, making all sentient beings happy, showing the practices of the transcendent ways according to the vision of all sentient beings, pleasing to the sight of all sentient beings. 
He saw multitudes of emanations showing the practice of giving in accord with the mentalities of all sentient beings, using their own languages to communicate with them, to detach all sentient beings from their attachments, by indifference to material things, giving impartially to all sentient beings without neglecting any, impartial toward all sentient beings, not disrespecting or disregarding any sentient beings, relinquishing all things internal and external, showing the relinquishment of that which is very hard to give up, showing the practice of giving to sentient beings in all worlds according to their mentalities. 
He saw multitudes of emanations projecting the difficult act of relinquishment practiced by the enlightening beings of past, present, and future emerge and appear to all sentient beings in all worlds in the ten directions, by attainment of the inconceivable mystic power of enlightening beings. 
He saw multitudes of projected bodies in the forms of all sentient beings emerge from every pore of the goddess, appearing before all sentient beings in all worlds, showing them unshakability in all aspects of self-control, illustrating as many forms of austerity as there are living beings, showing independence from all worlds, disregard of all objects, indifference to all mundane abodes, showing that celestial and human prosperity and decline, happiness and suffering, are all inextricably intertwined, showing impurity and putting an end to the false notion of purity in the world, revealing the nature of things as impermanent, unstable, and changing, showing the nature of all conditioned states as painful and selfless, promoting the appeal of living constantly in the realm of the enlightened, directing sentient beings to the ultimate purity of the way of life of the enlightened, teaching the practice of discipline using expressions adapted to the mentalities of all sentient beings, showing the grace of ethical conduct pleasing all sentient beings, developing all sentient beings to maturity. 
He also saw emerging from all the goddess’s pores multitudes of projected bodies with various appearances showing sentient beings’ patient endurance of mutilation and dismemberment, patient endurance of beatings, patient endurance of unjust abuse, reproof, contempt, degradation, beatings, and threats, showing unshakability, showing kindness to all beings without hauteur or servility, showing freedom from conceit, showing inexhaustible knowledge of the inexhaustibility of tolerance of the true nature of all things, showing the practice of forbearance to destroy all afflictions of all sentient beings, turning sentient beings away from all warped conditions, praising the supreme purity of the enlightened, developing sentient beings to maturity. 
He also saw emerge from all the pores of the goddess multitudes of projections of the forms of various kinds of beings, the same as all beings in appearance and size, showing all sentient beings, according to their mentalities, the exertion of energy to store the great knowledge and virtue needed for omniscience, showing the energy to destroy all demons, the energy to work for enlightenment without being disturbed or deflected, the energy to lift all sentient beings out of the sea of the mundane whirl, the energy to get rid of all paths leading to falls into miserable conditions, evils, and states inopportune for enlightenment, the energy to pulverize the mountain of nescience, the energy to serve all buddhas tirelessly, the energy to receive and hold all buddha-teachings, the energy to cut through and shatter the mountains of all obstacles to enlightenment, the energy to develop and guide all sentient beings tirelessly, the energy to purify all buddha-lands, and the supreme purity of the energy of the enlightened, thus developing sentient beings to maturity. 
He also saw multitudes of projected bodies emanate from the goddess’s pores producing joy in sentient beings by various means, removing depression, wary of all sensuality, promoting modesty in the world, directing sentient beings to guard their senses, praising unexcelled religious practice, portraying the realm of desire as a perilous realm of demons, showing the realm of enjoyment of all worldly desires even to those free from sensuality, establishing sentient beings in enjoyment of truth, step by step producing the bliss of the attainments of meditation and concentration, praising conscious contemplation of all the afflictions of all sentient beings, showing the magical creativity of the ocean of concentrations of all enlightening beings, showing the majesty of the miracles of the mystic knowledges of enlightening beings, making sentient beings joyful and happy, removing melancholy, bringing goodness of mind, producing cleverness and activity of mind, purifying the mind, clarifying the senses, producing physical bliss, promoting the growth of the energy of the joy of truth, thus developing sentient beings to maturity. 
He also saw multitudes of bodies in the forms of all sentient beings emanate from all the goddess’s pores, appearing agreeably to all sentient beings in all lands, showing them tirelessness in going to all spiritual benefactors, showing tirelessness in attendance on all mentors and spiritual benefactors, showing tireless energy in taking in and holding in mind the operations of the cycles of teachings of all buddhas, investigating the oceans of all approaches to the truth, describing the way to enter the ocean of all buddhas, elucidating the teaching of the characteristics and nature of all phenomena, showing the door of concentration, showing the thunderbolt of wisdom which breaks through the mountain of views of sentient beings, by continuous mental application showing the rise of the sun of wisdom dispelling the darkness of ignorance of all sentient beings, developing sentient beings in omniscience while engendering joy in all sentient beings. 
He also saw multitudes of projected bodies, equal to all sentient beings, with splendid, inconceivably various appearances, emanate from the goddess’s pores and appear before all sentient beings in accord with their inclinations and interests, using various languages to reveal higher knowledge of all worldly good, explaining the excellence of the path of omniscience by doing all that should be done in the world, by showing the issue of all states of existence, by describing the way out of conditioned existences, and by showing the way out of the wilderness of all views, showing transcendence of the paths of individual salvation, showing absence of attraction or aversion toward the created or the uncreated, showing nonattachment to the pleasures of mundane life or nirvana, showing unceasing progression from the heaven of satisfaction, showing unceasing attainment of enlightenment at the pinnacle of enlightenment, showing the realm of wisdom to guide all beings out of the sea of doubt, illumining omniscience for sentient beings. 
He also saw as many multitudes of projected bodies as atoms in all lands emanate from each pore of the goddess and stand before all sentient beings praising the vow of practice of universally good enlightening beings, praising the excellence of the vow to ultimately purify all universes, praising purification of all worlds in each moment of thought, praising persistence in entering the powers of buddhas in each moment of thought, showing ceaseless entry into the ocean of principles of the cosmos—equal to the number of atomic particles in all oceans of worlds—in every single moment of thought, praising ceaseless elucidation of purification of the path of omniscience in all lands throughout all time, showing ceaseless entry into the ocean of past, present, and future means of guidance, showing ceaseless manifestations of all magical powers of enlightening beings, leading all sentient beings to omniscience by showing the practice of the vows of enlightening beings. 
He also saw multitudes of projected bodies as numerous as the minds of all beings emanate from each of the goddess’s pores and stand before all sentient beings, showing them the endless power of the provisions for omniscience, showing the unbreakable, invincible, indestructible power of the will for omniscience, showing the nonregressing, irreversible, sustained, ceaseless power of accomplishment of the supreme practice of all enlightening beings, praising enlightening beings’ power to remain unaffected by the ills of mundane life, showing enlightening being’s power to destroy all demons, showing enlightening beings’ power of great compassion tirelessly carrying out enlightening actions throughout all ages, showing enlightening beings’ power to shake all buddha-lands and please all beings, showing enlightening beings’ power to crush all demons and false teachers, to nurture the power of knowledge to turn the wheel of the great teaching in the world, elucidating omniscience for all sentient beings. 
He also saw multitudes of projected bodies in endless forms, presented to the minds of all sentient beings, emanate from each pore of the goddess, filling the endless realms of sentient beings in the ten directions, showing beings, according to their mentalities, the energetic activity of the knowledge of the practice of enlightening beings, showing knowledge comprehending all realms of sentient beings, showing knowledge comprehending all sentient beings’ minds, showing knowledge thoroughly aware of the faculties of all sentient beings, showing knowledge comprehending all sentient beings’ actions, showing knowledge of proper timing in developing and guiding all sentient beings, showing the knowledge to echo the languages of all realms of existence, showing knowledge pervading the ocean of ways to knowledge of all phenomena in each moment of thought, showing knowledge of the formation and disintegration of all worlds, showing knowledge of the differences in basis, form, and arrangement of all worlds, showing the knowledge to go to buddhas with magical offerings, serve the buddhas, and receive their teachings, thus producing joy in sentient beings by showing the practice of the transcendent way of knowledge, soothing their minds, producing joy and happiness, getting rid of melancholy, purifying the mind, leading to goodwill, clarifying the senses, producing the power of resolution, making sentient beings irreversible on the way to omniscience. 
Just as he saw her proceeding to develop sentient beings in the world by demonstrations of the practices of the transcendent ways, he saw multitudes of bodies of beings of various forms emanate from each of the goddess’s pores with the thunder of the laws of all enlightening beings, the preparations of the goddess’s first inspiration, propitiation of spiritual benefactors, going to buddhas and attending them, the practice of virtuous conduct, the relinquishment of what is hard to give up in the course of practicing transcendent giving, the purification of transcendent discipline, the abandonment of rulership and retinue and going forth from society, the exercise of forbearance in austerities difficult to practice in the world, unshakability in the application of the vows undertaken by enlightening beings, the oceans of practices of steadfast resolutions of enlightening beings, the endurance of suffering which is impossible, unspeakable, unthinkable to all worldly beings, the endurance of physical and mental harassment, acceptance of the nonperishing nature of deeds, earnest acceptance of all truths, contemplative acceptance of the nature of all things, energy in undertaking to become omniscient, energy in accomplishing all aspects of buddhahood, all practices of transcendent energy, the preparations for transcendent meditation, energetic efforts in transcendent meditation, practices purifying the attainments of transcendent meditation, mystical powers attained by enlightening beings through concentration, entries into the ocean of mediums of concentration, practices of transcendent meditation, the preparations for transcendent wisdom, the clarification of the sun of great wisdom of enlightening beings, the issue of great masses of wisdom, the treasures of wisdom, applications of the ways of contemplation of the ocean of great wisdom, applications of the principles of great skill in means, embodiments of the transcendent vows of enlightening beings, achievements of great transcendent vows, practices of transcendent commitment, past efforts involved in great transcendent vows, great resources for the attainment of transcendent power, cooperating circumstances of transcendent power, oceans of principles of transcendent power, indications of transcendent power, past efforts involved in transcendent power, principles of transcendent knowledge, applications of transcendent knowledge, methods of purification of knowledge, realms of knowledge, attainments of knowledge, ranges of knowledge, integration of principles of knowledge, methods of communicating knowledge, consequences of the courses of knowledge, suffusions of knowledge, expansions of knowledge, embodiments of knowledge, principles of the ocean of knowledge, past efforts involved in the accomplishment of knowledge, attainments made possible by ascertainment and entry into the modes of practice of knowledge, attainments of knowledge involved in the method of total integration of perfect knowledge, attainments of knowledge of truth comprehending right and wrong, attainments of knowledge of actions, of lands, of ages, of past, present, and future, attainments of knowledge of the emergence of buddhas, attainments of knowledge of buddhas, attainments of knowledge of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge originating in the mind of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the particular states of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the origins of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the orientation of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the vows of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the cycles of teaching of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of enlightening beings’ ascertainment of what is right, attainments of knowledge of principles of the ocean of practice of enlightening beings, attainments of knowledge of the multitude of enlightening beings’ doctrines, their spheres, their hidden resources, and their courses of action—all the principles of enlightening beings connected with consummate knowledge of infinite objects, Sudhana saw being embodied by emanations from the goddess to develop sentient beings to maturity. 
He saw multitudes of embodiments of the forms of all kinds of beings emanating from the goddess, filling the cosmos, appearing before all sentient beings, and developing them to maturity. 
He also saw projections of the streams of good thoughts rising in the goddess’s past lives, beginning with the preparations of her initial aspiration, the continuing successions of commendations of aspiration to enlightenment, the continuous successions of death and rebirth, the continuous successions of incarnation, the continuous successions of names, the continuous successions of visits to spiritual benefactors, the continuous successions of harmonizations with buddhas, the continuous successions of absorption of every sentence and syllable of the teachings of buddhas, the continuous successions of states of mind in carrying out the path of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of attainment of concentrations, the continuous successions of pervasion of vision of all lands, the continuities of the circles of knowledge of the succession of ages, the continuous succession of penetrating knowledge of the cosmos, the continuous succession of knowledge observing the realms of sentient beings, the continuous succession of knowledge of individual deaths and rebirths, penetrating the ocean of principles of the cosmos, the continuous successions of contemplative knowledge purifying the celestial ear, the continuous successions of media of access of wisdom observing the minds of all sentient beings, the continuous successions of media of initial access of the celestial eye, the continuous successions of initial perceptions of the celestial ear, the continuous successions of initial knowledge of others’ thoughts, the continuous successions of initial recollections of the past states of self and others, the continuous succession of the initial circumstances of attainment of uncontrived mystic powers based on nonbeing, the continuous succession of pervading everywhere by exercise of great mystic powers, the continuous succession of attainments of liberations of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of comprehension of the inconceivable principles of the ocean of liberations of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of mystic transformations of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of procedures of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of attainments of enlightening beings, the continuous successions of impressions of enlightening beings, the continuous succession of entries into the path of enlightening beings, and so on, including the night goddess’s continuous successions of entries into the most subtle knowledge of enlightening beings. 
He saw projected bodies emanate from each pore of the goddess, expounding the Teaching to sentient beings, elucidating, clarifying, demonstrating, discussing, analyzing, extending, categorizing, explaining, communicating, and conveying it to them. 
He saw some teaching with the sound of wind, some with the sound of water, some with the sound of fire, some with the sound of the ocean, some with the sound of earth quaking, some with the thrilling sound of mountains crashing together, some with the sweet sound of celestial cities trembling, some with the sound of celestial palaces crashing together, some with the voices of celestial beings, some with the voices of various fantastic beings and entities, some with the voices of human chiefs, some with the voices of Brahma chiefs, some with the songs of nymphs, some with celestial music, some with the sound of jewels, some with the voices of all living beings, explaining the sphere of the night goddess’s liberation to sentient beings. 
Thus he saw the range of the night goddess’s liberation, with the attainment of perfection proceeding from her first aspiration, including her sport in liberation, being communicated to all sentient beings by means of multitudes of embodiments of enlightening beings, various utterances of enlightening beings, multitudes of emanation bodies of buddhas, and various utterances of buddhas. 
He saw untold buddha-lands in the ten directions being purified in each instant of thought by each of her hosts of projected bodies; he saw infinitely varied oceans of sentient beings being liberated from all ills and miseries; he saw infinitely varied sentient beings being led to celestial and human states; he saw infinitely varied multitudes of sentient beings being led to the stages of individual liberations. 
In each moment of thought Sudhana saw infinite masses of sentient beings going through the ten stages; he listened, reflected, investigated, discerned, contemplated, approached, followed, entered, and made himself equal thereto, by the mystical power of the night goddess’s enlightening liberation characterized by the immensity of the inconceivable joy of universal good, by the development of inconceivable roots of goodness through having performed the same practices in the past and having been empowered by the support of the enlightened, and by having become a vessel of universally good enlightening practice. 
Then Sudhana, imbued with the light of the ocean of ecstasy of enlightening beings, empowered by the buddhas of the ten directions, stood reverently before the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana and sang her praises in such terms: For measureless eons you have studied The profound nature of the buddhas, Progressively extending throughout the worlds of the ten directions, Appearing according to the minds of the beings therein. 
Knowing them to have no self, no master, To be always confused by untruth and false ideas, By occult powers you manifest many kinds of bodies And guide sentient beings. 
Infinite, tranquil, the reality-body Is nondual and pure: Sentient beings clinging to duality You guide by myriad emanations. 
While you have no attachment To mind or matter, You guide the world By emanation of perfect forms. 
Detached from the internal and the external, Having left the ocean of mortality, You manifest infinite reflections In the states of mundane existence. 
You have no vacillation, No vain imaginations or false ideas; To the ignorant attached to falsehood you show The inherent nature of things to guide them. 
Single-minded for many eons On the states of the ocean of all concentrations, To make offerings to buddhas everywhere, you send forth Multitudes of emanations from your pores. 
You enter the way to the powers of buddhas In every moment of thought: Striving to save all beings, You show them incarnations like themselves. 
Observing the ocean of being, Its variety of actions and various forms, Showing the path of nonobstruction by things, You purify sentient beings. 
Your body, of splendid appearance, Is purified by the practice of universal good: 
In command of the minds of beings, You manifest the form of a goddess in the world. 
Having praised the goddess with these verses, Sudhana said to her, “How long have you been devoted to supreme perfect enlightenment, and how long ago did you attain this enlightening liberation characterized by the immense pure energy of the joy of universal good?” The goddess answered him, “I remember, many eons ago, past as many eons as atoms in the world, the land Blissful Light of Jewel Radiance, in the eon Silent Sound, filled with a hundred duodecillion sets of four continents, in the center of which were four beautiful continents, extending as far as the light of a mountain of jewels, filled with a hundred duodecillion royal cities, in the center of which was a delightful city Fragrant Banner, radiant with jewels: 
therein lived a wise king named Lord of the People, a world ruler, adorned with the thirty-two marks and eighty embellishments of great people, born spontaneously from a lotus calyx, his body shining gold, his light filling the continent all at once, spreading through the sky. 
He had a thousand sons, all with the constitution of heroes, ten million ministers, learned, intelligent, wise, and ten million concubines, beautiful as goddesses, expert in the arts of love, affectionate, altruistic, kind, attentive to the king. 
That king ruled the whole four continents and enriched them by the power of justice. 
I was the main wife of that king, with a clear voice and a pleasing body; my aura of pure golden light extended a thousand leagues. 
One night as the king, his sons, and his retinue slept, the sounds of singing ended, and as I was peacefully asleep in bed, in the middle of the night a buddha appeared in the world and filled the ten directions with infinite mystic projections, pervading everywhere with various magical bodies imbued with glorious oceans of light, as many as atoms in all lands. 
The earth, including the mountains, quaked, announcing the appearance of the buddha; gods, titans, humans and spirits, were all thrilled at the emergence of the buddha. 
The buddha’s emanations came forth from every pore; pervading the worlds of the ten directions, they taught according to people’s mentalities. 
The buddha showed me all those infinite manifestations in a dream: hearing those profound teachings, I was joyful while dreaming. 
Ten thousand night goddesses stood in the sky above me, describing the buddha in celestial tones and telling me to wake: 
‘Arise, O queen, a buddha has appeared in your realm, hard to meet in a hundred oceans of eons; those who behold him are happy and purified.’ I became joyful, and on awakening I saw an immaculate light. 
Seeing this light, immediately I beheld the buddha at the enlightenment tree, adorned with the thirty-two marks, oceans of lights streaming from his pores, rising above all like the polar mountain. 
Seeing him, I joyfully wished to become like that; I made this vow upon seeing the grandiose manifestation of Buddha. 
I woke the king and his concubines, and when they saw the light of Buddha they were thrilled. 
I went to the buddha with my husband, accompanied by millions of people and troops. 
I made offerings to the buddhas for twenty thousand years, giving precious substances, the earth, and its seas. 
The buddha expounded myriad scriptures, multitudes of virtues, an ocean of vows, and the adornments thus produced, explaining the origins of all buddhas according to mentalities in this world. 
That night goddess awakened me for my benefit, and then I was inspired with compassion, eager to become like this and then awaken the heedless. 
This was my first aspiration to supreme enlightenment, and while coming and going in the oceans of being, I have never lost this resolve. 
“I served ten decillion buddhas with faith while desiring celestial and human enjoyments in the mundane. 
The first buddha was Ocean of Glory, next was Lamp of Virtue, third was Jewel Brightness, fourth was Spacelike Wisdom, fifth was Flower Calyx, sixth was Moon of Unattached Intellect, seventh was Power King of the Moon of Truth, eighth was Light of the Sphere of Knowledge; ninth was Jewel Flame Mountain Lamp, and tenth was Light and Sound of All Times. I served all the buddhas, beginning with these, but had not yet attained the eye to enter this ocean of wisdom. “After that a land called Jewel Light came into existence; the age was called Celestial Glory, and five hundred buddhas emerged therein. 
The first buddha was Light of the Lunar Sphere, second was Solar Lamp, third was Star Banner, fourth was Jewel Mountain, fifth was Flower Flame Ocean Lamp, sixth was Blazing Glory, seventh was Filled with Heavenly Glory, eighth was Shining King, ninth was Radiant Clarity, and tenth was King of Light of Universal Knowledge. Beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas, but I was still attached to body and mind, my intellect dwelling on what really has no abode. 
“After that there was a world named Myriad Lights of the Lamp of Truth; the world was beautiful, the age was called Light of Brahma: the buddhas in that world were numberless, and I served them and their retinues, and reverently heard the teachings of all those buddhas. 
The first buddha was Jewel Mountain, second was Ocean of Virtues, third was Clarity of the Cosmic Voice, fourth was Roar of the Ocean of Truth, fifth was Banner of Truth, sixth was Energy of Mystic Spells, seventh was Light of the Power of Truth, eighth was Spacelike Awareness, ninth was Light of the Peak of the Polar Mountain of Flames of Truth, and tenth was Massive Radiance; beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas, yet I did not awaken to the real nature whereby I could enter the ocean of buddhas. “After that was a buddha named Sun Lamp Brilliance; the land was called Enlightened Mind, and there was an age there called Glory of Soma. Therein were eight hundred octillion buddhas whom I served, with an endless variety of fine offerings. First was King of Celestial Musicians, second was Tree King, third was Polar Mountain of Virtue, fourth was Jewel Eye, fifth was Array of Shining Lights, sixth was Radiance of the Ocean of Truth, seventh was Lord of the World, eighth was Blazing Glory, ninth was Virtuous, and tenth was King of Light of All Laws; beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas, yet still did not attain the knowledge to enter the ocean of truth. 
“After that there was a pure land of indestructible energy, Omnipotent Cloud of Light, arrayed with various adornments; therein were many purified beings, mostly healthy, with few afflictions. In the age Energy of the Tranquil Mind, a thousand buddhas came forth: 
the first was Diamond Navel, second was Bearer of Unattached Power, third was Reflection of the Cosmos, fourth was King of Light Illumining All Quarters, fifth was Energy of Compassion, sixth was Ocean of Vows, seventh was Lamp of the Sphere of Patience, eighth was Light of the Sphere of Truth, ninth was Array of Oceans of Light, tenth was King of Tranquil Light. Beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas, yet I did not awaken to the real nature which is spacelike, inherently pure, based on which I could carry on spiritual practices in all lands. 
“Then there was a pleasant land called Radiance of a Multitude of Fragrant Lamps, both defiled and pure, where there was an age called Good Possibility, in which one hundred trillion buddhas appeared, by whom it was adorned for ten eons; I held in memory the teachings spoken by those Guides. 
The first one was Vast Renown, second was King of Powerful Radiance of the Ocean of Truth, third was Sovereign of Truth, fourth was Voice of Virtue, fifth was Glory of Truth, sixth was Celestial Crown, seventh was Radiance of Energy of the Flame of Knowledge, eighth was Sound of the Sky, ninth was Lamp Appearing Everywhere, and tenth was Mind of Light Radiating from the Brow. 
I served all those buddhas, but did not purify the unhindered path. “After that was a land called Supreme Mind, constructed of jewels, in fine arrays, well proportioned; in the age Luminous there, five hundred buddhas emerged. 
I honored all those buddhas, seeking this liberation: Host of Virtues was first, second was Silent Sound, third was Oceanic Glory, fourth was Sun Energy, fifth was Mountain King, sixth was Thunder on a Polar Mountain of Distinctive Marks, seventh was King of Law, eighth was King of Virtues, ninth was Mountain of Merit, and tenth was King of Silent Light; I served all those buddhas, beginning with these ten, but though the path of the buddhas, into which all buddhas enter, was purified, I still had not attained the forbearance to enter into this way of the buddhas. “After that was a land of beautiful light called Mind Wreathed with Silent Sounds; that world was inhabited by purified beings with little affliction. 
In the age called Delightful Pleasure there were eight hundred octillion buddhas; I attended and served them all and clarified the path of the supreme buddhas. 
The first buddha was Mass of Flowers, second was Ocean Womb, third was Mountain of Being, fourth was Crest of the Lord of Gods, fifth was Jewel Matrix, sixth was Gold Mountain, seventh was Heap of Gems, eighth was Banner of Justice, ninth was Glory of Speech, tenth was Mind of Knowledge; beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas. 
“After that was a land called Lamp Emblematic of Beautiful Creations; in the age called A Thousand Glories were one hundred decillion buddhas: 
Quiescent Star of Tranquility, Supreme Glory of Myriad Silent Lamps, Illuminating King, Trailing Cloud, Solar Radiance, Light of the Lamp of Truth, Flaming Brilliance, Filled with Celestial Glory, Lamp of Wisdom Roaring Like a Lion; beginning with these ten, I served all those buddhas, but did not attain the forbearance to enter this ocean of wisdom. 
“After that was a land called Splendor of Universal Light, in an age called Independent Array, in which were twenty-six octillion buddhas: 
first was Mass of All Virtues, then Spacelike Mind, Array of Good Capacities, Thunder of the Ocean of Truths, Voice of the Cosmos, Blissful Light of Myriad Emanations, Universal Energy, Sound Born of the Ocean of Truths, Mountainous Lamp in an Ocean of Virtues; and the last of them I propitiated was Paragon of Virtue Radiant As a Jewel. 
When that buddha emerged in the world, I was a queen, Moonlike Face, going to honor the buddha. 
He expounded a scripture on the supernal manifestations originating in an ocean of independent vows, which I listened to and remembered. 
I attained tranquil concentration of broad vision, and the power of mental command. I see oceans of buddhas in one land after another, from moment to moment. 
I have borne a cloud of universal light from the womb of compassion by means of kindness, a will for enlightenment as vast as space, with the measureless light of the powers of buddhas. 
“Seeing the world in error, engrossed in the glitter of permanence and pleasure, shrouded in the darkness of delusion and ignorance, filled with afflictions, thinking falsely, given to views, wandering in obscurity, controlled by craving and evildoing, accumulating a variety of deeds in mundane conditions, going from one state to another, suffering the physical and mental pains of birth, old age, and death, I have therefore wished above all for their welfare and happiness: 
in all places where there were buddhas, I produced a multitude of vows, to be as a source of happiness for all beings, with endless preparation and development according to the myriad methods of the path; and I emanated vast multitudes of projections of the transcendent ways throughout the cosmos, speeding to gladden the beings in all paths of existence. 
Progressing through the stages with great speed into the wisdom of all times, traversing the stages unhindered, I went to all buddhas in a moment of thought; and having entered the practice of universal good, I realized the myriad principles of the differentiations of the ten universes. 
“That king named Lord of the People, the world ruler who was determined to prevent the dying out of the lineage of buddhas, was none other than Manjushri, who had become a king, successful in perpetuating the family of buddhas. 
The night goddess by whom I was awakened was emanated by the enlightening being Universally Good. The wife of the king was me. 
When I was awakened by the night goddess, I was caused to see Buddha; this was when I first aspired to enlightenment. Ever since that inspiration, for as many eons as atoms in a buddha-land, I have never fallen into bad states but have always wound up in celestial and human states. Wherever I have been, I have never been apart from the sight of buddhas; then when I saw the buddha Paragon of Virtue Radiant As a Jewel, I attained this enlightening liberation characterized by the immense pure energy of the joy of universal good, by the attainment of which I have come to develop and guide all sentient beings in this way. 
“I just know this enlightening liberation characterized by the immense pure energy of the joy of universal good. 
How can I know the virtues or tell of the practice of the enlightening beings who have attained the ocean of great speed setting out for omniscience in the presence of all buddhas in each instant, who enter unceasingly into the ocean of great vows at every moment in the beginning of all undertakings, who are skilled in carrying out a multitude of practices in every moment of thought over endless eons in the ways shown by the ocean of all vows, and who are skilled in producing in each practice as many bodies as atoms in all buddha-lands, and who pervade the systems of all universes with each body, and who are skilled in demonstrating practices according to the mentality of sentient beings in each universe, and skilled in comprehending the ocean of ways of transformation of all buddhas of past, present, and future? 
“There is a night goddess named Samantasattvatranojahshri who lives right here in the Buddha’s circle. 
Go ask her how an enlightening being is to enter and purify the sphere of practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana and left her. 
Samantasattvatranojahshri Entering with intense absorption into the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana’s liberation of immense pure energy of the joy of universal good, understanding it, plunging into it, penetrating it, following it throughout its full range, going along with it, cultivating it, accomplishing it, encompassing it, carrying out the instructions of the spiritual benefactors, recollecting the teachings projected by the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana for the continuity of teaching and instruction, with all faculties turned in all directions following the sight of spiritual benefactors, with the intention to get to see spiritual benefactors, free from all conceits, with attention focused on seeking spiritual benefactors, with determination to develop the great provisions of virtue and knowledge, with vigorous initiative to harmonize with spiritual benefactors, with all roots of goodness one with those of spiritual benefactors, firmly intent on the practice of all skill in means of spiritual benefactors, having generated an ocean of energy fostered by spiritual benefactors, Sudhana went to the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri. 
When Sudhana came to her, the night goddess, in order to show him the majesty of the endless enlightening liberation manifesting guidance for sentient beings in all works, showed him a body replete with beautiful features and embellishments, and emanated a light from the circle of hair between her brows called “emblem of pure stars of the lamp of flames of universal knowledge,” with infinite light beams; the light illumined the whole world, then descended into Sudhana and pervaded his entire body. 
As soon as Sudhana was touched by the light, he attained a concentration called “sphere of ultimate dispassion,” whereby he saw as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-land forming and dissolving in each particle of fire, water, earth, diamond, various jewels, flowers, perfumes, incenses, arrays of gems, and all objects in between the night goddess Pramuditanayanajagadvirocana and the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri. 
He also saw clusters of water, fire, air, and earth, and the sentient beings in all the worlds, with the various abodes they dwell in and the various arrays of the lands—various mountain ranges, rivers, lakes, oceans, heavens, trees, adornments of the skies, adornments of the habitations of all kinds of beings, the realms of hells, animals, ghosts, the realms of death and birth among humans, all the various conditions of existence being interconnected, infinite different courses of being interrelated. 
He also saw the difference in those worlds—he saw some worlds to be defiled, some pure, some wholly defiled, some with purified states of being, some with purity in the midst of defilement, some with defilement in the midst of purity, some wholly pure, some level, some inverted, some askew. 
He saw the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri in all realms of being in those worlds, facing every sentient being capable of being guided; by seeing all worlds together at once, he saw her standing, without division, before all sentient beings, adapting to their life spans, their various spheres of belief, their physical forms, their conventions of verbal communication, and their mastery, in order to guide them to full development. 
That is to say, he saw her standing before all sentient beings without division to free beings in hells from the pains and fears of hell, to free beings in brutish states from the perils of mutual predation, to free beings in the realm of ghosts from the pains and perils of hunger and thirst, to free beings in the realm of dragons from all the pains and perils of the dragon realm, to free all beings in the realm of desire from all the pains and perils of the realm of desire, to free all beings in the human realm from all the fears and perils of darkness, to free beings from all fear of ill repute, to free beings from intimidation by groups, to free beings from fear of death, to free beings from fear of falling into states of misery, to free beings from fear of not being able to make a living, to free beings from fear of loss of virtue, to free beings from fear of loss of the determination for enlightenment, to free beings from the danger of association with bad companions, to free beings from fear of separation from spiritual benefactors, to free beings from fear of falling into the stages of individual salvation, to free beings from fear of suffering the pains of the various mundane states, to free beings from fear of all association with the uncongenial, to free beings from fear of coming on bad times, to free beings from fear of being born among bad people, to free beings from fear of doing evil, to free beings from fear of obstruction by deeds, to free beings from fear of bondage by attachment to various notions. 
That is to say, he saw her confronting the purification of all lands by undertaking the vow to save all beings, whether corporeal or incorporeal, thinking, nonthinking, and neither thinking nor nonthinking, by the immense power of the vigorous exercise of the energy of concentration of enlightening beings, by exertion of the power of the great mystic knowledges of enlightening beings, by the power of execution of the vow to practice the conduct of universally good enlightening beings, by having generated the energy of the ocean of means of great compassion, to suffuse all beings with desireless universal love, to increase the energy of joy, which is the origin of happiness for all beings, to apply the knowledge of how to take care of all beings, by embodiment of the vast spiritual power of enlightening liberation. 
He saw her confronting realization of knowledge of all things, attendance of all buddhas, preservation of the teachings of all buddhas, accumulation of all roots of goodness, development of all enlightening practices, unhindered penetration of the minds of all beings, maturation of the faculties of all beings, purification of the ocean of interests of all beings, removal of obstructing elements for all beings, dispersal of the darkness of nescience of all beings, and the implementation of all good, to generate the light of omniscience. 
Then Sudhana, having seen this inconceivable manifestation of the night goddess’s enlightening liberation showing guidance for beings in all worlds, prostrated himself before her, enraptured. 
At that point the night goddess stopped assuming the adornments of the forms of enlightening beings and continued to produce all the mystical manifestations by means of the form of a night goddess. 
Then Sudhana stood respectfully before her and spoke these verses to her: 
I have seen your immense body, Of excellent appearance, adorned with jewels, Variously beautified by embellishments As the sky is by the stars. 
Your aura of light, the sublime radiance of your body, Is equal to the atoms in endless lands; Like various kinds of matchless colors, It pervades everywhere endlessly. 
From every pore you radiate nets of light, As many as minds of beings; On a beautiful lotus in each ray of light Stands an emanation of you, extinguishing pain in the world. 
You emit fragrant clouds of light In the forms of all beings, all pure, Showering flowers everywhere, On all the buddhas in the cosmos. 
Your multitude of lights, vast and pure, Is like a mountain radiant with jewels; With it you illumine all worlds And remove the darkness of delusion. 
Myriad pure suns emerge From your mouth; Your sunlight shines throughout The vast realm of Vairocana. 
Pure moon and star lights Radiate from your eyes in great numbers And pervade the ten directions, Illumining the world and destroying darkness. 
From your features come myriad emanations In the forms of all beings; They go throughout the cosmos Developing the countless masses. 
Your body appears before all beings Everywhere, creating joy; You put an end to measureless dangers— From kings, brigands, fire, and floods—guiding beings. 
As directed, I have come to you, Observing your qualities; A pure aura of light beams Emanated from between your brows, Illuminating all places, Producing great light in the world; Having shown many various wonders, It descended into my body. 
When the light descended on me, I experienced a marvelous, supreme happiness; I was imbued with mental command, a hundred concentrations, And I saw the infinite buddhas everywhere. 
I knew the number of atoms In the ground where I walked, And saw in each atom As many lands as atoms in lands. In an atom are hundreds Of various mixed-up, defiled lands, Where the beings suffer pains And weep and wail. 
There are also many lands with purity amid defilement, Where the happiness is little and the suffering much, Where the compassionate buddhas, Their disciples, and the self-enlightened gather. 
There are also lands with defilement amid purity, Where many enlightening beings are assembled, Beautiful lands graced with men and women, Where the family of buddhas abides. 
Oceans of lands, vast and pure, Are in an atom, or an even plane, Purified over long eons past By the action of Vairocana. 
In every land buddhas appear At the enlightenment tree; Having attained enlightenment, They teach and guide the world. 
I see you in the vast realm of Vairocana, Honoring all the infinite buddhas. 
Then Sudhana said to the night goddess, “It is wonderful how deep your enlightening liberation is. 
What is this liberation called? 
How long ago did you attain it? 
How does an enlightening being practice so as to purify this liberation?” She replied, “This state is hard for celestials, Buddhist disciples, and individual illuminates to arrive at. 
Because this is the realm of enlightening beings who follow the commitment to the practice of universally good enlightening beings; it is the sphere of enlightening beings imbued with great compassion who have undertaken the salvation of all sentient beings, who have undertaken the purgation of all unfavorable and unhappy states, who have undertaken the perpetuation of the lineage of buddhas in all buddha-lands, who have undertaken to preserve the teachings of all buddhas, who have plunged into the ocean of great vows to continue enlightening practice through all ages, who have undertaken to clarify the light of unobscured knowledge of the ocean of all phenomena, who have attained the state of the light of instantaneous knowledge of the ocean of wisdom of past, present, and future. 
“Now, then, by the empowerment of Buddha I will tell you: 
in the past, as many eons ago as atoms in a buddha-land, there was an age called Sphere of Dispassion in a world called Sunny Brilliance; as many buddhas as atoms in the polar mountain arose in that age. 
Now, that world rested on an ocean of all kinds of jewels of pure light and was itself made of all kinds of fragrant jewels. 
It was perfectly round and pure, with some defilement. It was covered with canopies of all kinds of ornaments, and surrounded by a thousand peripheral mountain ranges, circles of jewels in all arrays. 
It had millions of sets of four continents, some of which were inhabited by beings whose actions were defiled and beings whose actions were undefiled, some of which were inhabited by beings whose actions were a mixture of defilement and purity, some of which were inhabited by beings who were mostly pure with some defilement, beings of refined virtues, beings with little in them that is blameworthy; and some were inhabited by wholly pure enlightening beings. 
“In the eastern part of that world, at the border of the peripheral mountains, was a set of four continents called Jewel Flower Lamp Banner. The land was pure, with some defilement. 
There was an abundance of food without plowing or sowing, and there were dwelling places resulting from the maturation of past deeds. 
There were wish-fulfilling trees everywhere, trees of various fragrances always emitting clouds of perfume, various garland trees constantly showering garlands, various flower trees raining multitudes of flowers of inconceivable colors and scents, trees of aromatic powders of various qualities continually giving forth a rain of powder of fragrant jewels, various jewel trees shining with light from their jewel buds, and trees of various celestial instruments that filled the air with beautiful sounds produced when stirred by the breeze. 
The sun and moon shined pleasantly day and night, and jewels shone everywhere. 
“At that time there were millions of capital cities on those four continents, each of which was surrounded by a thousand rivers. 
Each of those rivers carried various celestial flowers and produced celestial music; the banks were lined with trees of various jewels, and those who traveled by boat on the rivers enjoyed various delights to their hearts’ content. 
Between the river were built millions of cities, each surrounded by millions of towns. 
In all the cities and towns were many heavenly parks, palaces, and mansions. 
“In the middle of the southernmost of those four continents was a central capital city called Jewel Flower Lamp Banner, which was prosperous and peaceful, with a large population of virtuous people. 
The king in that city ruled the four continents; spontaneously born in the calyx of a lotus, he had the thirty-two marks of a great man and was a just ruler. 
He had a thousand sons, valiant, strong, destroyers of enemy armies. He also had millions of concubines who were products of the same virtues as was the king, carried out the same practices, and were noble-minded. They were as beautiful as goddesses, with golden complexions, celestial fragrances and auras of pure light emanating from their bodies. He also had millions of ministers, superlative advisers. 
“The king also had a beautiful wife, whose aura constantly suffused a thousand leagues all around her with multicolored light of celestial fragrance. 
That queen had a daughter by the king who was so beautiful that no one ever tired of looking at her. Just as no one was ever tired of the sight of the sovereign, in the same way no one was ever sated with the sight of the princess, except those sated with wisdom. “At that time the life span of the beings in that world was measureless—there were none with fixed life spans and no untimely deaths. Also at that time the variety of forms of sentient beings was known, as was the variety of their colors, voices, names, families, life spans, physical sizes, abilities and strengths, agreeable and unpleasant affairs, and higher and lower inclinations. 
There, those with better appearances and more confidence, who were physically perfect and good-looking, proclaimed their superiority to others; and those with well-formed bodies looked down on all those with ill-formed bodies. Then, because of the evil of mutual contempt, they lost their span of life, physical appearance, strength, and happiness—all was lost. “There was an enlightenment tree north of the city called Sound of Clouds of Teachings Illumining All. 
Its strong roots were made of indestructible diamonds that showed the arrays of the enlightenment sites of all buddhas in every moment; its trunk was a mass of all kinds of jewels, high and wide; its foliage, flowers, and fruits were made of all kinds of jewels. It was perfectly formed, well proportioned everywhere, its foliage equally distributed, with endless adornments throughout, flashing with all kinds of jewel lights radiating in all directions, producing sounds of magical displays of the spheres of all buddhas. 
“In front of that enlightenment site there was a pond of fragrant water called Sound of Clouds Thundering Teachings with Jewel Flower Lightning, surrounded by millions of jewel trees. 
Each of those trees was formed like the enlightenment tree. The banks of the pond were made of well-distributed collections of all kinds of gems, hung with strings of all kinds of jewels, graced with arrays of mansions made of pure jewels, adorned with pure arrays of all kinds of ornaments. 
The whole enlightenment site was also surrounded by countless jewel towers in lotus calyxes with inconceivable adornments. In the middle of the pond appeared a great ruby lotus called Array of Clouds of Light Rays Flashing Lightning from Between the Leaves Illumining the Sphere of the Buddhas of Past, Present, and Future. 
“In that lotus appeared a buddha named Paragon of Virtue Radiant with the Light of Universal Knowledge, who was the first of as many buddhas as atoms in the polar mountain to attain supreme perfect enlightenment in that eon. Having developed sentient beings for thousands of years by hearing the Teaching, he prepared them by manifestation of lights for ten thousand years for the appearance of the buddha in ten thousand years: 
there emanated from that great lotus a light called ‘spotless lamp of all beings,’ and the beings touched by that light became aware that the buddha would emerge in ten thousand years. 
They realized that the buddha would emerge in nine thousand years as a light called ‘full of undefiled radiance’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, and the beings touched by the light perceived all subtle forms. 
Realizing that the buddha would emerge in eight thousand years as a light called ‘voice of the results of the deeds of all beings’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light comprehended the oceans of their own doings and gained recollection and knowledge of their deeds. 
Realizing that the buddha would emerge in seven thousand years as a light called ‘voice produced by all roots of goodness’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light gained completeness of all their faculties. 
Realizing that the buddha would emerge in six thousand years as a light called ‘sound of revelation of the inconceivable sphere of buddhas’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light were transformed into higher states. 
Realizing that the buddha would emerge in five thousand years as a light called ‘conveying the dramatic mental impression of the purity of all buddha-lands’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light saw all aspects of the purity of buddha-lands. 
Realizing the buddha would emerge in four thousand years as a light called ‘lamp of the unity of the realm of buddhas’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light comprehended the omnipresent miracle of the buddha. 
Realizing the buddha would emerge in three thousand years as a light called ‘lamp in the presence of all beings’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light were engrossed in the sight of the buddha right before them. 
Realizing the buddha would emerge in two thousand years as a light called ‘lamp of lightning of knowledge of past, present, and future’ emanated from the tree of enlightenment along with the voice of the past efforts of the buddha, the beings touched by the light put faith in and entered into the oceans of past efforts of the buddha. 
Realizing the buddha would emerge in a thousand years as a light called ‘lamp of realization of suchness of unobscured knowledge’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light gained the power of the universal eye to see the miracles of all buddhas, the buddha-lands, and all sentient beings. 
Realizing the buddha would emerge in a hundred years as a light called ‘product of virtues of all beings resulting from seeing buddhas’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light got an impression of the emergence of Buddha. 
Realizing the buddha would appear in seven days as a light called ‘sound producing happiness and joy in all sentient beings’ emanated from the enlightenment tree, the beings touched by the light developed the energy of the great joy of seeing Buddha. 
“Having thus developed beings for ten thousand years by means of such measureless lights, when the seven days were up he shook that whole world with infinite means of shaking it and made it completely pure, as the buddha-lands of all buddhas in the ten directions are pure—and in each moment of thought he showed the various inconceivable arrays of all those buddha-lands. And in those final seven days all the beings in that world who were ripe for the sight of Buddha stood facing the site of enlightenment. 
“Then the supremacy of the realm of all buddhas was proclaimed from every single object in that world—from all the peripheral mountains, all the polar mountains, all the other mountains, all the rivers, all the seas, all the trees, all the land masses, all the cities, all the walls, all the buildings, all the clothing, ornaments, and paraphernalia, all the music and song, and all the created adornments—emanating clouds of all kinds of fragrant smoke, clouds of lusters of all jewels, clouds of all kinds of precious clothing and jewelry, clouds of mountains of all kinds of jewel flowers, clouds of all kinds of aromatic powders, clouds of light rays of all buddhas flashing, clouds of auras of all buddhas, clouds of oceans of sayings of all buddhas, clouds of glorious manifestations of the marks and embellishments of all buddhas, manifesting the signs that a buddha is about to appear in the world. 
Around the great ruby lotus Array of Clouds of Light Rays Flashing Lightning from Between the Leaves Illumining the Sphere of the Buddhas of Past, Present, and Future, there stood as many ruby lotuses as atoms in ten buddha-lands, on which appeared as many jewel lion seats, on which appeared as many enlightening beings sitting cross-legged. 
“As soon as that buddha, Paragon of Virtue Radiant with the Light of Universal Knowledge, had realized supreme perfect enlightenment, the buddhas in all worlds in the ten directions attained supreme perfect enlightenment and set in motion the wheel of teaching for sentient beings in accordance with their mentalities: 
thereby innumerable sentient beings in that world were thenceforth freed from the calamities of all states of misery, innumerable sentient beings were led to heaven, innumerable beings were led to the stage of saints, innumerable beings were led to the stage of individual enlightenment, innumerable beings were developed to the point of enlightenment in which emancipation is realized by way of intense illumination, innumerable sentient beings were developed to the point of enlightenment characterized by pure exertion, innumerable sentient beings were developed to the point of enlightenment in which emancipation is realized through the efficacy of purification of the senses, innumerable sentient beings were developed to the point of enlightenment in which emancipation is realized through pursuing conduct consonant with the powers of knowledge, innumerable sentient beings were led to enlightenment in which emancipation is made possible by conveyance to the precincts of the citadel of truth, innumerable sentient beings were led to enlightenment in which emancipation is realized by means of integration of efforts in practice, innumerable sentient beings were led to enlightenment in which emancipation is realized through methods of concentration, innumerable sentient beings were led to enlightenment in which emancipation is realized through means of purifying all objects, innumerable sentient beings were inspired to the enlightenment of enlightening beings, innumerable sentient beings were set in the path of enlightening beings, innumerable sentient beings were led to the purification of the path of transcendent ways, innumerable sentient beings were led to the first stage of enlightening beings; in the same way, as the buddha turned the wheel of teaching by his inconceivable spiritual power, in each moment of consciousness innumerable sentient beings were led to the second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, and tenth stages; innumerable sentient beings were introduced to the practice of enlightening beings based on the most excellent vows; innumerable sentient beings were led to the purification of commitment to the conduct of universally good enlightening beings. 
Thus, as the buddha turned the wheel of teaching by his inconceivable spiritual power, he succeeded in guiding innumerable sentient beings in each moment of consciousness, and all the sentient beings in that world, according to their mentalities, perceived the Teaching through various bodies expediently projected by the buddha. 
“At that time, furthermore, in order to discipline the beings in the city who were intoxicated with enjoyment of forms and colors and who were contemptuous of each other, the enlightening being Universally Good magically assumed a body of superlative appearance and went to the city. 
His glorious light illumined the city so that the lights of the king and queen, the lights of the jewel trees and the precious stones, even the lights of the sun, moon, planets, and stars, and all the lights of the whole continent, could not be perceived. Just as when the sun rises the darkness disappears and the moon, planets, and stars cannot be seen, in the same way all the lights of the continent, overwhelmed by the light of Universal Good, could not be seen. 
Just as a mass of carbon black does not look beautiful or shine or seem bright or lustrous in the presence of pure gold, in the same way the bodies of those beings did not look beautiful or shine or seem bright or lustrous in the presence of the universally good enlightening being Samantabhadra. 
They thought, ‘Who might this be, a god, or Brahma, before whom we do not appear beautiful, do not shine, do not glow, have no radiance or luster? 
We cannot grasp his appearance.’ “Then Universally Good stood in the sky above the palace of the king in the middle of the city and said to the king, ‘Know, O king, that a buddha, a perfectly enlightened one, has arisen in the world. 
He is in this very realm of yours, at the enlightenment site Emblem of the Sound of Clouds of Teaching Revealing Universal Truth.’ “Now, the daughter of the king, seeing the form-body and the supernal manifestation of light of the enlightening being Universally Good, and hearing the sound of his ornaments, was enraptured and was inspired with this thought: ‘Whatever basic goodness I have accumulated, may I thereby attain such a body, such adornment, such features, such deportment, such mystic power. 
Just as he generates light in the dark night of sentient beings and announces the emergence of a buddha, in the same way may I also dispel the darkness of nescience in sentient beings and produce the light of great knowledge. 
Wherever I may be born, may I never be apart from this spiritual benefactor.’ “Then the king, along with his armies, his concubines, his sons, his ministers, and the inhabitants of the city, left the city and rose a league in the air by the magic power of the king, who filled the four continents with a great light, and who, in order to get all sentient beings to see the buddha, manifested his reflection in all the jewel mountains, stood before all the sentient beings in the four continents, and praised the sight of buddha in verse: Buddha has appeared in the world, Savior of all living beings; All should get up and go To see the guide of the world. 
Buddhas appear once In millions of eons And teach the truth For the benefit of all beings. 
Seeing the world in error, Shrouded by the darkness of nescience, And oppressed by the pains of life and death, Buddhas conceive great compassion. 
For countless millions of eons They have practiced enlightenment To perfect sentient beings And extinguish all suffering. 
They have given up Their hands and feet, ears, noses, and heads For endless eons, to attain The immortality of enlightenment. 
It is hard to find a guide of the world, Even in millions of eons; To listen to them, meet them, and associate with them Cannot but be fruitful. 
This supreme teacher is to be seen Sitting on the seat of enlightenment, Having conquered the demon armies And realized the highest awakening. 
Behold the body of Buddha, With an endless array of lights, Emanating various glows Which soothe the world. 
Countless multitudes of light beams Emanate from the Buddha’s pores; Those on whom they shine Feel incomparable joy. 
Honor the guide of your own will— Muster great energy and go to him. “Then the king, having exhorted the inhabitants of his domain with these verses, showering the whole enlightenment site with offerings from ten thousand clouds of offerings developed from the roots of goodness of the ruler, went to the buddha, covering the sky with clouds of parasols of all jewels and canopies of clouds of all kinds of flowers, adorning the sky with cloud covers of all kinds of robes, clouds of nets of jewel bells, clouds of fragrant flames given off by an ocean of all kinds of scents, clouds of chairs made of all kinds of jewels, magically adorning the sky with clouds raining all kinds of presents. 
Having gone to the buddha and paid his respects, the king sat before the buddha in a throne of great jewels flashing light in all directions. 
“At that point the daughter of the king took off all her jewelry and scattered it over the buddha; the jewelry formed a parasol over the buddha’s head and stayed there, covered all around with nets of various jewels, held by the chief water spirits, the whole body of jewelry forming a perfect circle surrounded by ten jewel parasols, all completely pure, in the shape of a tower, variously arrayed, covered by clouds of all kinds of jewel ornaments, covered by arrays of diamond trees, adorned with the finest pearls from all the fragrant seas. 
In the middle of that she saw a great enlightenment tree called ‘draped with foliage of all jewels produced by the cosmos of realities,’ with infinitely various adornments, displaying various auspicious supernal manifestations. 
There she saw a buddha named Vairocana surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands, all of whom had undertaken the vows of practice of universally good enlightening beings and dwelt in the inconceivably various total unity of all enlightening beings. 
She also saw the leaders of all worlds in the presence of the buddha. 
She also perceived that world’s ages of formation and disintegration, and the succession of past buddhas in that world. 
She also saw the universally good enlightening being Samantabhadra in that world, and saw him in the presence of all buddhas, honoring the buddhas and guiding all sentient beings to full development. 
In each of those worlds she also saw as many worlds as atoms in a buddha-land, with their boundaries, bases, forms, masses, and various purities of adornment, covered by clouds of various supernal manifestations, with various names and numbers of ages, various lineages of buddhas appearing, various temporal locations, various spatial locations, belonging to various phenomenal realms within various planes of the cosmos, situated in various planes of space, with various arrays of enlightenment sites, various lights projected by buddhas, various buddhas’ lion thrones, various oceanic audiences of buddhas, various circulations of the audiences of buddhas, various clarifications by the skill in means of buddhas, various buddhas’ ways of turning the wheel of teaching, various sayings of buddhas, various indications of oceans of ways of expressing thought, and enunciations of multitudes of various scriptures. “Seeing all these, she was all the more enraptured. 
The buddha expounded to her in her rapture a scripture called Voice of the Cycles of Teaching of All Buddhas, along with as many accompanying scriptures as atoms in ten buddha-lands. 
When she had heard these scriptures, ten hundred thousand kinds of concentration entered into her, subtle and pleasant, like the consciousness of an embryo on the first day in the mother’s womb, like the commencement of activity in beings, like the impulse of the sprout in the seed of a tree on the day it is planted—this is how subtle and full of potential those concentrations were. 
Ten hundred thousand concentrations descended into her, beginning with such concentrations as one called ‘face-to-face communication with all buddhas,’ one called ‘illumination of all lands,’ one called ‘penetrating the principles of all pasts, presents, and futures,’ one called ‘voice of the teaching activity of all buddhas,’ one called ‘communicating the ocean of vows of all buddhas,’ one called ‘communicating the voice of all means of emancipation from all suffering and torture of the mundane whirl,’ one called ‘manifestation of the vow to dispel the darkness of all sentient beings,’ one called ‘determination to release all sentient beings from suffering’ one called ‘source of achievement of happiness for all sentient beings,’ one called ‘source of tireless developmental guidance for all sentient beings,’ one called ‘characterized by entry into the path of all enlightening beings,’ and one called ‘supernal manifestation produced by entry into the stages of all enlightening beings.’ “With her mind subtly concentrated, unwavering, joyful, refreshed, unpreoccupied, in harmony with the wise, focused on profound omniscience, swelling with oceanic love, free from all attachments, not dwelling on any worldly objects, entering the sphere of those who arrive at Thusness, aware of the appearances of all buddhas, unperturbed, unagitated, unobstructed, unfragmented, neither excited nor depressed, tireless, unretreating, undiscouraged, meditating on the inherent nature of all things, realizing the ocean of principles based on the inherent nature of all things, following the principles of investigation of all things, plunging into the ocean of all sentient beings, determined to save all worldlings, illumined by the vast ocean of buddhas, plunging into the ocean of vows of all buddhas, breaking through all obstructions to enlightenment, gathering great stores of virtue, on the verge of attainment of the ten powers of buddhas, aware of the realms of all enlightening beings, amassing the provisions of all enlightening beings for the path of enlightenment, her mind reaching everywhere to take up the great vow of universal good, by as many oceans of vows as atoms in ten buddha-lands she undertook the past vow of all buddhas for the purification of their own buddha-lands. 
That is, by guiding all sentient beings to perfection, to know all ways to the realm of reality, to enter the ocean of all ways to the realm of reality, to enter enlightening practice in all buddha-lands forever, to live in the sphere of the practices of all enlightening beings forever, to visit all buddhas, to associate with all spiritual benefactors, to fully honor and serve all buddhas, to continue with each moment of consciousness the practice of enlightening beings which increasingly becomes aware of omniscient knowledge. 
She undertook the vow of universally good enlightening practice by means of as many oceans of ways of undertaking vows as atoms in ten buddha-lands, beginning with such vows as these. 
“Ten eons before that, in the world Light Shining from a Jewel Sun and Moon, in which the teaching of the buddha Moonlike Brilliance was preserved, that same woman, instructed by the enlightening being Universally Good, repaired a ruined image of the Buddha seated on a lotus, painted it, and adorned it, having gone to Universally Good with the aspiration for enlightenment. 
At this time, furthermore, Universally Good was thoroughly pleased with her. “Who do you think the king of that time was? 
It was none other than the enlightening being Manjushri, the Glorious One, who was the king. 
And do not suppose that it was anyone else but the night goddess Prashantarutasagaravati, who is seated here near me, who was the queen. 
That became a determining factor for me all the way to supreme enlightenment. 
And when I was directed by the enlightening being Universally Good toward supreme perfect enlightenment, I first aroused the determination for enlightenment. Then, when I went to the buddha Paragon of Virtue Radiant with the Light of Universal Knowledge and cast my jewelry over him, saw the buddha’s miraculous power, and heard the Teaching from him, I attained this enlightening liberation showing guidance to all sentient beings. And I propitiated all those buddhas, numerous as atoms in the polar mountain, and honored them with all kinds of offerings. And I listened to all their teachings, and put their instructions into practice; and I gained such intense respect for those buddhas that in a single moment of thought I would see all those buddhas, their circles of enlightening beings, and their buddha-lands. 
“When that world Radiant Brilliance had passed away and the age Sphere of Dispassion was over, there followed a world called Magnificent Array Brilliantly Adorned with Jewel Discs, and an age called Great Light; five hundred buddhas emerged therein, and I propitiated them all. 
The first buddha in that age was named Representative of Great Compassion; when he was leaving home, I, who had become a night goddess, made offerings to him. 
After him, a buddha named Adamantine Paragon of Man arose; I, at that time a ruler, made offerings to him, and he expounded to me a scripture called Source of All Buddhas, accompanied by as many scriptures as atoms in ten buddha-lands, which I listened to and took up. 
After that a buddha named Magnificent Array of Lights of a Mountain of Blazing Fire appeared; at that time the daughter of a grandee, I made offerings to him, and he expounded to me a scripture called Containing the Manifestations of Past, Present, and Future, accompanied by as many scriptures as atoms in the continent, which I listened to and took up. 
After that a buddha named King of Energy Risen Above the Ocean of All Phenomena appeared in the world; at that time a titan chieftain, I made offerings to him, and he expounded to me a scripture called Analysis of Knowledge of the Planes of All Reality Realms, accompanied by five hundred scriptures, which I listened to and took up. 
After that a buddha named Light of the Ocean of Splendor of the Profound Doctrine appeared; at that time the daughter of a chief water spirit, I honored him with a shower of wish-fulfilling jewels, and he expounded to me a scripture called Light of Reason in the Ocean of Reality Realms, accompanied by as many scriptures as atoms in ten buddha-lands, which I listened to, took up, and memorized. 
After that a buddha named Splendor of the Multitude of Manifestations of the Ocean of Virtue appeared; at that time a seer with five kinds of occult knowledge, I went to him by magical power with a company of six thousand seers and honored him with incense and flowers. 
He expounded to me a scripture called Lamp of Independence, accompanied by six thousand scriptures, which I listened to and took up. 
After that a buddha named Imbued with Sunny Radiance appeared. At that time I was an earth goddess named Source of Common Weal; accompanied by countless earth goddesses, I went to that buddha showering jewel flowers and garlands from trees of all jewels as tokens of honor. 
He expounded a scripture called Womb of Knowledge from Which All Buddhas Are Born, along with countless scriptures, which I listened to and remembered permanently. 
“The last of those five hundred buddhas was named Lamp Radiant As a Mountain Peak of Jewels Filling the Space of the Cosmos. 
At that time I was a dancing girl named Radiantly Beautiful Face. 
When the buddha came into the city, I began to dance and by the power of the buddha rose into the air and went to the buddha, praising him with a thousand verses. 
He illumined my whole body with a light called Array of Cosmic Lightning, which emanated from the circle of hair between his brows; and as soon as that light touched me I attained a liberation called ‘offspring of contemplation of the principles of the reality realm.’ “Thus I associated with and honored all the five hundred buddhas of that age in that world, and I remember everything they taught me, forgetting nothing, not even a line or letter. 
Also, as I went to each buddha, I benefited innumerable beings by describing the ways of buddhas. 
Also, from each buddha I obtained illumination by the lightning of omniscience, called ‘womb of knowledge of past, present, and future, extensive as the cosmos,’ which is the oceanic body of the reality realm, containing at once all the practices of universal good. 
Now I perceive infinite buddhas in each mental moment, and from seeing those buddhas, flashes of light of omniscience which I have not previously apprehended or seen enter into my mind, and I do not fall away from the practice of universally good enlightening beings. 
Because apprehending these flashes of light of omniscience is endlessly and infinitely revealing and instructive.” Then the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri spoke these verses to Sudhana, further elucidating the enlightening liberation showing guidance for beings in all worlds: Listen, Sudhana, as I tell Of what is deep, hard to see, hard to fathom: Means of distinction of the planes of all times, Total illumination of the appearances of things. 
Listen to me explain how I first aspired to enlightenment In quest of the qualities of buddhas, And how I attained This liberation of awareness. 
More eons ago than atoms in a buddha-land, There was a land called Radiant Brilliance, vast and pure, Where there was an age called Sphere of Dispassion, During which there was an unbroken succession of buddhas. As many buddhas as atoms in the polar mountain, free from evil, appeared: 
The first was Paragon of Virtue Radiant with the Light of Universal Knowledge; Then Banner of Truth, Polar Mountain of Light, and Lion of Virtue; King of Peace, Continual Life, Lofty Renown, Glory of Supreme Virtue, Light Maker, Moon Face—these were the first ten buddhas there. 
Vault of the Sky, Universal Light, Omnipresent, Source of the Sea of Mindfulness, Exalted, Summit of Glory, Light of Lofty Flames of Truth, Lotus Born, The Compassionate, and Flower of the Cosmos— These were the second ten, lighting the ocean of buddhas. 
Mind of Foremost Light, Mind of Knowledge, Manifold Benefits, Glory of Indra, Celestial Intellect, Mind of Supreme Energy, Splendor of Knowledge, Brilliance of the Best of Lights, Mighty Celestial Stride, Lotus of the Cosmos— These were the third ten buddhas, revealing this vast teaching. 
Splendor of a Mountain of Jewel Lights, then Radiant Ocean of Virtues, Light of Truth, Lotus-Born Glory, Moonlike Eye of the World, Fragrant Light, Brilliant As a Mountain of Jewels, Radiant King in the Form of a Celestial Musician, Full of Glorious Light of the Finest of Jewels, and tenth was Physically Calm. 
After that were Vast Awareness, Jewel Luster, Splendor of Clouds in the Sky, Superb Appearance, magnificent, and Sphere of Holy Practices, radiant, Living Like Primeval Man, Splendid As the Polar Mountain, King Resplendent with Virtue, Paragon of Invincible Resolve, and Lofty Tree the tenth of them. 
Imbued with the Splendor of the King of Trees, Reflection of the Bodies of the Leaders of the Worlds, Superlative Radiance, Spotless Light, Brilliance of the Energy of Earth, Glory of the Supreme Virtues of the Profound Teaching, Knowledge of the Sound of the Ocean of Truths, Pole of the World, Radiant Mind, Diamond Light. 
Light of Brahma, Sound of Space, Splendor of Reflection of the Cosmos, Sphere Of Lights, Brilliant Mind with the Ten Powers of Knowledge, Lamp of Space, Beautiful Splendor, Glory of Sunlight, Light of Virtue, Tranquil Radiance, and Beauty of Clouds of Compassion, were the next ten buddhas. 
Mindful of the Light of Power Born of Thusness, Appearing to All Beings, Exalted Light, Embodiment of Impartiality, Born of Truth, Swift As the Wind, Paragon of Heroism, Jewel Body Luster, Light Appearing in All Times— These were the next ten buddhas. 
Shining Light of the Ocean of Vows, Splendor of the Mountain of Adamantine Will, Exalted Brilliance, Paragon of Mindfulness, Aware of Truth, Lamp of Wisdom, Radiance of the Most Excellent Light, then Vast Intellect, Following the Course of Knowledge of the Principles of the Cosmos, and Light of Knowledge of Oceanic Awareness. 
Sublime Giver of Jewels of Truth, Clouds of Glory of Mountains of Virtue, Light of the Lamp of Peace, Light of Fiery Energy, Voice of Cessation, Paragon of Tranquillity, Radiant Lamp of the World, Energy of Great Vows, Invincible Power, Radiant Sea of Lights of Knowledge. 
Spiritual Master, Unattached Mind, Understanding the Speech of All Beings, Articulate in All Languages, Resolved to Sacrifice Willingly, Appearing to All Beings Everywhere, Adopting Forms Congenial to All Beings, Living Together for the Benefit of Others, Embodiment of Nature, and the Buddha Good: 
Beginning with these, I served as many buddhas, light-makers, As atoms in the polar mountain. And I served all the buddhas who appeared In as many eons as atoms in the buddha-lands, And entered this ocean of liberation. I have practiced and developed this liberation for infinite eons; Having heard it and put it into practice, You will accomplish this teaching soon. 
“I know only this enlightening liberation showing guidance to beings in all worlds. 
How can I know the practice on tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who live by various resolutions in the infinitely varied ocean of enlightening practices, who manifest various minds and bodies, who have perfected oceans of various faculties, who have carried through the various vows of enlightening beings? 
“In this same enlightenment site is a night goddess named Prashantarutasagaravati, who sits next to me on a lotus seat, in a calyx adorned with starry diamonds, surrounded by countless tens of hundreds of thousands of night goddesses—go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri and left her. 
Prashantarutasagaravati Then Sudhana, cultivating that enlightening liberation of the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri, showing guidance to beings in all worlds, entering into it, becoming absorbed in it, plunging into it, expanding it, spreading it, extending it, mastering it, making it manifest, attaining it, went to the night goddess Prashantarutasagaravati. 
He paid his respects to her and said, “With the help of spiritual benefactors I am learning the practice of enlightening beings, entering into the practice of enlightening beings, carrying out the practice of enlightening beings; having undertaken the practice of enlightening beings, I want to become thoroughly familiar with omniscience. 
So please tell me, noble goddess, how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” The goddess said, “It is good that you seek the ocean of practices of enlightening beings by relying on spiritual benefactors. 
I have attained an enlightening liberation of supernal manifestations of a moment of consciousness producing floods of immense joy.” Sudhana said, “What is your activity, your sphere of action, your means of practice, your contemplation? 
What is the scope of this liberation?” She said, “I have attained equanimity through purification of the ocean of mind. 
I have attained indestructible adornment undefiled by the taint of all worldly passion. 
My mind is unregressing and unswerving from its object. 
My mind is unshakable, adorned with virtues like a mountain of jewels. My mind is not fixed on anything, not dependent on anything. 
My mind is intent on serving all beings. 
My mind is tireless in seeing all buddhas. 
My desire for the powers of all enlightening beings is pure. 
My mind dwells in the ocean of mindfulness of the manifestations of great knowledge. 
I have undertaken to extinguish beings’ suffering caused by separation from loved ones and contact with the uncongenial. I am intent on stopping all the sufferings of beings that come from delusion arising from their relations to objects. I am a refuge for all fallen beings and am engaged in showing all beings means of emancipation from the miseries of the mundane whirl. I have undertaken to stop all sentient beings’ sadness, lamentation, suffering, depression, and mental disturbance occasioned by birth, old age, and death. 
I have undertaken to produce the supreme felicity of the enlightened in all beings. I find satisfaction in presenting my services for the happiness of beings in all abodes, and I see to their spiritual protection, and I gradually develop them to omniscience. 
That is to say, I produce detachment in beings who live in great palaces and mansions, and I remove their various melancholies, and in order to put an end to all attachments, I teach them to realize the intrinsic nature of all things. 
I teach those who have long-standing ties of affection with their families and relatives in such a way that they may get to meet and associate with buddhas and enlightening beings. 
Those who are involved with their spouses and children I teach in such a way as to extinguish their craving for mundane enjoyments and so that they will become impartial toward all and will come to have great compassion. 
Those in the marketplaces I teach in such a way that they will enter into association with the community of sages and get to meet enlightened people. 
Those who are obsessed with consumer goods I teach in such a way that they acquire transcendent forbearance. 
Those eagerly desirous of enjoyment of sense objects I teach in such a way that they may arrive at the realm of the enlightened. Those who are filled with anger I teach in such a way as to lead them to transcendent tolerance. 
Those who are lazy I teach in such a way as to purify transcendent vigor. 
Those whose minds are confused I teach to attain the transcendent meditation of those who arrive at Thusness. 
Those who are stupid I teach in such a way that they may acquire transcendent wisdom. 
Those attached to the realms of desire, form, or formlessness, I teach in such a way that they may escape from the sufferings of the mundane whirl. 
Those with low aspirations I teach in such a way that they may fulfill the vow of enlightenment. 
Those intent on their own benefit I teach in such a way that they may fulfill the vow to bring benefit to all beings. 
Those with weak wills I teach in such a way that they may perfect the transcendent power of enlightening beings. 
Those in misery I teach in such a way as to enable them to attain the felicity of omniscience. 
Those who are sick I teach in such a way that they may develop the reflectionlike bodies characteristic of enlightening beings. 
Those attached to various pleasures I teach in such a way that they may acquire delight in the practices of enlightening beings. 
Those who are destitute I teach in such a way that they may obtain the spiritual treasury of enlightening beings. 
Those who resort to parks and gardens I teach in such a way that they are motivated to seek the way to enlightenment. 
Those who are on the road I teach in such a way that they set out on the road to omniscience. 
Those in villages I teach in such a way that they may be emancipated from everything in the realms of desire, form, and formlessness. 
Those in communities I teach in such a way as to lead them beyond the paths of those who strive for individual salvation and set them on the way to buddhahood. 
Those in cities I teach in such a way as to reveal the city of the supreme truth. 
Those in the intermediate directions I teach in such a way that they may attain knowledge of the equality of past, present, and future. 
Those in the four quarters I teach in such a way that they may realize higher knowledge of all things. 
Those whose behavior is governed solely by lust I teach to stop their craving for all mundane pleasures by means of contemplation of impurity. 
Those who act on hatred I teach in such a way that they many enter the ocean of universal love. 
Those who act on delusion I teach in such a way that they may realize higher knowledge with analytic comprehension of all things. 
Those who act equally on lust, hatred, and delusion I teach in such a way that they may rise above them through the ocean of means of the undertakings of all vehicles of emancipation. Those who are inclined to enjoyment of evanescent mundane objects I teach in such a way as to lead them away from attachment to transient mundane objects. Those who are touched by all the miseries of the mundane whirl I teach in such a way that they may be unaffected by the woes of life and death. Those who are susceptible to guidance by the enlightened I teach in such a way as to elucidate unborn birth. 
Those who are attached to physical and mental elements I teach in such a way that they may abide in nonreliance. Those who are cowardly I teach in such a way as to reveal the excellence of the adornments of the path of enlightenment. 
To those who are conceited I elucidate acceptance of the equality of all things. 
To those who are prone to deceit and guile I explain the purity of intention of enlightening beings. 
“In this way I take care of all sentient beings by giving teaching. Leading them away from all miseries and paths leading to unhappiness, showing them the happiness of human and celestial states, freeing them from the dominion of the realms of desire, form, and formlessness, leading them to omniscience, developing them to maturity by various means, I rejoice, exult, become glad at heart, having achieved manifestation of the ocean of energy of great joy. 
“Furthermore, as I observe the oceans of assemblies of enlightening beings in all directions, I generate oceans of energy of various joys in the enlightening beings carrying out various vows, enlightening beings with variously purified bodies, with various auras of light, radiating auras of light beams of infinite colors, illumined by knowledge penetrating oceans of various ways to omniscience, plunged into oceans of various concentrations, manifesting various occult powers, speaking in various languages, variously adorned, plunged into various principles of buddhahood, gone to various lands, seeing various multitudes of buddhas, imbued with oceans of various intellectual capacities, aware of the sphere of knowledge of various liberations of buddhas, encompassing oceans of various knowledges, dwelling in various methods of concentration, freely employing various doctrines, liberations, and disciplines, entering various doors to omniscience, variously adorning the sky of the cosmos, filling the sky with clouds of various supernal manifestations, observing various communities, gathered joyfully in various worlds, gone to various buddha-lands, assembled in various places, sent forth by buddhas, leaving the presence of various buddhas in company with groups of enlightening beings, showering rain from clouds of various adornments, entering into the systems of various buddhas, contemplating the oceans of teachings of various buddhas, plunged into various oceans of knowledge, sitting in the midst of various magnificent arrays. 
Those enlightening beings, filled with various joys, enter the oceans of assemblies of buddhas, see them, and contemplate them; as they meditate on the infinity of the powers of buddhas, floods of great joy arise in them. 
“Furthermore, perceiving the inconceivable purity of the form body of Vairocana Buddha, adorned by the marks of greatness, I experience exalted joy and serenity. 
“Also, seeing as many oceans of great beams of light as atoms in infinite buddha-lands emanate from each pore of Vairocana Buddha’s body, each beam of light accompanied by as many oceans of light beams as atoms in infinite buddha-lands, pervading all buddha-universes and extinguishing the suffering of all beings, in each moment of consciousness I experience floods of great joy. 
“Also, seeing massive clouds of lights the color of all jewels, as many as atoms in all buddha-lands, emerging from Vairocana’s head moment to moment, pervading all universes, I experience great floods of joy. 
“Also, seeing multitudes of various fragrant lights, as numerous as atoms in all buddha-lands, emanating from each pore of Vairocana’s body in each moment of thought, I experience great floods of joy. 
“Also, as I observe Vairocana’s body, seeing multitudes of images of Buddha, adorned with the marks of greatness, as numerous as atoms in all buddha-lands, emanating from each of the Buddha’s marks of greatness in each moment of thought, I experience great floods of joy. 
“Also, as I observe Vairocana’s body, seeing multitudes of Buddha’s spiritual manifestations, as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands, emanate from each pore in each moment of thought, including manifestations of the Buddha’s first inspiration, purification of the six transcendent ways, and progress through the stages of enlightenment, I experience great floods of joy. 
“Also, as I watch Vairocana’s body, seeing multitudes of all kinds of beings, celestial, preternatural, and human, as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands, emanating from each of Vairocana’s pores in each moment of thought, along with their characteristic atmospheres of projected auras, going throughout all worlds, appearing to those sentient beings who are suited to being guided by manifestations of such and such particular forms of being, and expounding the Teaching to them, I experience great floods of joy. 
“And as I watch Vairocana’s body, seeing multitudes of Brahma gods, as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands, emanating from each pore in each moment of thought, along with the miraculous projections of Brahma gods, appearing to sentient beings in all universes who are suited to being guided by manifestations in the form of Brahma gods and expounding the Teaching to them with the voice of Brahma, in each moment of awareness I experience great floods of joy of cosmic dimensions concomitant with all-knowledge. 
“And so I attain what I have never attained before, understand what I have never understood before, penetrate what I have never penetrated before, pervade what I have never pervaded before, see what I have never seen before, and hear what I have never heard before. 
All things are to be completely known by the nature of things as being of one characteristic at all times, while yet manifest in an endless variety as all things. 
“This is the range of the ocean of means of the enlightening liberation of supernal manifestations of a moment of thought producing immense floods of joy. 
This liberation is infinite because it goes into the ocean of principles of the cosmos. 
This liberation is inexhaustible because it is inseparable from the determination for omniscience. 
This liberation is endless because it is perceived by the eye of enlightening beings. 
This liberation is peerless, because it pervades the total cosmos. 
This liberation is all-sided, because it encompasses all miracles in a single object. 
This liberation is unfailing, because of practicing the nonduality of all bodies of reality. 
This liberation is unborn, because its practice is like magic. 
This liberation is like a reflection, because it arises as a reflection of the vow for omniscience. 
This liberation is like an emanation, because it emanates the practices of enlightening beings. 
This liberation is like earth, because it is the refuge of all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like water, because it rains great compassion on all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like fire, because it ends the cravings of all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like wind, because it directs all sentient beings to omniscience. 
This liberation is like the ocean, because it is a repository of ornaments of virtues for all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like the polar mountain, because it rises out of the ocean of jewels of knowledge of all things. 
This liberation is like the sky, being the space in which the miracles of the buddhas of past, present, and future take place. 
This liberation is like a great cloud, showering the rain of the cloud of the Teaching on all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like the sun, dispelling the darkness of nescience of all sentient beings. 
This liberation is like the moon, imbued with an ocean of goodness and knowledge. 
This liberation is like arrival at Thusness, reaching everywhere. 
This liberation is like one’s own reflection, being produced by rightness of action. 
This liberation is like an echo, thundering the voice of all truths in accord with inclinations. 
This liberation is like a reflection, communicating to all sentient beings according to their mentalities. 
This liberation is like a great tree, flowering with the miracles of all buddhas. 
This liberation is like diamond, its nature unbreakable. 
This liberation is like a wish-fulfilling jewel, accomplishing an endless variety of miracles. 
This liberation is like a flawless jewel, showing the miracles of the buddhas of past, present, and future without interference. 
This liberation is like a jewel of happiness, equally producing the voice of the teachings of all buddhas. 
This liberation is illustrated by countless such similes.” Then Sudhana asked the night goddess, “How did you manage to attain such a liberation?” She replied, “There are ten great provisions of enlightening beings, great accomplishments, great encompassing practices, great illuminations, great manifestations of power, great good fortunes, great heritages, great capacities, great powers, by the practice of which enlightening beings attain this liberation. 
What are the ten? 
Enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of giving, devoted to satisfying all sentient beings according to their wishes; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of appropriate conduct, devoted to embodying the virtues of all buddhas; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of forbearance, devoted to contemplating the nature of all things; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of vigor, devoted to undertaking the attainment of omniscience without turning back; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of meditation, devoted to extinguishing the fire of afflictions of all sentient beings; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of wisdom, devoted to higher knowledge of all things; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of skill in means, devoted to guiding all sentient beings to perfection; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of vows, going to all lands to go into the practice of enlightening beings for all time in all lands; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of power, going to all universes to ceaselessly manifest realization of enlightenment in each instant in all lands; enlightening beings’ great encompassing practice of knowledge, intent upon the powers of all buddha-lands in those oceans of structures of all realms of reality. 
And in each of those buddha-lands I see Vairocana Buddha at the pinnacle of enlightenment manifesting the miracle of perfect enlightenment in each moment of consciousness, pervading the oceans of structures of all reality realms with each miraculous display of enlightenment. 
I also perceive myself in the presence of each of those buddhas and listen to what the buddhas in those worlds teach. 
And as multitudes of emanations of all those buddhas come forth from all their pores, proclaiming myriad teachings and showing various miracles, and turn the wheel of teaching in all realms by mastery of sentient beings’ minds, using various ideas, I remember, apply, and contemplate it all. 
I pick it up by mental command, able to swiftly grasp all meanings and expressions, clarify it by wisdom penetrating the inner sanctum of purity of all realities, follow its course by higher knowledge investigating the ocean of all realities, encompass it by awareness as vast as past, present, and future, balance it by wisdom conforming to the equality of those who arrive at Thusness. 
I carry out all the principles of the Teaching, I bring forth multitudes of scriptures from all the clouds of teaching, I arrange oceans of doctrines in all the multitudes of scriptures, I gather cycles of doctrine in all the oceans of doctrines, I find oceanic floods of spiritual joy in all the waves of doctrine, I produce momentum in attainment of the stages of enlightenment in all the oceans of spiritual joy, I produce momentum in attainment of oceans of concentration in the momentum through all the stages, I attain oceans of visions of buddhas in all the multitudes of oceans of concentration, I attain oceans of awareness in all the oceans of visions of buddhas, I order the stages of knowledges of past, present, and future in all the oceans of awareness; by concentration on pervading the endlessly variegated ocean of realms, by concentration on comprehending the ocean of past practices of infinite buddhas, by concentration on the range of knowledge of the ocean of past efforts of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of the light of knowledge of infinite buddhas, by concentration on perception of the purity of conduct of infinite buddhas, by concentration on perfection of the stage of forbearance of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of the scope of knowledge of the mighty effort increasing the great force of energy of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of perception of the efforts to purify the ocean of contemplative attainments of the meditations of infinite buddhas, by concentration on the perception of the purity of the ocean of means of consummation of transcendent wisdom of infinite buddhas, by concentrating on penetrating the ocean of ways of consummation of transcendent skill in means of infinite buddhas, by concentration on comprehending the ocean of ways of consummation of transcendental vows of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of knowledge of increasing and perpetuating the good and wise transcendent power of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of contemplation of the ocean of principles of the perfect knowledge of infinite Buddhas, by concentration on attainment of the scope of knowledge of infinite buddhas’s past progress through the stages of enlightening beings, by concentration on infinite buddhas’ past entry into the spheres of the stages of enlightening beings, by concentration on infinite buddhas’ abiding in the stages of enlightening beings, by concentration on infinite buddhas’ perfection of the stages of enlightening, by concentration on contemplation of the ocean of knowledge of infinite buddhas, by concentration on attaining manifestation of the knowledge of infinite buddhas, by concentration on communication of all meetings and association with past buddhas on the part of infinite buddhas when they were enlightening beings, by concentration on attainment of the scope of knowledge of infinite buddhas’ productions of bodies going throughout all lands in the past when they were enlightening beings, by concentration on infinite buddhas’ extension of their past enlightening practices throughout all universes, by concentration on the manifestation of infinite buddhas’ past practices as enlightening beings using various methods to develop and guide all sentient beings, by concentration of infinite buddhas’ pervasion of all realms with their light, by concentration on infinite buddhas’ demonstration of miracles to sentient beings, by concentration on the scope of knowledge of infinite buddhas’ ascent through the stages of enlightenment, by concentration on attainment of the scope of knowledge of the miracle of perfect enlightenment of infinite buddhas, by concentration on receiving and holding all the doctrines preached by infinite buddhas, by concentration on attainment of knowledge of the oceans of marks of distinction manifested by infinite buddhas, by concentration on awareness of infinite buddhas’ oceans of embodiments representing practices, by concentration on attaining the scope of knowledge of the vast realm of infinite buddhas, in every moment of thought I comprehend everything about those buddhas from their first determination to the cessation of their true teaching. 
“If you ask also how long ago I attained this enlightening liberation of supernal manifestations in a moment of thought producing great floods of joy, when I was an enlightenment tree goddess named Exemplary Light Serving As a Beacon of Good in the world Pure Golden Radiance as many eons ago as atoms in a buddha-land, I first aspired to enlightenment on hearing the teaching of the buddha Unremitting Voice of the Reality Realm, and after having carried out the practice of enlightening beings for as many eons as atoms in a buddha-land, I was born in this world and propitiated the buddhas of the eon of Virtue from Krakucchanda to Shakyamuni. 
And I will propitiate and honor all the buddhas yet to come, in this world and in all worlds. 
Even now that world of Pure Golden Radiance still exists, and the lineage of the buddhas there is unbroken. 
So you should apply yourself to this doctrine with the great strength of enlightening being.” Then the goddess further explained her liberation to Sudhana in verse: 
Listen to me tell, O Sudhana, How I attained this pure liberation. Hearing this and generating the power of joy, Enter this way of liberation. 
I practiced for many eons past And purified my mind; Generating great momentum of zealous application, I came into the presence of the citadel of omniscience. 
Hearing of the buddhas, supreme in all times, And developing great faith in them, I served them and their retinues for hundreds of eons With all that is pleasing. 
Seeing the buddhas of the past, I honored them for the benefit of all beings; And I heard their incomparable teaching, Generating immense power of joy. 
I always paid respect to my parents and elders, Taking pleasure in their welfare; I served them and honored them, While entering this liberation. 
Many people who were old, infirm, poor, Handicapped, suffering, helpless, I made happy, rich, and protected, Over hundreds of lifetimes. 
In my past practice I rescued those In the sea of existence from various perils— From the perils of kings and robbers, Fire and water, wild beasts and enemies. 
I saved those always burning with afflictions in the world, Made that way by impure deeds, In dangerous straits in the mundane whirl, Born in the paths of existence. 
The terrors of the calamities in the woeful states of misery Are harsh and violent, continuous and manifold; The terrors of birth, old age, death and sickness in the world I put an end to entirely. 
Stilling the intense pains of the mundane world, Producing all happiness in sentient beings, Producing the ultimate bliss of the enlightened, For endless eons—this is my vow. 
“I only know this enlightening liberation of supernal manifestations in a moment of thought producing vast floods of joy—how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings who have plunged into the ocean of all principles of the cosmos of reality, who are freed from all internal and external suffering, who know all eons are in the thoughts, who are versed in the knowledge of the becoming and dissolution of all worlds? 
“At this same enlightenment site, in the circle of Vairocana Buddha, is a night goddess named Sarvanagararakshasambhavatejahshri—go ask her how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana spoke these verses to the night goddess Prashantarutasagaravati: 
Instructed by a spiritual benefactor, I came to you, O goddess; I see you sitting on your seat Of infinite height. 
Those whose minds are on appearances, Who cling to existence or conceptualize being, And the low-minded with false views, Cannot know this realm of yours. 
No worldly or celestial beings can know The features of your appearance and form, Even if they look for endless eons— So endless is the sight of your form. 
You are free from dependence on the body-mind clusters, And you do not rest on the sense media either; Gone beyond the world and transcended desire, You appear in the world, transforming. 
You have attained immovability, faultless and unattached, You have clarified the eye of higher knowledge; In every atom you see as many buddhas as all atoms Magically transforming. 
Your body contains the body of truth, Your mind is made of knowledge, unhindered. Illumined by universal light, You produce endless light in the world. 
You produce endless deeds from the mind, So all worlds are adorned by your deeds; Knowing that worlds are mental in nature, Your manifest yourself in bodies Equal to beings. 
Knowing this world is like a dream And all buddhas are like reflections And all phenomena like echoes, You live in the world without clinging to anything. 
In each moment you show yourself To the beings of past, present, and future, Yet there is no inclination to dualism in your mind, And thus do you expound the Teaching in all realms. 
The oceans of beings are as infinite As the endless oceans of atoms, And infinite too are the oceans of Buddha— All are the sphere of your practice of liberation. 
Then Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess and left her. 
Sarvanagararakshasambhavatejahshri Then, contemplating that enlightening liberation of supernal manifestations in a moment of thought producing floods of joy, fostering it and making it manifest, remembering the instruction of the night goddess Prashantarutasagaravati, absorbing it, keeping in mind knowledge of the principles inherent in it, a measureless repository of many principles to be found in each statement, fixing it in memory, examining it intellectually, putting it into practice, consciously extending it, physically feeling and dwelling in it, entering into it, Sudhana made his way to the night goddess Sarvanagararakshasambhavatejahshri. 
He saw the night goddess sitting on a great lotus seat full of diamonds illumining the dwelling places in all cities, accompanied by untold numbers of night goddesses, with a body appearing to the beings in all realms, with a body equal in form to all beings, with a body appearing to all beings, with a body unstained by all worlds, with a body equal to all beings in number of manifestations, with a body transcending all worlds, with a body adapted to developing and guiding all beings, with a body proclaiming the truth in all realms, with a body reaching everywhere, with a body ultimately freed from obstructions, with a body of the essence of those who arrive at Thusness, with a body guiding all beings to ultimate perfection. 
Sudhana, enraptured upon seeing the night goddess, paid his respects to her and said, “O goddess, I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment; please tell me how an enlightening being is to be a benefactor to others while carrying out enlightening practice, and how an enlightening being is to take care of sentient beings with the highest protection and care, and how an enlightening being, engaged in the work of enlightening beings by the assent of the enlightened, is to approach the seat of a spiritual sovereign?” The night goddess replied, “It is very good that you ask about the way of practice of distributing teachings to sentient beings according to their mentalities, to attain the goal of guiding all sentient beings to perfection, to attain the goal of the effort to preserve the family of all buddhas, to apply all-pervasive knowledge, to confront entry into the ocean of means leading to all realms of reality, to penetrate all knowables by knowledge boundless as space, to receive and hold the teachings of all buddhas. 
“I have attained an enlightening liberation, ‘entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound.’ Having attained this liberation, engaged in preaching the great Teaching, free from attachment, dedicated to dissemination of the treasury of teachings of all buddhas, imbued with the power of great compassion and goodwill, set on working for the welfare of all sentient beings to inspire them to seek enlightenment, set out to become a leader of all sentient beings to ceaselessly accumulate stores of virtues in determination for enlightenment, engaged in producing clouds of teaching and suns of teaching in all worlds to guide all sentient beings on the path of omniscience, ceaselessly reaching out impartially to all sentient beings to illumine all worlds so as to produce infinite roots of goodness, applying a purified mind to practical knowledge of sustaining the performance of good works of all sentient beings, set out to lead all sentient beings to accord with all paths of good action, engaged in the work of directing all sentient beings in good ways, engaged in showing all sentient beings the way to peace and security, set out to lead all sentient beings to emancipation, engaged in directing all sentient beings to all good practices, set out to serve all spiritual friends uninterruptedly, engaged in directing all sentient beings to the teaching of the enlightened, engaged in undertaking all pure and good practices such as giving, firmly resolved to realize omniscience, with a broad mental sphere firmly focused on the powers of buddhas, I stay by the spiritual benefactor, determined to shatter the mountains of afflictions and obstructions to enlightenment caused by actions, undertaking the preparations for omniscience, engaged in developing all good qualities, engaged in application of thought to the infinite variety of objects confronting omniscience. 
“Furthermore, as I purify this medium of light of the Teaching, communicating to all sentient beings, accumulating roots of goodness, I observe, approach, and proceed through the reality realm in terms of ten aspects. 
What are the ten? 
I realize that the reality realm is immeasurable, by gaining vast vision of knowledge. 
I realize that the reality realm is infinitely various, so as to perceive the miracles of all buddhas. 
I realize that the reality realm is endless, so as to fulfill travel to all buddha-lands and service of buddhas. 
I realize that the reality realm is boundless, so as to show the practice of enlightening beings in all oceans of worlds. 
I realize that the reality realm is uninterrupted, so as to enter the sphere of unfragmented knowledge of those who arrive at Thusness. 
I realize that the reality realm is one, so as to enter the sphere of the voice of those who realize Thusness, which communicates to all sentient beings according to their mentalities. 
I realize that the reality realm is inherently pure, so as to realize the ultimate end of the past vow to guide all sentient beings to perfection. 
I realize that the reality realm is equal in all worlds, so as to enter the range of the practice of universal good. 
I realize that all realms of reality are adorned with one adornment, so as to comprehend the adornment of the miracle of the universally good enlightening being. 
I realize that the reality realm is imperishable, because of the imperishable nature of the purity of all good pervading the reality realm. 
Thus do I observe, approach, and proceed through the whole reality realm in terms of ten aspects, to accumulate all roots of goodness, to realize the greatness of buddhas, to arrive at the inconceivable sphere of buddhas. 
“Furthermore, I expound the Teaching to sentient beings by means of the operation of ten thousand spheres of mental command, with the attention on the greatness of Buddha in this way. 
I expound the Teaching to sentient beings by means of the operation of ten thousand spheres of mental command, beginning with the sphere of mental command called absorption in the ocean of all truths, the sphere of mental command of light of remembrance of all buddhas, the sphere of mental command containing light illumining the ocean of deeds of all sentient beings, the sphere of pure mental command of absorption in the ocean of all means of liberation, the sphere of mental command uttering the names of all buddhas, the sphere of mental command of absorption in manifestation of the ocean of past vows of all buddhas, the sphere of mental command of swift turning of the attention to all truths, and the sphere of mental command called light of absorption in omniscience. “Moreover, I teach sentient beings with wisdom consisting of learning, wisdom consisting of thinking, and wisdom consisting of practice. 
I teach sentient beings about the process of one existence, and I teach sentient beings about the processes of all existences. 
I teach about the ocean of names of one buddha, I teach about the oceans of names of all buddhas. 
I teach about one ocean of worlds, I teach about all oceans of worlds. I teach about the ocean of predictions of enlightenment of one buddha, I teach about the oceans of predictions of enlightenment of all buddhas. I teach about the ocean of audiences of one buddha, I teach about the oceans of audiences of all buddhas. I teach about the cycle of teachings of one buddha, I teach about the oceans of cycles of teachings of all buddhas. 
I teach sentient beings in untold ways such as these. 
“Entry into the oceans of those who arrive at Thusness, identical to the structures of the reality realm, taking care of sentient beings in the highest spiritual way of expounding the Teaching to them, living by the practice of universally good enlightening beings for endless eons, I cultivate this enlightening liberation of entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound, by expanding it in every moment of consciousness, by the means of actualizing the sphere of liberation; and I pervade all realms of reality in every moment of thought with each means of actualizing the sphere of liberation.” Sudhana said, “This enlightening liberation is marvelous. 
How long ago did you attain it?” The goddess said, “Many eons ago there was world called Multitude of Cities of Spiritual Lights, set on a network of lofty fragrant jewel mountains, as many as atoms in four continents, arrayed with lotus flowers intoning the past vows of all buddhas, composed of multitudes of jewels produced by the deeds of all sentient beings, shaped like a huge lotus, pure with some defilement, encircled by as many masses of flowers as atoms in a mountain, adorned by lofty polar mountains of fragrant jewels, as many as atoms in a polar mountain, and with as many sets of four continents as atoms in a polar mountain. 
On each continent were untold trillions of cities. “In that world there was an age called Pure Light, in which there arose as many buddhas as atoms in a polar mountain. 
In the middle of the world was a set of four continents called Resplendent Banner, in the middle of which was a metropolis called Omnipresent Jewel Flower Light, not too far from which was an enlightenment site called Image of the Abode of a Spiritual Sovereign. 
At that site a buddha named Illuminating King Voicing the Ocean of All Truths arose, the first of the buddhas of that age. 
At that time there was a monarch named Radiantly Pure Countenance, who received from that buddha a scripture called Ocean of All Truths and followed it. 
“After that buddha passed away, the king left home and preserved the buddha’s teachings. 
At the time of the ending of the teaching, when it was divided into a thousand sects, with a thousand different explanations of the doctrine, and uninterrupted degeneracy of the age was imminent, in order to shake up the people shrouded by the barriers of afflictions and contentious quarrelsome mendicants, who were not seeking the virtues taught by the buddha but were wholly devoted to enjoyment of sense objects, addicted to talk of kings and thieves, addicted to talk of women, lands, and seas, addicted to materialistic thought and conversation, the renunciant king, a true follower of the religion, warned them, ‘Alas! 
The torch of the great teaching, which was developed over many eons, is going to die out.’ Then he rose into the sky to the height of seven palm trees, emanated clouds of flames of infinite colors, produced great networks of multicolored lights from his body, extinguished the burning of afflictions in the world with multicolored light, and directed infinitely many sentient beings toward enlightenment. 
The buddha’s teaching was thereby rekindled and remained in the world for another sixty thousand years. 
“At that time there was also a nun named Light of Projections of the Wheel of the Teaching. 
She was the daughter of that king Radiantly Pure Countenance, and she had a retinue of a hundred thousand nuns. 
Hearing that rousing speech and seeing that great miraculous performance, she and her retinue had been inspired to seek enlightenment. 
Furthermore, those hundred thousand nuns became irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment: 
they attained a concentration called ‘coming into existence in the presence of those who have arrived at Thusness,’ and they attained a mental command called ‘adamantine light of the teachings of all buddhas,’ and a perfection of wisdom called ‘entry into the principles of the ocean of all truths.’ The nun Light of Projections of the Wheel of the Teaching attained a concentration called ‘lamp illumining the source of the teachings of all buddhas,’ as well as this subtle, gentle enlightening liberation ‘entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound,’ after which all the miracles of the buddha Illuminating King Voicing the Ocean of All Truths became visible to her. 
“What do you think—was the king of that time, who went forth into the teaching of the buddha Illuminating King Voicing the Ocean of All Truths, followed the buddha’s teaching, sustained the teaching after the buddha’s demise when it was dying out, and kindled the torch of the teaching, anyone else? 
It was none other than Samantabhadra, the universally good enlightening being, who was that king Radiantly Pure Countenance. 
And do you think the king’s daughter, who became a nun, accompanied by a hundred thousand nuns, was anyone else? 
Do not see it that way. 
It was I myself who was that nun at that time. 
I preserved the teaching of that buddha, and I made those hundred thousand nuns irreversible in their progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment, I established them in the concentration ‘coming into existence in the presence of those who have arrived at Thusness,’ I established them in the mental command ‘adamantine light of the teachings of all buddhas’ and the perfection of wisdom ‘entry into the principles of the ocean of all truths.’ “After that I learned from a buddha named Light of the Peak of Knowledge of the Mountain of the Undefiled Teaching, then Crest of Light, then Multitudes of Lights of the Sun of the Teaching, then Sound of Explanation of the Ocean of the Teaching, then Light of the Sphere of Knowledge of the Sun of the Teaching, then Cloud of Banners Marked by the Flowers of the Teaching, then Supreme Brilliance of the Mass of Lights of the Teaching, then Moon of Light of the Depth of the Principles of the Teaching, then Mine of All Images Arising from Knowledge of the Teaching, then Crowned with the Treasury of Knowledge, then King Imbued with the Glory of the Highest Mountain, then Paragon of Universal Knowledge, then Paragon of Energy in All Good Practices, then Multitude of Lights of Spiritual Jewel Flowers, then Supreme Depth of the Light of Peace, then Moon Radiating Images of Eyes of Light, then Ocean of Brilliance of the Flames of Knowledge, then Sphere of Skill of Universal Knowledge, then Light of Knowledge of the Nadir and Zenith, then Lamp Blooming with Flames, then Supreme Lion of Knowledge, then Supreme Light of the Universal Sun, then Lofty Mountain Adorned with Precious Characteristics, then Complete Reflection of the Course of the Sun, then Radiant Moon of Awareness of the Nexus of Realities, then Multitude of Beauties of the Blossoming of the Lotus of the Teaching, then Universal Light of the Solar Orb of the Marks of Distinction, then Glorious Voice of the All-Illumining Teaching, then Adamantine Lion of Practical Wisdom, then Heroic Paragon of Universal Knowledge, then Embodiment of the Flowering of the Lotus of the Teaching, then Ocean of Splendor of Flowers of Virtue, then Mass of Light from the Pinnacle of Spiritual Treasures, then Multitude of Lights from the Summit of Knowledge, then Light of Jewels Bearing All Facets of the Teaching, then Glorious Moon of Awareness at the Pinnacle of Enlightenment, then Moon Glowing with the Fire of the Torch of the Teaching, then All-Reflecting Crown, then Lamp Emblematic of the Body of the Teaching, then Multitude of Representations of the Adamantine Ocean, then Clouds of Glory of Lofty Repute, then Radiant Moon of Sandalwood, then Fiery Light of Flowers of Universal Beauty, then Light Shining on All Beings, then Beautiful Calyx of the Lotus of Virtue, then King Shining with Fragrant Flames, then Lotus of Logic, then Shining with Magnificent Marks of Greatness, then Universally Renowned, then Polar Mountain of Light of Impartial Knowledge, then Glory of Light of the Citadel of Religion, then Majestic As a Forested Mountain, then Shining Clarity of Universal Light, then Sound of the Ocean of the Teaching, then Energy Arisen from the Undertaking of All Spiritual States, then Foremost Light of Universal Knowledge, then Resplendent with Superior Qualities, then Represented by the Lance of Spiritual Power, then Brilliant Sound of the Wheel of the Teaching, then Light of Knowledge and Wisdom Crowned with Radiant Virtue, then Glorious Moonrise of the Wheel of the Teaching, then Enlightened Paragon Illumining the Lotus of the Teaching, then Jewel Lotus Full of Light, then Lamp of Myriad Peaks of Jewel Radiance, then Flower of Pure Knowledge of Universal Vision, then Vast Treasury of Lights, then King Crowned with a Halo of Light Beams, then Crested with Myriad Virtues, then Mass of Manifestations of the Pinnacle of Religion, then Energy of Enormous Virtue, then Lamp of Myriad Suns of Truth, then King Acclaimed As a Source of Teaching, then Multitude of Sets of Teachings, then Light Representative of the Awareness of Enlightened Knowledge, then Radiant Moon Aware of the Sphere of Realities, then Magnificent As a Mountain of Gold and Jewels, then Topknot of Myriad Spheres of Light of All Truths, then Flaming Light of the Wheel of Teaching, then Lofty Majesty, then Myriad Lights of the Torch of All-Sided Energy, then Light of Vast Crowning Wisdom Sealed by Concentration, then Beautiful Jewel Light, then Voice of Arrays of Jewels from the Light of the Teaching, then Powerful Light in the Sky of Reality, then Moon Adorned with Marks of Greatness, then Flashing Cloud on a Mountain of Light, then Light in the Unobstructed Sky of Reality, then Body Blossoming with the Beauty of the Marks of Greatness, then Supreme Splendor and Voice of the World Ruler, then Light and Sound of Concentration on All Truths, then Mine of Initiatory Sounds, then Sound of the Ocean of Blazing Flames of the Teaching, then Light of Reflections of the Appearances of Past, Present, and Future, then Shining Light of the Highest Splendor of the Sphere of the Teaching, then Powerful Light in the Realm of Reality, then Lion Manifesting the Ocean of All Concentrations, then Light of Total Knowledge, then Lamp of the City of Reality with the Light of Universal Wisdom. 
“In that age Pure Light, as many buddhas as atoms in the polar mountain appeared, beginning with these. 
The last of them was a buddha named Supreme Lamp of Knowledge Lighting the City of the Reality Realm. 
I served all those buddhas, from the first to the last, and I listened to their teachings, and left society to delve into all their teachings. 
I kept all their instructions in mind, and from all of them I attained this enlightening liberation of entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound, by various methods of attainment, and I matured infinitely many sentient beings in the presence of all those buddhas. 
Since then I served all the buddhas that have emerged in as many eons as atoms in a buddha-land by putting their teachings into practice. 
Thenceforth I have been awake in the midst of beings asleep in the slumber of nescience during the night of mundane routines; I have guarded the city of their minds, removed them from the city of the triple world, and settled them in the city of the way of omniscience. 
“I just know this enlightening liberation of entry into the miracle of pleasing sound, which stops mixed-up worldly talk and does not use duplicitous speech, ultimately leading to truth. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who have unobstructed knowledge of the essential nature of all speech, who command awareness of all realities in each moment of thought, who comprehend the utterances of all beings, who are familiar with the patterns of thought of all beings, who know the ways of classification and naming of all things, who are masters of the ocean of mental command of all truths, who are skilled in producing teachings adapted to the mentalities of all beings, who endeavor to guide all beings to perfection—how can I know their accomplishment in taking care of all beings, or know their efforts applied to undertaking the supreme works of enlightening beings, their attainment of subtle knowledge of enlightening beings, their multifaceted powers of the mine of practice of enlightening beings, or their accession to the lion throne of those who tell of the deeds of enlightening beings? 
“Right here in the presence of Vairocana Buddha there is a night goddess named Sarvavrikshapraphullanasukhasamvasa, who is sitting next to me. 
Ask her how an enlightening being is to learn omniscience and how one is to practice so as to lead all sentient beings to omniscience.” Then the night goddess Sarvanagararakshasambhavatejahshri spoke these verses to Sudhana, further illustrating the enlightening liberation entering into profound miracles of pleasing sound: 
Profound and hard to see is the liberation of enlightening beings, Like space, entering everywhere; They see the buddhas of all times, Infinite, throughout the cosmos. 
They attain endless liberations born of virtue and knowledge, Of inconceivable nature, immeasurable: Increasing unimpeded momentum in all directions, They plunge into the paths of benevolence in all times. 
Many eons ago there was a world Called Cities of Spiritual Lights: In that glorious world Was a brilliant age called Pure Light. 
In that age was an unbroken succession of buddhas, As many as atoms in the polar mountain. Illuminating King Voicing the Ocean of All Truths Was the first buddha of the age, Supreme Lamp of Knowledge Lighting the City of the Reality Realm Was the last of those buddhas: 
I visited and served them all, And joyfully heard their teachings. 
I saw the golden light of the first buddha, Illuminating King Voicing the Ocean of All Truths, Like the polar mountain resplendent with the thirty-two marks, And seeing him I determined to become a buddha. 
As soon as I saw that buddha there arose My first aspiration to buddhahood, full of power, By means arising from the progress of omniscience, As pure as space, of the nature of Thusness. 
Thenceforth seeing all the buddhas throughout all times, And all the multitudes of enlightening beings, And all the myriad worlds and sentient beings there, I produced an ocean of ambrosia of goodwill. 
I determined to pervade all lands, Showing my body differently to sentient beings according to their mentalities, To illumine and stir all the lands And develop the beings to maturity. 
I went and saw the second buddha, And the buddhas in the oceans of lands in the ten directions, In as many lands as atoms in an ocean of lands, And finally saw the last buddha of that age. 
I went and served all the buddhas, Lamps of the world, that appeared In as many ages as atoms in all worlds, That I might purify this liberation. 
Then, having attained this enlightening liberation of entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound, having entered an ocean of infinitely various media of concentration, his mind having developed an immense ocean of means of sustained attention, illumined with the great mystic knowledge of enlightening beings, having entered an ocean of great joyful intelligence, his mind expanded with a vast ocean of ecstasy, Sudhana praised the night goddess with these verses: Vast is your wisdom, coursing in the ocean of truth, And you have traversed the infinite sea of existences. 
Long-lived, without affliction, an embodiment of beneficent knowledge, Your presence illumines this assembly, O goddess. 
Aware of the nature of things, like the sky, You enter unhindered into all times; In an instant of consciousness without discriminatory thought You assess all objects, inconceivable as they are. 
With the eye of knowledge you see into the beingless nature, While by compassion you enter infinite oceans of beings. Deliberately plunging into most profound liberation, You guide and develop innumerable beings. 
You know how to analyze all states of being, And are aware of the way to penetrate the essence of things: 
You practice the undefiled path of all sages; You will liberate all beings, purifying them. 
You are an unexcelled leader of beings, O goddess, As you acquire omniscient knowledge throughout the universe, You expound the Teaching to all beings therein, And extinguish all fears in the world. 
You go by way of the path of Vairocana’s vows, With unhindered, vast, undefiled understanding; Everywhere practicing the powers of the enlightened, You witness the miracles of buddhas in all lands. 
Hard to accomplish is a skylike mind such as yours, Free from the taints of the afflictions; Therein are all lands in all times, All buddhas, enlightening beings, and all living creatures. 
Day and night, instants and moments, seasons, fortnights, months, And years, along with their passing away and imagined discriminations, And the waves of eons, with their enumerations of myriad names, The oceans of concepts of sentient beings, all you see in an instant. 
The deaths and births of beings in the ten directions, With form or without, thinking and thoughtless, You comprehend according to their conventional truth, And show them the way to supreme enlightenment. 
Born of the family of the network of Vairocana’s vows, Having become one with all buddhas, Your spiritual body pure, your mind unobstructed, You appear to beings according to their minds. 
Having eulogized the goddess with these verses, Sudhana paid his respects and went on. 
Sarvavrikshapraphullanasukhasamvasa Then Sudhana, further cultivating, fostering, and expanding the enlightening liberation of entry into the profound miracle of pleasing sound, went to the night goddess Sarvavrikshapraphullanasukhasamvasa. 
He saw her sitting on a lion throne of jewel tree shoots inside a tower of branches of jewel trees of all fragrances, surrounded by ten thousand night goddesses. 
He went up to her, paid his respects, and said, “Noble goddess, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to carry out and learn the practice of enlightening beings. 
Please tell me how to perform and learn the practice of enlightening beings, and how to act and learn so as to arrive at omniscience.” The goddess said to Sudhana, “By my power, when the sun goes down, the blooming lotuses become highly fragrant; all the men and women sporting in the parks decide to go home; the highly conscious beings on the roads and paths in the night head for the protection of all beings: 
those who live in mountain caves go into the mountain caves, those who lie in trees head for the trees, those who live in caves go into their caves, those who live in villages, cities, or towns go into their villages, cities, and towns, those who live in water go down in the water, those who live in other abodes go to their respective dwelling places, to spend the night comfortably. 
“Furthermore, to the young men and women intoxicated with the joy of youth, reveling in music and song and intent on sensual pleasures, I praise the effort to produce roots of goodness as an antidote to the fears of the darkness of birth, old age, and death. 
I enjoin giving on those who are greedy and lead the ill-behaved to discipline. 
To those who are hostile I praise kindness, and I lead those agitated in mind to patience. 
I lead the lazy to undertake the vigorous effort of enlightening beings. 
Those whose minds wander I establish in meditation. 
I furnish the stupid with transcendent wisdom. 
Those who are interested in the Lesser Vehicle I establish in the Great Vehicle. 
Those who are attached to the world, who act within the sphere of attachment to the conditions of existence, I lead to the transcendent commitment of enlightening beings. 
Those who are overcome by obstructions, tormented by afflictions in their actions, lacking in the power of virtue and knowledge, I lead to the transcendent power of enlightening beings. 
Those bound up in the darkness of nescience, in the darkness of the ignorance characterized by egoism and possessiveness, I lead to the transcendent knowledge of enlightening beings. 
“Furthermore, I have attained the enlightening liberation ‘manifestation of contentment with the treasure produced from great joy.’” Sudhana said, “What is the sphere of this liberation?” The goddess said, “The scope of this liberation is the knowledge and means to take care of sentient beings by the goodness of those who arrive at Thusness. 
How is that? 
Whatever well-being sentient beings experience is all due to the power of the goodness of the enlightened, due to the path of the teaching of the enlightened, due to putting the word of the enlightened into practice, due to learning from the enlightened, due to the support of the enlightened, due to practicing the path of knowledge of the enlightened, due to planting roots of goodness like the enlightened, due to the true teaching of the enlightened, due to the illumination of the sun of knowledge of the enlightened. 
“Indeed, the happiness of beings comes from the light of the sphere of pure deeds of the family of the enlightened. 
How do I know? 
As I enter into this enlightening liberation of the manifestation of contentment with the treasure produced from great joy, and recall and plunge into the ocean of Vairocana Buddha’s past practices as an enlightening being, thus do I know and understand—as the Buddha was concentrating on the stages of enlightenment in the past, seeing sentient beings caught up in egoism and possessiveness, in the darkness of ignorance, gone into a tangle of views, dominated by craving, bound by the fetters of desire, hostile and malevolent, continuously pursuing delusions, wrapped up in envy and jealousy, their minds crowded with afflictions, experiencing the great misery of the mundane whirl, tormented by the pains of poverty in the mundane whirl, deprived of the sight of the enlightened, there appeared in the Buddha a mind of great compassion, a mind to take care of all sentient beings materially for their benefit, a mind to produce means of worldly support for all sentient beings, a mind free from attachment to all things, a mind without acquisitiveness for any objects, a mind not dwelling on any pleasures, a mind free from grasping for any material goods, a mind not seeking rewards for giving, a mind not eager for existence in any world, a mind not confused about causal relations, a mind contemplating the truth after thorough investigation, a mind to provide refuge for the welfare of all living beings. 
“Having comprehended the essence of all things as it really is, having impartial goodwill toward all sentient beings, working to fill all worlds with great compassion, covering all worlds with the canopy of the great Teaching, holding the thunderbolt of great knowledge, which shatters the mountain of afflictions of all sentient beings, his mind growing in satisfaction through the welfare of all sentient beings, determined to effect the ultimate happiness of all sentient beings, wishing to provide all sentient beings with everything they need, working impartially without abandoning any sentient beings, wishing to satisfy all sentient beings with the wealth of sages, determined to attain the jewel of knowledge of the supreme ten powers, empowered with the mystic knowledges of enlightening beings, pervading all worlds throughout the space of the entire cosmos with a multitude of various enlightening manifestations, appearing before all sentient beings, swirling a great cloud of all manner of objects and showering a rain of all kinds of precious ornaments, he undertook to give infinite various articles to all sentient beings for their use as appropriate, to perform innumerable services, to strive to provide care by all sorts of charity, giving away many kinds of things, to construct arrangements of myriad benefits, services, and useful articles, to practice various forms of giving, satisfying sentient beings according to their mentalities by endless giving, to make uninterrupted effort to save all beings from the miseries of the mundane world, without desiring the gratitude of anyone, impartial toward all beings, purifying the mind-jewel of all beings, increasing the flood of the ocean of wealth of all-knowledge for all beings produced from the ocean of roots of goodness at one with those of all buddhas, engaged in taking care of all beings by providing for their needs, undertaking all this continuously, from moment to moment, to develop and guide all sentient beings and gradually purify them. 
“He undertook to adorn every land as a supreme pure buddha-land in every moment of thought, to purify the practice of the ocean of methods of the Teaching in every moment of thought, to fulfill the means of knowledge pervading all of space in every moment of thought, to purify the means of knowledge of how to tame all sentient beings in every moment of thought, to bring to light the knowledge of how to guide all worldlings in every moment of thought, to always teach in a manner appropriate to the time in every moment of thought, to be a benefactor to all beings by showing the skillfulness to support all knowledge in each moment of thought, carrying out the practice of enlightening beings in each moment of thought in all kinds of worlds, in various forms, by various means, having entered the way of enlightening beings, to suffuse the worlds with various manifestations of the practice of enlightening beings, to show the bodies of all the buddhas of past, present, and future to other beings according to their mentalities in each moment of thought, increasing the flood of the ocean of wealth of all-knowledge for all beings. 
“Thus as Vairocana Buddha was carrying out the practice of enlightening beings in the past, he aroused great compassion for those without virtue or knowledge, those attached to the world, ungrateful, wrapped up in the darkness of nescience, egotistical and possessive, shrouded by the darkness of ignorance, immersed in unreasonable thought, lost in the wilderness of views, heedless of cause and effect, dominated by afflictions in action, fallen into a pit of suffering in the wasteland of the mundane whirl, experiencing the misery of various kinds of want; producing vast multitudes of practices of the ways of transcendence, praising the firm foundation of roots of goodness, removing the pain of mundane want from all sentient beings, fostering the growth of great stores of virtue and knowledge, clarifying the realm of causes, enlightening them on the consistency of deeds and states, showing the origin of all beings and lands, involving them in the continuation of the family of buddhas, getting them to remember the teachings of all buddhas, turning them away from all evil, describing the preparations for omniscience, producing a great multitude of transcendent practices filling all realms of beings, he established sentient beings in the care of the ultimate Teaching, satisfying them according to their mentalities. 
He directed them in preparation for omniscience, he introduced them to the great transcendent ways of enlightening beings, he got them to support themselves on the wealth of sages, he got them to increase their roots of goodness by the momentum of the joy of omniscience. 
Introducing them to the miracles of all buddhas, taking them into ultimate unattached bliss, showing them the greatness of the enlightened, he led them to enlightening beings’ knowledge of means of salvation.” Sudhana said, “How long ago did you set out for supreme perfect enlightenment?” The goddess said, “This is hard to reach, hard to know, hard to believe, hard to penetrate, hard to say, hard to understand. 
Neither celestial nor human beings can comprehend it, nor can any listeners or individual illuminates comprehend it, except those who, by the empowerment of Buddha, by the help of spiritual benefactors, by the mind being stabilized on great stores of virtue and knowledge, by purity of intention, by the mind being buoyant, undisturbed, straightforward, unimpaired, open, unobscured, by the mind being illumined by the light of universal knowledge, by the mind being dedicated to the welfare and happiness of all beings, by the mind being invulnerable to the afflictions of all demons, by the mind being within range of attainment of omniscience, thus do not seek any mundane pleasures, are focused on the pleasure of the enlightened, have undertaken to put an end to the suffering and misery of all beings, are headed into the ocean of virtues of the enlightened, are in the realm of the space of meditation on the intrinsic nature of things, have purified the path of higher aspirations, have turned away from the flow of the mundane whirl, are turned toward the ocean of knowledge of the enlightened, are certain to arrive at the citadel of omniscience, proceed energetically into the sphere of those who arrive at Thusness, advance boldly toward buddhahood, are headed toward complete fulfillment of the powers of omniscience, and will ultimately attain the ten powers—such people can penetrate, believe in, grasp, follow, and know this matter. 
Because this matter is the sphere of buddhas—not even enlightening beings can reach it, much less others. 
Now, with the support of the Buddha I will tell you, for the sake of the correct purification of the minds of those capable of learning, so that those who practice good can master their minds, and so that you may have an explanation of what is on your mind.” Then the goddess, further elucidating what she meant, looked over the realm of the buddhas of past, present, and future and spoke these verses: Profound, infinite, is the sphere of buddhas, Of which you now ask, O child of Buddha. Even in eons as many as atoms in inconceivable lands It could not be fully told. 
The peaceful nature of the buddhas cannot be known By the covetous or the malevolent, Or by those shrouded in the darkness of delusion, Or those whose minds are defiled by hypocrisy and conceit. 
This sphere of buddhas cannot be known By those ruled by envy and jealousy, Or those whose minds are polluted by guile and deceit, Or those enshrouded by barriers of action based on afflictions. 
Buddhahood cannot be known By those who depend on mental or material elements, Or those attached to the body as real, Or those with false views and ideas. 
Hard to know is the tranquil realm of buddhas, Which is inherently pure and nonconceptual— This reality cannot be truly known By those attached to life and being. 
Those who are born in the family of buddhas, Who are empowered by all the buddhas, Who preserve the lineage of the enlightened, Are the knowers of this sphere. 
Those who are tireless in good practices And are helped by spiritual benefactors, With their minds focused on the powers of sages, They attain peace on perceiving this. 
This is the sphere of the undefiled Whose minds are pure, without false ideas, Like the sky in all directions, Lamps of wisdom who have dispelled darkness. 
Those who pervade all worlds Of all times with compassion And are benevolent to all beings Enter the way of the buddhas. 
This is the stage of those without grasping, The happy ones without attachment Who always gladly give all there is Impartially to all beings. 
This is the sphere of the undefiled, Whose minds are unafflicted and conduct impeccable, Whose minds are ultimately free from regret, Who apply themselves to practice of Buddha’s teaching. 
This is the liberation of the inexhaustible Whose minds are unshakable, imperturbable, Whose minds are focused on the essence of things, Whose minds are unhindered by the oceans of actions. 
This is the sphere of the disciplined, With indefatigable and nonregressing minds, With strength, vigor, and control, With endless energy in preparing for omniscience. 
This is known to those gone to peace, With tranquil minds, concentrated, Ultimately calm and cool, Practitioners of all the branches of meditation. 
This is known to the lamps of wisdom, Whose minds are liberated from all attachments And have penetrated the essence of things, Who have gone the way into the reality realm of the enlightened. 
This is the liberation of those who know the path, Whose minds have penetrated the essence of beings, Whose minds are not imprisoned in the sea of existence, Who are moons reflected in the minds of beings. 
This is known to the universally good, Who are born from the ocean of vows Of the buddhas past, present, and future, And carry them out forever in all lands. 
This is the liberation of those who penetrate all oceans of worlds By means of the oceans of principles of the reality realm And see their ages of becoming and decay without discrimination. 
This is known to those of unobstructed vision Who see the buddhas under the enlightenment trees, As many as atoms in all lands, Teaching after having realized enlightenment. 
You have come after many eons Of serving spiritual benefactors In quest of the Teaching, seeking tirelessly; Having heard it, you can remember it. 
To purify your mind I will tell you freely Of the infinite realm of Vairocana By the inconceivable power of Buddha. 
The goddess continued, “Long ago, past eons as many as atoms in an ocean of worlds, there was an ocean of worlds called Sun on the Summit of a Mountain of Gold and Jewels. 
Therein, furthermore, was a buddha called Supreme Light Illumining the Realm of Truth at the Summit of Knowledge, who purified that ocean of worlds while carrying out the practice of enlightening beings in the past. 
In that ocean of worlds were as many world systems as atoms in all the mountains on earth, each system containing as many worlds as atoms in a galaxy. 
In each world there were as many sets of eons as atoms in a world, each containing many eons, in each of which there were many events, including buddhas appearing in the world and displaying miracles. 
Each buddha that appeared expounded as many scriptures as atoms in a world, in each of which scriptures were outlined as many instructions for enlightening beings as atoms in the world, with infinitely various indications of how to guide sentient beings, operated by the principles of various vehicles of liberation, guided by the buddhas’ various mystic powers of perception and prescription. 
“Within that ocean of worlds was a central world-system called Array of Markers of Doors Facing All Directions, in which there was a world called Ubiquitous Light the Color of All Jewels. 
The borders of that world were arrayed with jewels reflecting images of the enlightenment sites of all buddhas; it rested on an ocean of flowers made of all kinds of jewels, it was composed of jewels showing the appearances of emanations of all buddhas, it was shaped like a celestial palace, and it was pure with an admixture of defilement. 
Furthermore, in that world there were as many world-regions with four continents as atoms in the polar mountain; at the center was a set of four continents called Mountain Peak of All Jewels, whose four continents were innumerable hundreds of thousands of leagues in extent. 
On each continent were ten thousand great cities. 
In the middle of the southern continent was a great metropolis called the Light of Myriad Arrays of Jewel Trees, surrounded by ten thousand cities. On that continent, furthermore, the life span of the people was ten thousand years. 
The king in that metropolis was named Encompassing Sound of the Proclamation of All Laws, a sovereign ruler. The king had five hundred ministers, six thousand concubines, and seven hundred sons all of whom were brave and manly, well built and handsome, dignified and strong. 
The whole continent was under the protection of that king, and he had no enemies or opponents. 
“At that time the end of the eon was approaching in that world; the five corruptions were in evidence, people had stopped acting virtuously and had taken to bad ways, most of them were headed for misery. 
Because of their wrongdoings their lives were short, they had scanty means of subsistence, they were ugly, they experienced little pleasure and much pain, they were in the habit of argument and dissent, they were given to foul and incoherent speech, they were overcome by acquisitiveness, they were corrupt in mind and thought, they were lost in the jungle of various views. 
As they were obsessed with unreasonable desires and dominated by unwholesome acquisitiveness, the rain that would cause the crops to grow did not fall in the proper season. 
For that reason, furthermore, with all the vegetation withered, the people suffered from various diseases and scattered to the eight directions, without resort. 
They all went to the capital city Light of Myriad Arrays of Jewel Trees, surrounded it, and with various gestures of supplication raised a great outcry to the king—‘We are oppressed, abandoned, tormented by hunger and thirst, dismayed and distressed, without any savior, without refuge or resort, in a cage of suffering; our livelihood is threatened, and we are on the brink of death.’ The people in the city who were suffering from hunger and thirst, who were naked and homeless, who were in misery, despondent, and depressed, also were sick and tired of suffering. 
They betook themselves to the king as a man of great knowledge and a protector, thinking they had found a source of comfort, happiness, and livelihood, a guide to the way out, a great ship, an island of jewels of knowledge, a great benefit, thinking they had found all the delights of heaven. 
“The king, hearing their outcry, was filled with countless tens of hundreds of thousands of facets of great compassion. Meditating on the principle of great compassion, in a moment he became single-minded and uttered ten statements of great compassion: 
‘Alas, these people, without support, have fallen into the great pitfall of the mundane whirl—how can I be a refuge for them, leading them to the state of repose of the enlightened? 
Alas, these people have no savior and are oppressed by all kinds of afflictions—how can I become their savior, leading them to impeccable behavior? 
Alas, these people have no refuge in the world and are terrorized by old age and death—how can I become a refuge for them, removing all their fears of life and death? 
Alas, these people have no resort and are oppressed by various kinds of worldly distress—how can I become a resort for them, leading them to ultimate safety on the path of omniscience? 
Alas, everyone is in the darkness of ignorance, shrouded in the darkness of uncertainty and doubt—how can I become a light, dispelling the darkness of ignorance for them? 
Alas, these people are without illumination—how can I spread the light of great knowledge, showing them all the way into unobscured knowledge? 
Alas, the world of these people lacks the light of knowledge, and their minds are polluted by envy, jealousy, guile, and deceit—how can I produce the light of supreme knowledge, leading them all to cultivate purity? 
Alas, the world is without a guide and has plunged into a dangerous current in the ocean of the mundane whirl—how can I become a guide, to show them what to do? 
Alas, everyone lacks a teacher, all are misguided—how can I become a teacher for everyone, with the proper timing commanded by a buddha to guide people to complete maturity in all qualities? 
Alas, everyone lacks a leader, all are as though blind—how can I become a leader, to lead everyone on the way to unobstructed omniscience?’ “Having made these expressions of compassion, the king announced that he would undertake a great sacrifice, that he would satisfy everyone, giving them whatever they needed. 
With that the storehouses in every city and town on the continent were opened and all kinds of goods were placed on the streets, all the necessities of life were set out, all treasuries were opened, all stores of valuables were displayed; and the king projected a likeness of himself to every house to fulfill their wishes. 
“Having arranged this act of giving things away, he had a great place of sacrifice prepared east of the city, in front of the city gate called Jewel Mountain Light. 
That place was equal in length and width, covering a most extensive area. It was level and clean, without potholes, clear of brambles, dust, and gravel. 
It was made of all precious elements, and the surface was spread with jewels. It was adorned with many arrays of jewels and strewn with flowers of various jewels. There was an abundance of all the finest aromatic powders, and it was perfumed with all kinds of scents. There were lamps giving off jewel lights, and the sky was covered with radiant clouds of incense. 
It was shaded by canopies shining with various jewels, spread with aromatic powders of all the finest fragrances, and beautifully strewn with flowers made of all kinds of jewels, while pleasant music sounded from innumerable instruments. 
It was purified with arrays of various ornaments of all kinds of jewels, produced as a result of the deeds of enlightening beings. 
“In the middle was a great lion throne, standing on a surface made of a variegated collection of ten kinds of jewels, surrounded by shining railings made of ten kinds of jewels, beautified with trees of ten kinds of jewels arrayed evenly between the railings, its feet firmly set on unbreakable diamond. 
The throne was set with jewel figurines and was adorned with hundreds of jewel protuberances. It was embellished with variegated arrays of jewels, jewel banners and streamers were raised all around it, and it was covered with nets of jewel bells, nets of celestial jewels, and nets of jewel flowers. 
It gave off clouds of fragrance and was arrayed with many-colored cloths of pleasant texture, finer than those of the heavens. Sweet music and song were heard all around. 
Here the king sat, handsome, serene, endowed with the pure marks of a great man, strong, robust, good, kind, and virtuous in all ways, endowed with all the best qualities, born of a line of great rulers, in command of all goods, pure in control of the law, master of his own mind, eloquent, endowed with unshakable knowledge, correctly applying well-constructed laws, showing endless virtues. 
“Furthermore, as the king sat there, in the sky above him there appeared a great parasol, on a long, brilliant jewel pole, its hundred thousand ribs made of all kinds of jewels, brilliantly adorned with blazing lights, covered with lustrous gold, arrayed with nets of jewels, hung with bells of gold and jewels on strings of jewels, adorned with garlands of jewels twirling all around, producing sweet heavenly sounds, the ringing of the bells urging all beings to act virtuously. 
The king, moreover, fanned with jewel wisp fans, shone with a splendor surpassing that of the king of gods. 
As soon as the king sat on this throne, all the people stood before him with their palms joined and paid their respects. “Then, seeing the assembly of countless petitioners, with various needs and desires, from various places, speaking various languages, all looking up to the king as the pole of prosperity, each thinking of him as a man of great knowledge, looking up to him as a great man of goodness and charity, considering him to have undertaken the vows of enlightening beings, the king felt as if he were seeing good friends and was flooded with immense compassion. 
There arose in him the dauntless energy to satisfy all petitioners forever and the all-pervasive will to give to everyone impartially. 
“Furthermore, when the king saw all those petitioners, he became happier than if he had acquired rule over the galaxy for boundless eons, more than if he had acquired the throne of lordship over the gods for countless eons. 
His joy upon seeing those petitioners was as that of someone in the wilderness, long separated from family and friends, upon being united with them. 
His mind was filled with happiness, he was uplifted with joy and flooded with delight. 
The power of his faith in the enlightenment of buddhas increased, his budding faith in omniscience grew, the power of his purity of determination for all the qualities of buddhahood swelled, his faculties as an enlightening being became fit for use, he was flooded with a feeling of contentment and well-being, and by the force of great joy his senses and will as a benefactor became flexible. 
Because the king, who was intent on omniscience, had betaken himself to the nature of omniscience, stood before the door to the path of omniscience, had engaged his attention on the satisfaction of all living beings, was on the verge of entry into the ocean of all enlightened virtues, was intent on shattering the mountains of obstructions caused by demons, actions, and afflictions, was absorbed in properly taking up the instructions of all buddhas, was endeavoring to embody all roots of goodness, was free from all attachments, was unattached to any objects in the world, and realized that all things are in essence like space, thought of all those petitioners as like an only son, as like his parents, as worthy of gifts, as spiritual benefactors, as precious, as doers of what is difficult, as useful in many ways, as supreme benefactors, as supporting the path of enlightenment, as guides and teachers. 
“The king then fulfilled the needs and wishes of all the petitioners with unmitigated kindness, without turning his back on anyone, giving impartially to everyone, according to their needs. 
He gave away whatever he had to whoever required it, impartial toward all living beings. 
“At that time, in that gathering at the sacrificial ground, there was a grandee’s daughter, named Jewel Light, with a retinue of sixty girls. 
She was beautiful, with a clear, healthy complexion, dark hair and eyes, a pleasant scent, and a clear voice. She was well dressed and wore fine ornaments. She was alert and intelligent, modest, stable, and well behaved. She was respectful to the worthy, most circumspect and clear-headed in conduct, profound in action, endowed with wisdom. 
She had already accomplished basic skills involved in grasping, practicing, and realizing enlightening teachings, and she had attained clarity and serenity through the teachings. 
Her intentions were pure and good, and she was dedicated to the welfare of others. She was aiming for the vision of Buddha and was seeking omniscient knowledge. She stood near the king’s throne in an attitude of respect, but she did not take anything from among the goods the king was distributing. 
Just standing there, she thought, ‘I have gained a true boon in getting to see such a spiritual friend as this.’ Thinking of the king as a spiritual friend, a sympathizer, a protector, and an enlightened one, with a mind free from deceit or guile, flooded with supreme joy and happiness, she took off her jewelry and tossed it before the king, so that it lay on the ground between the railings around the throne. Having scattered her jewelry, she made these vows: 
‘Just as the king Encompassing Sound of the Proclamation of All Laws is a refuge for leaderless people in the dark, so may I also become one such in the future. The reality he knows, may I also know. 
Just as he is fair to behold, has endless wealth and assistants, and is invulnerable and invincible, may I also become like this. Wherever he is born, may I also be born.’ “Perceiving her involved in such thoughts, the king looked at her and said, ‘Take what you need. I am giving away all I have to satisfy everyone.’ Made this offer by the king, she gained even more faith; with a serene mind, energized by lofty, far-reaching virtue, she spoke these verses to the king: Before you were here in this city, great king, It was joyless, lifeless, horrible as the realm of ghosts. 
People were murderous, thieving, unrestrained, Deceitful, harsh, and foul in speech. 
They were covetous, malicious, and opinionated; By their wrongdoing they fell into states of woe. 
Because of the ills of the views of these unjust, ignorant people, For many years there was no rain. 
Because of drought the seeds died, crops and trees did not grow: Lakes and streams dried up, plants and forests withered. 
The rivers all went dry, the parks were like deserts; Before you appeared, clear-eyed, the earth was strewn with bleached bones. 
Now you have joined with the needy, and all are satisfied— Coming forth, you shower gifts on the four quarters, fulfilling all, low and high. 
There are no more thieves, mercenaries, or frauds—no one is killed or injured; None go hopelessly to death, the world is leaderless no more. 
People who like to kill used to drink the blood of their victims— Those who used to eat each other’s flesh have become kindly due to your charities. 
People used to wear rags and leaves, And were hungry and homeless. 
With you here, the grains grow by themselves and the trees give forth their bounty; Wise women and men appear too, now that you have been born, leader of the world. 
Those who were formerly all on wrong paths Are now well adorned and dressed, sporting like gods in paradise. 
Men were wrongly obsessed with desires, delighting in unruly passion, Given to raping women and girls in their own care and the care of others. 
Now, though others’ wives be like goddesses, well dressed, adorned, and perfumed, When men see them they are satisfied with their own wives, as in the heaven of content. 
People used to be deceitful, cruel, coarse, and dishonest in speech; Having given this up, now they act justly, freed from wrong views. 
No music or celestial song, nor even the voice of Brahma or the singing of birds Can match your voice, O leader. 
Above you stands a jewel parasol with webs of gold, On a jewel cane, radiant, with nets of jewelry all around. 
The notes of its bells surpass all sounds in the world: Like the tones of Buddha’s voice, they intone the tranquil sound of truth. 
Those in all lands who hear this put an end to afflictions, Hearing the names of the buddhas over the ages and the oceans of the wise. 
By your power the bells bespeak the successive lands since the past, The names of the lands, and the cycles of true teaching everywhere. 
The sound of the bells, liquid, free-flowing, rings throughout the continent, Telling of the manners of action of the gods and the lords of the worlds. 
Hearing the bells tell of the accumulations of their deeds, gods and people Give up evil, practice good, and rely on the enlightenment of the buddhas. 
Your father was Starlight, the king, your mother queen Lotus Light; You were born in a corrupt age and acquired the rulership. 
There was a large park, arrayed with flowers and precious lamps, Adorned with five hundred lotus ponds, and surrounded with hundreds of trees. 
On the bank of each pond was a villa, with a thousand pillars, Resplendent with a thousand balustrades, with radiant nets and crescents all around. 
When it had not rained for years, with lawlessness prevailing everywhere, The water in the ponds evaporated and the trees withered. 
Seven nights before your birth there were innumerable wonders, Convincing all who saw them that a savior was surely to be born. 
In the middle of the night the earth quaked, And a light like the sun appeared in the pond called Impeccable. 
Thereupon the five hundred ponds were filled with pure water, The trees flourished, and flowers and fruits were filled with life. 
The ponds, filled with water, refreshed the whole grove; By the streams flowing from them the whole continent was replenished with moisture. 
The herbs, crops, and greenery growing, the trees flowered and fruited; All the seeds in the earth sprouted, moistened by the water. 
Every place on earth was equally watered then, And all places low and high became level. 
Ravines and rugged terrain then became instantly level; Brambles, gravel, and the like disappeared, replaced by beautiful jewels. 
All the people exulted, like the thirsty drinking water, And celebrated this park, saying, “By whose power is this felicity?” Then the king Starlight, with his wife, son, and ministers, Surrounded by millions of people, went to enjoy the park. 
In the middle was the pond Impeccable, filled with fragrant water; There the king stood, up in its villa, a temple of truth. 
It had been seven nights since the water had appeared; Again the whole earth trembled, with all its mountains and abodes. 
In the middle of the pond a thousand-petaled lotus appeared, Shining like a thousand suns, suffusing the peak of the polar mountain with light. 
Its stem was diamond, its calyx the essence of beauty, its clean broad leaves Diamond, its pericarp of finest gold, its filaments radiant, with superb fragrance. 
On that pericarp the Guide was born, sitting up straight, cross-legged; You shone, your body resplendent with the marks of greatness, attended by celestial beings. 
Descending from the temple, the king took you in his arms, delighted, And handed you to the queen, saying “This is your son—be of good cheer.” Millions of hidden treasuries appeared, the trees of plenty released Their goods, and the air was filled with music as you were born, leader of the world. 
All those living on the continent looked up to you, trusting— Respectfully they said, “This is the leader of the leaderless.” The light emanating from your body illumined the whole earth; Dispelling the darkness of the world, it put an end to all ailments. 
All malevolent creatures, the venomous and harmful, Became inactive then. 
Frustration, censure, ill-fame, pain, misfortunes, illness, accidents— These all ended, fortune came, and everyone became joyful. 
Everyone loved one another, and all became kind; Free from animosity, nonviolent, they set out on the path of knowledge. 
The righteous king shut off the evil ways, opened the way to heaven, And showed the way to omniscience—you have done a great service to the world. 
We benefit further from seeing you, oceanic giver; after long absence, A leader of the helpless is born in the world—you are a rare guide. “Having thus eulogized the king, the girl Jewel Light then paid her respects to him and stood there reverently. 
Looking at her, the king said, ‘Rare are those who appreciate the virtues of others. 
For the ignorant, the ungrateful, the undiscerning, the agitated, the disturbed, the muddled thinkers, the deranged, the backsliders, those who do not realize the excellence of others’ virtues, it is impossible to comprehend or even conceive of the virtues of the enlightened, or to realize the excellence of knowledge of all virtues. 
Without a doubt you have set out for enlightenment, since you have understood such virtues of enlightening beings. 
Our efforts for the care of beings have not been fruitless, as you, endowed with such knowledge, have appeared in our kingdom, by virtue of the higher knowledge of superior people.’ “Then with his own hand the king gave her a priceless robe, radiant with sparkling jewels, and also gave a precious robe to each of her companions. He said, ‘Take this and put it on.’ Jewel Light then knelt on the ground, picked up the robe in both hands, lifted it to her head, and put it on. Her companions likewise each put on their robes. 
Having put on the robes, the girl and her companions circled the king in respect, with the reflections of all the stars glittering in their robes. 
Seeing this, the people said, ‘You are beautiful, young lady, with your companions, adorned with stars like a night goddess; surrounded by them, you sparkle most brightly.’” Then the night goddess Sarvavrikshapraphullanasukhasamvasa said to Sudhana, “You should realize that it was none other than the buddha Vairocana, who at that time was the king Encompassing Sound of the Proclamation of All Laws, and the queen Lotus Light, wife of the king Starlight and mother of the king Encompassing Sound of the Proclamation of All Laws, was none other than Queen Maya; Maya was the queen Lotus Light at that time, by whom the spontaneously born child was carried at the hip. 
And the king father, the elder king Starlight, was none other than King Shuddhodana. 
And you may think the girl Jewel Light of that time was someone else, but you should realize that she was none other than I—I myself was that girl Jewel Light in that time. 
As for the people of that time who were taken care of by the king Encompassing Sound of the Proclamation of All Laws by means of generosity, kindness, charitable works, and sympathy, you might think they were other people, but you should not see it that way—they are now the enlightening beings gathered here in the audience of the Buddha, standing on the ground of enlightening beings, irreversibly determined to reach supreme perfect enlightenment, some in the first stage, some in the second, some in the third, some in the fourth, some in the fifth, some in the sixth, some in the seventh, some in the eighth, some in the ninth, some in the tenth stage, who have attained by various different vows, various approaches to omniscience, various preparations, various accomplishments, various ways of emancipation, various purifications of manifestations of the path, various mystic powers, and various manifestations of the path, and, by various states of liberation, abide in various spiritual abodes in this assembly.” Then the night goddess spoke these verses to Sudhana, further revealing the enlightening liberation of manifestation of satisfaction by treasure produced from great joy: 
Broad is my vision, with which I observe everywhere, vast oceans Of lands of many kings, and oceans of beings in a whirl. 
In all lands buddhas sit at enlightenment trees, dispassionate, Pervading everywhere by mystic powers and always teaching and guiding beings. 
My hearing is perfectly clear, and I hear all sounds thereby; I hear all the teachings of the buddhas and am extremely joyful. 
My knowledge, nondualistic, unhindered, penetrates the spheres of others’ minds; The vast ocean of minds of the world I comprehend in an instant. 
I remember the past by the power of recollection and concentration, Know oceans of eons, the many hundreds of oceans of lives of myself and others. 
I know in an instant as many eons as atoms in an ocean of lands, The beings transmigrating, the buddhas and their projections. 
I also remember the initial vow of the buddhas, and those who attained, Having accomplished their practice, by many means appropriate to their undertaking. 
The attainments to the stage of coronation of the oceans of lofty virtue, And their many ways of awakening, I comprehend in an instant. 
I know the methods by which they taught in the world, their measureless virtues In nirvana, and how long their teachings remained. 
This way of liberation, witnessing the wealth of satisfaction produced from the treasury of joy, I have cultivated over many hundreds of eons, and you too should enter this way. 
I know only this enlightening liberation of manifestation of satisfaction by treasure produced from great joy. 
How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings in the presence of all buddhas who have plunged into the ocean of commitment to omniscience, who have fulfilled the vow to accomplish the myriad past vows of all buddhas, who have the mighty knowledge to enter all stages of enlightening upon entering one stage of enlightening, who have purified the practice of the vow to comprehend all practices of enlightening beings in one practice, who are masters of the state of comprehension of the whole ocean of all enlightening liberations in each enlightening liberation? 
“In this same enlightenment site there is a night goddess named Sarvajagadrakshapranidhanaviryaprabha, in the presence of the Buddha; go ask her how an enlightening being is to develop sentient beings to supreme perfect enlightenment, purify all buddha-lands, serve all buddhas, and practice all buddhas’ teachings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess Sarvavrikshapraphullanasukhasamvasa and went on. 
Sarvajagadrakshapranidhanaviryaprabha Then Sudhana went to the night goddess Sarvajagadrakshapranidhanaviryaprabha and saw her sitting, in that same assembly, on a seat of jewels reflecting the abodes of all beings; her body was covered with a net of jewels reflecting the principles of the cosmos. 
Her body showed reflections of all moons, suns, stars, and planets; she appeared to sentient beings according to their mentalities, she manifested her own body in forms like those of all beings; her body manifested infinitely various appearances; her body manifested the principles of the states of all modes of bearing; her body appeared to be present everywhere; her body appeared to sentient beings everywhere to mature them; her body appeared to all beings, pervading everywhere with various projections proclaiming the truth; her body descended from the sky to meet the needs of beings at all times; her body was bowing at the feet of all buddhas; her body was leading all sentient beings in accumulating roots of goodness; her body was facing all buddhas, receiving their teachings and remembering them, heedfully minding and retaining them in fulfillment of her vows; her body was filling all directions with infinite various manifestations; her body was radiating the light of the lamp of truth dispelling darkness for all beings; her body showed the embodiment of pure knowledge of the illusoriness of things; her body showed the embodiment of spirituality free from ignorance and passion; her body was born of the magical nature of reality; her mind was aware of the nature of reality; she was illumined with the light of impartial knowledge; her mind and body were ultimately free from irritation and inflammation; she had come from the indestructible realm of the body of reality; her body was a pure embodiment of the nature of things, inherently undefiled, naturally unafflicted, empowered by the realization of Thusness, not fixed or dependent. 
Sudhana, seeing her, bowed his head; remembering as many ways of seeing her as atoms in a buddha-land, he prostrated himself on the ground for a long time. 
Finally rising from the ground, in a reverential attitude Sudhana gazed at the body of the night goddess, and as he did so he attained ten purities of thought, whereby he gained communality with all spiritual friends. 
What were those ten? 
He thought of spiritual friends as his own mind, to associate with them in all situations in the effort to attain omniscience. 
He thought of them as the pure essence of the development of his own actions, to accomplish the attainment of extensive roots of goodness to please spiritual friends. 
He thought of them as adorning the practice of enlightening beings, to associate with them in carrying out adornment by all spiritual vows. 
He thought of them as bringing him to all aspects of buddhahood, to practice the paths taught by all spiritual friends. 
He thought of them as the state of comfort, to manifest the abode of the supreme state of the realm of all buddhas. 
He thought of them as the one way of emancipation, to purify the practice of the commitment of emancipation by the vehicle of universal good. 
He thought of them as oceans of virtues of omniscience, to increase the production of all good qualities. 
He thought of them as fulfilling, increasing, and preserving all consummate good, to increase the force of energetic effort for total knowledge of complete enlightenment. 
He thought of them as fulfilling all roots of goodness, to fulfill the aspirations of all beings. 
He thought of spiritual friends as fulfillers of all aims, to establish the mastery of all acts of enlightening beings. 
He attained these ten purities of thought, whereby he attained communality with the night goddess and enlightening beings as numerous as atoms in a buddha-land. 
That is, he attained communality of recollection, in remembering all buddhas of all times and places; communality of intellect, in unconfused ascertainment of the principles of the ocean of all truths; communality of course, in familiarity with the principles of clear distinction following the courses of the teachings of all buddhas; communality of enlightenment, so as to realize the ocean of all principles of all times by spacelike awareness; communality of purity of faculties, so as to realize the knowledge of the ocean of faculties of all enlightening beings; communality of mental purity, so as to accomplish the path of adornment achieving the virtues of the path of enlightening beings adorned by the protection and care of living beings in all ways; communality of sphere, so as to attain the scope of the sphere of knowledge of those who have arrived at Thusness; communality of following principles, so as to gain the light of the path of entry into the ocean of principles of complete omniscience; communality of comprehension of meaning, so as to attain comprehension of knowledge of the nature of all things; communality of spiritual abode, so as to shatter the mountains of all obstructions; communality of purity of the physical body, so as to attain physical purity resplendent with the marks and embellishments of greatness, appearing to sentient beings variously according to their dispositions; communality of power, so as to increase focus on omniscience in which all powers of enlightening beings are consummated; communality in expertise in all spiritual methods, so as to make the mind clear as space; communality of energy, so as to be capable of tireless perseverance in enlightening practices through all ages; communality of eloquence, so as to illumine unobstructed knowledge of all things; communality of insuperability, so as to purify the body beyond all worldlings; communality of noble-minded, nondepressive, intrepid speech, for purity of good relations with all groups; communality of voice, for enunciation of all truths; communality of purity of articulation, in respect to the myriad principles of conventions of expression of the languages of all beings; communality of purity of virtue, in respect to purities of accomplishment of virtues taught by the buddhas; communality of harmonizing with the tradition of principles and actions of buddhas, for purity of consequences of blameless action; communality of devotion to truth, so as to turn the wheels of teaching of all buddhas who appear in the world; communality of religious practice, so as to dwell in the knowledge of the realm of all buddhas; communality of great kindness, so as to pervade the ocean of all beings in every moment with the various aspects of kindness; communality of entry into the ocean of great compassion, so as to rain teachings for the salvation of all beings; communality of physical action, for equality in application of means to perfect all beings; communality of purity in verbal action, in respect to seeking modes of expression of all truths; communality of mental action, for production of focus on omniscience in the minds of all beings; communality of adornment of all kinds, to approach all buddhas in all buddha-lands; communality of visitation of all buddhas appearing in the world; communality of seeking the teachings of all buddhas; communality of service, to serve all buddhas at all times; communality of leading beings to full development, in all realms of beings; communality of attainment of illumination of all methods of teaching sentient beings; communality of attainment of concentration, in all methods of concentration; communality of universal pervasion, so as to pervade all buddha-lands with projections of practices of enlightening beings; communality of states of enlightening beings, in the oceans of means of miracles of all enlightening beings; communality of associates, associating with all enlightening beings in practice; communality of entry, entering the most suitable aspects of all worlds; communality of mental distinction of the extent of all buddha-lands; communality of differences in approach, according to differences in entering the ocean of all buddha-lands; communality of thorough penetration of the entire range of reason, in representations of endless knowledge of differentiations of all buddha-lands; communality of emergence in all buddha-lands; communality of nonregression, never to regress in penetrating and comprehending all realms; communality of dispelling darkness, so as to illumine the sphere of knowledge of all buddhas awakening at the site of enlightenment; communality of arrival in the oceans of audiences of all buddhas; communality of pervasion of the network of all buddha-lands, in efforts to serve the buddhas in untold buddha-lands; communality of direct knowledge of the connections of all principles of the Teachings; communality of application, in undertaking all the principles of the Teaching in order; communality of seeking, to purify intensive seeking for truth; communality of purity, in accumulating the adornments of enlightened virtues of physical, verbal, and mental action; communality of goodness of mind, to purify the sphere of knowledge of all things and the sphere of mind without evil thoughts; communality of vigor, in efforts to fulfill the undertaking of collection of all roots of goodness; communality of arrays of practices, in accomplishments of all enlightening practices; communality of unhindered state, in understanding the characteristics of all things; communality of skill in means, in mystical displays of the knowledge of each spiritual state; communality of purification of senses, in assumptions of suitable appearances according to the mentalities of sentient beings; communality of attainment of the concentration methods of enlightening beings, in cultivation of all enlightening teachings; communality of base, in the abodes of all buddhas; communality of accession to the stages of enlightenment, in attainments of all stages of buddhas and enlightening beings; communality of standpoint, in all states of enlightening beings; communality of instruction, in receiving the instructions of all buddhas; communality of concentration, entering the ocean of all concentrations at once; communality of differentiation of concentrations, in the context of various buddha-works; communality of mindfulness, of all points to remember; communality of conduct of enlightening beings, continuing to perform the tasks of enlightening beings through all times; communality of pure faith, to expand the ocean of energy of joy of devotion to infinite enlightened knowledge; communality of destruction of all obstructions to enlightenment; communality of nonregressing knowledge, to produce endless stores of enlightened knowledge; communality of emergence at appropriate times to guide all sentient beings to full development; communality of abode on the ways to omniscience; communality of sphere, entering the sphere of the majesty of the design of the cosmos; communality of independence, so as to be mentally free of all dependence; communality of teaching of all truths, realizing knowledge of the equality of all things; communality of exertion, so as to embody the power of all buddhas; communality of higher knowledge of means of accomplishing communication with all beings; communality of attainment of uncontrived mystic powers, entering the oceans of lands in all directions; communality of the stage of mental command, so as to gain the illumination of the ocean of all concentration spells; communality of penetration of the secrets of all the buddhas’ teachings in the doctrines of all the scriptures; communality of entry into profundity, in realizations of the principle of all things being like space; communality of range, coursing through all worlds; communality of splendor, appearing to beings according to their mentalities; communality of shaking, showing beings changes in the basis of the world; communality of fruitful action, edifying all who see, hear, or remember them; communality of emancipation, so as to awaken to the knowledge of the ten powers, to fulfill all vows. 
Thus did Sudhana, by attainment of ten purities of thought while gazing at the night goddess, gain communality with the night goddess in as many such ways as atoms in a buddha-land. 
Then, having seen the night goddess in as many ways as atoms in a buddha-land, having attained an infinite variety of purity of perception of spiritual friends and entered into as many aspects of communality with them as atoms in a buddha-land, Sudhana bared one shoulder, bowed to the goddess, and spoke these verses: 
As the power in my own mind, my will For enlightenment is firm and unbending; As in your mind, O goddess, so in mine This determination now spontaneously arises. 
All evils are cleared away, And resplendent good is developed: 
From witnessing your beauty Endless goodness is born in me. 
My mind is adorned with myriad virtues, Each to the benefit of living beings; Adorned thereby, I carry on practice In all lands for all time. 
You have taught me the consummation Of all the teachings to aid me: 
For my benefit, thinking to assist me, You present supreme spiritual instruction. 
You have blocked the path to woe and calamity And shown the way to felicity; You have also shown the way to omniscience, Followed by all enlightened ones. 
I think of you as a vehicle Of emancipation, incomparable, rare; Like space, undefiled, infinite, Pure is the door to omniscience. 
I think of you as a pure, Immeasurable mine of omniscience; Oceans of virtues, vast as the sky, Arise in my mind every moment. 
Guide me by the transcendent ways And nourish me with inconceivable virtues; Fully developed by pure virtues, before long I will gain the turban of omniscience. 
I always think of spiritual friends As fulfillers of the path of omniscience; Therefore I think by serving them all, Good can be quickly developed. 
All advantages come from that, And achievement of good qualities; Having honored this infinite group, I will tell the world of the path of all knowledge. 
You are my mentor, of measureless virtue, My guide on the way of omniscience; Even in countless millions of eons I could never thank you enough, O sage. 
Having spoken these verses, Sudhana said to the night goddess, “You have shown me the sphere of this inconceivable enlightening liberation; tell me, what is this liberation called? 
How long ago did you set out for supreme perfect enlightenment? 
When will you realize supreme perfect enlightenment?” The goddess replied, “This liberation is called ‘made of roots of goodness fostering the development of all beings.’ Imbued with this liberation, realizing the equality of the essence of all things, comprehending the nature of all things, going to refuge in the independent state, passing away from all worlds, comprehending the differentiations in forms of things yet realizing the nature of things is without difference, without variation or distinction in appearance, not blue, yellow, red, or white, I manifest different bodies, of many appearances—of varying appearance, of nonvarying, undifferentiated appearance, neither colored nor colorless, of many appearances, infinite appearances, pure appearance, appearing to emanate all sorts of supernal manifestations, appearing to be visible everywhere, appearing to be the same as all beings, transcendent appearance manifest to all beings, appearance of light reflected everywhere, nonoffensive appearance, appearance beautified with the marks and embellishments of greatness, appearance resplendent with impeccable behavior, appearance manifesting the exertion of great power, appearance of unapproachable profundity, appearance unsurpassed in all worlds, appearance varying from moment to moment, appearance manifesting multitudes of different forms, appearance of various physical forms, appearance manifesting infinite miraculous displays, appearance as an eloquent speaker, appearance of all beautiful forms, appearance adapted to development of all beings, appearance of consummate good manifest to those who are teachable according to their mentalities, appearance reflected everywhere without obstruction, pure, untainted, serene, radiant appearance, healthy, beautiful appearance of an indestructible body, appearance of cultivation of inconceivable spiritual methods, superlative appearance overwhelming all, appearance without darkness or obscurity, appearance dispelling all darkness, appearance imbued with all good qualities, appearance of an ocean of virtues of a great soul, appearance attained by honoring the worthy in the past, appearance of supreme vastness of a mind clear as the sky, appearance revealing an ocean of indestructible, inexhaustible virtues, appearance free from all worldly attachments, appearance freely pervading everywhere, appearance instantly manifesting a multitude of different appearances in untold myriads of realms, appearance increasing floods of great joy in all sentient beings, appearance to protect all beings, appearance emanating multitudes of manifestations of all virtues of buddhahood from every pore, appearance purifying the wills and aspirations of all sentient beings, appearance showing determination of the meanings of all spiritual teachings, appearance radiating a network of varicolored lights, appearance of pure light as vast as the sky, appearance contained in the light of the untainted essence of pure jewels, appearance reflecting the undefiled real nature of things, incomparable appearance, appearance reflecting the variety of the ocean of means of liberation, appearance of ubiquitous light, appearance manifest to the world according to the time without fragmentation, appearance originating in the realm of tranquillity and restraint, appearance quelling all afflictions, appearance revealing a field of blessing for all sentient beings, appearance producing calm by all means, appearance fruitfully manifest throughout the world, appearance revealing the exertion of great knowledge, appearance of an unobstructed all-pervasive body, appearance of a universally supreme body manifest in ways beneficial to all beings, appearance embodying an ocean of great love, appearance embodying a mountain of great virtue, appearance reflected in all states of being while independent of all worlds, appearance purifying the power of great knowledge, appearance coexisting with the memory of all worlds and beings, appearance of light of all jewels, appearance showing the matrix of the source of light, appearance corresponding to the faith of all beings, appearance actualizing expression of all knowledge, appearance with laughing eyes cheering the world, appearance of light of the finest arrays of all jewels, appearance without grasping yet not turning away from sentient beings, unfixed, uninvolved appearance, appearance manifesting mystical powers, appearance showing all kinds of miracles, appearance of revealing the roots of goodness of the enlightened, impeccable appearance arising from the ocean of principles of all realms of reality, appearance as reflections going to the assemblies of all buddhas, appearance perfecting all kinds of forms, appearance resulting from good action, appearance adapted to guide those to be taught, appearance that all beings never tire of seeing, appearance radiating multicolored lights, appearance showing the ocean of forms of past, present, and future, appearance radiating lights of all colors, inexpressible appearance, appearance showing a variety of meanings in halos of light, appearance transcending all worlds, appearance manifesting as many suns as atoms in untold buddha-lands in each pore, appearance magically producing multitudes of forms like the clear moon, appearance emanating multitudes of mountains of flowers of infinite colors, appearance emanating garlands of all kinds of adornments, appearance manifesting multitudes of lotuses of all jewels, appearance filling all universes with clouds of incense of all fragrances; in each moment of consciousness producing clouds of treasuries of all kinds of fragrant powders and pervading all universes in the ten directions, I show all this to sentient beings who can be guided by seeing, those who can be guided by hearing, those who can be guided by remembering, those who can be guided by production of emanations of teaching cycles, those who can be guided when the time is ripe, those who can be guided by seeing physical bodies, those who can be guided by service, those who can be guided by comprehension, those who can be guided by manifestation of various miraculous effects, those who can be guided by manifestation of inconceivable miraculous effects, by mastery of minds, by mastery of timing, by mastery of prevention of evil deeds, by mastery of promotion of good deeds, by mastery of accomplishment of past great vows, by mastery of momentum toward omniscience, by mastery of the means of attainment of the immense miracles of the liberations of enlightening beings, by mastery of the source of power of great compassion accomplishing the salvation of all beings, by mastery of the will producing purity of the ocean of great love, empowered by the enlightened. 
“Thus, based on this enlightening liberation, fostering roots of goodness according to sentient beings’ mentalities for their development, realizing the undifferentiated essence of reality, manifesting an infinite variety of physical forms, projecting visions of an infinite variety of multitudes of appearances from each body representing practices, radiating an infinite variety of multitudes of light beams from each appearance of action, showing reflections of buddha-lands, showing infinite buddhas emerging from each beam of light in each buddha-land, showing the infinite variety of projections of each buddha, I vivify past roots of goodness, develop new roots of goodness, increase existing roots of goodness, and enhance developed roots of goodness; and in each mental moment I establish infinite beings in the stage of nonregression, where they will not retreat, advancing toward supreme perfect enlightenment. 
“Also, you ask how long ago I set out for supreme perfect enlightenment, and how many eons I have been carrying out enlightening practice. 
I will tell you this, too, by the power of Buddha. 
Because the sphere of knowledge of enlightening beings is utterly pure in its essential nature, it is outside the net of all conceptions, it is beyond the mountains of all obstructions. 
“It is like the sun: there is no reckoning of day and night on the sun, but when the sun has gone down that is known as the night, and when it has come up that is known as the day. In the same way, in the nonconceptual sphere of knowledge of enlightening beings there are no thoughts or conceptions of imaginations, or notions of cycle or duration or time frames: 
but when the will of enlightening beings arises, then by the light of the sphere of nonconceptual knowledge, and by mastery of timing in development of all sentient beings, conceptual calculations of ages, duration, and cycles are distinguished; in the sphere of nonconceptual knowledge, conceptual calculations of passage of time in past and future ages are distinguished. 
“It is like the orb of the sun in the sky: it is perceived reflected in all jewel mountains, in all jewel trees, in all jewels, in all jewel treasuries, in all oceans, in all springs and streams, in all vessels of clear water, and in the minds of all beings; it appears to all beings, and is seen reflected in each particle of all the jewels—the sun does not originate in the jewel mountains, does not enter the jewel trees or particles, is not in the crystals, does not come to the jewel treasuries, does not enter the oceans, does not enter any bodies of water—yet it is seen within them all. 
In the same way a great enlightening being, leaving the ocean of existence, risen into the sky of the reality realm of the enlightened, dwelling in the realm of the sky of the essence of things, abiding in the sky of peace, is seen in all realms of existence in forms similar to all sentient beings, for the development and civilization of sentient beings: yet the enlightening being is not stained by the ills of the mundane whirl, is not burnt by the suffering of death and birth, does not live by concepts and imaginations, and has no notion of length or brevity of the age. 
The enlightening being is ultimately beyond all errors of mistaken conceptions, thoughts, and views, sees with accurate knowledge of all worlds as dreamlike, realizes all worlds are like magic, has attained knowledge of the realm devoid of beings, sees things as they are, and yet by control of great vows of the sphere of vast compassion appears to all sentient beings to guide them to perfection. 
“Just as a boatman is always at work on the rivers to ferry people over, never ceasing, all his life never dwelling on the near shore or on the farther shore, and not remaining in midstream either, in the same way the enlightening being undertakes to save sentient beings from the current of the mundane whirl by the power of the boat of the transcendent ways; the enlightening being does not fear the near shore, does not think of the farther shore as safety, and yet is always engaged in ferrying sentient beings over. 
“Just as space, extensive as the cosmos, is without discrimination whether worlds become, decay, or disappear, is by nature pure, undefiled, neither turning back nor tiring, not long or short, eternally supporting all lands, in the same way the space of the will and knowledge of the enlightening being, with the whirlwind of great vows, never tires in keeping sentient beings from falling into all states of misery, has no fear in leading them to the paths of felicity, is not exhausted in setting them on the ways to omniscience, does not follow afflictions, and is not stained by the ills of the mundane whirl. 
“Just as a magically produced man has all his limbs and body parts but lacks ten physical elements—inhalation and exhalation, coolness and warmth, hunger and thirst, joy and sorrow, the pains of birth, old age, sickness, and death—in the same way, in the enlightening being whose form is born of the magic of knowledge, whose body is one with the cosmos, who appears in all states of existence to perfect sentient beings, who lives through all ages, ten things are not to be found: desire for the mundane world, rejection of life in the mundane, currying of enjoyment of objects, malevolence, desire for enjoyment, the burning of afflictions, experiences of painful feelings, fear of difficult situations, desire for existence, and attachment. 
“I will tell you more, by the power of Buddha, to increase the power of vows of enlightening beings of the future. 
“In the very remote past there was a world called Jewel Light. In that world was an age called Beautiful Light. In that age ten thousand buddhas appeared. 
The first of those buddhas was one called King Illumining Space with the Voice of Truth, who was one of those who has arrived at Thusness, perfectly enlightened, consummate in knowledge and action, arrived at felicity, supreme knower of the world, tamer of humans, teacher of humans and gods, a blessed buddha. 
East of that city was a forest called Beautiful Light, in which there was an enlightenment site called Cloud of Jewel Flowers. 
At that site a lion throne in the calyx of a lotus of radiant jewels appeared, and this is where that buddha realized supreme perfect enlightenment. “At that time the human life span was ten thousand years. 
Now, there being many who were set in evil ways—killing, stealing, raping, lying, foul and harsh in speaking, divisive, covetous, malicious, and deluded—the buddha sat at the site of enlightenment for a full thousand years and taught enlightening beings, world leaders, and people who had served past buddhas, in order to mature people’s existing roots of good. 
“At that time there was a king called Victorious Light in that capital city Array of Delights. He had thrown many hundreds of thousands of criminals and evildoers into prison to discipline them—thieves, killers, rapists, liars, abusive and violent people, troublemakers, greedy people, malicious people, people obsessed with aberrant ideas, people addicted to unlawful pleasures, people overcome by desire for ill-gotten gains, people involved in false cults, evildoers, people who had committed violence, people who had done no good, people who had neglected to come to the aid of those in danger and fear, people without respect for their parents or for mendicants, priests, and holy people. “The king had a son named Conqueror, who had twenty-eight of the marks of a great man, and lived in the palace surrounded by many graceful women. 
He heard the frightful cries of those who were bound up in prison; agitated and upset by these cries, moved with compassion, he left the palace and went into the prison, where he saw those people cast into the dungeons, bound by all sorts of fetters and shackles, chained together and thrown into the darkness, shrouded in smoke, exposed to unhealthy drafts, emaciated, hungry and thirsty, naked and homeless, filthy and unkempt, being subjected to various tortures, screaming in pain. “Seeing the prisoners, the prince was inspired with great compassion and an unprecedented determination to help others. He comforted the prisoners, intending to deliver them from their bonds. 
Giving them assurance, he went to the king and said, ‘Know, O king, that I have given assurance to the people in prison. 
Please set them free.’ “The king called his five hundred ministers together and asked them what they thought about this. 
They said, ‘These people are plunderers of the royal treasuries, attackers of the king, arrested entering the royal palace; they should be executed. Furthermore, anyone who wants to save them is also guilty of crime against the king.’ “The prince, overwhelmed with great compassion, said to those ministers, ‘Let it be as you say. Just release these convicts—I can endure all pains for their sake. Whatever you would do to them, do to me. 
To free them from bondage I will undergo all kinds of torture and give up my body and life. 
If I cannot liberate these people from bondage, how can I liberate those who are bound to the world, who are tied up by the ropes of craving, who are in the abyss of ignorance, who are cast into the darkness of delusion, who suffer the pains of poverty, who have fallen into the depths of evil ways, who act senselessly, whose minds are confused, who see no way to emancipation, who are without illumination, who are attached to the world, who lack virtue and knowledge, who have lost their faculties of knowledge, whose minds are tainted with various afflictions, who are flung in the mud of suffering, who are under the control of demons, who are tormented by birth, old age, death, grief, lamentation, misery, depression, and sorrow?’ “Then the prince released all those prisoners from their bonds, by giving up himself, his whole retinue, and all his wealth. Freeing them, he removed all that was torturing them once and for all. 
At that point the five hundred ministers, up in arms, went to the king and said, ‘Know that the law of the king has been broken by the will of the prince, and all of our lives are uncertain. 
If you do not punish the prince, your own life will not last long.’ “The king, enraged, set out to kill his son and those convicts as well. The queen, hearing of this, was very upset: her hair undone, her jewelry and makeup removed, she went to the king with a thousand of her ladies, beating her breast and throwing dust on her head, weeping and wailing; she said to him, ‘Let the prince go free, let him live.’ The king turned to the prince and said, ‘Give up on these criminals. 
If you do not, you will die for their sake.’ “The prince, facing death, was not fazed, being focused on omniscience, dedicated to the welfare of others, guided by great compassion. 
The queen, his mother, asked the king to allow a fortnight for observation: 
‘Let the prince give people whatever they need for half a month; then do whatever you want with him.’ The king agreed to this. “North of the city there was a large park called Sunlight that had been made in the past as a sacrificial ground. The prince went there and gave to anyone who asked whatever they needed. Thus for half a month he freely gave away various goods—food, clothing, utensils, and so on—to whoever needed them. 
“Then, on the last day of the fortnight, the whole population gathered—the king, his ministers, his women, the grandees, the landlords, the townspeople, and all the religious impostors. 
Now the buddha-king Illumining Space with the Voice of Truth, realizing it was an opportune time to teach people, went to that sacrificial ground, respectfully surrounded by celestial and spiritual beings. 
The crowd of people, and the prince, saw the buddha coming from afar, serene, pleasant to see, senses calm, mind quiet, self-controlled, master of his faculties, tranquil as an elephant, clear as a pool of water, purified, undefiled, miraculously radiating light by the great power of a buddha, overpowering with the mastery of a buddha, shining with the magnificence of a buddha, adorned with the marks and embellishments of a buddha, pervading all worlds with the light of his aura, illuminating them with rays of light, emanating orbs of fragrant jewel fire from every pore, causing all worlds to quake with the quaking of a buddha-land, destroying all beings’ afflictions, coming forth as a buddha raining multitudes of all kinds of supernal manifestations, bearing himself as a buddha, increasing the flow of joy in all beings, conveying the power of the sight of a buddha. 
“Then the prince and the people, going out to meet the buddha, their minds clear, prostrated themselves before the buddha, made offerings of many kinds, and said, ‘Welcome, welcome, Blessed One; the Buddha has turned his attention to us, the Buddha has bestowed his favor on us.’ Then the prince pointed out a seat of honor to the buddha and said, ‘Please sit down, O Blessed One—this seat has been prepared.’ Then, as the buddha approached, the gods of purity, by the power of the buddha, changed it into a calyx of a lotus of fragrant diamonds. 
The buddha sat on it, and enlightening beings sat on surrounding seats. 
As soon as they saw the buddha, everyone in the assembly was relieved of afflictions and obstruction and disturbance, and became fit vessels for the holy teachings. “Then the buddha, knowing that those people had become capable of receiving the Teaching, gave them a systematic talk. He expounded to them a scripture called Illumination of the Multitude of Causes, including all elements of the Teaching, which he spoke in the languages of all people. 
At that, eighty million people in that crowd attained dispassionate, pure, objective vision of things. Many millions reached the stage beyond learning. Ten thousand were led to the Great Vehicle, introduced to the way of fulfillment of the great vows of universally good enlightening action. Thus as the buddha turned the wheel of teaching by the great miraculous power of buddhas, as many beings as atoms in a hundred thousand buddha-lands in the ten directions came to the guidance of the Great Vehicle. 
And as for the prince, he attained this enlightening liberation made of roots of goodness fostering the perfection of all beings according to their mentalities. 
It was none other than I myself who was that prince in that time. 
As that prince, overwhelmed by great compassion, set on the welfare of all beings, unattached to the things of the world, desiring only perfection, with no wish for glory, fame, or repute, not elevating myself, not degrading others, unattached to things, without any notion of existents, without desire for anything in the world, material or immaterial, indifferent to the pleasures of the world, attentive to the sphere of the enlightened, purely intent on enlightenment, having developed an indomitable will, benevolent toward all living beings, compassionately resolved to quell the suffering of all beings, intent on the power of the enlightened, purifying the path of enlightenment, preparing the paths of emancipation of the Great Vehicle, contemplating the path to omniscience, I did these difficult deeds. 
This is how long ago I attained this liberation. 
“And who do you think those five hundred ministers were, who unjustly incited the king to execute me? They were none other than five hundred people whom Devadatta incited to kill the Buddha. 
The Buddha subsequently guided them and foretold their enlightenment, predicting that in the future, after as many eons as atoms in a polar mountain, in an age called Good Light, there would be five hundred buddhas, with buddha-lands of various qualities, born of various races, tribes, and families, showing various miracles at birth, undergoing various spiritual transmutations on leaving society, manifesting various lights at the tree of enlightenment, approaching the pinnacle of enlightenment in various ways, showing various ways of destroying demons, showing various miracles on attainment of enlightenment, articulating various terms for the principles of their teachings, expounding various scriptures, speaking various languages, surrounded by various audiences, emanating various auras of light, having various life spans, their teachings to remain for various lengths of time, their teachings variously circulating, and their names to be various, all embodiments of great compassion. 
The first buddha of the age to attain supreme enlightenment in the world Jewel Light would be one named Great Compassionate One, the second would be named Moon of Commitment to the Welfare of All Beings, the third would be Lion of Great Compassion, the fourth would be Desirous of the Welfare of All Beings, and the last one would be Supreme Healer. 
“Who do you think those criminals of that time were, doomed to die, whom I released from bondage by sacrificing my life? They were none other than the buddhas of the present age, Virtue, beginning with Krakucchanda, and countless millions of other enlightening beings who were inspired to seek enlightenment by seeing the buddha Resolution Born of the Glory of the Proclamation of Endless Power, and are now carrying out enlightenment practice throughout the universe, and are cultivating and extending this enlightening liberation born of roots of goodness aiding the development of all beings according to their mentalities. “Who do you think the Victorious Light of that time was? It was none other than the great debater Satyaka. 
And who do you think were the retinue and servants of the king, but the sixty thousand philosophers whom Satyaka brought to the buddha to debate and whom the buddha predicted would become enlightened and appear in the world as buddhas, with variously arrayed buddha-lands, in various ages, with various names. 
“To continue, the prince, Conqueror, given permission by his parents, after having released the prisoners, gave up his great wealth and family and went to the buddha. 
For five thousand years thereafter he cultivated spiritual practice, during which time he perfected ten thousand concentration methods, attained ten thousand ways of mental command, entered into ten thousand channels of mystic knowledge, attained ten thousand great treasuries of enlightening beings, produced ten thousand currents of momentum toward omniscience, purified ten thousand facets of tolerance, carried out ten thousand contemplations, developed ten thousand bodies of power of enlightening beings, entered ten thousand doors of knowledge of enlightening beings, produced ten thousand ways to transcendent wisdom, became aware of ten thousand channels of conscious vision of thousands of buddhas, and accomplished ten thousand vows of enlightening beings. 
With these realizations, in each mental moment he went to ten thousand buddha-lands in the ten directions, and in each moment of thought remembered ten thousand buddhas past and future in each world; and he perceived ten thousand multitudes of emanations of those buddhas radiating throughout the ten directions. 
In each moment of thought he saw all the beings in ten thousand buddha-lands, passing away and coming to life in various states, undeveloped and developed, felicitous and miserable, of good and bad appearance, following their desires; and he understood the passing away and coming to life of those beings, as well as the revolving of their minds, the conduct of their minds, the continuity of their thoughts, the variety of their inclinations, the multitude of their faculties, the courses of their endeavors, their habits of action, and the proper timing to develop and guide them. 
“Subsequently the prince passed away from there and was reborn in the same city Array of Delights, in the same royal family, and attained sovereign rulership. 
As the king, following the demise of the buddha-king Illumining Space with the Voice of Truth, he propitiated a buddha named Glorious King Risen in the Sky of Truth. 
After that, at that same enlightenment site, having become a chief god, he propitiated a buddha named Sanctuary of Celestial Rulers. 
After that, in the same world, having become a celestial chief of the heaven of timely portion, he propitiated a buddha named Fiery Energy of the Radiant Mountain of Mental Command. 
After that, having become a celestial chief of the heaven of satisfaction in the same world, he propitiated a buddha named King Proclaiming the Light of the Wheel of the Teaching. 
After that, having become a celestial chief of the heaven of good emanation in the same world, he propitiated a buddha named King Like the Moon in the Sky. 
After that, having become a celestial chief of the heaven of command of others’ emanations in the same world, he propitiated a buddha named Paragon of Indestructible Power. 
After that, having become a chief Brahma god in the same world, he propitiated a buddha called Sound of Projections of the Wheel of Teaching Reflected Everywhere. 
Beginning with these, ten thousand buddhas emerged in the age Beautiful Light in the world Jewel Light, all of whom were propitiated by the prince Conqueror. 
“Following that age Beautiful Light was an age called Subtle Light; in that age I was a king called Great Wisdom. 
As a king, I propitiated a buddha named Glorious Mountain of Marks of Greatness. 
Next, in the same age, as a city spirit, I propitiated a buddha named Walking Boldly As a Lion. Next, in the same age, as a god of riches, I propitiated a buddha named Crown of the Lord of Gods. Next, in the same age, as a celestial musician, I propitiated a buddha named Spiritual Renown. Next, in the same age, as a goblin chief, I propitiated a buddha named Crown of Light. 
“In this way, I propitiated sixty million buddhas in the age of subtle light, beginning with these ten. 
I honored and served those buddhas in various forms of existence, and as I went to each buddha I matured countless beings for supreme perfect enlightenment. 
And as I went to each buddha I attained various concentrations, various mental commands, various accomplishments, various types of specialized knowledge, various perspectives on truth, various operations of knowledge, various perceptions of the totality of realms, various awarenesses of the totality of lands, various perceptions of the totality of visions of Buddha; all these I entered into, purified, enlarged, and devoted my attention to from start to finish. 
“And just as I propitiated the buddhas in the age of Subtle Light, so did I propitiate all the buddhas who arose in as many eons as atoms in all oceans of worlds and came from other worlds and taught, and I listened to their teaching and remembered it. 
I have retained all their teachings, and from all of those buddhas I got this enlightening liberation born of roots of goodness aiding the development of all beings according to their mentalities, by various means of attainment and by various ways of liberation.” Then the night goddess spoke these verses to Sudhana elucidating this liberation: 
This supreme liberation is inconceivable; Resolute, you ask me about it. 
Endless, vast, inconceivable eons ago, Countless worlds away, There was a pleasant world Called Jewel Light. 
There was an age called Beautiful Light In which numberless buddhas emerged; I propitiated those supreme sages As I cultivated this liberation. 
There was a great and glorious metropolis there Called Array of Delights In which there lived both Pure-minded people and evildoers. 
The king there was Victorious Light, Who ruled his people justly; His son was called Conqueror, A fine man with the marks of greatness. 
Thousands of offenders had been Condemned to death by the king; Seeing them, the prince was seized with compassion And asked the king to release them. 
Hearing this, the king called his ministers And told them all about it: They all said, bowing to the king, “He is out to destroy you.” Incited by the ministers, the king Hastened to kill the prince. 
Undismayed, indifferent to his own death, The prince did not abandon the convicts. 
Grieved to hear the prince was condemned, The queen and the palace ladies asked the king To free the prince for a fortnight To give all kinds of gifts to the people. 
Granted permission by the king, the prince Made gifts of all that was asked for, Day and night, for half a month, Giving charity to all who came. 
Whatever the needy required, That he gave them, prepared for death; The whole population of the city came out, Lamenting the fate of the prince. 
Then the buddha at the enlightenment tree, Illumining Space with the Voice of Truth, Realizing people’s faculties were ripe, Went to that sacrificial ground out of compassion. 
Going there, the buddha Produced a miraculous display And expounded a scripture, The voice of the Teaching as myriad lamps of truth. 
Countless people were edified, And the buddha foretold their enlightenment; The prince Conqueror, enraptured, Set out for supreme enlightenment. 
The prince gave the buddha Many offerings and joyfully said, “May I become a guide, savior, refuge, And resort for the people of the land.” He left home to join the buddha, Seeking the path of perfect enlightenment; He spent hundreds of eons Thoroughly investigating the essence of thing. 
Pitying all the helpless ones Fallen into the sea of suffering, Having cultivated the path of enlightenment, He attained this liberation. 
All the buddhas in that age He propitiated with pure faith; He made great offerings to them And kept their teachings in mind. 
After that, for eons numerous As atoms in oceans of lands, He propitiated and made offerings to All the buddhas that arose. 
I was the prince Conqueror, Who, seeing people imprisoned, Gave up my body to free them And thus attained this liberation. 
I cultivated it for eons as many As atoms in oceans of lands, Expanding it moment by moment Through endless incomparable means. 
From all the buddhas I saw I gained some realization And was shown this liberation By a succession of means. 
From them I learned the inconceivable Reality of liberation over countless eons, Imbibing all at once the multitude of teaching Projected by the buddhas when established therein. 
Those established therein Go everywhere without attachment, Instantly comprehending the countless Names and groups of past, present, and future. 
They appear before all the multitudes Of buddhas of all times, Manifesting themselves in the presence Of those buddhas as reflected images. 
They go everywhere and appear Before all the buddhas, Showering all kinds of ornaments As offerings to the buddhas. 
Then they ask the myriads of buddhas Multitudes of questions And remember the infinite teachings Poured forth by the buddhas. 
They go to the circles of buddhas everywhere, As far as they can see, Sitting on seats of many forms, Manifesting various miracles. 
With bodies of infinite appearances, They fill all realms, by the thousands; They show an endless, endless variety of forms, And all those forms in one. 
From each pore they emanate countless Multitudes of light rays And extinguish the fire of afflictions Of all beings by various means. 
In this state, emanating myriad projected bodies From each and every pore, They pervade all realms with them And guide beings with rain from the ocean of truth. 
This way of enlightenment, with inconceivable forms, Is the resort of all enlightening beings; Based on this they carry out practices In all lands for all time. 
Expounding the Teaching according to mentalities, They remove the web of views; Dwelling in ultimate felicity, They show people the stage of omniscience. 
With inconceivably many bodies of endless forms In all states of existence, They teach according to mentality, Their forms reflections of all beings. 
How can I know the practice, or comprehend the oceans of virtues, or completely know the power of knowledge, or know the realm of thought, or understand the mastery of concentration, or recognize the miracle of liberation, of the enlightening beings who have transcended all worldly courses, who appear as reflections in all states of being, who are intent on shattering the mountains of barriers to omniscience, who know the nature and characteristics of all things, who are engaged in dispelling the darkness of all barriers caused by afflictions, who are skilled in carrying out a thorough investigation of all things, who actually realize the knowledge of selflessness, who ceaselessly develop and guide all sentient beings, who really know the principle of the nondual reality realm, whose intellects encompass the ocean of all manners of verbal expression? 
“In the Lumbini grove, here on Jambudvipa, there lives a goddess of the Lumbini grove named Sutejomandalaratishri. 
Go ask her how enlightening beings are born in the family of buddhas, how they become light-makers for the world, and how they carry on the practice of enlightening beings forever without wearying.” Then Sudhana paid his respects to the night goddess Sarvajagadrak-shapranidhanaviryaprabha and left. 
Sutejomandalaratishri Remembering the instruction of the night goddess Sarvajagadrak-shapranidhanaviryaprabha, cultivating and extending the enlightening liberation born of roots of goodness fostering the development of all beings according to their mentalities, Sudhana made his way to the Lumbini grove. 
When he got to the Lumbini grove he circled it, looking for the goddess Sutejomandalaratishri. Finally he saw her sitting on a jewel lotus calyx lion seat in a tower made of encircling branches of trees of all jewels in the Lumbini grove, surrounded by twenty million billion wood goddesses, teaching them, expounding to them a scripture called Exposition of the Ocean of Lives of All Enlightening Beings, born in the family of buddhas, increasing the flood of the ocean of virtues of enlightening beings. 
Seeing the goddess, Sudhana went up to her, paid his respects, and said, “I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how enlightening beings get to be born in the family of buddhas, or how, carrying out the practice of enlightening beings, they become light-makers for sentient beings.” The goddess replied, “There are ten kinds of birth by which enlightening beings become born in the family of buddhas. 
Enlightening beings who have accomplished these develop correctly by means of the skills of enlightening beings, without stopping, without becoming exhausted, without regressing, without giving up, without wearying, without becoming discouraged, without becoming confused, without tarrying, without becoming afraid, without waning away. 
They follow the way to omniscience and remember the principle of the realm of reality; they become ripe for the enlightenment of buddhas and broaden the determination for enlightenment. They grow by means of all the transcendent ways, they withdraw from all worldly ways, and progress into the stage of those who realize Thusness. 
What are these ten kinds of birth of enlightening beings? 
The first is called the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of the undertaking of the vow to serve all buddhas. 
The second is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of consummation of all elements of the determination for enlightenment. 
The third is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of meditation on the principles of the Teaching. 
The fourth is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of purification of the intent in viewing past, present, and future. 
The fifth is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of the light of universal awareness. 
The sixth is the birth as enlightening beings as offspring of the family of all buddhas. 
The seventh is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of the array of lights of the manifestation of powers of buddhas. 
The eighth is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of consummation of contemplation of the way to omniscience. 
The ninth is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of manifestation of emanations throughout the cosmos. 
The tenth is the birth of enlightening beings as offspring of momentum going into the stage of the enlightened. 
“What is the first birth of enlightening beings, as offspring of the undertaking of the vow to serve all buddhas? 
Here the enlightening beings, honoring, respecting, serving, attending, and pleasing all buddhas just as when they first made offerings in service of a buddha, never tire of seeing the enlightened; their minds expanded by floods of joy from the buddhas they honor, they are flooded with well-being by the sight of buddhas. Gaining virtue with unwavering faith, tireless, they ceaselessly work to bring offerings to all buddhas. 
This is enlightening beings’ first kind of birth, as offspring of the undertaking of the vow to serve all buddhas, which is conducive to the production and acquisition of roots of goodness in preparation for omniscience. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of consummation of all elements of the determination for enlightenment? 
Here enlightening beings arouse the will for supreme perfect enlightenment: 
that involves the will of great compassion to save all beings; the will to please all buddhas ultimately; the will to seek all ways of enlightenment, to be equanimous toward all things; the will for the greatest of undertakings, to head for omniscience; the will of great kindness, to treat all beings with care; the will not to abandon any beings, to be firmly equipped for omniscience; the will to avoid deceit and falsehood, to attain the light of truthful knowledge; the will to act in accord with one’s speech, to carry out the path of enlightening beings; the will not to disappoint the buddhas, to keep the vows of all buddhas; the will for the great undertaking of omniscience, to ceaselessly guide and perfect all beings that will ever be. 
When enlightening beings have fulfilled as many such elements of the determination for enlightenment as atoms in a buddha-land, then they are born in the family of buddhas. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of meditation on the principles of the Teaching? 
Here the enlightening beings’ minds are turned to meditation according all the principles of the teaching, dedicated to fulfilling all aspects of the path of omniscience, intent on practicing impeccable actions, bent on purification of the ocean of all concentration methods of enlightening beings, determined to practice and perfect all qualities of enlightening beings, intent on accomplishing all elements of the path of enlightening beings, energetically striving for omniscience, like the fire that burns ceaselessly through an eon of destruction, determined to accomplish the infinite variety of practices of enlightening beings aimed at guiding all sentient beings to perfection; in terms of all practical techniques and accomplishments of perfect qualities of enlightening beings they enter into the means of realization of all methods of cultivation and meditation. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of purification of the intent in viewing past, present, and future? 
Here enlightening beings become pure in the element of intent; they come into the range of the enlightenment of buddhas; they enter the ocean of methods of enlightening beings; their minds are firm, governed by an intent as strong as steel; they are aloof from all forms of existence; they are attentive to the accomplishments of miracles of all buddhas; they gain higher direction so as to increase the keenness of awakening faculties; they become noble-minded, so that their will becomes clear; they become unshakable, so that they develop their firm great vows; they are kept in mind by the buddhas, so that they break through all barriers; they become refuges relied upon by all sentient beings. “What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of the light of universal awareness? Here the enlightening beings become fully engaged in the effort to guide all sentient beings to perfection. They become free from any notion of things, having let go and relinquished all. 
They become tolerant, having attained the light of acceptance of all teachings of buddhas. 
They become greatly energetic, accomplishing right emancipation everywhere. 
They become released through meditation, having purified the sphere of knowledge of all-sided concentration. They become radiant with the energy of transcendent wisdom, having attained awareness of all truths. They become unimpeded in vision, perceiving the manifestations of the ocean of vision of buddhas. They manifest the total potential of the reality of all things, satisfying all beings. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of the family of all buddhas? 
Here the enlightening beings are born in the family of buddhas, born into the lineage of buddhas. They become accomplished in the methods of all buddha teaching and pure in the great vows of the buddhas of past, present, and future. Their roots of goodness become one with the roots of goodness of all buddhas, and they become one body with all buddhas. They go beyond the world by pure qualities. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of the array of lights of the manifestation of powers of buddhas? 
Here enlightening beings, within range of entry into the powers of buddhas, do not regress in their travels to buddha-lands, and do not backslide in their approach to the ocean of various virtues of enlightening beings. They are not frightened by the knowledge that all things are really illusory, and they know all worlds are like dreams. They effect the magical manifestation of all forms, like reflections, and they attain mastery of the miraculous effects of mystic knowledge, like emanations. 
They show their faces like shadows or reflected images in all states of being. 
They know all buddhas’ teachings are like echoes, and they attain supreme perfection of explanation of the principles of the reality realm, teaching through the use of various meanings and methods. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of consummation of contemplation of the ways to omniscience? 
Here the enlightening beings, like children, become established in the state of enlightening beings, where they contemplate the way to omniscience. In each medium of the way of knowledge they will travel for measureless eons defining the infinite realm of enlightening beings, and they become masters of all concentrations of enlightening beings, attaining supreme perfection. 
In each and every moment of awareness they appear in the presence of the buddhas in untold buddha-lands in the ten directions. They attain holistic concentration on differentiated objects, and show mastery of distinct knowledge of inseparable things. They enter the realm of no object in boundless objects. They enter the stage of endless definition of minute objects, and they know the immeasurable nature of things as small or large. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of manifestation of emanations throughout the universe? 
Here the enlightening beings set up variously arrayed buddha-lands everywhere in an instant of thought. They become perfectly expert in creating emanational beings, skilled in producing emanational buddhas, and expert in creating projections of the Teaching. Their sphere of action is the unobstructed cosmos of realities; they become able to produce manifestations of all kinds of bodies according to the mentalities of those they are dealing with, and arrive at the skill to guide unthinkable numbers of sentient beings. They show enlightenment through various practices, are skilled in accomplishing the unobstructed path of omniscience, and thereupon demonstrate the ability to turn the wheel of the Teaching. 
“What is enlightening beings’ birth as offspring of momentum going into the stage of the enlightened? 
Here enlightening beings are initiated into the realm of oneness of all buddhas of all times, and they enter into the perspective of continuity of all worlds. They know the continuous generation of mind of all beings in their past and future goings and comings. They know the continuum of action and knowledge of all enlightening beings, they know the continuum of enlightenment of all past, future, and present buddhas, and they know the continuum of skill in use of all the teachings. They know the continuum of all past, future, and present ages of formation and disintegration, as well as their names and features. 
They effect the knowledge underlying showing sentient beings the realm of awakening to the manifestation of enlightenment according to their development, at the appropriate times, and they show the continuity of the means of turning the wheel of teaching leading to realization of enlightenment applied by all buddhas who appear in the world, by skill in carrying out techniques of guiding endless numbers of beings. 
“These are enlightening beings’ ten births as enlightening beings, in which they are born, come into existence, form and develop, are fulfilled and completed; they magically produce offerings of adornments in a single array for awakening in all lands; they produce magical powers for endless eons to guide sentient beings ceaselessly; they awaken to the stream of the endless succession of teachings in the multifaceted succession of particularizations of the various objects of sense in the ocean of all actualities; they show the inconceivable majesty of buddhas throughout the space of the cosmos; they show the operation of the Teaching in the context of the immeasurable oceans of varieties of actions of sentient beings, to develop and guide and care for them; they cause all worlds never to be deprived of the presence of a buddha; they convey the multitudes of all teachings, the purity of the ocean of their innumerable utterances, in all objects of sense; having reached the state of unobstructed infinitude, they produce spheres of enlightening beings beautifully arrayed with all realities; they expound the infinitely various treasury of the Teaching, pursuant to infinite buddhahood, for the purpose of perfecting all beings, expounding it to all beings in accord with their mentalities.” Then Sutejomandalaratishri, goddess of the Lumbini grove, looking over the ten directions by the empowerment of Buddha, spoke these verses to Sudhana, shedding light on the meaning of the ten kinds of birth of enlightening beings: 
Those who tirelessly imbibe the Teaching, Contemplative and unattached, Equanimous in mind and body, pure as space, Attain the third peerless birth. 
Those who enter the ocean of great compassion With wills as firm as a diamond mountain, Plunging into the ocean of means of omniscience, Theirs is the fourth birth of the best of people. 
Those who carry out the oceans of pure transcendent ways, Suffusing all worlds with love, Developing beings by the lights of truth, Theirs is the fifth birth of great people. 
Knowing the nature of things, unhindered in mind, Born in the family of the peerless buddhas of all times, Those who enter the ocean of the reality realm Attain the sixth great birth of sages. 
Those whose spiritual body is pure and mind unattached, Who pervade all lands with their own bodies, And enter into all powers of buddhas, Attain the seventh inconceivable birth of the enlightened. 
Those who have mastered the ocean of knowledge, Contemplate the way to omniscience, And enter the ocean of all ways of concentration Attain the eighth birth of those abiding in Thusness. 
Those who purify spiritual realms, Engaged in perfection of all beings, And show the miraculous effects of buddhas, Attain the ninth birth of the great-minded. 
Those who enter the power of the conquerors, Developing the immense force of omniscience, With unhindered knowledge of the differentiation of the cosmos, Attain the tenth birth of the offspring of buddhas. 
“By these ten births enlightening beings are born in the family of buddhas and become light-makers for sentient beings. 
“Also, I have attained an enlightening liberation of vision of the birth of enlightening beings in all objects for incalculable eons.” Sudhana asked, “What is the scope of this liberation?” The goddess said, “I have perfected a vow to go to see all manifestations of birth of enlightening beings. 
“Then ten omens appeared in this Lumbini grove. 
What ten? 
The whole grove became level, without uneven terrain, without any pitfalls; this was the first omen to appear. 
Then the whole grove became clear of gravel and brambles, and the ground became diamond, strewn with jewels; this was the second omen to appear. 
Then the whole grove was adorned with rows of trees of all kinds of jewels; this was the third omen to appear. 
Then the whole grove was arrayed with adornments set on tree roots made of figurines of fragrant jewels, sending forth sprouts more fragrant than celestial perfumes, growing from mines of aromatic powders, producing multitudes of all kinds of banners and pennants; this was the fourth omen to appear. 
Then the whole grove was filled with all kinds of arrays of garlands of various celestial flowers; this was the fifth omen to appear. 
Then great treasuries of jewels opened up in all the trees in this grove; this was the sixth omen to appear. 
Then in all the lotus ponds in the grove, all kinds of jewel lotuses sprang up from the earth in bud and emerged on the surface of the water; this was the seventh omen to appear. 
Then the various beings of the realms of desire and the realm of form in this world all stood reverently here in this grove; this was the eighth omen to appear. 
Then the females of all the various kinds of beings came here joyfully with all kinds of offerings and bowed before the holy fig tree; this was the ninth omen to appear. 
Then lights called “lamp of the magical manifestations of birth of enlightening beings” emanating from the navels of all the buddhas of the ten directions appeared in this grove; and in all the beams of light, reflections of the magical manifestations of births of all the buddhas were seen, and the sounds of the voices of buddhas telling of the virtues of enlightening beings magically born were heard emanating from the light beams. 
This was the tenth omen to appear. 
These ten omens appeared when the time of the enlightening being Vairocana’s birth was near, and because of the appearance of these omens the thought occurred to all world leaders that the enlightening being would be born. And I, for my part, was flooded with inconceivable joy from seeing those omens. 
“Then, as Lady Maya went out of the city of Kapilavastu, ten omens of great light appeared in this Lumbini grove, by the appearance of which the fervor of joy of vision of the teaching of omniscience grew in countless beings. 
What were the ten? 
Light appeared in the chambers of all the jewel towers on the ground level; light appeared in the buds of all the fragrant flowers; light appeared in the blossoming buds of all the jewel lotuses, coming from all the petals, and sweet, agreeable sound flowed from them. 
Also, the light of the first inspiration of the enlightening beings of the ten directions appeared, illumining this Lumbini grove. 
Also, the mystical manifestation of light of the enlightening beings of the ten directions entering all the stages of enlightening beings appeared in this grove. 
Also the light of all enlightening beings’ knowledge of developmental disciplines appeared in this grove. 
Also the light of all enlightening beings’ attainment of knowledge of the principles of the reality realm appeared in this grove. 
Also the light of all enlightening beings’ attainment of knowledge of buddhas’ projected birth, leaving society, and realization of enlightenment appeared in this grove. 
These ten omens of light appeared, by which the darkness of the recesses of the minds of infinite enlightening beings were lit up. 
“Then, as Lady Maya leaned against the holy fig tree, all the world rulers, the gods and goddesses of the realm of desire, the gods and goddesses of the realm of form, and all the other beings who had gathered there to make offerings to the enlightening being were bathed in the glorious radiance of Maya’s body, and their arrays of offerings were also illumined thereby; and all the lights in the billion-world universe were eclipsed by Maya’s light. 
“Then everything in this universe was seen reflected in the abdomen of Lady Maya, and in all the worlds in the universe, at the foot of trees in groves in the capitals of the southern continents Lady Maya appeared just as she did in the Lumbini grove, surrounded by all the world leaders as she was about to give birth to the enlightening being, by the miracle of knowledge which gives birth to enlightening beings. 
This was the second miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“Then, from every one of Lady Maya’s pores came visions of how the Blessed One had served buddhas as he carried out enlightening practice in the past, and the teachings expounded by those buddhas were also heard in the buddhas’ voices coming from her pores. Just as the sun, moon, stars, planets, and thunderclouds are seen reflected in a lake, in a piece of gold, in a mirror, or in crystal-clear water, in the same way the past emanations of the buddhas, thundering with exposition of all the teachings, were seen in the pores of Lady Maya. 
This was the third miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“Then, from each of Maya’s pores appeared visions of all the universes, all the worlds, all the lands, and all the places the Blessed One had carried on enlightening practices, all the features of the lands, the means of salvation being taught, the names and numbers of the ages, the buddhas there, the pinnacles of purification, the life span of the beings of those ages, the enlightening being’s births in the worlds, the people he associated with, the spiritual benefactors he followed, the good practices he applied himself to, the principles he put into action, the buddha-lands in which he carried out enlightening practice, the bodies in which he performed enlightening practice and attained nonregression, and what his appearance, surroundings, and pleasant and painful experiences were in his successive lifetimes—all was seen in each of Maya’s pores. 
And all the bodies of the enlightening being were seen as a magical reflection in the pores of Lady Maya. This was the fourth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. “Then the physical forms, the means of subsistence, the pleasures and pains, and the life cycles through which the Blessed One performed enlightening practice in the past were all seen reflected in all the pores of Lady Maya’s body. This was the fifth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“Then the difficult sacrifices the Blessed One made in the course of his past enlightening practice, relinquishing everything inside and outside himself, the appearances of the enlightening being as a donor, the appearances of those who received his gifts, the gifts themselves, the circumstances of the giving, and the company of the enlightening being, were all seen reflected in the pores of Lady Maya. 
This was the sixth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. “Then manifestations of the lands, the groves, the raiment, the flowers and garlands, perfumes and incenses, banners, pennants, and parasols, all the precious adornments, and the sublime sounds of the music and singing of the times when all the buddhas of the past descended into their mother’s womb, appeared in this grove for all to see and hear. This was the seventh miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“Then all the furnishings of the enlightening being, surpassing those arraying the abodes of the celestial chiefs and the abodes of the chiefs of all other realms of being—diamond towers, diamond mansions, diamond nets, diamond statues, diamond ornaments, all the finest fragrances, and all kinds of beautiful objects—emerged from Lady Maya’s abdomen and arrayed this Lumbini grove. This was the eighth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“Then as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold millions of buddha-lands, all of the same appearance as the blessed Vairocana, adorned with similar marks and embellishments of greatness, with similar auras, emanating similar lights, with similar deportment, projecting similar radiance, with similar retinues, and similar adornments, emerged from Lady Maya’s abdomen first, extolling the myriad qualities of the Blessed One. 
This was the ninth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. “Then, when the time for the birth of the enlightening being had come, the diamond ground in front of Lady Maya split and a great jewel lotus called Calyx Arrayed with All Jewels emerged. Its calyx was unsurpassed diamond, surrounded by all the finest jewels in a dazzling array. 
It had as many petals as atoms in ten buddha-lands, all evenly arrayed, made of various jewels fringed with pure wish-fulfilling gems, lined with innumerable filaments the colors of all jewels, draped with nets of countless jewels, covered with heaps of indestructible diamonds, surrounded by celestial chiefs, sprinkled by showers from fragrant clouds by the water spirits, surrounded by the chief demigods clasping celestial flowers in their hands, with the chief celestial musicians appearing singing eulogies of the enlightening being’s past service of buddhas, the chief titans prostrating themselves in respect, freed of arrogance, pride, and conceit, the chief birds trailing jewel streamers, adorning the sky, the chief celestial choristers looking on joyfully singing songs encouraging the enlightening beings, the chief serpents showering adornments, proclaiming their joy. 
This was the tenth miracle attending the birth of the enlightening being in the Lumbini grove. 
“After these ten miracles had appeared, the enlightening being, manifesting an effusion of inconceivable, measureless light, emerged from Lady Maya’s abdomen, like the sun from the horizon, like lightning from the clouds, like the diffusion of the dawn from the mountains, like a great torch from the darkness. 
Thus did the enlightening being manifest emergence from the abdomen of Lady Maya, by the nature of manifestation of illusory form, by the nature of noncoming, by the nature of manifestation of appearance to the world without origin or extinction. 
“Thus did I perceive the oceans of miracles attending the birth of the Blessed Vairocana as I sojourned here in the Lumbini grove. 
And just as I perceived the oceans of miracles attending the birth of this Vairocana in this world, in the same way I perceived the oceans of miracles attending the birth of Vairocana Buddha in all worlds in this universe. And just as I perceived the billions of miracles attending the birth of Vairocana Buddha in all worlds in this universe, so also did I perceive, in each mental moment, with each penetration of consciousness, as many miracles attending the birth of Vairocana Buddha as atoms in a buddha-world, in the worlds within all the atoms in all universes accessible to knowledge penetrating the atoms in all buddha-lands. In the next moment I perceived, in each of the buddha-lands in the atoms of a thousand buddha-lands, an equal number of miracles attending the birth of the enlightening being. In this way, in each of the buddha-lands in the atoms of each buddha-land, I perceived all the miracles attending the birth of the enlightening being, without reaching their end. 
I did not reach the end of the succession of buddha-lands in each and every atom, or of the miracles attending the birth of the enlightening being in each and every one of those buddha-lands. 
And just as I perceived all the miracles attending the birth of the enlightening being in this world, so also did I perceive, in each moment of consciousness, all aspects of all the miracles attending the birth of the enlightening being in infinitely many worlds in the ten directions, by application of unceasing power.” Then Sudhana asked the goddess, “How long ago did you attain this enlightening liberation of vision of the miracle of birth of enlightening beings in all objects over incalculable eons?” She replied, “In the past, as many eons ago as atoms in ten million buddha-lands and even more, there was a buddha named Invincible Paragon of Virtue who emerged in a world called Ubiquitous Jewels in an age in which eighty decillion buddhas appeared. 
In that world there was a central group of four continents called Dazzling Array of Lights, in the southern continent of which was a capital city called Lofty Banner of Pure Adornments, where there was a king named Jewel Flame Eye Light, whose wife was named Queen of Joyous Light. 
Just as Maya is the mother of the Buddha Vairocana here, that queen was the mother of that buddha Invincible Paragon of Virtue in that world at that time, the first of the eighty decillion buddhas of the age. 
When the time for the birth of the enlightening being came, the queen went to a park called Circle of Lights of Golden Flowers, accompanied by twenty decillion women, and there gave birth to the child Invincible Paragon of Virtue, by the inconceivable miracle of the birth of an enlightening being. 
As soon as she took him into her hands, the nurse was flooded with great joy and attained an enlightening concentration called ‘sphere of the universal eye,’ by the attainment of which she saw countless buddhas in various worlds in the ten directions, and this enlightening liberation of vision of the miracle of birth of enlightening beings in all objects over countless ages subtly entered into her, just as the consciousness of the embryo enters the abdomen of the mother on the day of conception. 
By attaining this liberation, she accomplished the great vow to see the miracle of birth of all buddhas. 
And who do you think the twenty decillion women were? 
It was none other than Lady Maya here. 
From that time on I was never separated from the Blessed Vairocana, by entry into the ocean of miracles of his births as an enlightening being, and entry into the ocean of miraculous manifestations of his power to guide sentient beings, in every moment of awareness. 
“Furthermore, just as in this world I perceived the oceans of lands of Vairocana and the buddhas born of the ocean of the totality of great vows in every moment of thought in all atoms by the eye of knowledge penetrating all atoms, and perceived the ocean of manifestations of buddhas in those lands, and perceived the ocean of miracles of births of those buddhas as enlightening beings, in the same way, in every mental moment I perceived the oceans of miracles of births as enlightening beings of infinite buddhas in the ten directions. 
And just as in this universe, by successive penetration of all atoms, I perceived the buddha-qualities of complete perfect buddhas as they were being born as enlightening beings, in the same way I perceived oceans of lands in the atoms of untold decillions of buddha-lands in the ten directions, and perceived the vast oceans of buddhas therein, saw those buddhas as they were miraculously being born as enlightening beings, paid reverence to them as buddhas, listened to those buddhas’ teachings, and practice in accord with their teaching.” Then Sutejomandalaratishri, goddess of the Lumbini grove, elucidating this enlightening liberation of vision of the miracle of birth of enlightening beings over countless eons, looked over the ten directions by the power of Buddha and spoke these verses: 
Son of Buddha, listen respectfully To what I say to your question: The realm of buddhas, silent and hard to see, I explain in terms of cause. 
I remember unthinkable eons ago, past as many eons As atoms in a hundred million lands, An age in which there were Eight decillion buddhas. 
Invincible Paragon of Virtue Was the first of those buddhas; I saw him being born In the wonderful park of golden flowers. I was then his wet nurse, By the name of Light of Purity, wise; The world guardians put him in my arms When he was born, shining with golden light. 
Taking that supreme person in my arms, I could not see the top of his head; Looking at his inconceivable body, I could not see any bounds. 
Adorned by marks of greatness, pure, His body was beautiful to behold; Seeing him, like a jewel figurine, Incomparable joy welled up in me. 
Thinking of his measureless virtues, An infinite sea of felicity grew in me; And seeing his ocean of miracles, I was inspired to seek enlightenment. 
Seeking the oceans of qualities of buddhas, My ocean of vows grew; All lands were purified, And all paths of miserable states were closed. 
To serve the inconceivable buddhas To come in all lands, And to liberate suffering beings, My ocean of vows emerged. 
Hearing the teachings of those saviors, I attained this excellent sphere of liberation, Having carried out practice to purify enlightenment For as many eons as atoms in a hundred million lands. 
I served all the buddhas Who appeared over the ages, And remembered their teachings, Purifying this ocean of liberation. 
There were as many buddhas in the past As atoms in a hundred million lands; Remembering their cycles of teaching, I developed this sphere of liberation. 
Seeing all atoms In a buddha-land, In every atom I see oceans of lands Purified by the Buddha. 
In those lands I see Guides Being born in the best of groves, In an instant manifesting Inconceivable vast miracles. 
I see the leaders, in whatever land, Seeking supreme enlightenment, Living in heaven, or appearing to be born, In inconceivable decillions of lands. 
I see them being born with great miracles, In hundreds of oceans of lands, Attended by the best of women, Expounding the Teaching. 
I see as many buddhas as atoms in a hundred million In one moment of consciousness, Showing the world in many ways Tranquillity in an instant. 
I see all the births of buddhas, Looking into the oceans of lands in an atom; In life after life, in millions of bodies, I arrive at compassion in their service. 
In inconceivable oceans of lands, In the endless realms where they appeared, In all those worlds I appear before them And make the clouds of Teaching rain. 
Child of Buddha, I know This inconceivable, exalted liberation, Which could not be all seen Even in inconceivable decillions of eons. 
“I just know this enlightening liberation of vision of the miracles of birth of enlightening beings in all objects over countless ages—how can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings whose minds are the sources of all eons from moment to moment of consciousness, who manifest birth by meditation on all the principles of the Teaching, who are determined to serve all buddhas, who are intent on realizing all buddha-teachings, who are like reflections appearing to be born in all races, who are born spontaneously in lotus calyxes in the presence of all buddhas, who have higher knowledge of proper timing in developing all beings, who manifest miracles of birth oriented toward guiding all beings, who show multitudes of miracles in all lands, who are reflected in all conditions and classes and families of beings? 
“In the city of Kapilavastu lives a girl of the Shakya clan named Gopa. 
Go ask her how an enlightening being should live in the world for enlightening development.” Then Sudhana paid his respects and left the goddess of the Lumbini grove. 
Gopa Then Sudhana left the Lumbini goddess and went to the city of Kapilavastu; cultivating that enlightening liberation of vision of miracles of birth of enlightening beings in all objects over countless ages, entering into it, expanding it, practicing it, purifying it, mastering it, contemplating it, examining it, he made his way to the meeting hall of enlightening beings reflecting the cosmos. 
When he went there, a goddess of the enlightening beings’ meeting hall named Sorrowless, together with ten thousand house goddesses, appeared before Sudhana and said to him, “Welcome is the great person with wisdom, knowledge, and courage, who roams the grounds of the vast palace of reality intent on cultivating the inconceivable liberations of enlightening beings, in the presence of the city of truth, ceaselessly entering into the endless methods of enlightening beings, attaining manifestation of the ocean of virtues of those who realize Thusness, aiming for the knowledge of how to act and speak so as to mature all people, acting and speaking according to knowledge of the behavior of all people, mind oriented toward spiritual practice, committed to increasing the flood of the ocean of joy in the feelings of all beings, on the path of knowledge of the Teaching of all those who arrive at thusness. 
As I see you, with steady gaze on the pure realm of conduct of profound spiritual practice, before long you will attain perfection of the supreme ornaments of body, speech, and mind of the enlightened, and will act in the world with a body adorned with the marks and embellishments of greatness and a mind adorned with the light of knowledge of the ten powers. 
As I see your steadfast, energetic exertion, before long you will be furnished with all the requisites for manifesting your being in the presence of all buddhas of past, present, and future; receiving their teachings, experiencing the delight of the tranquil palace of spirituality, with all the meditations, liberations, concentrations, and attainments of enlightening beings, you will see into the profound liberation of buddhas. 
That is because you do not tire, do not regress, do not feel pain in going to spiritual benefactors, meeting them, associating with them, receiving instructions, and applying the ways to virtue; and you are not overcome by any interference or barrier or obstacle, or by any demon or deity. 
Therefore you will soon become a source of joy for all beings.” Then Sudhana said to the goddess Sorrowless, “May it be as you say—I would find supreme joy in extinguishing the burning of all beings’ afflictions, in stopping the development of their evil deeds, in making them all happy, in getting them to act impeccably. 
Whenever sentient beings are involved in evil deeds and afflictions, with scattered minds, fall into painful or pleasurable states, and experience various forms of physical and mental distress, enlightening beings become most unhappy at that. 
Just as a doting parent would love its only child and would be most distressed at seeing the child be dismembered, in the same way a practicing enlightening being is most unhappy to see people fallen into miserable states because of compulsion by afflictions in action. 
Whenever sentient beings live in felicity because of good thoughts, words, and deeds, and experience physical and mental pleasures in celestial and human realms, enlightening beings are delighted and become happy and joyful. 
“Furthermore, enlightening beings do not seek omniscience for their own sake, nor to produce mundane enjoyments and pleasures, nor in search of the various enjoyments of the realm of desire, nor under the compulsion of errors of conception, thought, and view. They live and work in the world without being controlled by fetters, bonds, propensities, or obsessions, without being controlled by craving or views, without their minds being bound up in ideas of mundane enjoyments, without being taken with the taste of pleasure of meditation, without being blocked by mental barriers. 
“Furthermore, enlightening beings, giving rise to great compassion for sentient beings suffering immeasurable miseries in the ocean of existence, undertake a great vow to care for all beings. 
They appear carrying out the practice of enlightening beings in the mundane whirl, engaged in the development and guidance of sentient beings, by the force of the power of carrying out the vow of great compassion. 
They undertake a vow to serve all buddhas in quest of thoroughly unobstructed omniscience for all sentient beings. By mastery of the vow to serve buddhas, they do not tire in enlightening practice. While they carry on enlightening practice, seeing defiled lands they undertake a vow to purify all buddha-lands. While purifying oceans of lands, observing the variety of beings’ states, they undertake a vow to purify the undifferentiated supreme reality body. 
“Thus enlightening beings are indefatigable in carrying out the infinitely various practice of enlightening beings. Practicing in this way, they become ornaments of heaven and earth, by producing human and celestial welfare. 
They become parents, because they bring enlightening beings into existence. 
They become nurses, leading into the path of enlightening beings. 
They become guardian spirits, giving protection from the danger of falling into bad ways. 
They become great mariners, ferrying beings across the ocean of the mundane whirl. 
They become refuges, eliminating the dangers of all demons and afflictions. 
They become resorts, leading to the ultimate state of coolness. 
They become landings leading into the ocean of enlightenment. 
They become guides, leading to the island of spiritual jewels. 
They become flowers, their minds blooming with the virtues of all buddhas. 
They become adornments, radiating the light of great virtue and knowledge. 
They become sources of supreme joy, pleasing in all ways. 
They become worth visiting, because they act impeccably. 
They become universally good, perfecting themselves in all respects. 
They become light-makers, emanating light beams of knowledge. They become illuminators, holding the lamp of truth. 
They become clouds, showering the Teaching on all beings. 
Thus do enlightening beings become a joy to all living creatures as they carry out enlightening practice.” Then Sorrowless, goddess of the hall of assembly of enlightening beings, with those ten thousand house goddesses, showered Sudhana with a rain of mentally created flower garlands, aromatic powders, perfumes, and jewelry, all superior to those in the heavens; then, surrounding him, they sang these verses in his praise as he entered the abode of enlightening beings: 
Hard to get to see Even in millions of eons, You are a sun of knowledge For the world in the darkness of ignorance. 
Seeing the world in error, Shrouded in the darkness of nescience, Conceiving great compassion You’ve set out for independence. 
With pure intention you seek The enlightenment of buddhas; You serve spiritual benefactors Without concern for yourself. 
You are not attached to the world, You are independent and aloof; You do not dwell in the defilement of the world, Your mind is free as the sky. 
You practice lofty deeds of enlightenment, Beautiful light of virtues; You appear in the world Radiating lights of knowledge. 
You do not leave the world, Nor are you stained by worldly things; You traverse the world unattached, Like the wind through the sky. 
Just as the holocaust Burns constantly, With energy like fire You carry on enlightening practice. 
Lionlike, great hero, Progressing boldly with steadfast vigor, Imbued with the power of knowledge, You practice undaunted. 
All the oceans Of principles in the cosmos You will enter, O Hero, By serving true benefactors. 
Then the goddess Sorrowless, having eulogized Sudhana, followed him as he went on, bound to him by love for truth. Sudhana went into the meeting hall of enlightening beings which shone with reflections of the cosmos and looked around, desirous of seeing the Shakyan girl Gopa. 
He saw her in the middle of the hall sitting on a seat of jewels which reflected the abodes of all enlightening beings, surrounded by eighty-four thousand maidens, all of royal lineage, who had equally established good foundations of the practice of enlightening beings, who had been won over by her generosity in the past, who practiced gentle, pleasing speech, who were taken with the happiness of approaching the goal of omniscience, who were thoroughly absorbed in the common purpose of complete knowledge of buddhas and enlightening beings, who were sustained by the loving care guided by great compassion, who had purified great kindness, who had already developed the inconceivable skill in means of enlightening beings. 
All of those eighty-four thousand women were irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment; they had comprehended enlightening beings’ means of transcendence, and needed no one’s guidance in the studies of enlightening beings. Their minds were free from all attachments and aloof of all mundane pleasures. They had cleared the way to the unobstructed cosmos and their minds were rapidly approaching omniscience. 
They were free from the web of all obstacles and barriers, and transcended all attachments. 
They had developed tremendous energy in powers of enlightening beings, and the light of their minds was as a sun of knowledge. 
Then Sudhana went up to Gopa, paid his respects, and said, “I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how enlightening beings act in the midst of the mundane whirl without being stained by its ills; how they realize the equal essence of all phenomena without staying in the stage of personal liberation alone; how they manifest the qualities of buddhas without stopping the practice of enlightening beings; how they remain in the stage of enlightening beings yet show the sphere of all buddhas; how they transcend all worldly states yet act in the midst of worldly states; how they achieve the reality-body yet produce endless physical manifestations; how they resort to the formless reality-body yet manifest bodies like all beings; how they comprehend all the inexpressible truths, yet expound the truths to sentient beings in all languages; how they know there are no beings in the elements of existence, yet do not give up efforts to guide all beings; how they realize all phenomena are unoriginated and unperishing, yet do not give up the effort to serve all buddhas; how they realize there are no results of action in phenomena, yet do not give up the effort to perform good deeds.” Gopa said to Sudhana, “It is very good that you think it fit to ask about the nature of this kind of practice of enlightening beings, as this is the question of one who is set on practicing the vow of universal good. 
So listen well and think carefully, for I will tell you, by the power of Buddha. 
“There are ten things by which enlightening beings fulfill this kind of enlightening practice, the light of total knowledge, like the cosmic net of interrelation of all things. 
What are the ten? 
Association with superior spiritual friends; attainment of enormous devotion; purity of lofty good will; a state of mind founded on oceanic virtue and knowledge; listening to the great teaching of buddhas; associating with thought devoted to the buddhas of past, present, and future; equally following the practices of all enlightening beings; gaining the empowerment of all buddhas; purity of intent, greatly compassionate in nature; attainment of the basic power of mind to stop all vicious circles. 
Having attained these ten things, enlightening beings fulfill this kind of enlightening practice, like the cosmic net of interrelation of all things, radiating total knowledge. 
“Then enlightening beings with unrelenting vigor, having attained these things, developing and expanding them by putting them into practice in endless ways, propitiate spiritual benefactors in ten ways: 
by indifference to themselves, by not seeking worldly goods, by realizing the equality of essence of all things, by not turning back from the commitment to omniscience, by observing all the principles of the cosmos, by being mentally free of all existents, by independence in the space of truth where there is nothing to depend on, by freedom from obstruction in the undertaking of all enlightening beings, by entering all lands, by perfect clarification and purification of the unobstructed sphere of knowledge of enlightening beings.” Then, by the empowerment of Buddha, looking over the ten directions, Gopa uttered these verses illustrating what she meant: 
Those who set out for vast pure wisdom for the welfare of others And serve true benefactors honestly With tireless vigor, seeing them as teachers, Carry out practice in the world like the cosmic net. 
Those whose devotion is vast as the sky, Embracing all worlds of past, present, and future, All lands, beings, phenomena, and buddhas— Theirs is this practice, producers of the light of knowledge. 
When the will is infinite as the sky, Supremely pure, free from the taint of afflictions, Therein arise the virtues of all buddhas, Concentrating the whole variety of the cosmic net of practice. 
The wise who rest on great oceans of virtue, Inconceivable, infinite, vast as omniscience, As pure offspring of the body of all virtues They act in the world unstained by the filth of the world. 
Those who listen to the teaching of buddhas And tirelessly catch every nuance Are lamps shining with wisdom in accord with truth; Theirs is this practice which lights the world. 
Those who perceive in an instant of awareness The infinite buddhas everywhere, interrelated, Contemplate the ocean of all buddhas; This is the way into the mind of the enlightened. 
Those who see the vast audiences of the buddhas Enter the ocean of their meditations And their infinite ocean of vows; This is the practice of those like the cosmic net. 
Those empowered by all the buddhas Practice universal good for endless ages, Reflected in all lands; This is the practice of the lights of truth. 
The suns of compassion and knowledge emerge, steadfast, Seeing the misfortune of the world, And disperse the darkness of delusion with the light of truth; This is the practice of those like the sun. 
Seeing people revolve in the rut of existence, The wise stand opposed to the flow of the mundane whirl; Developing the measureless wheel of true teaching, They practice universal higher goodness and wisdom. 
Suffusing the world with myriad expressions of love, Showing spiritual practice to people of various interests, Teaching them according to their mentalities, The steadfast lead billions to enlightenment. 
Then Gopa said to Sudhana, “I have attained an enlightening liberation whose sphere is observation of the ocean of concentrations of all enlightening beings.” Sudhana asked, “What is the scope of this liberation?” Gopa replied, “Having attained this liberation, I penetrate as many ages in this world as atoms in untold buddha-lands, and I know all the beings in all conditions of existence therein, and I know all the deaths and births of those beings, their developments, their accomplishments, the variety of results of their actions; I know their undertakings—good, bad, liberative, nonliberative, certain, uncertain, wrongly fixated, compulsive, noncompulsive, based on good, not based on good, fostered by good, fostered by evil, fostered by good and evil, good by development, bad through neglect. 
“I know the oceans of names of all the buddhas in those ages as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands; I know the oceans of initial inspirations of those buddhas, the ways they set out for omniscience, their undertakings of the oceans of all vows, their heading for previous buddhas, their oceans of efforts in the service of previous buddhas, their oceans of fulfillment of past enlightening practices, their oceans of arrangements of means of emancipation. 
I also know the oceans of those buddhas’ development and guidance of sentient beings, and I know their oceans of attainment of enlightenment, their majestic displays of mystic power in turning the wheel of the teaching, and their oceans of miraculous displays of all buddhas. 
I also know the differences in the audiences of those buddhas, and I know the methods of emancipation of the listeners in those audiences, as well as their past roots of goodness, the variety of their cultivation of the path, and the difference in the purity of their attainment of knowledge. 
I also know the sentient beings who have been led to individual enlightenment by those buddhas, and I know the past roots of goodness of those individual illuminates, as well as their attainments of individual enlightenment, the doors of liberation mystically developing in their peaceful states, their various spiritual transformations, their development of others, their teachings, and the various freedoms of liberation in their infinite states of concentration. 
I also know the ultimate extinction of those buddhas. “I also know the oceans of enlightening beings surrounding those buddhas, and I know those enlightening beings’ first cultivation of roots of goodness, their first inspirations and vows, the variety of their vows, the variety of their production of arrangements of vehicles of emancipation by all the practices of enlightening beings, the variety of their perfection of provisions for the path of transcendence, the variety of the manifestations of their practices of the path of enlightening beings, the variety of their provisions for advancing through the states of enlightening beings, the variety of the speed of their advance through the states of enlightening beings, the variety of their spheres of concentration in the stages of enlightening beings, the spiritual manifestations of their advance through the states of enlightening beings, their spiritual states during their progress through the states of enlightening beings, their footholds in the stages of enlightening beings, their practices cultivating the states of enlightening beings, their methods of purifying the stages of enlightening beings, their abodes in the stages of enlightening beings, their characteristics in the stages of enlightening beings, their mastery of the stages of enlightening beings, their science of entry into the stages of enlightening beings, the enlightening beings’ science of salvation, the enlightening beings’ science of development, the different states of enlightening beings, the mystic projections of enlightening beings’ practices, the oceans of concentrations of enlightening beings, the oceans of methods of liberation of enlightening beings. I also know those enlightening beings’ attainments of oceans of various concentrations in each moment of consciousness, their discoveries of the range of omniscience, their tremendous flashes of omniscience, their means of attainment of the forbearance of enlightening beings, their plunges into omniscience. 
I also know those enlightening beings’ travels to oceans of lands, their penetrations of the principles of oceans of phenomena, the variety of characteristics of all things, the mystic projection of the designs of all states of enlightening beings, the oceans of principles of various vows, and the variety of oceans of miracles. 
“Just as I penetrate the various oceans of ages past in this world, in the same way I know the endless unbroken succession of ages of the future; and just as I know all this in this world, so do I know it in all the worlds within this world. And just as I know this in all the worlds within this world, so do I know it in all the worlds in the atoms of this world. And just as I know it in all the worlds in the atoms of this world, so do I know it in the worlds in the ten directions contiguous with this world. And just as I know it in the worlds in the ten directions contiguous with this world, so do I know it in all the worlds in the ten directions surrounding this world. 
And just as I know it in all the worlds in the ten directions surrounding this world, so do I know it in all the worlds in the radiant world system of Vairocana. 
And just as I know it in all the worlds in the radiant world system of Vairocana, I know it in all the worlds surrounding the radiant world system of Vairocana. 
And just as I know it in all the worlds surrounding the radiant world system of Vairocana, I know it in all the places in the worlds in the oceans of worlds in the masses of worlds in this whole flower treasury universe, and in all the structures and features of the worlds. 
“And just as I comprehend, know, and realize the oceans of enlightening practice of Vairocana Buddha in this whole cosmos, so also do I comprehend, know, and realize the indivisible oceans of enlightening practice of all buddhas in all oceans of worlds throughout the cosmoses throughout all space. 
In that world was an age called Superior Conduct. 
In the middle of that world was a set of four continents called Safe. On the southern continent was a metropolis called Magnificent Trees, the greatest of eighty-four billion cities. 
The grounds of the cities were like jeweled checkerboards, the plots evenly divided by arrays of various jewels. 
He had eighty-four thousand women in his palace. He also had five hundred ministers, and also five hundred sons, all of whom were brave, powerful warriors, handsome and well built. 
His queen, the foremost of the eighty-four thousand women, was named Lotus Born. 
“Once, as a youth, this prince went, with the permission of his father and mother, to go see one of the parks of the city, called Clouds of Light on a Mountain of Fragrant Plants. He went together with twenty thousand girls, projecting a great aura of felicity, glory, energy, splendor, and beauty, admired by men and women all around. They got into a golden vehicle with four huge diamond wheels and unbreakable diamond axles set in the finest sandalwood. It was ribbed with well-arranged diamonds of all fragrances, splendidly adorned with flowers of all jewels, draped with nets of all jewels, with a lion seat set in the middle of the interior, arrayed with great jewels. 
Rows of jewel buildings were arrayed on either side. “In some of those buildings were precious vessels filled with various jewels, to be given to those in need. In some buildings were all kinds of precious ornaments, for those in need of ornaments. 
“At that time there was a courtesan named Beautiful in that metropolis, with whom the king consorted. 
She had a lovely daughter named Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct, who was neither too tall nor too short, neither too stout nor too lean, neither too heavy nor too light. She had black hair and eyes, a pleasant face, and a clear voice. She spoke sweetly and kindly, she was wise, versed in all arts and sciences, clever and diligent, dignified and serene, kind-hearted and gentle, always pleasant to be with. She had scarcely any desire, aversion, or folly; she was modest and conscientious, soft and sincere, free from guile and deceit, self-controlled. 
She and her mother, accompanied by many girls, got in a jeweled chariot and rode out of the city before the prince Lord of Glory. Looking for the prince, going according to the king’s directions, when she saw the prince she became greatly enamored of him. 
Bound by the excessive affection she conceived for the prince, unable to control herself, she said to her mother, ‘If you do not give me to the prince Lord of Glory, I will die or suffer torment equal to death.’ Her mother said, ‘Do not think this way. 
This prince has the marks of a supreme ruler, and it is obvious that after his father passes away he will succeed to the throne and become king. At that time a special woman will appear from the sky. Furthermore, we prostitutes give pleasure to everyone; we do not serve one person all our lives as a rule. We have set out to attend the prince Lord of Glory at the command of the king Lord of Wealth. 
Do not hold fast to this wish of yours, for it is unattainable.’ “Now, at that time a buddha named Supreme Sun was appearing in the world, a saint, perfectly enlightened, complete in knowledge and conduct, gone to felicity, supreme knower of the world, tamer of humans, teacher of celestials and humans, awake, blessed. 
“The girl, who was reclining in the chariot, saw that buddha in a dream. When she awoke, a goddess who had been a relative in a past life told her that the buddha was in the park, in his first week of enlightenment, surrounded by a group of enlightening beings, before a crowd of all kinds of spirits, and that all the deities of earth, space, water, fire, wind, oceans, rivers, mountains, night, dawn, forests, trees, plants, grain, cities, foot tracks, sanctuaries, bodies of light, habitations, the sky, and all directions had gathered to see the buddha Supreme Sun. “Emboldened by seeing the buddha and hearing of the buddha’s virtues, finding a favorable opportunity, the girl then spoke these verses before the prince: I am known in the world for beauty, Renowned everywhere for virtues. 
None compares to me in the power of knowledge; I know all arts, amusements, and magic. 
I have neither anger nor hatred; I delight in the welfare of all. 
When I saw you, young man, excellent In form and strength, endowed with virtue, All my senses were delighted, And immense joy arose in me. 
Your complexion is like a pure shining jewel, Your hair is black and curly, You have a fine brow and nose; I offer myself to you. You have excellent features. Resplendent, you are like a mountain of gold. 
In your presence I do not shine; I am like a pile of charcoal. 
Your eyes are large and dark, Your jaw is like a lion’s, your face like the full moon. The fine sound of your voice is irresistible; Please take me in. 
Your tongue is long and broad, Coppery red, soft, shining like a jewel; With your superb, clear voice You delight people when you speak. 
Your teeth are even, shining white, Clean and well spaced; When you show them as you smile, You delight people, O hero. 
Your body has the thirty-two marks Of greatness, brilliantly shining, pure. Adorned with them, you will become A sovereign ruler of men. “Then the prince Lord of Glory said to the maid Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct, ‘Whose daughter are you, whose ward? 
I cannot make another’s ward my own.’ Then he spoke these verses: O lovely one, endowed with beauty of form, With fine features and a pure body, I ask you to tell me this— Whose ward are you? Have you father or mother, Brother, husband, or master, Or someone else who thinks of you As his, treating you kindly? 
I hope you are not vicious, Do not steal, Are not promiscuous, And do not lie. 
I hope you do not cause discord, Do not slander others, Do not covet others’ goods, And are not hostile toward anyone. 
May you not stand on the wasteland of views; Let your intelligence not be taken away by habits; May you not exert bad influence on people By guile or deceit. 
Do you love and respect your parents, Relatives, friends, and elders? Does your heart reach out To give to the poor to help them? 
Are you well disposed toward spiritual benefactors Who tell you about religion at the appropriate time? 
Do you respect the buddhas And love the enlightening beings? 
Do you know the supreme Teaching From which the enlightening beings are born? 
Are you kind To the helpless and lost? Are you really compassionate Toward evildoers? 
Are you indifferent, by the power of wisdom, To those who annoy you for no reason? 
Seeing people in the slumber of ignorance, Do you firmly seek supreme enlightenment? Would you not weary of endless ages Of spiritual practice? “Then the supreme courtesan Beautiful, mother of the maid Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct, said to the prince Lord of Glory, ‘This daughter of mine, who was spontaneously born from within a lotus, has never before gone out of the house.’ Then she spoke these verses: Listen to what I say, O prince, About my daughter, of whom you ask. 
I will tell you of her birth And how she grew up. On the very same morn as your birth, My daughter too was born, Generated spontaneously in the calyx of an undefiled lotus, All her limbs complete, with nice big eyes. 
In springtime, the best of seasons, When the crops and herbs are growing, In my beautiful grove of sal trees I utterly forgot myself. 
I was with eight hundred girls, Adorned with garlands of flowers, Wearing various precious cloths, Well versed in song and speech. 
I sat on the bank of a pond Filled with lotuses of various scents; The area around, strewn with flowers, Was filled by those well-cultivated girls. 
In the middle of the water appeared A supremely fine lotus with a thousand petals; Its stem was lapis lazuli, its petals were diamond, Its pericarp was pure gold. 
It had a multitude of stamens of the finest fragrant jewels And had a brilliant golden sheen: The people were confused— How could the sun rise at night? Then, the night ended, from the rising sun, Stimulating with its glow, There emanated light and sweet sounds, Foretelling the birth of this girl. 
Then this precious girl appeared in the human world, Pure in the best of conduct. No deed is lost to the doer; she was the fruition Of good actions in the past. 
With dark hair, lotus-blue eyes, A clear voice and golden complexion, Finely clad in garlands, she emerged From the lotus, resplendent as pure light. 
Her limbs are bright, her body evenly balanced; Her limbs are complete, her body well proportioned: She shines like a golden statue adorned with jewels, Illumining all directions. 
The finest fragrance of sandalwood wafts from her body, Filling the air around her; As she speaks, with celestial sweetness, A scent like blue lotus comes from her mouth. 
Whenever she smiles, Heavenly music plays; This treasure of a woman should not be abandoned To the control of the vulgar. 
She has perfect knowledge of calculation, Writing, symbology, and technical literature; She has mastered all the arts and crafts In the whole world. 
All her limbs are like pure jewels; She radiates an aura of light. Adorned by the virtues she has accomplished, She is fit to be your companion. 
She knows the cause of all illnesses That afflict living beings, And she is able to cure them By correct use of medicines. 
She has mastered all the different languages Of the people on the continent And the variety of customary usages Of society everywhere. 
She knows the articulation of sounds And the means of differentiation among them, And she is expert in all The songs and dances in the world. 
She is not jealous or envious, She is not lustful or ill-tempered; She is taciturn, honest, and gentle, Free from anger and harshness, very intelligent. 
She is diligent, well behaved, not argumentative, Always obedient to the worthy; She is respectful, seeking to do whatever is good. 
She will do as you ask. She is always compassionate toward the elderly, Toward the sick and the poor, Toward the suffering, the blind, And toward the helpless. 
She is always thinking of the welfare of others, And never thinks of benefit for herself; Seeking the welfare of the whole world, She is adorned with superior virtues of mind. 
This virtuous one shines in all ways, And is always loved by people; None would tire of looking at her, But she has no attachment to the world. 
Ever-adorned with her own virtues, She has no enemies at all; She has no peer in knowledge. 
“Then the prince, having entered the park, said to the maid in the presence of her mother, ‘I have set out for supreme perfect enlightenment, whereby I may gather the infinite stores of omniscience, cultivate the practice of enlightening beings for infinite eons and perfect all the transcendent ways, serve the buddhas for endless eons, uphold the teaching of all buddhas, purify all buddha-lands, perpetuate the lineages of all buddhas, develop all groups of sentient beings to maturity, stop the pains of the mundane whirl for all sentient beings, lead sentient beings to ultimate bliss, clarify the eye of knowledge in all sentient beings, strive for the attainments of all buddhas and enlightening beings, abide in the equanimity of all enlightening beings, accomplish all the stages of enlightening beings, purify all sentient beings, cultivate total giving to put an end to poverty for all sentient beings, practice transcendent giving for endless eons and satisfy all sentient beings with gifts of food and drink, and satisfy all beggars by giving away all goods. 
You will hinder my giving, you will become unhappy at the relinquishment of beloved children, you will feel much physical and mental pain, you will resent my determination to give up everything. When I cut off my limbs to give them to beggars, you will be pained and grieved. And there will come a time when I leave you to go forth into the tutelage of a buddha; at that time you will be unhappy.’ Then the prince spoke these verses to the maid: I am going to fulfill the immeasurable ocean Of provisions for perfect enlightenment; Therefore, with compassion for all, I have set forth forever for enlightenment. 
For infinite eons, measureless as air, I will purify my vow; For endless eons I will perform the preparations Of the initial stage of the buddhas. 
I will learn the paths of transcendence From the buddhas of past, present, and future And perfect the path of supreme enlightenment By the great means of unexcelled knowledge. 
I will purify all Defiled lands everywhere; I will remove all difficulties And evil ways from all worlds. 
I will purify all beings Who are wrapped up in afflictions, blind with delusion; Developing them by various means, I will bring them into the path of omniscience. 
I will accomplish the unobstructed stages And serve the buddhas for myriad eons; Generating kindness toward the world, I will give all gifts. 
I will give away my prized possessions, Even my children, yet I want you; Hear my aim and if you do not despair, All shall be as you wish. 
I will behave as you wish. I will exert myself properly and act in harmony with you.” Then she spoke these verses to the prince: Even if my body should be burnt to death In the fires of hell, I would endure it for myriad lifetimes As your companion in practice. 
Even if life after life for endless lives My body were cut asunder, I would endure it with a steadfast mind If you were my husband. 
Even if the mountains should crush My head for endless ages, I would endure it unfazed If you became my husband. 
In infinite lifetimes you may cut off Your own limbs and give them to others; Lead me to control of my thoughts And make me firm in my duty. 
I give you my body completely, O prince of men; Performing spiritual practice for myriad ages, Give me to whoever wants me, and I will be happy. 
You have set out for supreme enlightenment, With infinite compassion for beings; Having taken all beings into your care, Take me in too with compassion. 
It is not for enjoyment Or wealth or sensual pleasure That I want you, best of men, for my husband, But to share the same spiritual practice. 
You look upon all beings With clear eyes and kind heart; Being compassionate with undefiled mind, You will surely become a king of sages. 
As you walk along, a jewellike glow From your footsteps remains on the earth, pure; Endowed with the marks of greatness, You will surely become a sovereign king in the human world. 
In a dream I saw the enlightenment site Illumined by clouds of true teaching in this kingdom; With the buddha sitting at the foot of the best of trees, In the company of many enlightening beings. 
That exalted buddha Supreme Sun Is like a mountain of finest rose gold; In my dream he patted my head, And I awoke then, full of joy. 
A pure-bodied goddess named Light of Delight, Who had been a companion in the past, Told me the buddha was here, Staying at the supreme site of enlightenment. 
I had been thinking before that I wanted To see the prince Lord of Glory, And I was told by the goddess I would see the prince soon. 
Now I have seen the buddha in a dream, And have seen you, the perfect man; My wish is fulfilled, and I am happy; With you now I will honor that supreme sage. “Then the prince, having heard the name of the buddha Supreme Sun and having thus gotten the opportunity to see the buddha, became very joyful; he showered the maid Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct with five hundred jewels, gave her a shining crown of jewels, and covered her with a precious robe the color of fire blazing with jewels. And she, thus honored, neither rejoiced nor wept, nor did anything but gaze steadily at the prince with palms joined in respect. 
“Then the prominent courtesan Beautiful spoke these verses to the prince: For a long dark time I have wished To give this girl to you; Now this beautiful maiden Of virtue and quality is yours. 
There is no girl in the world Equal to her, much less superior; By virtue of her conduct, intellect, and other qualities, She is the best of women in the world. 
Born of a lotus, there is no question of her class; She cannot be called impure. Her mind is free from the taint of all faults; She is capable of sharing your practice. 
Her limbs are extremely soft, Conveying the finest pleasures of touch; The sick are instantly cured By her touch. 
The pure fragrance of her body Excels all the finest perfumes; All men who smell it Become pure in conduct. 
Her body shines like gold, Undefiled like a lotus; Angry and cruel people Become kind when they have seen her. 
She speaks kindly, sweetly, pleasantly, A delight to people who hear; When they have heard her, the darkness of evil disperses, And none wants to do anything bad. 
Her mind is pure, her heart untainted; There is no guile at all in her. What she says is just what she thinks, And thus she makes people happy. 
She does not fool anyone by deceit, Nor does she lead people on for gain; She is modest and discreet, Always respectful to old and young. 
She is not fascinated by class Or looks or followers. She has no conceit or arrogance; She is always humble toward all. “Then the prince and the maid, with her retinue of twenty thousand girls, left the park and went to the site of enlightenment where the buddha was, to see, pay respects to, make offerings to, and attend the buddha. Going by vehicle as far as the vehicle would go, the prince got off the vehicle and approached the buddha on foot; even at a distance he saw that the buddha was serene, a sight to behold, senses tranquil, mind quiet, senses under control, like a tame elephant, his heart like a clear, still pond. 
With his mind full of great joy, energy, serenity, and rapture, he paid his respects to the buddha, and together with his whole company, including the young woman, covered the buddha with five hundred thousand great jewel lotuses, and made five hundred sanctuaries of jewels for the buddha and adorned each one with five hundred thousand diamonds. 
“Then the buddha, knowing the prince’s strong determination, expounded a scripture called Lamp at the Door of the Universal Eye, upon hearing which the prince attained ten oceans of concentrations absorbed in all principles of the Teaching: he attained ways of concentration such as those called ‘light produced from the oceans of vows of all buddhas,’ ‘path of illumination of past, present, and future,’ ‘going forth into the circle of all buddhas,’ ‘entry into the highest range of awareness of all beings,’ ‘attainment of the scope of knowledge of the causes that produce all worlds,’ ‘lamp illumining the oceans of faculties of all beings,’ ‘cloud of knowledge to save all beings,’ ‘lamp leading to the development and emancipation of all beings,’ ‘communicating the cycles of teaching of all buddhas,’ and ‘multitude of undertakings to purify the practices of universal good.’ Beginning with these, the prince attained ten oceans of concentrations absorbed in all the principles of the Teaching. The young woman attained a meditation called ‘filled with an ocean of invincible knowledge’ and became irreversible in progress toward supreme perfect enlightenment. “Then the prince, paying respects to the buddha, left the presence of the buddha with the young woman and the rest of the company and went to his father, the king, in the city. 
Greeting the king respectfully, he informed him that the buddha Supreme Sun had appeared in the world and was staying in the king’s realm, having recently attained enlightenment. 
The king then asked the prince who had told him so, and he replied that it had been the young woman Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct. “Then the king, hearing of the emergence of the buddha, felt that he had gained a great treasure, felt that he had found the rare jewel of Buddha; he considered the sight of a buddha to be the end of the danger of falling into evil ways; he felt he had found a great physician who could heal all afflictions. He thought of the buddha as a liberator from all the sufferings of the mundane whirl, as one who leads to ultimate peace and felicity, as one who reveals the unobscured light of knowledge. 
He thought of the buddha as the appearance of a great torch dispelling the darkness of ignorance, and felt that he had found a spiritual guide for a world with no guide, thinking of the buddha as a leader to omniscience for the leaderless. 
“Hearing of the emergence of the buddha with great joy, the king Lord of Wealth gathered together all the warriors, priests, townspeople, ministers, family priests, princes, and governors, as well as the gatekeepers and courtiers, and abdicated the throne in favor of his son Lord of Glory, who had brought the joyous news of the appearance of the buddha. 
Then, having crowned the prince as king, he went together with ten thousand people to the buddha, paid his respects, and sat with his retinue before the buddha. “Then the buddha, looking at the king and the whole assembly, emitted a light from the curl of hair between his brows, a light called ‘lamp of the minds of all beings,’ which illumined all worlds in the ten directions, then stopped in front of all the world leaders, displayed inconceivable buddha-projections, clarified the minds of those beings who could be taught by the buddha, and then, by the inconceivable mastery of Buddha, by means of embodiment of Buddha appearing in all worlds, speaking all languages in the voice of Buddha, expounded a medium of mental command called ‘unshaded lamp of meaning of all things,’ which was accompanied by as many media of mental command as atoms in a buddha-land. 
The king Lord of Wealth, hearing of this medium of mental command, gained an immense spiritual perspective on all things. As many enlightening beings there as atoms in the continent attained the mental command of the unshaded lamp of meaning of all things. Sixty million people, freed from contaminations, were mentally liberated. Ten thousand people became dispassionate and untainted, and their objective vision of things was clarified. 
Infinitely many beings in the ten directions, by seeing the inconceivable mystic displays projected by the buddha, reached liberation by way of the Three Vehicles. “The king Lord of Wealth, having gained great illumination from the Teaching, thought, ‘I cannot apply myself assiduously to such a teaching or accomplish such knowledge while living at home; let me leave home to be with the buddha.’ Then he told the buddha he wanted to receive the precepts from the buddha and leave home to become a mendicant. The buddha assented to this. “So then the king and ten thousand of his people left home to follow the buddha. 
He also attained ten mystic knowledges of enlightening beings and plunged into infinite oceans of analytic knowledge. He also attained a purity of body called ‘unhindered sphere of action’ in going to see the buddhas of the ten directions. He received the teaching of the buddha, preserved it, and preached it, having become a great spiritual preacher and a practitioner of the teaching. By the power of attainment of mystic knowledge, he pervaded the whole world, appearing to people according to their mentalities, telling them of the emergence of the buddha, illuminating the nature that produces all buddhas, explaining the accomplishment of the past practices of the buddha, praising the miraculous power of the buddha, supporting the buddha’s teaching. 
“As for the new king, the son of Lord of Wealth, on that very day, the time of the full moon, he obtained the seven treasures of kingship. 
As he was sitting in the upper palace surrounded by a group of women, there appeared a great disc called ‘unobstructed momentum,’ adorned with a hundred thousand jewels, made of gold, shining all over, perfectly formed. 
There also appeared a great elephant named Diamond Mountain Blaze. 
There also appeared a horse named Swift As the Wind in the Mountains. 
There also appeared a great jewel called ‘supreme cluster of sunlight.’ There also appeared the young woman Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct, to be his treasure of a wife. 
There also appeared a treasurer named Mass of Abundant Wealth. 
There also appeared a military leader, the seventh treasure, called Untainted Eye. 
Endowed with these seven treasures, he became king, sovereign, ruler of the four continents, just, commander of the law, victorious, with the power and vigor of the people. 
He also had a full thousand sons, strong and valiant, destroyers of enemy armies. 
Under his just rule the earth was free from war, free from evil, free from calamity, prosperous, peaceful, pleasant, and well populated. “In each of the eighty-four thousand main cities on the continent, he had five hundred sanctuaries built, complete with all the finest features, equipped with all utensils, supplies, and facilities, adorned with gardens, buildings, promenades, and delightful groves. In each sanctuary he also had buddha-memorials built, high and wide, adorned with many arrays of jewels. And he invited the buddha Supreme Sun to all those cities, where he presented the buddha with inconceivable offerings of all kinds. 
The miracle of the entry of the buddha into the cities fostered virtue in innumerable people, and all those with disturbed minds attained tranquillity, while those with calm minds developed the intense joy of seeing the buddha; those who were full of joy attained purity of will for enlightenment, while those whose will for enlightenment was pure developed great compassion; those of goodwill became involved in the quest for all buddha-teachings, while those who knew the principles of the buddha-teaching set their minds to meditation on the intrinsic nature of all things; those who had realized the equality of things set their minds on realizing the equality of past, present, and future; those who had attained the scope of knowledge of past, present, and future entered into the light of knowledge of the succession of all buddhas, while those who had entered the knowledge of various manifestations of buddhas set their minds on the salvation of all sentient beings; those engaged in the salvation of all beings vowed to complete the path of enlightening beings, while those who had realized the equanimity of the path generated the light of knowledge to bring forth the cycles of teaching of all buddhas; those who were ready for the guidance of the ocean of teachings set their minds on pervading the network of all lands with their own bodies, while those who realized the equality of lands undertook to know the faculties of all sentient beings, and those engaged in consideration of the faculties of all sentient beings in accord with their inclinations purified the determination to reach omniscience. 
Entering into the fulfillment of such benefits for such people, the king Lord of Glory had the buddha Supreme Sun enter all the cities, to develop and guide those people by the inconceivable vision of the miracles of the Buddha. 
“Now, who do you think that prince Lord of Glory was? 
You should see him as none other than this buddha Shakyamuni, who at that time was a prince named Lord of Glory, who attained kingship, and was on good terms with the buddha Supreme Sun. 
And who do you think the king Lord of Wealth, father of Lord of Glory, was? 
You should see him as none other than the buddha Jewel Flower Light, who at that time was a king named Lord of Wealth, who attained supreme perfect enlightenment at an enlightenment site symbolized by reflection of the moon and expounded the Teaching surrounded by as many enlightening beings as atoms in untold buddha-lands in a world called Shining Lamp of the Aura of Buddha in a world system called Family Born of a Diamond Reflecting Past, Present, and Future in the center of an ocean of worlds called Multitude of Reflections in the Space of the Cosmos of Realities, which was to the east past as many oceans of worlds as atoms in a world. 
Furthermore, that ocean of worlds, Multitude of Reflections in the Space of the Cosmos of Realities was purified by that buddha Jewel Flower Light in the course of his past practice as an enlightening being, and all the past, present, and future buddhas in that ocean of worlds were ripened for supreme perfect enlightenment by that buddha Jewel Flower Light as he carried out the practice of enlightening beings. “Now then, who do you think was the queen Lotus Born in that time, mother of the prince Lord of Glory, foremost of the eighty-four thousand women? You should see her as none other than Lady Maya, mother of the Blessed Buddha, progenetrix of the enlightening being Vairocana, established in unobstructed liberation of universal light, direct witness to the appearance of the countless multitude of all buddhas, who knows the manner of manifestation of birth of all enlightening beings. And who do you think was the great courtesan Beautiful? 
You should see her as Sunetra, wife of Dandapani of the Shakya clan, who is my mother. And who was her daughter, Splendor of Delight in Virtuous Conduct? You should see her as me. 
“Who do you think were the retinue of the king Lord of Wealth? 
They were these enlightening beings seated here in this assembly, guided by the Buddha to the fulfillment of the vows of universally good action, with a body reflected in all worlds, mind unadulterated and unfragmented in all concentration states of enlightening beings, eyes seeing the being and countenance of all buddhas, ears hearing the utterances of all buddhas, breath in control of all spiritual stations, voice going to all buddha-lands, the body of an enlightening being ceaselessly going to the audiences of all buddhas, entering the network of all places by production of embodiments suitable to develop and guide according to the mentalities of those to whom the enlightening beings appear, arriving at fulfillment of the vows of practice of universal good unbroken throughout the ages. 
“The king Lord of Glory and I, furthermore, attended the buddha Supreme Sun as long as he lived, providing him with the necessities of life. 
After that buddha passed away entirely, a buddha named Pure Body emerged, in that same world, and we honored and served him. 
After that we served, in succession, buddhas named Moon Reflecting Knowledge in All Limbs, King of Golden Light, Adorned with Marks of Greatness, Moon Blazing with a Web of Brilliant Light Beams, Paragon of Observant Knowledge, King Illumined with Great Knowledge, Adamantine Energy, Invincible Power of Knowledge, All-Observing Knowledge, Cloud of Pure Light, Crown Blazing with Lights of Knowledge, Banner of Lights of Virtue, Energy of the Sun of Knowledge, Limbs Like Blooming Jewel Lotuses, Lamp of Felicity, Radiance of Multitudes of Rays of Knowledge, Moon Shining Everywhere, Powerful Lion Illumined by Universal Knowledge, Moon of Cosmic Mind, Reflection in the Spacelike Mind of Beings, Tranquil and Well Balanced, Ubiquitous Sound of Silence, Cluster of Images in a Network of Light Rays of Stable Knowledge, Radiance of the Mountain of Immortality, Thunder of the Ocean of Truths, Crown of Light in the Sky of Buddhas, Moon of Light Beams, Face of Complete Knowledge, Luster of Flowers of Pure Knowledge, Glorious Light of a Mountain of Jewel Flowers, Light of Myriad Stars of Virtue, Knowledge Emerging from the Heights of Concentration, Jewel Moon, Circle of Flames, Sublime Jewel Radiance, Unhesitating in Practice of Universal Knowledge, Blazing Lamp Topped with a Sea of Flames, King Proclaiming the Mansion of Truth, Famed for Peerless Virtue, Moon Reflecting Past Vows, Lamp of Meaning with Spacelike Knowledge, Lord of the Sky, Born of Truth, King Filled with Shining Light, Paragon of Spirituality, Chief in Knowledge, Lotus in the Ocean of Truth. 
Beginning with these, there were sixty decillion buddhas in that world whom we honored, served, and provided with food and clothing, medicine and furniture. 
“The last of those sixty decillion buddhas was one named Energy Born of Great Zeal for Truth. 
When that buddha came to town, I, as wife of the king, together with my husband, made all kinds of offerings and then heard an exposition of the Teaching from the buddha called ‘lamp produced by the emergence of all those who arrive at Thusness,’ on hearing which I attained the eye of knowledge, and attained this enlightening liberation whose sphere is observation of the oceans of concentrations of all enlightening beings. 
“Cultivating this liberation for as many eons as atoms in one hundred buddha-lands, carrying out enlightening practice with the enlightening being Vairocana, I associated with countless buddhas during those many eons. 
In an eon I might serve one buddha or two, up to an inexpressible number of buddhas; some eons I served as many buddhas as atoms in a buddha-land. 
Yet never did I know the size of the enlightening being’s body or what it looked like; nor did I know the enlightening being’s physical, verbal, or mental actions, nor his knowledge and vision, his range of knowledge, or his realm of concentration of knowledge. As for those who, seeing the enlightening being carrying out the practice of enlightening beings, developed pure faith through various associations, all of them were taken care of by the enlightening being by various worldly and transmundane means, and became associates of the enlightening being. 
Associating with the enlightening being as he carried on enlightening practice, they never regressed on the way to supreme perfect enlightenment. 
“Having attained the enlightening liberation whose sphere is observation of the oceans of concentrations of all enlightening beings when I saw the buddha Energy Born of Zeal for Truth, as I cultivated this liberation along with the enlightening being for as many eons as atoms in a hundred buddha-lands, I propitiated, served, and attended all the buddhas who emerged in those ages and heard, took up, and remembered their teachings; and I attained this liberation from all those buddhas, by various methods, by various enunciations of principles and systems of scriptures, by various bodies of liberation, by various doors of liberation, by various liberative meditations and procedures, by various ways of access, by entry into various oceans of buddha-lands, by various visions of oceans of buddhas, by entry into various buddhas’ assemblies, by various paths following the oceans of vows of enlightening beings, by carrying out various paths following the oceans of vows of enlightening beings, by carrying out various practices of enlightening beings, by accomplishing various practices of enlightening beings, by various manifestations of the scope of the endeavor of enlightening beings: 
Because the ways of liberation of the universally good enlightening beings are infinite as space, infinite as the thoughts of all sentient beings, infinite as the ocean of time periods of past, present, and future, infinite as the ocean of places, infinite as the ocean of structures of the cosmos; indeed, the ways of liberation of the universally good enlightening beings are equal to the sphere of buddhahood. 
“For as many eons as atoms in a buddha-land I gazed at the enlightening being, never tired of seeing him. 
By ceaseless effort, from each of his pores I saw in each moment of consciousness infinite oceans of buddhas, various adornments of enlightenment sites, various mystic operations of the Teaching, and various miraculous proclamations of scriptures. 
From each of his pores I saw, in each moment of consciousness, infinite oceans of beings, various houses, gardens, mountains, palaces, rivers, seas, and dwellings, various physical bodies, various goods, various actions and efforts, and various forms of development of faculties. 
From every one of his pores infinitely various ways of entering past, present, and future became perceptible; infinitely various oceans of vows of enlightening beings were purified, infinite oceans of differences of the practices of the stages of enlightening beings became perceptible, the infinitely various purities of the transcendent ways of enlightening beings became perceptible, infinitely various oceans of past efforts of enlightening beings became perceptible, infinitely various oceans of ways of purifying buddha-lands became perceptible; infinitely various oceans of the universal love of enlightening beings, oceans of universal love for all beings, and oceans of heroic efforts to develop and guide all beings descended into the world, infinite oceans of the universal compassion of enlightening beings arose, infinite oceans of the great joy of enlightening beings grew, and in every moment of consciousness infinitely various oceans of efforts to take care of all sentient beings were accomplished. “In each moment of consciousness through those eons numerous as atoms in a hundred buddha-lands, I perceived oceans of principles of the Teaching from each pore of the enlightening being, and never reached the end, even though I did not go into what I had already gone into, and did not attain what I had already attained. 
This I did by going into the ocean of various ways of liberation of the enlightening being, even when he was the prince Siddhartha in the royal palace surrounded by women; I perceived infinitely various oceans of principles of past, present, and future through each of his pores, by penetrating the oceans of ways into the realm of reality. 
“I only know and have attained this enlightening liberation whose sphere is observation of the oceans of concentrations of all enlightening beings. 
How can I know the practice, tell of the qualities, or show all the oceans of virtue of the enlightening beings who have gone into the infinitely various oceans of liberative means, who purposely appear physically like all beings, who appear to act in accord with the mentalities of all beings, who emanate infinitely various appearances from all their pores, who realize the purity of essence and nature of all bodies, who are free from discriminatory thought because of awareness of the spacelike quality of the nature of beings, whose intellect reaches everywhere with certain discernment, occupied with spiritual powers equal to those who arrive at Thusness, who produce miraculous displays of infinite spheres of liberation, who have mastered the state where they can enter the vast cosmos of realities in a thought, who roam freely in the ocean of liberation of the all-sided stage of all truths? 
“Go to Lady Maya, mother of the enlightening being, who is sitting on a great jewel lotus seat near the Blessed Vairocana. 
Go ask her how enlightening beings become undefiled by the taint of worldly things while they are carrying out the practice of enlightening beings, how they become unflagging in serving all buddhas, how they become undeviating from the ends of the actions of enlightening beings, how they become free from all hindrances to entry into the liberations of enlightening beings, how they become unfixed to all states of enlightening beings, how they come into the presence of all buddhas and do not stop their efforts to take care of all sentient beings, do not cease enlightening practice for all time, do not regress from the undertaking of the Great Vehicle of universal enlightenment, and do not become discouraged in maintaining and increasing the roots of goodness in the world.” Then, by the empowerment of Buddha, Gopa spoke these verses illustrating this way of liberation: 
Those who see the best of people Engaged in the practice of perfect enlightenment All go to join him, Be they friendly or inimical. 
I remember as many eons as there are atoms In a hundred lands; There was an excellent world of outstanding light, With an age of supreme magnificence. 
In that age, in that world, Were sixty decillion buddhas; The last of them, best of sages, Was a lamp of the world, Spiritual Paragon. 
At the time of that buddha’s demise There was a glorious king Who had conquered all enemies, A king of kings with unobstructed knowledge. 
He had five hundred sons Who were heroic, brave, and handsome, Physically perfect and pure, Adorned with unexcelled splendor. 
The king and his sons had faith in Buddha And made great offerings to the enlightened; They always followed the true teaching And were unshakable in application of its practice. 
The king had a brilliant son, A pure being, Adorned with the thirty-two Marks of a great man. 
Giving up his kingship, he left home Together with five million people; Having gone forth, he worked with firmness and energy To preserve the teaching of the Buddha. 
There was a city full of trees, Best of a billion cities; There was a forest there of various trees, Quiet and most beautiful. 
There the king’s son sojourned, Experienced, intelligent, clear-minded; He elucidated the Buddha’s teaching To purify the spirit of defiled beings. 
Gathering wise people, he entered the city, Composed, of noble mien and serene appearance, His gaze steady, mindful, aware, His action profound, walking steadily. 
There was an excellent town, Banner of Joy, And a grandee there named Resounding Fame; I was his beloved daughter, Named Shining Light, more beautiful. 
I saw the shining prince and his retinue As I stood in the door of my house; He was handsome, with the marks of greatness, And I became very happy on seeing him. 
When he passed my door, I put a pearl in his bowl; Then, taking off all my jewelry, Full of love I gave it to him. 
With an impassioned heart I made a gift to that enlightening being, And for two hundred and fifty eons Did not fall into evil states. 
I was born among celestials, Or as a human princess, And in endless forms I always saw the prince. 
Then I was born to a courtesan, Saw the prince and fell in love, Made myself known to him, And became his obedient wife. 
He and I together made offerings To the sage Supreme Sun with pure faith, And having seen that buddha, I was inspired to seek supreme enlightenment. 
During that eon sixty decillion Buddhas emerged in the world: 
The last of those buddhas Was Energy of Zeal for Truth. Then my objective eye was clarified And I became aware of the essence of things; My continuous errant conceptions were silenced, And I attained this illumination thenceforth. 
After that I observed the stage Of concentration of enlightening beings; In a mental instant I see unthinkable Oceans of lands in the ten directions. 
And I see in all directions Various pure worlds, infinitely wondrous; Seeing them, my mind does not cling to them, Nor is it repelled by defiled lands. 
I also see the enlightenment sites in those lands And all the buddhas there, And I behold in one thought Their measureless oceans of light. 
In the same way I see their oceanic congregations In an instant of awareness, unimpeded, And know all their concentrations, And all their immeasurable liberations. 
I also keep their myriad practices in mind, And penetrate all the principles of the stages; And in each and every instant I enter Into the countless oceans of their vows. 
Observing the body of the True Man for endless eons And carrying out his practice, I have never seen an end to the mystic projections Emanating from his every hair. 
And I see oceans of lands beyond number On the tip of a single hair, With their masses of air and water, fire and earth, On various foundations, with different forms, And diverse patterns of structure, Of various types, according to distribution of elements, With an endless variety of adornments. 
I see each of the untold realms In the measureless oceans of lands, And I see the buddhas therein Guiding people by articulating truth. 
I do not understand his activities, His speech, his mind, or its action, Or his mystic powers and miracles, or great sublime practice, Though I have been working at this for eons. 
Then Sudhana paid his respects and took leave of Gopa. 
Maya Then Sudhana, turning to go to Lady Maya, having attained knowledge from investigation of the sphere of buddhahood, thought to himself, “How can I meet, associate with, and learn from spiritual benefactors whose senses are detached from all worlds, who do not abide anywhere, whose bodies are beyond all attachments, who have set out on the unimpeded path, who have purified the spiritual body, who skillfully project bodily forms by the illusion of physical action, who observe the world as being within the illusion of knowledge, who are physical embodiments of vows, whose bodies are made of mind by the power of Buddha, whose bodies are not born and do not perish, whose bodies are neither real nor unreal, whose bodies neither come nor go, whose bodies neither become nor disintegrate, whose bodies are of one form which is formless, whose bodies are nondual and freed from attachments, whose bodies have no resting place, whose bodies have no extinction, whose bodies are like reflections and have no difference, whose bodies are like dreams in action, whose bodies are like images in a mirror, whose bodies stand tranquilly everywhere equally, whose bodies are emanations pervading all directions, whose bodies are continuous through past, present, and future, whose bodies are neither physical nor mental and are indivisible, whose bodies are beyond the range of vision of all worldlings, whose secret being can only be known to the vision of the eye of universal good, whose realm of action is unobstructed like space?” As he was engaged in such thoughts, a city goddess named Jewel Eyes, surrounded by a group of sky goddesses, showed herself in the sky, her body adorned with various adornments, holding a basket of celestial flowers of many shapes and colors, and spoke to Sudhana in these terms as she scattered them before him: 
“You should guard the city of mind, by not dwelling on enjoyment of mundane objects. 
You should adorn the city of mind, by concentrating on the ten powers of the enlightened. 
You should clean the city of mind, by getting rid of jealousy, envy, and guile. 
You should extinguish the burning of the city of mind, by meditating on all truths. 
You should illumine the city of mind, by absorbing universal transcendent wisdom in the assemblies gathered around all buddhas. 
You should make the city of mind firm, by putting the paths of means produced by all buddhas into the city of your own mind. 
You should build strong walls about the city of mind, by purification of mind in carrying out the vow of practice of universal good. 
You should make the city of mind invincible and impregnable, by being invulnerable to all afflictions and bad influences. 
You should light up the city of mind, by illumining all beings with the knowledge of the enlightened. 
You should irrigate the city of mind, by receiving the clouds of teaching of all buddhas. 
You should firmly brace the city of mind, by absorbing into your own mind the oceans of virtues of all buddhas. 
You should broaden the city of mind, by suffusing all beings with great love. 
You should provide shelter, by producing the shield of all good ways in the vast canopy of the Teaching. 
You should water the city of mind, by feeling great compassion for all beings. You should open the doors of the city of mind, by giving of yourself and giving goods to all beings. 
You should energize the city of mind, by maintaining the energy to produce the provisions for omniscience. You should illuminate the city of mind, by the illumination of recollection of the spheres of the buddhas of past, present, and future. 
You should know how to stock the city of mind, by examination, learning, and higher knowledge of the various doors of truth in the scriptures of the cycles of teaching of all buddhas. 
You should know how to govern the city of mind, by showing all beings the path of entries into omniscience in various ways. 
You should know how to support the city of mind, by perfection of accomplishment of the vows of all buddhas of past, present, and future. 
You should know how to increase the power to provide for the city of mind, by increasing the great stores of virtue and knowledge from all realms of truth. 
You should know how to emanate light throughout the entire city of mind, by higher knowledge of the science of stripping away defilements from the minds, senses, and interests of all sentient beings. 
You should know how to control the city of mind, by embracing all the principles of the realm of reality. 
You should make the city of mind light, by the light of mindfulness of all buddhas. 
You should know the essence of the city of mind, by penetrating the principle of nonsubstantiality of all things. 
You should observe the illusoriness of the city of mind, by going to the spiritual city of omniscience. 
“By thus purifying the city of mind, an enlightening being can produce all good. 
Because no obstacles stand before an enlightening being whose mind-city is thus purified—no obstacles to seeing buddhas, or obstacles to hearing the Teaching, or obstacles to serving buddhas, or obstacles to efforts to save sentient beings, or obstacles to purifying buddha-lands. 
Spiritual friends are easily perceptible to an enlightening being looking for spiritual friends when the mind is free from obstacles; and omniscience for enlightening beings comes through the help of spiritual friends.” Then a goddess, Spiritual Lotus, surrounded by innumerable goddesses radiant with modesty and beauty, came forth from the enlightening site praising Lady Maya and stopped in the sky in front of Sudhana, each goddess emanating webs of light of many jewel colors, colors of pure flames of incense of many fragrances, colors soothing the mind, colors increasing the flow of joy in the mind, colors cooling the fever of the body, colors showing physical purity, webs of light produced by the motion of unattached, unimpeded bodies. 
Illumining a multitude of lands, revealing to Sudhana the forms of all buddhas everywhere, the lights then circled the whole world and descended into Sudhana’s head, and from his head entered into all of his pores. 
As soon as the light rays of the goddesses touched Sudhana, he acquired an eye called ‘dispassionate light,’ with which no darkness can coexist; he acquired an eye called ‘unobscured,’ whereby he saw the essence of beings; he acquired an eye called ‘dispassionate sovereign,’ whereby he viewed the sphere of essence of all phenomena; he acquired an eye called ‘pure state,’ whereby he viewed the nature of all lands; he acquired an eye called ‘shining light,’ whereby he viewed the reality body of those who arrive at Thusness; he acquired an eye called ‘universal light,’ whereby he viewed the inconceivable perfection of the physical embodiment of those who arrive at Thusness; he acquired an eye called ‘unobstructed light,’ whereby he viewed the becoming and disintegration of worlds in all universes; he acquired an eye called ‘total illumination,’ whereby he observed the manner of extraction of the principles of the scripture in the teachings of all buddhas; he acquired an eye called ‘universal scope,’ whereby he viewed the infinite variety of mystic powers used by buddhas to guide beings; he acquired an eye called ‘all-seeing,’ whereby he observed the emergence of buddhas in all lands. 
Then a supernatural being named Fine Eye, doorkeeper of the hall of assembly of enlightening beings, at the head of ten thousand supernatural beings, together with his wife and son and clan, sprinkled Sudhana with flowers of various colors and pleasant fragrances, and said, “An enlightening being imbued with ten qualities can approach all spiritual friends. 
What are these ten? 
A pure mind free from guile and deceit; great compassion taking in all beings as a whole; meditation on the unreality of self-existence of all beings; the willpower to proceed unswervingly toward omniscience; the power of attention to the spheres of all buddhas; clear perception of the purity of essence of all phenomena; great kindness to all beings as a whole; the light of knowledge that dissolves all barriers; the great body of teachings that acts as a shield against the miseries of the mundane whirl; the eye of knowledge of all currents of reality, directed toward the path of spiritual friends. 
“Having attained these ten things, enlightening beings can approach all spiritual friends; and by observation through ten ways of concentrated meditation they can come face to face with all spiritual friends. 
What are the ten? 
Meditation on the purity of the sky of reality; meditation viewing the ocean of all realms; meditation without discrimination or thought of any objects; meditation on the appearance of the multitudes of buddhas of all realms; meditation on the multitude of virtues of omniscience; meditation with every thought constantly on spiritual friends; meditation on the virtues of all buddhas deriving from spiritual friends; meditation on being with all spiritual friends forever; meditation on always going to all spiritual friends everywhere equally; meditation devoted to tireless application of the techniques of all spiritual friends. 
The enlightening being who has accomplished these ten kinds of concentrated meditation comes face to face with all spiritual friends and attains a liberation through concentration called ‘enunciation of the teachings of all buddhas by spiritual friends,’ practicing which the enlightening being realizes the indivisible sameness of all buddhas and finds spiritual friends everywhere in contact.” Having been told this by the supernatural being, Sudhana looked up to the sky and said, “Bravo, O noble one, sympathetic one; you are trying to help me and show me spiritual friends. 
Tell me, in the right way, how to proceed; where should I go? 
Where should I search? 
What should I meditate on to see spiritual friends?” The supernatural being said, “One may go into the presence of spiritual friends by an attitude of universal respect, by mental focus on remembering spiritual friends in all things, by concentration speeding everywhere by dreamlike speed of mind, by realizing mind and body as like reflections.” Then Sudhana, practicing as he had been taught by the supernatural being Fine Eye, saw a great jewel lotus spring up from the ground in front of him. 
In the heart of the lotus he saw a tower called ‘chamber containing the cosmos,’ beautifully made of gold and jewels. 
Inside the tower he saw a lotus calyx throne made of wish-fulfilling jewels, set on jewel figurines of the chiefs of all realms of being, arrayed with many kinds of precious adornments and bells which emanated sounds telling of the principle of universal love, the names of the buddhas of past, present, and future, the teachings of all buddhas, and the vows of all enlightening beings. 
It was also arrayed with rows of jewels which reflected the manifestations of buddhas and the succession of births of all buddhas of past, present, and future, rows of radiant jewels showing the lights of the activities in all buddha-lands throughout space and the effecting of all miracles, emanating the auras of light of all buddhas, emanating apparitions like the chiefs of all worlds making offerings to buddhas, and jewels filling the cosmos in every moment with the mystic projections of the universally good enlightening being. 
Every object on the throne of inconceivable qualities emanated celestial eulogies of the enlightened. 
The throne was also surrounded by an inconceivable number of seats arrayed with jewels. 
Sudhana saw Lady Maya sitting on that throne, her physical form transcending all in the triple world, having gone beyond all states of being; facing all beings, appearing according to their mentalities; unstained by any world, being made of myriad virtues; in the likeness of all beings, appearing in such a way as to please all beings; adapted to develop and guide all beings, descending into the presence of all beings; appearing continuously to beings at all times like the sky, appearing to all beings to be permanent; not going anywhere, not passing away from all worlds, not coming anywhere, not coming into existence in any world; unoriginated, absorbed in the equanimity of nonorigination; unextinguished, involved in the affairs of all worlds; not real, having attained suchness; not false, appearing in accord with the world; not in motion, being divorced from death and birth; not annihilated, because of the nonannihilation of the nature of reality; undefinable, being beyond any manner of speaking; uniform, her auspicious characteristics issuing from indefinability; like a reflection, appearing according to the minds of all beings; like magic, made of the magic of knowledge; like specks of light, moment to moment sustained by the thoughts of beings; like a shadow, bound to all beings by commitment; dreamlike, appearing to beings according to their mentalities without being mixed up; reaching throughout all universes, being in nature pure as space; issuing from universal compassion, engaged in the protection of the community of beings; issuing from the door of nonobstruction, pervading the cosmos in each instant; infinite, dwelling in all worlds without defilement; measureless, transcending all manner of verbal expression; nondwelling, manifesting to guide all beings; unfixed, appearing magically in the body of a living being; not really existing, made by the magic of aspiration; unsurpassed, being beyond all worlds; unreal, being a manifestation of tranquillity; unproduced, connected to beings according to their acts; like a wish-fulfilling jewel, fulfilling the commitment to satisfy the wishes of all beings; without discrimination, based on the thoughts of all beings; beyond conception, unknowable to all beings; based on resolve, never leaving the mundane; pure, nonconceptual like Thusness. 
In this form did Sudhana see Lady Maya, manifesting a physical body that was not form, being a reflection of form; not feeling, being the ultimate cessation of painful feelings of the world; outside the thoughts of all beings, but appearing in their thoughts; issuing from the unfabricated nature of reality, detached from illusory action; transcending the sphere of discriminatory consciousness, born of the knowledge of vows of enlightening beings; having no intrinsic essence, being beyond the range of all verbal expression; free from the burning of the mundane whirl, having arrived at the state of supreme coolness of the reality-body—she was appearing physically to beings in accord with their minds by mastery of their minds, appearing in forms resembling all beings but superior to the physical forms of all beings. 
Some beings saw her in the form of a devil woman, with a form superlative among devil women; some saw her in forms superlative among the goddesses of various heavens; some saw her in forms superlative among the females of the various kinds of beings; some saw her in the form of a most beautiful human princess. 
Then Sudhana, emptied of notions of the forms of all beings, penetrating the minds of other beings, saw Lady Maya in the minds of all beings, her virtue sustaining all beings, her body an accumulation of the virtues of omniscience; she was engaged in nondiscriminatory perfect giving, impartial toward all beings, having united all beings in the fellowship of universal compassion; she had set out to actualize the virtues of all buddhas; she had entered the ocean of all ways of tolerance; her mind was expanded with a flood of energy of omniscience; she was indefatigable in clarification of all spheres of truth; she was adept in meditation on the essence of all things; her mind was accomplished in all branches of meditation; she was engaged in all branches of meditation without confusion and had perceived the unique sphere of meditation of those who arrive at Thusness; she was intent on various meditations to evaporate the ocean of afflictions of all beings; she knew how to analyze the teachings of all buddhas; she had the wisdom to consider all the designs of reality; she gazed tirelessly on all buddhas; she ceaselessly observed the succession of buddhas of past, present, and future; she faced the door of vision of all buddhas; she knew the variety of techniques to perfectly accomplish the path of attainment of all buddhas; she coursed in the space of all who realize Thusness; she knew how to take care of all beings; she appeared in an infinite variety of reflections to develop and guide beings according to their mentalities; she comprehended the variety of purities of all buddha-bodies; she had vowed to purify all lands; she had perfected the vow to guide all beings to ultimate liberation; her mind pervaded the spheres of all buddhas with respect; she had the energy to produce all the miracles of enlightening beings; she had purified the supreme spiritual body; she manifested infinite physical bodies; she crushed the power of all demons; she was imbued with the power of great roots of goodness; with intellect born of the power of truth she perceived the power of buddhas; she had perfected all powers of mastery of enlightening beings; she was flooded with the power of omniscience; her wisdom was illumined by the lightning of the knowledge of all buddhas; her knowledge contemplated the infinite ocean of minds of beings; she comprehended the myriad mentalities of beings; she was expert in knowledge of the differences in faculties of others; she was skilled in knowledge of the differences in interests of infinite beings; her body pervaded infinite oceans of lands in the ten directions; she was expert in knowledge of the differences in all worlds; she was skilled in the means of knowing the junction and disjunction of all lands; she saw throughout all realms by knowledge; she was aware of all times; she bowed to all buddhas; her mind was directed toward reception of the ocean of all buddha-teachings; she was engaged in accomplishing fulfillment of all qualities of buddhas; her intellect was applied to the production of all the provisions for enlightenment; she boldly considered and carried out all the undertakings of enlightening beings; she had completed all the elements of development of the will for enlightenment; she was engaged in protecting all beings; she undertook to be the mother of all enlightening beings and buddhas. 
Beginning with these, Sudhana saw Lady Maya in as many ways as atoms in the continent: 
seeing her, he magically made his body as extensive as Lady Maya, and with this omnipresent body bowed to the ubiquitous Maya. As he was bowing, an infinite variety of concentrations entered into him. 
Observing those concentrations, making them externally undetectable, cultivating them, mastering them, remembering them, making them all-pervasive, expanding them, watching them, increasing them, accomplishing them, and fixing their impression, he rose from those concentrations and circled Lady Maya, her retinue, her abode and seat, and then stood respectfully before her and said, “Noble one, Manjushri inspired me to seek supreme perfect enlightenment and directed me to attend spiritual benefactors. 
Now please tell me, noble one, how an enlightening being may achieve omniscience while carrying out the practice of enlightening beings.” She said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation, ‘magical manifestation of knowledge of great vows.’ Imbued with this liberation, I am the mother of all the enlightening beings in their final existence in all the worlds in this world-ocean where Vairocana Buddha’s miraculous manifestation of birth as an enlightening being in the final existence takes place. 
So here too in this great city of Kapilavastu, as wife of the king Shuddhodana, I became the mother of the enlightening being Siddhartha, by the great inconceivable miracle of the birth of an enlightening being. 
“At that time I was in the house of king Shuddhodana, and when the time of the enlightening being’s descent from the heaven of contentment had arrived, from every pore the enlightening being emanated as many rays of light as atoms in untold buddha-lands, arrayed with the qualities of the birth of all enlightening beings, known as the light originating from the qualities of birth of all buddhas; those rays of light illumined the whole world, then descended on my body and entered into every pore of my body, beginning with my head. 
And as soon as those light rays of the enlightening being had entered my body, I saw all the enlightening beings whose birth-miracles were shown in the spheres at the front of the enlightening being’s light rays, as they sat on the Buddha’s lion throne at the site of enlightenment, surrounded by congregations of enlightening beings, honored by the leaders of the worlds, turning the wheel of the teaching. 
I also saw all the buddhas with whom those buddhas associated as they carried out enlightening practices in the past. 
I also saw mystical projections of their initial inspiration, attainment of enlightenment, turning of the wheel of the teaching, final extinction, and the pure arrays of all buddha-lands, as well as the multitudes of emanations of those buddhas pervading the cosmos in each moment of consciousness. 
When those rays of light of the enlightening being entered my body, my body outreached all worlds, and my belly became as vast as space, and yet did not go beyond the human physical size. The supernal manifestations of the enlightening beings’ abode in the womb everywhere in the ten directions all appeared in my body. 
“Upon the appearance in my body of the furnishings of the enlightening being’s abode in the womb, the enlightening being, together with as many enlightening beings as atoms in ten buddha-lands, all with the same vow, the same practice, the same roots of goodness, the same state of liberation and the same stage of knowledge, adept at the same mystic projection, having accomplished the same endeavor, adept at the same practice, having purified the same spiritual body, able to assume an infinite variety of physical forms, expert in the projection of the endeavors of universally good enlightening beings, respectfully attended by chiefs of all worlds, descended from the heaven of contentment by the great miracle of enlightening beings; appearing to pass away from all heavens of contentment, appearing to become regenerated in all worlds, from each heaven of contentment to early existence, following skill in means of developing inconceivable numbers of sentient beings to maturity, alerting all intoxicated, deluded beings, detaching from all attachments, emanating a great network of light beams dispelling the darkness from all worlds, stopping all evils and miseries, putting an end to all hellish ways of being, making all beings aware of their past deeds, rescuing all beings, appearing in the presence of all beings, he descended from the heaven of contentment with his retinue and entered my belly. 
“Once all of them were in my belly, they walked around in strides as big as a billion-world universe, even as big as worlds as numerous as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
Also all the untold congregations of enlightening beings at the feet of all buddhas in all worlds in the ten directions entered my belly in every moment of thought to see the miracle of the enlightening being’s dwelling in the womb. The chief gods of all the heavens also came to the enlightening being in the womb, to see and honor him, to listen to the Teaching and hear his discourse. Yet even though it took in all those multitudes, my belly was not enlarged, nor did this body of mine become any more than a human body. Yet it received so many multitudes; and all the celestials and humans saw the various pure arrays of the enlightening beings’ surroundings. 
Why was this? 
Because of the development of this enlightening liberation of the magic of knowledge of great vows. 
“Just as I was the mother of this buddha in this world in all his manifestations of miracles of birth as an enlightening being, so was I the mother of the buddhas Krakucchanda, Kanakamuni, and Kashyapa; and so will I be the mother of all the buddhas of this eon. 
“And just as I will be the mother of Maitreya, so will I be the mother of all buddhas in this eon in this universe, and in all universes of the ten directions, penetrating endless universes. 
And just as I will be the mother of Maitreya, by untold virtues, so shall I be the mother of all the buddhas in this eon, and in endless billions of eons in all the worlds in all world systems in this flower treasury ocean of worlds, I will be the mother of all the buddhas of the future when they are enlightening beings, carrying on the practice of universally good enlightening beings, establishing guidance for the perfection of all beings in all ages.” Then Sudhana asked Lady Maya, “How long ago did you attain this enlightening liberation of magical manifestations of knowledge of great vows?” Maya replied, “Inconceivable eons ago, beyond the range of mind, beyond conscious calculation, there was an age called Pure Light. 
In that age of Pure Light there was a world called Elevated, which was pure with some defilement, made of many jewels, with surrounding mountains, polar mountains, and oceans, containing realms of celestials, humans, animals, ghosts, and hells, variegated and pleasant to see. 
In that world were a billion sets of four continents, in the middle of which was a group of four continents called Supreme Lionlike Majesty, in which there were eighty billion metropolises, among which was one called Possessed of the Best of Banners. There in that metropolis was a king called Great Energetic Power, a sovereign ruler. 
There was also an enlightenment site in that metropolis called Conspicuous Rays of Light, wherein there was a deity called Radiant Eyes. 
Furthermore, at that enlightenment site an enlightening being named Pure Standard sat, to attain omniscience. 
A demon named Golden Light, along with a great army of cohorts, had come invisibly to prevent the enlightening being from attaining omniscience; but the king Great Energetic Power, who had attained the mastery which enlightening beings realize, issued a great magical projection, producing a great army, more numerous than and superior to that of the demons, to surround the enlightenment site and fight off the demon army. 
The demon army was thereby scattered, and the blessed Pure Standard realized perfect enlightenment. 
“The goddess of the enlightenment site, Radiant Eyes, looking upon the king as her son, then prostrated herself before the buddha and made a vow: 
‘Wherever I may be born, may the king Great Energetic Power be my son; and when he attains supreme perfect enlightenment, I will be his mother then too.’ Having made this vow, she attended ten decillion buddhas at that enlightenment site during that eon. 
“Now, who do you think that goddess was? 
It was I myself who was the enlightenment-site goddess Radiant Eyes at that time. 
Ever since then, wherever I have been, he has come as my son, carrying out the practice of enlightening beings in all buddha-lands, in all states of being, in all lifetimes, based on all that is good, in all undertakings through which enlightening practice is carried out. 
In the same way I was the mother of infinite buddhas of the past, and I am mother to the infinite buddhas of the ten directions in the present. And all the buddhas I was mothers to in their last existence as an enlightening being emanated lights from their navels and illumined this great body and this seat. 
“I only know this enlightening liberation of magical manifestation of knowledge of great vows—how can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who are filled with great compassion, who never tire of guiding to perfection of omniscience, who are able to display projections of the miracles of all buddhas from every pore? 
“In the thirty-three-fold heaven of this world is a goddess named Surendrabha, who is the daughter of a god named Smrtimati. 
Go ask her how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects and left Lady Maya. 
Paying his respects to the goddess, Sudhana stood before her and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give instruction to enlightening beings, so please tell me how to learn and practice.” Surendrabha replied, “I have attained an enlightening liberation called pure manifestation of unimpeded recollection. 
I am aware that there was an age called Flowering, in which I served as many buddhas as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River. 
When they went forth from their customary surroundings, I protected them, provided for them, and made parks for their use. 
And all the developmental guidance of sentient beings performed by those buddhas—while they were enlightening beings, while in the womb of the mother, while being born, while taking seven steps, while roaring the lion’s roar, during childhood, during life at home, when leaving home, when awaking at the site of enlightenment, while teaching, while displaying the miracles of buddhas—all that, from their first inspiration to the final ending of their true teaching, I know and remember, recall and keep in mind, reflect on and follow. 
“There was an eon called Well-Being, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in ten Ganges Rivers; there was an eon called Good Fortune, in which I served as many buddhas as atoms in a buddha-land; there was an eon called No Attainment, in which I served eighty-four thousand duodecillion buddhas; there was an eon called Beautiful Light, in which I served as many buddhas as atoms in this continent; there was an eon called Peerless Light, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in twenty Ganges Rivers; there was an eon called Blazing Glory, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in the Ganges River; there was an eon called Sunrise, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in eighty Ganges Rivers; there was an eon called Victorious March, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in sixty Ganges Rivers; there was an eon called Beautiful Moon, in which I served as many buddhas as sand grains in seventy Ganges Rivers. 
“In this way, I remember as many eons as sand grains in the Ganges River, during which I was always with buddhas, and I heard of this enlightening liberation of pure manifestation of unimpeded recollection from those buddhas, and practiced it as they told me. 
Thus, constantly engrossed in this liberation, I recollect, remember, keep in mind, reflect on, and recall the supernal manifestations of all those buddhas from their stages of enlightening to the end of the duration of their true teachings, by means of this enlightening liberation of pure manifestation of unimpeded recollection. 
“I only know this enlightening liberation—how can I know the practice, or tell the virtues, of the enlightening beings who are free from all obscurity and darkness, who light up the night of the mundane whirl, who are rid of all obstacles, who do not slumber, who are rid of apathy and indolence, who have stopped compulsive actions based on conditioning, who have purified awareness of the essence of all things, who awaken others to the purity of the ten powers? 
“In the city of Kapilavastu there lives a boy named Vishwamitra who is a teacher. 
Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then Sudhana paid his respects and left the goddess Surendrabha. 
Vishwamitra Descending from the thirty-three-fold heaven, Sudhana made his way to Kapilavastu, where he went to see the young teacher Vishwamitra. 
Paying his respects, he stood before the teacher and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and practice.” Vishwamitra said, “I learned the science of writing from a young enlightening being named Shilpabhijna. 
Go ask him and he will tell you how the practice of enlightening beings is to be learned and carried out.” Shilpabhijna Then Sudhana went to the youth Shilpabhijna, paid his respects, and said to him, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out enlightening practice.” Shilpabhijna said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation with higher knowledge of arts. 
In uttering the phonemes, as I pronounce A, by the associative power of an enlightening being I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of totality; pronouncing Ra, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called differentiation of infinite levels; pronouncing Pa, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called differentiation of levels of the cosmos of realities; pronouncing Cha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called analysis of the universal sphere; pronouncing Na, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called independence; pronouncing La, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called unattached; pronouncing Da, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called unregressing effort; pronouncing Ba, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called adamantine sphere; pronouncing Da, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called universal sphere; pronouncing Sa, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called ocean womb; pronouncing Va, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called branching out everywhere; pronouncing Ta, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of light; pronouncing Ya, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called multitude of mixtures; pronouncing Shta, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called light extinguishing all burning; pronouncing Ka, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called unified multitude; pronouncing Sha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called directed rain; pronouncing Ma, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called crest of various currents of great force; pronouncing Ga, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called extending to all levels; pronouncing Tha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called unified womb of Thusness; pronouncing Ja, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called plunging into purification of the mundane whirl; pronouncing Swa, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called supernal manifestation of recollection of all buddhas; pronouncing Dha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called contemplative investigation of truths; pronouncing Sha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called light of the wheel of teaching of all buddhas; pronouncing Kha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called womb of knowledge of the causal ground of accomplishment; pronouncing Ksha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called investigation of the treasury of the ocean in which all actions are stilled; pronouncing Sta, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called light of purity dispelling all afflictions; pronouncing Ña, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called access to worldly knowledge; pronouncing Tha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of knowledge of the cycles of the mundane whirl; pronouncing Bha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called array of manifestations of spheres of existence; pronouncing Chha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called division of the encompassing sphere of practice applied to development; pronouncing Sma, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called turning to face all directions to see all buddhas; pronouncing Hwa, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called matrix of power to observe what all sentient beings cannot; pronouncing Tsa, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called plunging into practice of the ocean of all virtues; pronouncing Gha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called strong oceanic vessel holding the multitude of all teachings; pronouncing Tha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called going in the direction of the vows of all buddhas; pronouncing Na, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called voicing the millions of configurations of the wheel of phonemes; pronouncing Pha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of the ultimate development of all sentient beings; pronouncing Ska, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called suffusion of the sphere of light of unimpeded intellectual powers contained in the stages of enlightenment; pronouncing Sya, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called sphere of exposition of all buddha-teachings; pronouncing Shcha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called thunder of truth filling the sky of beings; pronouncing Ta, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called lamp of the ultimate consummation of selfless work for the benefit of sentient beings; pronouncing Dha, I enter a door of transcendent wisdom called matrix of the distinction of cycles of the Teaching. 
“As I pronounce the phonemes, I enter immeasurable, innumerable doors of transcendent wisdom, beginning with these forty-two. 
I have attained this enlightening liberation with higher knowledge of arts, and it is this I know. 
How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of enlightening beings who have attained perfection of all mundane and transcendental arts, inasmuch as they have no barrier, no doubt, no confusion, no uncertainty, no hesitation, no ignorance, no difficulty, no impairment, no frustration, no lack of knowledge, and no misunderstanding in regard to the subject matters of all arts—all writing and mathematics, all applied sciences of spells and herbs, all the bases of obsession, psychotherapy, epilepsy, lameness, and insanity, the science of compounding medicines, chemistry, mineralogy, the making of parks, groves, villages, towns, and cities, knowledge of the vicissitudes of the world through astronomy, physiognomy, geomancy, meteorology, agronomy, and prediction of trends of events, and the analysis, communication, understanding, and actualization of all transmundane phenomena. 
“In the city of Vartanaka, in the region of Kevalaka, in this same country of Magadha, there lives a laywoman named Bhadrottama. 
Go ask her how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects and left the noble youth Shilpabhijna. 
Bhadrottama Then Sudhana went to Vartanaka city in the region of Kevalaka, where he called on the laywoman Bhadrottama. 
Paying his respects to her, he said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and practice.” She said, “I know and teach a doctrine called ‘baseless sphere’ and have attained a concentration of mystic empowerment. 
In that concentration there is no foundation of any phenomenon whatsoever. 
Therein is produced the mystical empowerment of the eye of omniscience, the mystical empowerment of the ear of omniscience, the mystical empowerment of the nose of omniscience, the mystical empowerment of the tongue of omniscience, the mystical empowerment of the body of omniscience, the mystical empowerment of the mind of omniscience, the mystical power of the waves of omniscience, the mystical power of the lightning of omniscience, the mystical power of the flood of omniscience, spheres illumining the world. 
“It is this doctrine of the baseless sphere that I know. 
How can I know all the unobstructed, unattached practices of enlightening beings? 
Go south—there is a city called Bharukaccha, where there lives a goldsmith named Muktasara. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects, took his leave, and departed. 
Muktasara Then Sudhana made his way south, to the goldsmith Muktasara in the city of Bharukaccha. 
Paying his respects to Muktasara, Sudhana said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and practice.” Muktasara said, “I know an enlightening liberation called supernal manifestation of unobstructed mindfulness, and I ceaselessly seek the Teaching at the feet of all buddhas in the ten directions. 
I only know this enlightening liberation. How can I know the practice or tell the virtue of the enlightening beings who roar the fearless roar of the lion, who are grounded on great virtue and knowledge? 
“There is a householder named Suchandra living in this city, whose house is always illuminated; go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects, took his leave, and departed. 
Suchandra Then Sudhana went to the householder Suchandra, paid his respects, and said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I don’t know how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how an enlightening being is to learn and practice.” Suchandra said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation called light of undefiled knowledge. 
I only know this liberation. How can I know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who have attained infinite liberation? 
South of here is a city called Roruka, where a householder named Ajitasena lives. 
Go ask him how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So Sudhana paid his respects and left. 
Ajitasena Then Sudhana made his way to the city of Roruka, where he called on the householder Ajitasena. 
Paying his respects, Sudhana said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and practice.” Ajitasena said, “I have attained an enlightening liberation called inexhaustible appearance, with the attainment of which I obtained an inexhaustible treasury of vision of buddhas. 
South of here is a village called Dharma, where there lives a brahmin named Shivaragra. 
Go ask him how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” So then Sudhana paid his respects again and left. 
Shivaragra Then Sudhana made his way to Dharma village and called on the brahmin Shivaragra. 
Paying his respects, he said, “Noble one, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Shivaragra said, “I act on a vow of truth, that as by truth, by speaking truth, there has never been, is not now, and never will be, a single enlightening being who has turned away from supreme perfect enlightenment, who is turning away, or who will turn away, by that vow of truthful speech this work of mine may succeed. 
So whatever I wish comes to fruition. By this vow of truth, I accomplish all my tasks. 
How can I know the practice or tell the virtues of the enlightening beings whose words and deeds mutually accord in truth? 
“South of here is a city called Sumanamukha, where there live a boy named Shrisambhava and a girl named Shrimati. 
Go ask them how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” Then, with great reverence for the Teaching, Sudhana paid his respects to the brahmin Shivaragra and left. 
Shrisambhava and Shrimati Then Sudhana went to the city of Sumanamukha, and there he called on the boy Shrisambhava and the girl Shrimati; paying his respects to them, he said, “Noble ones, I have set my mind on supreme perfect enlightenment, but I do not know how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
I hear you give enlightening beings instruction, so please tell me how to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings.” They said to him, “We have attained and experienced an enlightening liberation called ‘illusory.’ Having realized this liberation, we see all worlds as illusory, being produced by the illusion of causes and conditions. 
We know all beings are illusory, by knowledge of the illusion of afflictions in action. 
We see all worldlings as illusory, born of the illusion of ignorant craving for existence. We see all phenomena as illusory, arisen from the illusion of mutual conditioning. 
We see the whole triple world as illusory, produced by the illusion of misunderstanding. 
We see all sentient beings, afflicted by birth, old age, death, grief, lament, suffering, and sorrow, as illusory, born of the illusion of untrue ideas. 
We see all lands as born of illusion, produced by the delusion of ideas of substance of existence in the illusions wrongly seen by the conceiving mind. 
We see all hearers and individual illuminates as illusory, born of illusory thoughts of knowledge and effort. 
We know the succession of all enlightening beings’ practices, vows, and developmental guidance of sentient beings as illusory, being essentially illusions of action and teaching created from illusion. 
We see the circle of all buddhas and enlightening beings as illusory, being essentially illusions of the inconceivable realm, produced by the illusions of vows and knowledge. 
“We know this enlightening liberation of illusoriness. 
How can we know the practice or tell of the virtues of the enlightening beings who follow the extensive network of the endless illusion of action?” Then the boy and girl, having showered Sudhana with an inconceivable stream of virtue and told him of their own range of liberation, said to him, “Go south, to a place called Samudrakaccha. 
There is a park called Great Array there, wherein there is a great tower called Chamber of Adornments of Vairocana, which has been produced by the maturation of roots of goodness of enlightening beings, originating from the thoughts of enlightening beings, arisen from the vows of enlightening beings, based on the masteries of enlightening beings, created by the power of mystic knowledge of enlightening beings, made of the skill in means of enlightening beings, completed by the power of virtue and knowledge of enlightening beings, showing enlightening beings’ great compassionate guidance of sentient beings, built of arrays of spiritual powers of enlightening beings, adorned by the states of inconceivable liberation of enlightening beings. 
There an enlightening being, a great being named Maitreya, lives for the purpose of benefiting the people of his native land, developing his parents and relatives to maturity, making those there who carry out the same practices firm in the Great Vehicle, to develop the roots of goodness of other beings according to their states, to show how to enter this liberation, to cultivate the power of an enlightening being to be born anywhere and travel about, appearing in all states of being, to perfect those beings, to develop the power of universal compassion of enlightening beings in the desire to benefit all beings, to become aware of the state of enlightening beings, which is detached from all abodes and locations, and to appear to live in all states of existence while being ultimately unattached. 
“Go to Maitreya and ask how an enlightening being is to seek the practices of enlightening beings, clarify the path of enlightening beings, carry out the studies of enlightening beings, purify the aspiration for enlightenment, accomplish the vows of enlightening beings, establish the provisions of enlightening beings, enter the stages of enlightening beings, fulfill the transcendent ways of enlightening beings, persist in the tolerances of enlightening beings, stabilize the qualities of achievement of enlightening beings, and attend spiritual benefactors. 
Because the enlightening being Maitreya has entered into all practices of enlightening beings; he has reached the goal of aspirations of all enlightening beings; he has comprehended the actions of all beings; he has confronted the developmental guidance of all beings; he has fulfilled all the transcendent ways; he has been through all the stages of enlightening beings; he has attained all the tolerances of enlightening beings; he has attained the certainty of enlightening beings; he has received all the predictions of buddhahood; he has roamed in all the liberations of enlightening beings; he has held the empowerments of all buddhas; he has been anointed by all buddhas with the consecration of the realm of omniscience. 
As a spiritual benefactor, he will nourish your roots of goodness, increase your determination for enlightenment, make your will firm, purify all your roots of goodness, increase the powers of your enlightening faculties, show you the realm of nonobstruction, bring you into conformity with the stage of universal goodness, introduce you to the means of carrying out all the vows of enlightening beings, describe to you the perfection of the virtues of the practical undertakings of all enlightening beings, and tell you about the practice of universal good. 
“You should not develop just one virtue, nor concentrate on clarifying just one doctrine, nor be satisfied with just one practice, nor concentrate on carrying out just one vow, nor take up just one instruction, nor rest in completion, nor think of attaining the three tolerances as ultimate, nor rest upon fulfillment of the six transcendent ways, nor stop on attainment of the ten stages, nor vow to encompass and purify a finite buddha-land, nor be content with attendance on a limited number of spiritual benefactors. 
Because an enlightening being should gather infinite roots of goodness, assemble infinite provisions for enlightenment, produce infinite bases of aspiration for enlightenment, learn infinite principles, extinguish the afflictions of infinite beings, penetrate the minds of infinite beings, know the faculties of infinite beings, work for the emancipation of infinite beings, be aware of the conduct of infinite beings, create guidance for infinite beings, destroy infinite afflictions and their consequences, clear away infinite obstacles caused by actions, put a stop to infinite views, remove infinite mental afflictions, produce infinite mental purities, destroy infinite miseries, evaporate infinite oceans of beings’ cravings, dispel infinite ignorance, bring down infinite mountains of pride, remove infinite bonds of the mundane whirl, evaporate the infinite ocean of birth, cross over infinite torrents of existence, extricate infinite beings stuck in the mud of desire, emancipate infinite beings from the dungeon of the triple world, place infinite beings on the path of sages, extinguish infinite lust, hatred, and delusion, rise above infinite nets of demons, purify infinite will of enlightening beings, increase infinite effort of enlightening beings, produce infinite faculties of enlightening beings, purify infinite resolutions of enlightening beings, enter infinite equanimity of enlightening beings, pursue infinite practices of enlightening beings in their entirety, purify infinite qualities of enlightening beings, fulfill infinite practices of enlightening beings, accord with infinite worldly practices, show infinite adaptations to the world, produce infinite power of faith, stabilize infinite power of vigor, clarify infinite power of mindfulness, purify infinite power of concentration, arouse infinite power of wisdom, stabilize infinite power of resolution, produce infinite power of virtue, expand infinite power of knowledge, establish infinite power of enlightening beings, fulfill infinite power of buddhas, ascertain infinite ways to truth, enter infinite realms of truth, clarify infinite doors to truth, produce infinite lights of truth, create infinite perspectives on truth, illumine infinite groups of faculties, clear away infinite afflictions, collect infinite spiritual medicines, cure sentient beings of infinite sicknesses caused by afflictions, collect infinite stores of immortality elixir, enter infinite buddha-lands, honor infinite buddhas, enter infinite assemblies of enlightening beings, remember infinite instructions of buddhas, endure infinite maliciousness from sentient beings, cut off infinite paths of misfortune, give infinite happiness to sentient beings, create infinite benefit for sentient beings, purify infinite methods of mental command, carry out infinite vows, cultivate infinite powers of universal love and compassion, persist in infinite endeavors in search of truth, pursue infinite powers of meditation, develop infinite mystic knowledge, purify infinite lights of knowledge, go the ways of infinite beings, encompass infinite becoming, appear in infinite different forms, know infinite different languages, comprehend infinite differences in the minds of beings, enter the vast realm of action of enlightening beings, live in the vast palace of enlightening beings, observe the profound state of enlightening beings, awaken to the mysterious realm of enlightening beings, reach the difficult goal of enlightening beings, sustain the hard-to-attain energy of enlightening beings, enter the difficult-of-access certainty of enlightening beings, be aware of the varied practice of enlightening beings, show the ubiquitous miracle of enlightening beings, receive the united multitudes of teachings, spread the infinitely varied network of practices of enlightening beings, fulfill the endless ways of transcendence, receive infinite directions for the future, enter countless doors of tolerance, purify countless stages of enlightenment, purify innumerable ways of access to truth, purify untold buddha-lands, put on spiritual armor for endless eons, serve infinite buddhas, accomplish the undertakings of inconceivable vows. 
“In short, the practice of enlightening beings is to perfect all sentient beings, to live in all ages, to manifest birth everywhere in all conditions, to awaken to knowledge of all times past, present, and future, to practice all truths, to purify all lands, to fulfill all vows, to provide for all buddhas, to be one with all enlightening beings in aim, to attain rapport with all spiritual friends. 
“Therefore you should not tire of seeking spiritual friends and benefactors, should not weary of meeting spiritual friends and benefactors, should not become complacent about questioning spiritual friends and benefactors, should not give up the determination to contact spiritual friends and benefactors, should not cease striving to respectfully attend spiritual friends and benefactors, should not misconstrue or resist the advice or instruction of spiritual friends and benefactors, should not be irresolute in acquiring the qualities of spiritual friends and benefactors, should not doubt the ways of emancipation shown by spiritual friends and benefactors, should not malign the acts of spiritual friends and benefactors adapting to the world to expedite their work, should not give up increasing pure faith in spiritual friends and benefactors. 
“What is the reason for this? 
It is from spiritual benefactors that enlightening beings learn the practice of enlightening beings; it is through spiritual benefactors that all enlightening beings’ virtues are perfected; spiritual benefactors are the source of the streams of all enlightening beings’ vows; the roots of goodness of all enlightening beings are produced by spiritual benefactors; the provisions for enlightenment are produced by spiritual benefactors; all enlightening beings’ perceptions of truth derive from spiritual benefactors; the purification of all ways to enlightenment derives from spiritual benefactors; the accomplishment of all studies of enlightening beings depends on spiritual benefactors; the virtuous qualities of all enlightening beings are based on spiritual benefactors; the purification of all enlightening beings’ wills is rooted in spiritual benefactors; the steadfastness of determination of all enlightening beings is born of spiritual benefactors; the light of the oceanic mental command and intelligence of all enlightening beings derives from the guidance of spiritual benefactors; the treasuries of ways of purification of enlightening beings are sustained by spiritual benefactors; the lights of knowledge of all enlightening beings are generated by spiritual benefactors; the excellence of vows of all enlightening beings is in the hands of spiritual benefactors; single-mindedness is led by spiritual benefactors; the faith characteristic of the attainment of all enlightening beings has its source in spiritual benefactors; the secrets of all enlightening beings are in the treasury of spiritual benefactors; spiritual benefactors are mines of principles of enlightening beings; the sprouts of power of the faculties of all enlightening beings are fostered by spiritual benefactors; the oceans of knowledge of all enlightening beings are expounded by spiritual benefactors; the treasuries of all enlightening beings are guarded by spiritual benefactors; the accumulations of virtues of all enlightening beings are protected by spiritual benefactors; the purities of life of all enlightening beings are generated by spiritual benefactors; the multitude of teachings for all enlightening beings come from spiritual benefactors; the entries into the paths of emancipation of all enlightening beings are in the keeping of spiritual benefactors; the enlightenment of all buddhas is attained by association with spiritual benefactors; the practice of all enlightening beings is governed by spiritual benefactors; the developments of virtues of all enlightening beings are illumined by spiritual benefactors; the directions followed by all enlightening beings are shown by spiritual benefactors; the greatness of will of all enlightening beings is described by spiritual benefactors; the power of universal love of enlightening beings derives from spiritual benefactors; the power of universal compassion of enlightening beings is generated by spiritual friends; the masteries of all enlightening beings are governed by spiritual benefactors; all elements of enlightenment are produced by spiritual benefactors; the charitable works of all enlightening beings originate from spiritual friends. 
“Sustained by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not fall into bad ways; supported by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not fall away from the Great Vehicle; minded by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not overstep the precepts of enlightening beings; guarded by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not come under the sway of bad influences; protected by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not deviate from the laws of enlightening beings; aided by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings go beyond the stage of sentient beings; taught by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not drop into the fall of those who seek individual liberation alone; hidden by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings rise above the world; developed by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings are unstained by mundane things; attended by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings become heedful and alert in all their practices; roused by spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings do not give up their undertakings; assisted by spiritual benefactors, enlightening being become invulnerable to active afflictions; based on the power of spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings cannot be crushed by any demons; in association with spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings develop all the elements of enlightenment. 
“What is the reason for this? 
Spiritual benefactors are those who clear away obstructions, restrain us from evil, teach us what is not to be done, extricate us from folly, dispel ignorance, break the bonds of views, emancipate us from the mundane whirl, cut off attachments to the world, free us from the nets of demons, extract the barbs of suffering, liberate us from the thicket of nescience, convey us across the desert of views, ferry us over the torrents of existence, pull us out of the mud of desire, extricate us from false paths, show the path of enlightening beings, enjoin on us the undertaking of enlightening beings, establish us in spiritual practices, lead the way to omniscience, clarify the eye of wisdom, strengthen the determination for enlightenment, foster universal compassion, tell about enlightening practices, give instruction in the ways of transcendence, direct us into the stages of enlightenment, impart tolerance, engender all roots of goodness, produce all preparations for enlightenment, bestow all virtues of enlightening beings, deliver us to the presence of all buddhas, show all virtuous qualities, inspire us to our goals, enhance efforts and attainments, show the ways to emancipation, protect us from the paths of destruction, illumine the ways to perceive truth, shower multitudes of teachings, extinguish all afflictions, stop the formation of views, and introduce us to all aspects of enlightenment. 
“Moreover, spiritual benefactors are mothers, giving birth to the family of buddhas; they are fathers, producing great benefit; they are nurses, protecting us from all evils; they are mentors, elucidating the learning of enlightening beings; they are guides, leading us into the path of transcendence; they are physicians, relieving us of the maladies of afflictions; they are like the Himalaya Mountains, growing the herb of knowledge; they are heroic warriors, protecting us from all perils; they are ferrymen, ferrying us across the torrents of the mundane whirl; they are helmsmen, delivering us to the treasure island of omniscience. 
“Therefore, thinking in this way, you should continue to approach spiritual benefactors, with a mind like the earth, bearing all burdens unbendingly; with a mind like adamant, having an unbreakable will; with a mind like a mountain range, impenetrable to all miseries; with a mind like a servant, doing whatever is bidden; with a mind like a student, following all instructions; with a mind like a slave, willing to take on all tasks; with a mind like a nurse, not overcome by afflictions; with a mind like a servant, taking up any task obediently; with a mind like a street cleaner, getting rid of pride and conceit; with a mind like the full moon, appearing at the proper times; with a mind like a good horse, avoiding all unruliness; with a mind like a vehicle, carrying a precious cargo; with a mind like an elephant, tame and docile; with a mind like a mountain, unshakable; with a mind like a dog, not getting angry; with a mind like an outcaste youth, free from arrogance and egotism; with a mind like a bull with its horns cut off, stripped of all haughtiness; with a mind like an apprentice, free from inflated ideas of your own worth; with a mind like a ship, coming and going tirelessly; with a mind like a bridge, crossing over with the directions of spiritual benefactors; with a mind like a good son, looking up to the countenance of spiritual benefactors; with a mind like a prince, carrying out the directives of the spiritual king. 
“Think of yourself as sick, and think of spiritual benefactors as physicians; think of their instructions as medicines, and think of the practices as getting rid of disease. 
Think of yourself as a traveler, and think of spiritual benefactors as guides; think of their instructions as the road, and think of the practices as going to the land of your destination. 
Think of yourself as crossing over to the other shore, and think of spiritual benefactors as boatmen; think of their instructions as a ford, and think of the practices as a boat. 
Think of yourself as a farmer, and think of spiritual benefactors as water spirits; think of their instructions as rain, and think of the practices as the ripening of the crops. 
Think of yourself as a pauper, and think of spiritual benefactors as the givers of wealth; think of their instructions as wealth, and think of the practices as getting rid of poverty. 
Think of yourself as an apprentice, and think of spiritual benefactors as mentors; think of their instructions as arts, and think of the practices as accomplishments. 
Think of yourself as fearless, and think of spiritual benefactors as heroic warriors; think of their instructions as attack, and think of the practices as vanquishing enemies. 
Think of yourself as a merchant, and think of spiritual benefactors as ship captains; think of their instructions as treasure, and think of the practices as obtaining treasures. 
Think of yourself as a good son, and think of spiritual benefactors as parents; think of their instructions as the family business, and think of the practices as the perpetuation of the family business. 
Think of yourself as a prince, and think of spiritual benefactors as the chief ministers of a spiritual king; think of their instructions as the precepts of kingship, and think of the practices as putting on the turban of truth adorned with the crest of knowledge and overseeing the capital of the spiritual sovereign. 
“You should approach spiritual benefactors with these thoughts in mind. 
With their attitude toward spiritual benefactors purified in this way, practicing the instructions of spiritual benefactors, enlightening beings grow in goodness, like plants, bushes, and trees growing up the mountains; they become vessels of all buddha-teachings, as the oceans are of water; they become repositories of all virtues, as the seas are of pearls; they purify the determination for enlightenment, as fire does gold; they rise above the world, like the polar mountain over the sea; they become unstained by things of the world, like a lotus in water; they reject all bad actions, as the ocean throws up a corpse; they increase in good qualities, as the moon grows brighter as it waxes; they illumine the reality realm, as the sun does the earth; they grow the bodies of vows of enlightening beings, just as children grow in the care of their parents. 
“In short, enlightening beings who have put the instruction of spiritual benefactors into effect embody untold virtues, purify untold resolutions, develop untold enlightening faculties, purify untold mystic powers, perfect untold worthy practices, get beyond untold demons, abide by untold ways to truth, fulfill untold ways of purifying virtue and knowledge, fulfill untold deeds, purify untold modes of conduct, carry out untold vows. 
“In sum, all practices of enlightening beings, all transcendent ways of enlightening beings, all stages of enlightening beings, all concentrations of enlightening beings, all mystic knowledges and spiritual powers of enlightening beings, all manifestations of mental command and intellectual power of enlightening beings, all knowledge of dedication and infinity of superknowledge of enlightening beings, all accomplishments of vows of enlightening beings, and all perfections of attainments of all aspects of buddhahood, derive from spiritual benefactors, are rooted in spiritual benefactors, are born of spiritual benefactors, are fostered by spiritual benefactors, are based on spiritual benefactors, are caused by spiritual benefactors, are produced by spiritual benefactors.” Now Sudhana, hearing about the virtues and qualities of spiritual benefactors, about the infinity of practice of enlightening beings, and the vastness of the buddha-teaching, was thoroughly delighted and uplifted in mind. 
Maitreya Then Sudhana, his mind enriched by the instructions of spiritual benefactors, went to the region of Samudrakaccha, contemplating that instruction in the conduct of enlightening beings, strengthening his body by thinking of past activities inconsistent with proper conduct, controlling his thoughts by thinking of past mundane mental behavior not conducive to purification of body and mind, contemplating the greater common weal in the present by thinking of the vanity of past involvement in harmful mundane activities, establishing the power of forming correct ideas of the practice of enlightening beings by thinking of former untrue notions based on mere fancy, strengthening the will based on the excellence of striving for the welfare of all beings by thinking of the ills of past striving for his own personal benefit, increasing the energy of his faculties with great inspiration to strive to attain all elements of buddhahood by thinking of past indulgence in pleasure seeking; purifying his being with the vow of enlightening beings connected with correct perception in the present free from delusion by thinking of past endeavors made up of error inextricably bound up with delusion; unifying body and mind with great vigor in action by thinking of past accomplishment of tasks through exertion of great vigor and striving for the attainment of complete buddhahood in the present; developing great joy and happiness by thinking how it would be to go on forever as in the past—helpless amid the ills of unenlightened life—and instead dedicating himself to the aid and benefit of all beings by establishing all the teachings of enlightenment, developing energy in his faculties rooted in inconceivable good by seeing this present life as a cause of old age, sickness, death, and grief, an abode of assemblage and disintegration, and yet the basis and condition of carrying out the practice of enlightening beings forever, absorbing the buddha-teachings that mature sentient beings, seeing the buddhas and going to all their lands, attending all teachers of truth, keeping the instructions of all buddhas, seeking all truths, meeting all spiritual friends, realizing all elements of buddhahood, and embodying the vows of enlightening beings. 
In this frame of mind, with these thoughts, engaged in such reasoning, with faith in the grace of all enlightening beings, with admiration for the determination of all enlightening beings, with respect for the determination of all enlightening beings, with reverence for the purity of the senses of all enlightening beings, with the powers of purity of sense derived from attentiveness to the teachings of all enlightening beings, with clarity of mind deriving from respecting all enlightening beings, with provisions of roots of goodness deriving from faith in all enlightening beings, with varieties of offerings deriving from the accomplishments of all enlightening beings, with expressions of respect made equally to all enlightening beings, with observations of the variety of eyes developed in the bodies of all beings, with productions of arrays of descriptions of the conceptual worlds of all beings made with the clarity of expression of all enlightening beings, with perception of the state of presence in the abodes of all buddhas by fulfillment of the mystic power of all enlightening beings of past and present, with awareness of the miracles of buddhas and enlightening beings everywhere, following the all-pervasiveness of the bodies of all buddhas and enlightening beings in every single point, with perception of the light of superknowledge of the purity of vision of all enlightening beings, with a mind sense comprehending the network of all places as a whole, pervading all levels of the cosmos, with the power of accomplishment of vows, extending everywhere throughout the entirety of space, continuous through past, present, and future, ceaselessly penetrating all truths, entering all areas illumined by the instructions of all spiritual benefactors, by the penetrating power of faith and resolve, Sudhana, his mind pursuing such thoughts of respect, reverence, honor, submission, regard, empowerment, and determination, with the eye of knowledge intent upon the ground of the realm of such infinite knowledge, prostrated himself in front of the door of the great tower, chamber of the adornments of Vairocana, the illuminator. 
Contemplating such application of accomplishment for a while, by the power of effectuation of resolute vows, deriving from intense faith, Sudhana projected himself continuously into the presence of all buddhas, and likewise into the presence of all enlightening beings, to the abodes of all spiritual benefactors, to all monuments of buddhas, to all statues of buddhas, to the abodes of all enlightening beings and buddhas, to the locations of all treasures of true teaching, to the presence of all monuments to saints and individual illuminates, to the vicinities of all groups of sages, worthies, and parents: 
he continuously projected himself into the presence of all beings, by entering into the totality of the body of knowledge, extending everywhere, by focusing attention through knowledge of control of formation of mental images. 
And just as he prostrated himself before the great tower of the chamber of the adornments of Vairocana, in the same way he prostrated himself before all the aforementioned beings and objects throughout the cosmos. 
“In this way, continuously mystically manifesting the eons of the endless future, by equanimity like the infinity of space, equanimity like the nonobstruction of the reality realm, equanimity toward the omnipresent ultimate limit of reality, the equanimity of absence of false notions in those who realize Thusness, the pervasiveness of perceptions of reflectional knowledge, equanimity toward thoughts as being like dreams, equanimity toward the representations of all worlds as being like reflections, equanimity toward conditional origins being like echoes, equanimity toward nonorigination, equanimity toward formation and disintegration, and equanimity toward the evolution of causal conditions as being equal to nonexistence, believing that development takes place according to actions, believing that results come about according to causes, believing that all Three Vehicles come to be according to accumulation of spiritual practices, believing that the appearance of all buddhas comes from faith, believing that all creations of offerings to buddhas come from devotion, believing that all projections of buddhas derive from respect, believing that the nature of all buddhas derives from the accumulation of virtues, believing that all arrays of mental adornments derive from wisdom and technique, believing that all buddha-teachings derive from vows, believing all the arrays of adornments spreading throughout the realm of realities, the sphere of omniscience, by the practices of all enlightening beings, derive from dedication; and by elimination of nihilism by knowledge of dedication, by elimination of the notion of permanence by knowledge of nonorigination, by elimination of erroneous views of causality by knowledge of causality, by elimination of false views by independent knowledge, by elimination of notions of self and others by knowledge of interdependence, by elimination of views attached to extremes by knowledge of the reality realm without extremes or mean, by elimination of the notion of transmigration by knowledge of the equal extinction of all abodes, by elimination of notions of becoming and decay by knowledge of nonorigination and nonextinction, by elimination of all views by knowledge of the nonorigination of emptiness, by dealing with the nonindependent nature of things with the power of knowledge of how to accomplish vows, by detachment from all notions of appearances by knowledge of the signless ultimate, due to the nature of things being unperishing like seeds producing sprouts, due to the nature of things being like the impression of a stamp, due to the nature of things being like seeing reflected images, due to the nature of things as being represented by sounds that are like echoes, due to the nature of things as arising from acts that are like illusions, due to the nature of things as rousing the formless world of mind, due to the nature of things as results conforming to the accumulation of causes and conditions, due to the nature of things as like developments according to accumulation of acts, due to the nature of things as outgrowths of skill in means, due to the nature of things as flowing into the transcendent equality of reality and unreality—with conscious thought accomplishing entry into knowledge thus, Sudhana prostrated himself before the great tower, the chamber of adornments of Vairocana. 
After a long while, his being flooded by the energy of inconceivable roots of goodness, his body and mind refreshed, he rose from the doorstep of the tower, gazed with unblinking eyes at the great tower containing the adornments of Vairocana, circled it respectfully hundreds of thousands of times, and voiced these thoughts: 
“This is abode of those who dwell in the state of emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness; this is the abode of those who dwell in the state of nonconceptualization of all things, those who dwell in the state of the unity of the cosmos, those who dwell in the state of ungraspability of the realm of beings, those who dwell in the state of the nonorigination of all things, those who dwell in the state of nonattachment to all worlds, those who dwell in the state of nonreliance on what all worldlings rely on, those who dwell in the state of having shed everything those who dwell in the state of independence from all supports, those who dwell in the state of independence of all bodily existence, those who dwell in the state of annihilation of all afflictive notions, those who dwell in the state of the essence of all things, those who dwell in the state of freedom from false imaginings, those who dwell in the state of detachment from all thought, those who dwell in the state of neither entering nor leaving all perceptions, those who dwell in the state of entry into profound transcendent wisdom, those who dwell in the state of capacity to penetrate the realm of reality in all its aspects, those who dwell in the state of ability to extinguish all afflictions, those who dwell in the higher state of wisdom free from all views, cravings, and conceits, those who dwell in the state of freedom arising from higher knowledge of all meditations, liberations, concentrations and spiritual attainments, those who dwell in the state of development of all spheres of concentration of enlightening beings, those who dwell in the state of presence with all buddhas. 
This is the abode of those who dwell in the state where one eon enters all eons and all eons enter one eon; those who dwell in the state of the totality of one land and all lands as one land; those who dwell in the state where one thing and all things, all things and one thing, harmonize without conflict; those who dwell in the state of the unity of one being and all beings as one being; those who dwell in the state of nonduality of one buddha and all buddhas, all buddhas and one buddha; those who dwell in the state of instantaneous penetration of all meanings; those who dwell in the state of going to all lands in a single mental pulse; those who dwell in the state of appearance in the abodes of all beings; those who dwell in the state of willing welfare and happiness for all beings; those who dwell in the state of attainment of complete independence. 
“This is the abode of those who have dropped all attachments to the world yet appear in the abodes of all beings in order to develop them to maturity; those who are not attached to any land but travel in all lands in the service of buddhas, those who travel in all lands to encompass the arrangement of all buddha-lands, without leaving where they are; those who are in the presence of all buddhas while free from attachment to the conception of Buddha; those who continue to associate with spiritual friends, even though they have no peer in any world in terms of knowledge; those who dwell in the abodes of all demons while yet being detached from passion; those who dwell in the state of comprehension of all ideas while their minds are clear of all ideas; those who adapt to all beings without duality between self and other; those who are physically present in all worldly realms without being cut off from the realm of reality; those who vow to remain in the world for all time without dwelling on the idea of long or short periods; those who appear in all worlds without moving from one spot. 
“This is the abode of those who abide in the state of entering everywhere into the recondite realms of truth; those who dwell in the state hard to know; those who dwell in the profound state; those who dwell in the nondual state; those who dwell in the signless state; those who dwell in the unopposed state; those who dwell in the ungraspable state; those who dwell in the nonconceptual state; those who dwell in the state inconceivable to all individual illuminates; those who dwell in the state that is beyond the sphere of all demons; those who dwell in the state that is undefiled by any worldly objects; those who dwell in the state of the transcendent ways of enlightening beings; those who dwell in the state of conformity to the state of all buddhas. 
“This is the abode of those who dwell in the state that is void of signs yet do not enter the unchangeability of individual illuminates; those who dwell in the abode of nonorigination of all things and yet do not fall into the condition of nonorigination; those who dwell in contemplation of impurity yet do not make the condition of dispassion their final realization, nor do they live with elements of passion; those who dwell in the state of love, their minds not stained by hatred; those who dwell on interdependent origination, ultimately free from delusion in regard to all things; those who dwell in the four meditation states, yet do not come under the sway of meditation; those who dwell on the four immeasurables, yet do not go to the world of pure form, so that they may develop all sentient beings; those who dwell in the states of the four formless attainments, yet do not go to the formless world, because of universal compassion; those who dwell in the state of tranquillity and insight, yet do not realize knowledge and liberation for themselves alone, so that they may develop all sentient beings; those who dwell in the state of universal equanimity, yet do not abandon the realm of sentient beings; those who dwell in the state of emptiness yet do not stick to it as a view; those whose sphere is not in appearances yet who confront the guidance of beings who act on appearances; those who have no wishes at all, yet do not give up the vows of enlightening beings; those who can control all active afflictions, yet for the sake of developing sentient beings appear to act under the influence of afflictions; those who have ended death and birth by perfect knowledge, yet appear to be born and die; those who are detached from all conditions of existence, yet go into all conditions of existence by the power to guide all beings; those who dwell in love but have no emotional attachment; those who dwell in compassion but show no hesitation; those who dwell in joy but are always grieving because they watch all who are suffering; those who dwell in equanimity while working for others; those who dwell in the attainments of the nine successive stages of meditation, yet do not disdain the realm of desire; those who are independent of all becoming yet do not dwell in the experience of the absolute; those who dwell in the three liberations but do not dwell in the feeling of liberation of individual saints; those who observe the four holy truths but do not dwell in the experience of the result; those who dwell in profound contemplation of interdependent origination but do not dwell in attachment to the ultimate; those who practice the eightfold holy path but do not dwell in ultimate emancipation; those who transcend the states of sentient beings but do not dwell in attachment to individual liberation; those who have perfect knowledge of the five grasping clusters but do not dwell in ultimate extinction of the clusters; those who are beyond the four demons but do not dwell on the idea of demons; those who have transcended the senses yet do not remain ultimately inoperative; those who dwell in Thusness, but do not dwell in the absolute limit of reality; those who show all vehicles of emancipation but do not leave the Great Vehicle—this is the abode of those who abide in all virtues.” Then Sudhana spoke these verses: 
Here is the compassionate, pure-minded Maitreya, Radiant with love, striving for the good of the world; At the stage of coronation, heir of the buddhas, He dwells in contemplation of the enlightened realm. 
This is the realm of great knowledge Of the illustrious offspring of buddhas, secure in liberation; This is the abode of those unrivaled ones Who travel the realm of reality without attachment. 
This is the abode of those risen from the power of discipline, generosity, patience, and vigor, Who have reached perfection of the power of mystic knowledge by meditations, Who are firm in wisdom, technique, resolve, and power, Who have reached the goal of the Great Vehicle. 
This is the abode of those of unobstructed intellect and broad mind, Enjoying the realm of space, free from dependence, Penetrating all times, free from obstruction, Clearly perceiving all being and becoming. 
Those who understand the principle of nonorigination of all things Realize the nature of things as of the essence of space; They do not rest on anything, like a bird in the sky— This is the abode of those who are perfect in knowledge. 
Those who, knowing the nature of passion, hatred, and delusion As unreal, evolving from thoughts, Go to dispassion, free from conception— This is their abode, who have realized peace and tranquillity. 
Investigating the doors of liberation, the truths, their meanings, The path, the clusters, the senses, beings, and relativity, Those who do not become attached to quiescience, Who have wisdom and skill in means—this is their abode. 
This is the abode of those who have entered the realm of unobstructed knowledge, In whom vain imaginings and false thoughts of lands and beings have ceased, Who have abandoned the notion of self-existence of things, Do not grasp things, and are filled with peace. 
Those who traverse this cosmos unattached and unhindered Roam free of existents, like the wind in the sky; Free from all dependence, acting independently, This is their abode, those of independent wisdom. 
This is the abode of the compassionate ones Who radiate love to extinguish all the ills Of all beings in the miserable states of views Suffering grievous pains. 
In the confines of the mundane whirl, having lost the path of the wise, Like a troop of people born blind without a guide; Those who see the world like this and guide them to the path of liberation, Like the leader of a caravan—this is their abode. 
This is the abode of those invincible warriors Who see the world in the snare of demons, Mastered by birth, sorrow, old age, and death, And lead the way to safety, peace, and emancipation. 
Seeing this world afflicted, diseased, They gather the medicines of immortal knowledge And foster release, with great compassion; This is the abode of those like master physicians. 
This is the abode of those like mariners Who make a ship of good ways To save those fallen in the sea of death, a mass of sorrows, Soothing troubled, helpless beings. 
Those of pure minds devoted to omniscience Who relieve beings in the sea of affliction, Cross the ocean of existence and pull them out— This is their abode, who are like fishers. 
This is the abode of those like giant birds Who watch the abodes of all beings With love and compassion, based on great vows, And pull beings out of the sea of existence. 
This is the abode of those who course in the sky of reality, As suns and moons illumining the abodes of beings, With the orb of vows and rays of knowledge Lighting up the world. 
This is the abode of the steadfast Who remain for eons to develop even one being, And as for one do the same for all, As refuges for the world. 
This is the abode of those of adamant will Who spend endless ages in a single land Working tirelessly for the benefit of the world, And as in one land, do the same everywhere in the ten directions. 
This is the abode of those like oceans of intellect Who imbibe the multitudes of teachings of buddhas In the ten directions at a single sitting And continue forever, alert and never complacent. 
This is the abode of those unobstructed in action Who go forth to untold oceans of lands, Enter the assemblies of the Guides, And serve the buddhas in various ways. 
This is the abode of the mines of all virtue Who have entered the infinite ocean of practice, Steadfast, plunging into the ocean of vows, Acting for the weal of the world for myriad eons. 
This is the abode of those with unobstructed eyes Who perceive infinite lands, buddhas, beings, And ages, in a single point, going in and out Without encountering any boundaries. 
This is the abode of those exalted in perfection of virtue Who perceive myriad eons, lands, buddhas, and beings In a single moment of awareness, Based on unobstructed knowledge. 
This is the abode of those unattached and unhindered in action Who carry out as many vows As atoms in all lands And drops of water in the oceans. 
They enter holy undertakings, mnemonic powers, concentrations, Meditations, liberations, and vows, Practicing these for endless eons; The mindful offspring of Buddha are in here. 
Here abide the offspring of Buddha, various, diverse; They carry out many instructive talks, And, considering arts and sciences beneficial to the world, They dwell here, in the abode of the wise. 
Here they dwell, in knowledge of means of supercognition, Of all the different patterns of existence everywhere; They see births and deaths everywhere, While grounded in liberation within illusion, unhindered in action. 
Abiding here, from their first determination, They show spiritual practice based on the good; Filling the cosmos with multitudes of emanations, Thus they show hundreds of miracles. 
Those who awaken to enlightenment in an instant of awareness Enter an endless variety of acts of knowledge; This is the abode of those who have reached what is hard to attain, Such that the thought of it would drive the worldling mad. 
This is the abode of those whose minds are unhindered, Who course in the unobstructed reality realm, Whose sphere is that of nongrasping, Whose will and intellect are pure. 
This is the abode of the peerless ones Who live and act in all worlds Without attachment, who abide In knowledge of nonduality. 
This is the abode of the dispassionate Who realize phenomena are like space in essence, Without any basis, quiescent, And live among them as in space. 
Here abide the merciful Who see the world injured by pain and sorrow And concentrate on the welfare of the world, Filled with great compassion. 
Here the infinitely liberated Appear in the abodes of all beings Like the sun and moon, Free from the snare of the mundane whirl. 
Here the offspring of Buddha stay, Yet in the presence of all buddhas, Appearing in all lands, Throughout endless eons. 
While here they pervade all directions With multitudes of emanations, As many as the bodies of all enlightening beings, Equal to the universe. 
The valiant ones are all in here Examining the sphere of the enlightened; They abide for countless eons Yet never become surfeited. 
Here, in each instant awakening To untold millions of concentrations, They reveal the realm of buddhahood In accord with the concentration they enter. 
Those of vast perception here Instantly gain access to Eons, lands, and buddha-names, Throughout measureless eons. 
Here they enter infinite eons In a single thought, Free of false ideas, By control of thoughts of the world. 
Here, in the abode of concentration, They see past, present, and future, Pinpointed on each instant, As they roam in the palace of liberation. 
While here in this abode, Sitting cross-legged, without disappearing They simultaneously appear In all lands, everywhere. 
Abiding here, these mighty ones Drink of the ocean of buddhas’ teachings, Having gone into the sea of knowledge And reached the other shore of inexhaustible virtue. 
Here, with unobstructed thought, They think of the number of all buddhas, The number of all lands and ages, And the number of all phenomena as well. 
Staying here, the offspring of buddhas Instantly discern the formation and decay Of all the lands there be In past, present, and future. 
Here, in the palace of enlightening beings, They observe in all their difference The action of the buddhas, The aspirations and faculties of beings. 
In a single atom they see Congregations, lands, beings, and ages, As numerous as all atoms, All there without obstruction. 
Here they discern the essence of things, Of all lands, ages, and buddhas, As without inherent existence, Through the principles of nonbecoming. 
Here they observe the equality Of beings, phenomena, and buddhas, And discern the equality of lands and endeavors Of past, present, and future. 
The steadfast ones here in this best of abodes Guide millions of other beings, Glorify millions of buddhas, And also contemplate phenomena. 
In millions of eons I could not tell The scope of the undertakings and knowledge Of the wise, beyond thought, So endlessly vast is it. 
I bow in respect to the abode Of the blameless ones in the realm of nonobstruction And to the noble Maitreya, best of enlightening beings, Unhindered in action, incomparably pure in mind, always aware. 
Having praised and honored the enlightening beings dwelling in the great tower of the chamber of adornments of Vairocana in this way with innumerable eulogies of enlightening beings, Sudhana stood at the foot of the tower wishing to see the great enlightening being, desirous of meeting Maitreya. 
Then he saw Maitreya outside the tower, coming from somewhere else, followed by a great number of beings, respectfully flanked by the gods Indra, Brahma, and the world guardians, surrounded by many relatives and priests, coming toward the great tower of the chamber of the adornments of Vairocana. 
Seeing Maitreya, Sudhana was uplifted in mind, very happy and joyful, and prostrated himself before Maitreya from afar. 
Now Maitreya, seeing Sudhana, pointed him out to the crowd with his right hand and spoke these verses eulogizing the virtuous qualities he had actualized: 
Look at Sudhana, pure in mind, born of enduring riches; Seeking the practice of supreme enlightenment, this wise one has come to me. 
Welcome, son of compassion and love, universally kind; Welcome, tranquil eyes; do not flag in practice. 
Welcome, pure of heart, tireless in mind; Welcome, buoyant in sense; do not flag in practice. 
Having set out to contemplate all truths, guide all beings, And follow all spiritual benefactors, You are welcome, with your unshakable, steadfast resolve. 
You are welcome, having come by a good path, on the path of virtue; You are welcome, having set forth on the path of the Victors; May you succeed, never stopping. 
Welcome, full of virtue, enriched by goodness; Your scope of action is endless; it is rare to see such as you in the world. 
You consider gain and not gaining equal, you are beyond censure, Misery, and ill repute; like a lotus, unstained by worldly things, You are undistracted in mind. 
Your heart is pure, free of guile and deceit, a good receptacle, Free from pride and conceit; free from anger, not arrogant, You are a welcome sight. 
Attentive to all fields of awareness, born of the treasures of every dimension, Developing the treasuries of all buddhas; welcome, indefatigable one. 
Aware of past, present, and future, absorbed in the reality realm, Born of the womb of virtues of all buddhas; welcome, tireless hero. 
Sprung from the ground of Manjushri’s knowledge, grown by the watering Of Meghashri, having sought out all enlightening beings, come— I will show you the unimpeded realm. 
See this net of vows, pervading the cosmos, inconceivable; Spreading it, drawing forth the path of enlightening practice, Sudhana has come. 
Seeking the realm of the Victors, pursuing the practice of the undefiled, Inquiring into the ocean of vows, this indefatigable one has arrived. 
Asking where the past guides have studied, what the future ones will learn, And what the present ones practice, he has come here. 
He comes with the thought of spiritual teachers, Guides to the realization of all truths, Teachers of the path of enlightening practice— Thus he has come here. He comes with these thoughts: 
“Enlightening beings increase my wisdom And grant me enlightenment, they are praised by the buddhas. 
“They are my parents, my wet nurses of virtue, always protecting my limbs of enlightenment, keeping me free from all harm. 
“As physicians they release me from old age and death, As celestial beings they shower the ambrosia of immortality; They are like the moon, clear and full, like the sun, Showing the way to peace. 
“They are like polar mountains, impartial to friend and foe, Like oceans, unshakable in mind, like pilots and protectors. 
“They are valiant givers of fearlessness, reliable caravan leaders, guides who give me well-being”—with these thoughts he serves the Friends. 
“They always show all spheres of truth, Showing the virtue and knowledge of all buddhas; Removing the ills of all states of woe, They show me what is good. 
“They bestow the treasures of buddhas, They guard the treasuries of the Victors; They are holders of the secrets of the buddhas”— Thus this wise one follows the Friends. 
See this wise one of lofty aspiration serving the Friends; You should study as he indicates. 
By virtue of past goodness he saw Manjushri and set out for enlightenment, Acting on Manjushri’s instructions; observe his perseverance. 
Having given up all comforts, home, family, and wealth, like an immortal, He attends the Friends as a servant. 
Having purified his mind and relinquished his body, this wise one Will see the abode of all buddhas and henceforth develop this fruit. 
Seeing people afflicted with sickness, beings tortured by a hundred pains, Burning with the fears and sorrows of birth and death, He compassionately acts for their benefit. 
Seeing the world beaten by the mechanisms of suffering, In the repetitious circle of conditioning, He seeks the adamantine knowledge That breaks the mechanism of suffering and the circle of conditioning. 
Aiming to clear all lands of the weeds and brambles of lust and hatred, Infestations of clinging to views, sprouts of harm, He seeks the strong plow of wisdom. 
The mind of the world is thick with delusion and ignorance, Bereft of the eye of wisdom, without a guide; He will become a leader of the world, Showing the way to the abode of safety. 
He will be a conveyor of tolerance and liberation, Assailing the enemy afflictions with the sword of knowledge, Heroic bestower of freedom from fear, teacher of the world. 
He is assembling the ship of the Teaching, Having learned the route of the ocean of knowledge; He is a helmsman on the sea of existence, Leading to the treasure island of peace. 
This buddha-sun will rise in the sky of reality, a great light, An orb of vows with rays of knowledge, illumining the abodes of all beings. 
This buddha-moon will rise, a full orb of virtues Equally cooling with higher love, exquisite light impartial toward all. 
Based on a firm ground of will, enlightenment practice gradually rising, He will become an ocean of knowledge, mine of all spiritual jewels. 
Born of the dragon of the mind of enlightenment, ascended into the sky of reality, Raining the teachings everywhere, he fosters all good fruits. 
He will light the lamp of truth, the pure wick, Dispelling the darkness of defilement, The lamp in a strong vessel of love and awareness, Glowing with the pure flame of the spirit of enlightenment. 
From the embryo of the aspiration for enlightenment, compassion, and love, Gradually developing the limbs of enlightenment, this baby buddha is growing. 
He will develop the embryo of virtue and clarify the path of knowledge; He is recognized as an embryo of knowledge, developed in accord With the womb of vows. 
One like this, girt with compassion and love, An altruist determined to liberate beings, Is hard to find in the world, celestial or human, So pure is his mind. 
Based on good roots of mind, grown through steadfast effort, Shading the three realms of being—such a fruit-bearing tree of knowledge Is hard to find. 
Aiming to develop all virtues, inquire into all truths, And break through all doubts, he serves the Friends with diligence. 
Destroying the afflictions of demons, clearing away views, defilement, and craving, Intent on freeing all beings, he has learned to do what is best. 
He will clear away the states of woe and show heaven; he will lead the world On the road of liberation, on which virtuous path he stands. 
He will free them from the straits of views, Cut through the entanglements of the web of craving, Clear away blameworthy passions, And become a guide on the path for the world. 
He will be a refuge for the world, providing light for all beings, A guide in the three realms of existence, knowing becoming and decay everywhere. 
He will purify people asleep in affliction, wisely pulling them from the mud of lust, Freeing them from clinging to notions, liberating them from bondage. 
Rejoice, Sudhana, for you will illumine the various aspects of reality, Illumine the various aspects of the world, And reach the goal of the various aspects of all truths. 
As your behavior is mild, as your faith is impeccable, As your intention is virtuous, you shall fulfill them all. 
You will see all buddhas soon, you will soon go to all lands, You will soon know all truths—such good have you done on your own. 
You will purify many lands and liberate masses of beings; You will fulfill myriad practices—such are your many attainments. 
You will be a vessel of virtues, a source of good; You will be equal to the offspring of buddhas, in accord with your devotion. 
You have conquered the demons and purified your actions; You have cleared away the afflictions in accord with your vows. 
You will clear the path of knowledge and realize the path of truth; Before long you will halt the course of the mechanism of suffering, Which is due to afflictions in action. 
You will turn the supreme wheel of truth, breaking the cycle of suffering Of all beings, which is based on the routines of the world, The circle of becoming, gone astray in repetition of mundane states. 
You will preserve the lineage of buddhas, purify the lineage of the Teaching, Support the spiritual Community, and become a source of treasures. 
You will remove the web of craving and the dense net of views, You will free the world from the net of suffering, Having purified such a network of vows. 
You will perfect beings, purify the world, and establish The realm of knowledge—such is your intention. 
You will bring greater felicity, beneficially gladdening sentient beings, Gladdening the family of enlightening beings, satisfying the wishes of all buddhas. 
You will be a buddha clearly seeing the abodes of all states of being, Seeing reflections of all lands and the scope of all truths. 
You will be a light illumining the reality realm, Extinguishing all states of woe, bringing felicity to existence. 
You will lead away from false paths into the path of sages; You will humbly follow the path of enlightenment, resolute and diligent. 
Intent on freeing beings in the sea of existence from suffering, You will save the world from the sea of existence— Become such an ocean of virtue. You will evaporate the sea of afflictions of beings With the transcendent lights of the sun of knowledge; Introducing them to the ocean of spiritual practice, You will lead them into the ocean of knowledge. 
You will increase the ocean of understanding And purify the ocean of practice; Soon you will plunge deep into the ocean Of the vows of all buddhas. 
You will view many oceans of lands and see the oceans of congregations therein; By the power of the ocean of understanding, you will imbibe the ocean of teachings. 
You will see multitudes of buddhas and will make myriads of offerings; You will hear millions of truths—such are the vows you make. 
You will go to the abodes of all lands, to all the abodes of beings, And will observe the abodes of all buddhas—this is the direction you are taking. 
You will observe the abode of concentration and tell of the abodes of liberation; You will dwell in spiritual powers, grounded in the reality realm. 
You will rise over the abodes of all beings, like the light of sun and moon, And ascend to the presence of the buddhas—such is your climb on the great path. 
You will walk in the realm of good, in the realm unattached to any world, And attain supreme peace—such is your realm of higher knowledge. 
The differentiations of the cosmic network, And all the differentiations of the network of lands, Soon you will see, pervading, like the wind unhindered in the sky. 
Do not be downhearted, be happy and content, In that you have seen, see, and will see yet such liberation as this. 
Sudhana, you are a good vessel of virtues, following the instructions of Buddha; You are fit to bear this Teaching—by it you see this wonder. 
Such as are hard to see in millions of eons, much more to reveal their virtues, You have seen carrying out good practice, enlightening beings In the realm of nonattachment. 
You are welcome in the human world; inconceivably great is your gain, That you have seen Manjushri face to face and made such a vessel of virtue. 
You have left the stage of the ignorant and are firmly grounded In the virtues of enlightening beings; having fulfilled The greatest knowledge, soon you will attain buddhahood. 
Enlightening practice is like an ocean, enlightened knowledge is like space, The ocean of vows is equally vast—you should be happy with these. 
The Friends are indefatigable, firm in will, and sure in application; Those who follow such Friends as these will soon become guides themselves. 
Seeing how various are the many practices of enlightening beings To educate sentient beings, do not become perplexed About enlightenment practice that confronts all realities. 
See how great is your gain in seeing enlightening beings continuously; They each show you your vows, and you follow them all. 
Hard to find even in hundreds of lifetimes Is such a participant in the practices of enlightening beings; Therefore the enlightening beings, one after another, Show you their ways of liberation. 
People live with enlightening beings for millions and billions of ages Yet do not know of their state, nor make themselves vessels of virtue. 
You hear this teaching, and see what is hard to find in the world, The spiritual manifestation of greatness of enlightening beings— You should be uplifted in mind. 
All the buddhas are minding you, the enlightening beings are caring for you, And you are grounded in their teaching—bravo, Sudhana, you live a good life. 
You live according to the principles of the family of enlightening beings, And learn the qualities of the offspring of buddhas; You will prolong the lineage of buddhas—you should be most joyful. 
All buddhas are your peerless parents, all enlightening beings your siblings; The elements of enlightenment are all your relatives— Nobly born are you, as an offspring of the buddhas. 
Sustainer of the lineage of spiritual sovereigns, Prolonger of the lineage of enlightening beings, You will attain buddhahood soon, so be happy, Sudhana, full of joy. 
Soon you will receive the supreme marvelous coronation of all buddhas And become equal to the peerless heirs of the Victors. 
As a man sows a seed, so shall he reap the fruit; Today I bring you glad tidings, that you may find inconceivable joy. 
Even unthinkable millions of enlightening beings Who have carried out this practice for millions of eons Have not attained such accomplishment As you have realized in one lifetime. 
This is all the fruit of devotion and firmness and vigor of will; Those who admire this practice should take up what Sudhana has done. 
All practice derives from vows, all qualities derive from application; Sudhana, you have accomplished this, forever the best course of conduct. 
The extent to which the dragons will is the extent to which rain is produced; The extent of the scope of vows and knowledge is the extent of pervasion Of enlightenment practice. 
This should be shown to you, Sudhana, by the practice of the good; Once one realizes this, one will be serving the Friends thereby. 
Remember the millions of bodies past that you squandered uselessly for lust; Now pursuing the path of enlightenment, this body, well disciplined, Should be critical. 
Over millions of eons past you experienced all miseries in conditioned states; Having turned away from myriad buddhas, you did not hear such a doctrine as this. 
Now you have got your chance as a human, in the presence of Buddha, With such spiritual friends; how could one not be purified when one has heard of the practice of supreme enlightenment? 
Even if there are buddhas existing and the Teaching is heard From spiritual friends and benefactors, If one does not listen to this doctrine one’s mind will not be purified. 
By it an attitude of faith and devotion is produced, supreme respect; Getting rid of desire, views, and lassitude, listen to this Teaching more and more. 
Hearing of such an entry into practice, whoever accomplishes this undertaking Makes a supreme gain, inconceivable—this human life is worthwhile. 
For one whose mind is thus purified, the buddhas are not hard to find, The enlightening beings are all friends, and there is no more doubt of enlightenment. 
One who has entered such a teaching keeps all the precepts, Abandons all causes of misery, and embraces all virtues. 
Soon, relinquishing this body, you will go to a buddha-land, purified; You will see the abode of enlightening beings and behold the buddhas everywhere. 
You have completed a set of past causes, Sudhana, based on your devotion; You serve the Friends with the highest aim, thereby growing like a lotus in water. 
Intent on rapport with all spiritual friends and with all buddhas, Intent on seeking out all truths, arise, well disciplined, and do not weary. 
Set out to apply all truths and follow all the paths; offspring of Buddha, Grounded on vows, arise, vessel of all virtues. 
Through such perfect devotion you have paid this honor to me; Soon you will come into the presence of the assemblies of all buddhas. 
Bravo, Sudhana, buoyant in mind, conscious of the vows of all buddhas; Firm in resolve, you soon will reach the perfection of virtue of buddhas. 
Ask Manjushri about ultimate liberation in the realm of knowledge; He will initiate you into the highest practice of good in your final existence. 
Thus Maitreya, seeing Sudhana arrive, imbued with virtues, in the realm of nonobstruction, revealed him to the assembly, speaking of his treasury of qualities. 
Sudhana, hearing such supreme direction and instruction, was flooded with joy and burst into tears. 
He rose and paid his respects to Maitreya. 
Then, by the mental power of Manjushri, there appeared in his hands beautiful flower garlands and jewels, produced by the vows of enlightening beings; blissfully, Sudhana showered these on Maitreya. 
Then Maitreya patted him on the head and said, “It is good that you are so indefatigable, Sudhana; you will be a vessel of virtues, like Manjushri and me.” Hearing this, Sudhana disclosed the joy of his heart: 
“It is hard to find, even in hundreds of lifetimes, such Friends as these whom I have now met. 
By the direction of the honorable Manjushri, perfect in true virtue, I have found this rare Friend. 
This sincere good person has set out to save all beings, undertaken to liberate all beings from misery, to evaporate all bad tendencies, to put an end to all states that are inopportune for attaining enlightenment, to block off all perilous roads, to dispel all darkness of ignorance, to cross all the wastelands of the mundane whirl, to stop all vicious circles, to get beyond the reach of all demons, to remove all attachment and dependence, to rescue people from the mire of lust, to abandon passion for joy, to remove the fetters of views, stop attachment to the body as real, cut through the snare of conception, stop the pursuit of error, to pluck out the thorns of delusion, to break through obstacles, to shatter the mountains of obstructions, to remove the net of craving, to dissolve the bonds of ignorance, to illuminate existence, to do away with guile and deceit, to clear mental disturbance, to remove doubt and confusion, to get out of the current of ignorance and delusion, to repel all the ills of the mundane whirl. 
“Indeed, good people, this worthy wishes to assemble the ship of the Teaching, a precious gift, to rescue beings from the four torrents. 
He wishes to set up the great bridge of the Teaching for those sunk in the morass of views. 
He wishes to produce the light of knowledge for those in the darkness of delusion. 
He wishes to point out the path of sages to those lost in the wilderness of the mundane whirl. 
He wishes to dispense the medicine of the teaching to those suffering from the illness of afflictions. 
He wishes to give the element of immortality to those assailed by birth, old age, and death. 
He wishes to cool those burning with the three fires by means of the water of tranquillity. 
He wishes to give great comfort to those suffering from sorrow, grief, misery, and depression. 
He wishes to give those bound in the prison of existence the knowledge of how to break out. 
He wishes to give the sword of wisdom to those tied up in the bonds of views. 
He wishes to show the door of liberation to those locked in the city of the triple world. 
He wishes to show the direction of safety to those headed in dangerous directions. 
He wishes to comfort those suffering from the joint operation of afflictions. 
He wishes to lend a hand to those terrorized by the perils of falling into states of woe. 
He wishes to show the citadel of nirvana to those struck by the murderous clusters. 
He wishes to tell those surrounded by the serpents of the elements how to escape. 
To those loitering in the ghost town of the sense media, he wishes to show the way out by the light of wisdom. 
Those on wrong paths he wishes to lead into the right path. 
To the friendless he wishes to show true spiritual friends. 
Those clinging to the realm of the infantile unenlightened condition he wishes to initiate into the teachings of sages. 
Those clinging to the city of the mundane whirl he wishes to lead away into the city of omniscience. 
“Thus, for the salvation of sentient beings, this worthy, ceaselessly pursuing the complete purification of the aspiration for enlightenment, is tireless in mastering the Great Vehicle, never complacent in seeking all means of conveying truth, constantly engaged in fulfilling all the provisions for enlightenment, always bearing the responsibility of clarifying all avenues of truth, carrying out all practices of enlightening beings with vigor, not stopping anywhere, carrying out all vows with unbending effort, meeting all spiritual benefactors without complacence, tireless in attendance on all spiritual benefactors, properly following the advice and instruction of all spiritual benefactors. 
“In all the world it is hard to find people who aspire to supreme true enlightenment; it is even harder to find those who set out for supreme true enlightenment, who master the teachings of buddhas with such diligent application, seek the path of enlightening beings with such ardor, purify the practice of enlightening beings with such purposefulness, attend spiritual benefactors with such diligence, follow the knowledge of spiritual benefactors with such urgency, carry out the instructions of spiritual benefactors with such unbending determination, assemble the elements of enlightenment with such correct understanding, be so indifferent to gain, honor, and praise as not to ruin the will appropriate to an enlightening being, seek the Great Vehicle of enlightening beings with such detachment from home and family, comforts, enjoyments, and material goods, and seek omniscience with such indifference to joy and life. 
You have made a great gain, and your existence amid humanity is indeed welcome. 
You live the good life among the living and have satisfied the purpose of the emergence of Buddha in the world. 
You have met the benefactor Manjushri and have made yourself a worthy vessel of truth. 
You have been nourished with virtues and stabilized on good qualities. 
You have purified high resolve and good intention. 
You are minded by all buddhas, and you are in the care of all spiritual friends. 
By this intent of yours you have developed the determination for supreme perfect enlightenment. “What is the reason? 
The determination for enlightenment is the seed of all elements of buddhahood; it is like a field, growing good qualities in all beings; it is like the earth, being a support for all beings; it is like water, washing away all afflictions; it is like wind, unattached to all worlds,; it is like fire, burning up the deadwood of clinging to views; it is like the sun, illumining the abodes of all beings; it is like the moon, fulfilling the sphere of all good qualities; it is like a lamp, producing spiritual light; it is like an eye, seeing the even and the uneven; it is like a road, leading to the city of omniscience; it is like a passageway, leading away from all wrong paths; it is like a vehicle, carrying all enlightening beings; it is like a door, leading into all the practices of enlightening beings; it is like a mansion, because of determination to abide in concentration; it is like a park, because of experience of spiritual pleasures; it is like a home, protecting all beings; it is like a basis, being the practice of all enlightening beings, it is like a father, protecting all enlightening beings; it is like a mother to all beings; it is like a nurse, protecting in every way; it is like a king, overwhelming the mentality of all individually liberated ones; it is like an overlord, because of the excellence of all vows; it is like the ocean, containing all jewels of virtue; it is like the polar mountain, being impartial toward all beings; it is like the surrounding mountains, being a refuge for all beings; it is like the Himalaya, growing the herb of knowledge; it is like intoxicating fragrance, being the seat of all scents of virtue; it is like the sky, because of the great extent of its virtue; it is like a lotus, unstained by any things of the world; it is like an elephant, patient and noble; it is like a horse of good breed, free from all unruliness; it is like a charioteer, being the driver of the Great Vehicle; it is like medicine, curing the ills of afflictions; it is like a pit, because in it all bad qualities disappear; it is like a thunderbolt, penetrating all things; it is like a chest of incense, producing the aroma of all virtues; it is like a great flower, pleasant to the sight of all beings; it is like cooling sandalwood, cooling off the burning of passion; it is like the moon, pervading the cosmos; it is like the medicine ‘good to see,’ obliterating all ills due to afflictions; it is like an extracting drug, as it extracts the arrows of evil propensities; it is like a chief of gods, because of mastery of all the faculties; it is like the god of wealth, because it puts an end to all poverty; it is like the goddess of beauty, being adorned with all virtues; it is like jewelry, gracing all enlightening beings; it is like the conflagration that ends an eon, burning up all evildoing; it is like medicine for underdevelopment, because it increases the growth of all enlightened qualities; it is like a dragon pearl, repelling the poison of all afflictions; it is like a water-clearing jewel, because it removes all turbidity and pollution; it is like a wish-fulfilling jewel, granting success in all aims; it is like the horn of plenty, fulfilling all wishes; it is like the desire-granting tree, as it showers the ornaments of all virtues; it is like a goose-feather robe, as it does not absorb any of the ills of the mundane whirl; it is like cotton fiber, being soft in nature; it is like a plow, clearing the mind-field of sentient beings; it is like a warrior, striking down the self; it is like an arrow, piercing its target of suffering; it is like power, overcoming its enemy, afflictions; it is like armor, protecting logical thought; it is like a scimitar, cutting off the head of affliction; it is like a sword blade, slashing through the armor of pride, conceit, and arrogance; it is like a razor, slicing off compulsive propensities; it is like the banner of a hero, bringing down the banner of pride; it is like a machete, felling the tree of ignorance; it is like an ax, cutting through the tree of suffering; it is like combat, being a savior from all attacks; it is like hands, protecting the body of the transcendent ways; it is like feet, being the base of all virtue and knowledge; it is like a surgical probe, cleaning away the covering of the sheath of ignorance; it is like an extracting instrument, extracting the thorn of the notion of self; it is like a hoe, dragging away the thorns of propensities; it is like a benefactor, freeing you from the bonds of the mundane whirl; it is like wealth, rejecting all that is useless; it is like a teacher, knowing the way to carry out all enlightening practices; it is like a mine, having inexhaustible blessings; it is like a fountain, having inexhaustible knowledge; it is like a mirror, showing the reflection of all ways into truth; it is like a white lotus, free from defilement; it is like a great river, carrying forth the streams of the ways of transcendence and the ways of integration; it is like the chief water spirit, causing the clouds of the Teaching to shower; it is like the root of life, sustaining the universal compassion of all enlightening beings; it is like the elixir of immortality, bringing you to the deathless realm; it is like an all-encompassing net, taking in all beings who can be guided; it is like health, producing endless health; it is like an antidote to poison, vitiating the poison of desire; it is like a spell, destroying the poison of all folly; it is like wind, removing all barriers and obstacles; it is like an island of jewels, being a mine of the spiritual jewels of all the limbs of enlightenment; it is like a family, producing all good qualities; it is like a home, being the abode of all virtuous qualities; it is like a market, attended by all enlightening ‘merchants’; it is like liquid metal, clearing all obstructions caused by actions and afflictions; it is like a honeybee, filling the stores of provisions for omniscience; it is like a road, whereby all enlightening beings approach the city of omniscience; it is like a vessel, holding all pure qualities; it is like rain, settling the dust of afflictions; it is like a basis, defining the respective stations of all enlightening beings; it is like a magnet, unaffected by individual liberation; it is like a jewel, inherently pure; it is like an emerald, being totally beyond the knowledge of all individual illuminates and worldlings; it is like the drum that sounds the hour, because it wakes up beings sleeping in affliction; it is like still, clear water, being pure; it is like an ornament of the finest gold, obscuring all collections of virtue in the conditioned realm; it is like an enormous mountain, being invulnerable to anything in the triple world; it is like a savior, not abandoning any who take refuge in it; it is like motivation, because it draws you toward your aim; it is like intelligence, because it creates contentment of the heart; it is like sacrifice, because it satisfies all beings; it is like understanding, because it is what is best in the minds of all beings; it is like a treasury, preserving all enlightened qualities; it is like a summary, containing all the practices and vows of enlightening beings; it is like a protector, protecting all beings; it is like a guardian, repelling all evils; it is like the net of Indra, rounding up the titans of afflictions; it is like the snare of the sky god, rounding up the teachable; it is like the fire of Indra, burning up all habitual propensities and afflictions; it is like a monument for the world. 
In sum, the virtues of the determination for enlightenment are equal to all the qualities and virtues of buddhas. 
Because it is the source of all the practices of enlightening beings, and from it come all buddhas of past, future, and present. Therefore, whoever has aroused the determination for supreme perfect enlightenment becomes imbued with measureless virtues because of being absorbed by the will for omniscience. 
“Just as there is a medicine called ‘fearless’ that prevents five perils—one is not burned by fire, not affected by poison, not wounded by weapons, not swept away by water, not suffocated by smoke—in the same way, an enlightening being who has taken the medicine of the will for omniscience is not burned by the fire of passion, not affected by the poison of objects, not wounded by the weapons of afflictions, not swept away by the torrent of existence, not suffocated by the smoke of false discrimination. 
“Just as there is a medicine called ‘liberated’ that frees one from fear of attack, in the same way an enlightening being who has taken the medicine of knowledge of aspiration for enlightenment has no fear of being impinged upon by the mundane whirl. 
“Just as there is an herb whose scent repels all poisonous snakes, in the same way the scent of the determination for enlightenment wards off the vipers of afflictions. 
“Just as a person who has taken the herb of invincibility is victorious over all enemies, the enlightening being who has taken the herb of invincibility of the will for omniscience is invulnerable to all opposing demons. 
“Just as there is a medicine called ‘extracting’ that removes all barbs, so all barbs of passion, hatred, delusion, and views drop out of the enlightening being who has taken the extracting medicine of the determination for enlightenment. 
“Just as there is a medicine called ‘good to see’ that cures all illnesses, the enlightening being who has taken the good-to-see medicine of the aspiration for enlightenment is cured of all the illnesses of afflictions and ignorance. 
“Just as there is a medicinal tree called ‘continuity’ whose bark heals all wounds and ulcers upon application and which itself regrows as it is stripped, the tree of continuity of omniscience, which grows from the seed of the essence of enlightenment, heals the wounds and ulcers of actions and afflictions of the faithful on sight, and the tree of omniscience cannot be exhausted or killed by all beings. 
“Just as there is a kind of herb that promotes growth, by the efficacy of which all the trees in the continent grow, similarly by the efficacy of the growth-promoting drug of the will for enlightenment, the saints and enlightening beings all grow. 
“Just as there is an herb called ‘attainment of pleasure,’ which when applied to the body produces physical and mental health, in the same way the ‘attainment of pleasure’ herb of the aspiration for omniscience produces physical and mental health in enlightening beings. 
“Just as there is an herb called ‘gaining memory’ that purifies the conscious memory, in the same way the memory herb of the aspiration for enlightenment produces in enlightening beings purity of unhindered memory of all buddha-teachings. 
“Just as there is an herb called ‘great lotus’ by which one may live for an eon, the enlightening being who keeps taking the great spiritual medicine of the will for enlightenment becomes able to live for countless eons. 
“Just as there is an herb of invisibility that renders one invisible to any humans or nonhumans, the enlightening being under the protection of the invisibility herb of the will for enlightenment, who is assured of buddhahood, cannot be seen in the range of all demons. 
“Just as there is a great jewel in the ocean called ‘totality of all jewels,’ which is such that it is impossible for all the eonic fires to evaporate even a drop of the ocean where it is, in the same way it is impossible that enlightening beings whose mental course is imbued with the ‘totality of all jewels’ gem of the determination for omniscience could lose even one virtue dedicated to omniscience; whereas if they abandon the determination for omniscience, all of their roots of goodness would evaporate. 
“Just as there is a great jewel called ‘collection of all lights,’ which in a necklace obscures all jewelry, in the same way an enlightening being wearing the ornament of the ‘collection of all lights’ mind-jewel of the aspiration for enlightenment is unsurpassed by all aspirations to individual salvation. 
“Just as there is a water-clarifying jewel that will clear all turbidity and foulness from water in which it is placed, in the same way the water-clarifying jewel of the determination for enlightenment clears all the murk and turbidity of afflictions. 
“Just as fishers wearing the water dwelling gem do not die in water, in the same way an enlightening being protected by the water-dwelling gem of the will for omniscience does not die in the sea of the mundane whirl. 
“Just as there is a jewel called ‘dragon scale gem,’ with which fishers and others who live from the sea enter the abodes of the dragons without being attacked by dragons or sea serpents, in the same way an enlightening being holding the spiritual jewel of the dragon of knowledge of the determination for omniscience enters the abodes of the realm of desire without being harmed. 
“Just as the chief of gods overwhelms other gods when wearing the jewel of lordship, in the same way the enlightening being wearing the crown of vows with the regal jewel of the aspiration for omniscience overwhelms all in the triple world. 
“Just as someone with a wish-fulfilling jewel does not fear poverty, the enlightening being with the wish-fulfilling jewel of the aspiration for omniscience has no fears about livelihood. 
“Just as a ‘sun beauty’jewel emanates fire when exposed to the sun, in the same way the sunny jewel of the will for omniscience emanates the fire of knowledge when touched by the light rays of the jewel of wisdom. 
“Just as the moon beauty jewel emits water when touched by moonlight, in the same way the moon beauty jewel of the aspiration for enlightenment emits the water of commitment to all good when touched by the light of the moon of dedication of roots of goodness. 
“Just as great elephants wearing a crown of wish-fulfilling jewels have no fear of attack, in the same way those wearing the crown of wish-fulfilling jewels of great compassion of the aspiration for enlightenment have no fear of the ills of the state of misery. 
“Just as a jewel called ‘repository of the adornments of the world’ fulfills the wishes of all beings without ever being exhausted, in the same way the aspiration for enlightenment, the great jewel containing the adornments of all worlds, is never exhausted because of fulfilling the undertaking of enlightenment, which is the wish of all beings. 
“Just as the great jewel of a sovereign king dispels darkness and lights up the palace, in the same way the royal jewel of the aspiration for omniscience dispels the darkness of ignorance in all states of being and radiates the great light of knowledge in the realm of desire. 
“Just as everything bathed in sapphire light becomes blue, wherever the sapphire of the aspiration for omniscience is taken, and whatever roots of goodness are dedicated by the will for omniscience, all become the color of the jewel of omniscience. 
“Just as a jewel in a shower of filth does not absorb any foul odors, in the same way the jewel of the aspiration for enlightenment is not defiled though in the realm of desire, because it is essentially pure. 
“Just as the jewel ‘pure light’ outshines all other jewels, in the same way the jewel of ultimately pure light of the aspiration for omniscience is not overcome by the accumulated virtues of all ordinary people, or all learners, saints, and solitary illuminates. 
“Just as one fiery jewel disperses all darkness, in the same way one fiery jewel of the aspiration for omniscience, coupled with objective observation and correct thought, dispels the darkness of ignorance. 
“Just as a priceless jewel in the hand of a merchant in a boat on the sea is superior in beauty and value to hundreds of thousands of crystals in town, in the same way the priceless jewel of the aspiration for omniscience, even in the ocean of the mundane whirl, in the boat of vows, in the determination of an enlightening being who has just aspired to enlightenment for the first time, even though not having yet reached the city of omniscience, is still superior to the crystals of all hearers and individual illuminates in the town of liberation. 
“Just as the jewel known as the ‘powerful king,’ even when on the surface of the earth, shows the arrays of appearances of the abodes on the far-distant sun and moon, in the same way the powerful king jewel of the aspiration for omniscience, in which all virtues are purified, even while in the mundane whirl shows the arrays of appearances of the spheres of all buddhas in the great sun and moon of knowledge of those who realize Thusness in the reaches of the sky of the cosmos of reality. 
“Just as all the wealth, jewels, silver, gold, flowers, perfumes, garlands, clothes, and furnishings there are as far as the sun and moon shine do not match the worth of the powerful king jewel, in the same way, all the virtues of celestials and humans, all Buddhist disciples and self-illuminates, tainted or untainted, as far as the scope of the reality-realm reveals, do not match the worth of the powerful king jewel of the determination for enlightenment. 
“Just as the jewel known as ‘containing the arrays of the oceans’ shows the arrays of all oceans, in the same way the determination for enlightenment shows the array of the ocean of the scope of all-knowledge. 
“Just as nothing surpasses celestial gold, with the exception of a wish-fulfilling jewel, there is nothing except the wish-fulfilling jewel of omniscience, which surpasses the celestial gold of the aspiration for enlightenment. 
“Just as a master snake-catcher can place all serpents under his control, the enlightening snake-catcher who has mastered the will for enlightenment can place all the serpents of affliction under control. 
“Just as an armed warrior is invulnerable to enemy troops, the enlightening being armed with the determination for omniscience becomes invulnerable to the enemy troops of afflictions. 
“Just as one handful of celestial serpent sandalwood powder perfumes a thousand worlds, and three thousand worlds full of jewels cannot match the worth of an ounce of it, in the same way one element of the celestial serpent sandalwood of the aspiration for omniscience perfumes the whole cosmos with virtue and surpasses the minds of all learners, those who are beyond learning, and self-illuminates. 
“Just as the precious snowy sandalwood stops all burning and cools the whole body, in the same way the snowy sandalwood of the aspiration for omniscience stops the burning of all afflictions, false notions, lust, hatred and delusion, and cools the body of knowledge. 
“Just as all who come to the polar mountain become one color, gold, in the same way all who approach enlightening beings who are entirely dedicated to omniscience become one color, the color of omniscience. 
“Just as the bark of a tree of paradise emits a fragrance that is not found in all the flowers on earth, in the same way the fragrance of the bark of virtue and knowledge of the tree of vows grown from the seed of enlightening beings’ determination for omniscience is not found in any of the flowers of hearers and individual illuminates, who have lesser roots of goodness, in their untainted discipline, concentration, wisdom, liberation, and knowledge and vision of liberation. 
“Just as it can be known of a budding tree of paradise that it will produce hundreds of thousands of blossoms, in the same way it can be known that the paradise tree of the aspiration for omniscience budding with roots of goodness will produce countless flowers of enlightenment, imperfect and perfect, in celestials and humans. 
“Just as the fragrance of cloth or oil perfumed for one day with paradise tree flowers is not to be found in cloth or oil perfumed for a hundred thousand days with jasmine flowers, in the same way the fragrance of enlightening beings’ virtue and knowledge, of the mind and body infused for one lifetime with the determination for omniscience, wafts to the presence of all buddhas in the ten directions, and is not to be found in the fragrance of untainted virtue and spiritual knowledge of those infused for a hundred thousand eons with the aspirations of those who seek individual salvation. 
“Just as there is a kind of tree that grows in an ocean, on all of which, from its roots to its flowers and fruits, all beings are at all times living, in the same way the world is sustained by the process of enlightening, growing from the root of vows based on great compassion, from the initial aspiration for omniscience through the duration and ending of the true teaching. 
“Just as there is an ointment called ‘golden light,’ one ounce of which will make a thousand ounces of copper gold, while those thousand ounces of copper cannot appropriate the ounce of ointment and make it copper, in the same way the one element of the essence of the aspiration for omniscience, concentrated by knowledge of dedication of roots of goodness, takes away the copper of the barriers caused by actions and afflictions and makes them into the color of total knowledge of all things, and the essential element of the aspiration for omniscience cannot be defiled or appropriated by any actions or afflictions. 
“Just as even a little bit of fire will produce as much flame as the amount of fuel it gets, in the same way even a little bit of the fire of the determination for omniscience, because of mixing with objects, will increase in its production of flames of knowledge to the extent of the provisions it is supplied with. “Just as millions of lamps can be lit from one lamp, without the one lamp being exhausted or diminished by all the lamps taking their flame from it, in the same way from the one lamp of the aspiration for omniscience the lamps of aspiration for omniscience of all buddhas of past, future, and present are lit, yet the one lamp of aspiration for omniscience is not exhausted, and shines undiminished by the lights of the lamps of aspiration to omniscience proceeding from it. 
“Just as when a lamp is put into a room, even a thousand years of darkness immediately vanishes and it lights up the place, in the same way when the lamp of the aspiration for omniscience enters the room of the mind of sentient beings, dark with ignorance, immediately untold eons of darkness caused by the obstruction by afflictions is dispelled, and the lamp produces the light of knowledge. 
“Just as a lamp makes light according to the condition of its wick, and burns as long as there is a supply of oil, in the same way the lamp of the aspiration for omniscience lights up the realm of reality according to the excellence of the wick of vows of the enlightening being, and as long as there is a supply of the oil of the practice of universal compassion, so long will there be the power for the buddha-tasks of guiding sentient beings and purifying lands. 
“Just as celestial gold ornaments on the head of the king of gods of control over others’ emanations cannot be outshone by any of the celestials in the realm of desire, in the same way the celestial gold ornament of the aspiration for omniscience, set on perfected virtue and fastened on the head of universal vows of nonregressing enlightening beings, cannot be outshone by ordinary people or by learners or attainers of individual liberation. 
“Just as lion cubs thrive on the roar of the lion, king of beasts, while the other animals all hide, in the same way by the roar of omniscience of the Buddha, the human lion, extolling the determination for enlightenment, the lion-cub beginning enlightening beings thrive on the enlightened teachings, while all grasping, clinging people hide. 
“Just as the strings of all instruments snap at the sound of an instrument strung with lion sinew, in the same way at the virtue-extolling sound of the instrument strung with the sinew of the aspiration for enlightenment of the buddha-lion whose body is the transcendent ways, the strings of the lute of sensuality snap and the songs of praise of the virtues of the individually liberated fade out. 
“Just as a drop of lion milk in an ocean of cow milk causes all the milk to separate and does not mix with it, in the same way the ocean of milk of acts and afflictions accumulated over hundreds of thousands of eons is destroyed by putting into it one drop of the milk of the determination for omniscience of the Buddha, the human lion, and it does not mix with the liberation of those who are only enlightened for themselves alone. 
“Just as the extraordinary power of the cry of a kalavinka chick still in the shell is not found in any of the birds of the mountains, even when they are full grown, in the same way the extraordinary power of the cry of universal compassion of the aspiration for enlightenment of a fledgling enlightening being still in the shell of the mundane whirl is not found in the individually liberated. 
“Just as the wing flapping power and clear vision of a newborn garuda is not found even in fully grown birds of other species, in the same way the power of the determination for enlightenment and the purity of the mind of compassion in a beginning enlightening being born in the family of the buddhas is not found even in seekers of individual liberation and self-illuminates who have been practicing for a long time. 
“Just as a spear in the hand of a powerful man can pierce any armor, however strong it is, in the same way the spear of the determination for omniscience, in the hand of an enlightening being of steadfast vigor, pierces the armor of all views and propensities. 
“Just as a mighty man full of wrath cannot be defeated by any man on earth as long as there are eruptions on his forehead, in the same way a mighty enlightening being filled with universal love and compassion cannot be overcome by any devils or actions in any world as long as the eruptions of the determination for omniscience do not disappear from the face of will. 
“Just as the special strength of application to technique of a student of archery is not found in a teacher of archery who has already learned it all, the special strength of zealous practice of beginning enlightening beings is not found in those who seek and attain personal salvation without the aspiration for universal enlightenment. 
“Just as the first step in learning archery is to learn the stance, in the same way for an enlightening being learning about omniscience is the first step to understanding all the buddha-teachings in the act of setting out with the determination for omniscience. 
“Just as when a magician is going to make a display of magical effects, all the effects are accomplished by first thinking of the magical formula, in the same way when manifesting the spheres of buddhas and enlightening beings, the establishing of the spheres of buddhas and enlightening beings takes place by first evoking the vow to accomplish enlightenment. 
“Just as all magical formulas are formless and invisible but produce magical phantoms with form by mental activity, in the same way the determination for omniscience is formless and invisible, yet it fashions all spiritual realms with arrays of ornaments of all virtues merely by control of mental activity. 
“Just as when one puts on an ornament of the finest gold it outshines all bangles, in the same way the enlightening being wearing the gold ornament of the determination for omniscience outshines the ornaments of virtue of all hearers and individual illuminates. 
“Just as even the smallest bit of the most powerful magnet can burst strong chains asunder, in the same way even the smallest bit of aspiration for omniscience with powerful determination can burst asunder the chains of views, ignorance, and craving. 
“Just as wherever a magnet is used, all metals that it expels are repelled and do not remain there or join with it, in the same way wherever the determination for omniscience is used, whether in the midst of actions or afflictions or the liberation of hearers and individual illuminates, those actions and afflictions and individual liberation are expelled and do not remain or join with it. “Just as a fisher with knowledge of sea monsters is free from fear of any creatures of the sea and is safe from harm even in the mouth of a whale, in the same way the enlightening being with the knowledge of the powerful determination of the aspiration for enlightenment is free from fear of all the actions and afflictions of the mundane whirl and cannot be annihilated even in the midst of realization of individual liberation, because of not falling into the extinction produced by witness of ultimate reality. 
“Just as one who has drunk the elixir of immortality does not die from the attacks of others, in the same way the enlightening being who has drunk the immortality elixir of the aspiration for omniscience does not die in the stages of learners of individual salvation and does not cease acting on the vow of universal compassion of enlightening beings. 
“Just as a man who has perfected the ointment of invisibility can wander through people’s houses unseen by anyone, the enlightening being grounded on the wisdom and commitment of the determination for enlightenment can roam in the realms of all demons without being seen by any demons. 
“Just as a person who cleaves to a great king does not fear ordinary people, the enlightening being who cleaves to the spiritual king of the determination for omniscience does not fear any obstacles, hindrances, or states of misery. 
“Just as someone in water is in no danger from fire, the enlightening being who is soaked in the virtue of the aspiration for enlightenment is in no danger from the fire of knowledge of individual liberation. 
“Just as a person who cleaves to a heroic warrior does not fear enemies, the enlightening being who cleaves to the heroic warrior of the determination for omniscience does not fear the enemies that are evil actions. 
“Just as the king of gods with the thunderbolt weapon crushes all the titans, the enlightening being with the thunderbolt of the steadfast will of the aspiration for omniscience crushes all the titans of demons and false teachers. 
“Just as a person who takes the elixir of life lives for a long time and does not grow weak, the enlightening being who uses the elixir of the aspiration for omniscience goes around in the mundane whirl for countless eons without becoming exhausted and without being stained by the ills of the mundane whirl. 
“Just as in all compounds of herbal extracts potable water is primary, never spoiling, in the same way in the application of preparations of all enlightening beings’ practices and vows the determination for omniscience is primary, never becoming corrupt. 
“Just as in all of a person’s doing the faculty of life is the primary necessity, for an enlightening being to absorb the buddha-teachings the aspiration for enlightenment is the primary necessity. 
“Just as a person who has lost the faculty of life has no way to live, being unable to do anything for his people, in the same way an enlightening being without the life root of the determination for omniscience has no way to live, being unable to obtain enlightened knowledge for all beings. 
“Just as the ocean cannot be ruined by any poisons, the ocean of aspiration for omniscience cannot be ruined by any of the poisons of compulsive actions, afflictions, or aspirations for personal liberation alone. 
“Just as the sun is not outshone by the lights of all the stars, the sun of aspiration to omniscience is not outshone by the taintless virtues of those who are personally liberated. “Just as a newborn prince is not inferior to fully grown ministers, because of his superior birth, a beginning enlightening being, born in the family of the enlightened spiritual kings, is not inferior to Buddhist disciples with long experience in religious practice, because of the superiority of universal compassion of the aspiration for enlightenment. 
“Just as a minister, no matter how old, should pay respect to a prince, no matter how young, and a prince need not honor a minister, in the same way Buddhist disciples and self-illuminates, no matter how long they have performed religious practice, should pay respect to even a beginning enlightening being, and the enlightening being need not honor those who are enlightened only for themselves. 
“Just as a prince, without any power yet never without the character of royalty, is not equaled even by the ministers who have gained eminence, because of his superior birth, in the same way a beginning enlightening being, no matter how much under the sway of action and affliction, is never without the character of the aspiration for omniscience, and is not equaled even by eminent Buddhist disciples and self-illuminates, because of being of the family of enlightened ones. 
“Just as a clear jewel appears impure to a clouded eye, the inherently pure jewel of the aspiration to omniscience is perceived as impure by those whose eye of unbelief is beclouded by ignorance. 
“Just as a body of medicine endowed with all medical knowledge and medicinal herbs curse the diseases of sentient beings by sight, contact, and association, in the same way the body of vows and knowledge of enlightening beings, sustained by the knowledge and medicine of wisdom and means assembling all roots of goodness, endowed with the will for enlightenment, cures sentient beings’ diseases of afflictions by hearing, seeing, association, recollection, and application. 
“Just as a goose-feather robe is not stained by any dirt, the goose-feather robe of the aspiration for enlightenment is not stained by the dirt of afflictions of the mundane whirl. 
“Just as a wooden figure held together by the main pin does not fall apart and can perform any kind of movement, in the same way the body of the vow and knowledge of omniscience, held together by the main pin of the vow of enlightenment, can perform the tasks of enlightening beings, and does not fall apart as the embodiment of the vow of omniscience. “Just as a machine without its pins cannot work, even though the parts are the same, similarly, the enlightening being without the commanding will of the aspiration to omniscience cannot attain buddhahood, even though the preparations of the parts of enlightenment be the same. 
“Just as a sovereign ruler has a precious incense by the perfume of which his four armies are levitated into the air, in the same way the roots of goodness of an enlightening being, perfumed by the incense of the determination for omniscience, leave the mundane and end up in the unconditioned realm of the sky of enlightened knowledge. 
“Just as diamond comes from nowhere else but a jewel mine, from a diamond or gold mine, in the same way the diamondlike aspiration for omniscience comes from nowhere else but the jewel mine of roots of goodness in sentient beings’ minds, from the diamond mine of universal compassion saving all beings, or from the gold mine of concentration on omniscience. 
“Just as there is a kind of tree called ‘rootless’ whose roots cannot be found, yet branches, leaves, and flowers appear luxuriantly on the tree, in the same way the root of the aspiration for omniscience cannot be found, yet it appears in all worlds, blooming with all virtues, knowledge, and mystic capacities, forming a web of vows. 
“Just as a diamond does not shine beautifully in another kind of vessel, and cannot be held in an imperfect, perforated vessel, only in a perfect vessel, in the same way the diamond of the aspiration for omniscience does not shine in the vessels of people with inferior resolutions, in the envious, in the immoral, in the mentally corrupt, in the lazy, in the heedless, or in the stupid, and it cannot be held by a vessel of a wavering, inconstant mind with defective will, only in the precious vessel of the powerful will of an enlightening being. 
“Just as diamond pierces all jewels, the diamond of the determination for omniscience pierces the jewels of all truth. 
“Just as adamant splits all mountains, the adamant of the aspiration for omniscience splits the mountains of all views. 
“Just as even a cracked diamond is better than an ornament of gold, the finest of precious metals, in the same way the diamond of the aspiration for omniscience is better than the gold ornaments of the virtues of hearers and individual illuminates, even if the will is broken by adversity. 
“Just as a diamond, even if cracked, relieves poverty, in the same way the diamond of the determination for omniscience, even if split, relieves the poverty of the mundane whirl. 
“Just as a diamond, however little, breaks all gems and stones, in the same way the diamond of the aspiration for omniscience, focused on however small an object, breaks all ignorance. 
“Just as a diamond does not come into the hands of an ordinary man, the diamond of the determination for omniscience does not come into the hands of those of low intentions and poor roots of goodness. 
“Just as someone who has no knowledge of gems does not recognize the qualities of diamonds or understand their excellence, in the same way a stupid person does not know the qualities of the diamond of wisdom of the aspiration for enlightenment and does not understand its excellence. 
“Just as a diamond cannot be worn out, the diamond of the aspiration for enlightenment, the basis of omniscience, cannot be worn out. 
“Just as the thunderbolt weapon cannot be held even by a strong man unless he has superhuman strength, likewise the thunderbolt of the aspiration for enlightenment cannot be held even by the mighty saints and sages, only by the great enlightening beings with great illumination, excelling in the superhuman might of infinite roots of goodness based on the power of the cause of omniscience. 
“Just as a thunderbolt can prevail where all other weapons cannot, and will not be destroyed, in the same way where the weapons of vows and knowledge of all Buddhist disciples and self-enlightened ones cannot prevail, in developing and guiding people or living through the toils of practice through the ages of past, present, and future, there the enlightening being who holds the great thunderbolt weapon of the determination for omniscience, indefatigable, prevails unharmed. 
“Just as adamant cannot be held on any spot on the earth except on an adamantine surface, in the same way the adamant vows of emancipation of enlightening beings cannot be held by those whose goal is personal salvation only; it can only be supported by the adamantine ground of the resolute determination for universal enlightenment. 
“Just as the ocean does not leak any water because it is a solid container with an unyielding ground, in the same way the roots of goodness of an enlightening being, grounded on adamant, solid, unyielding dedication to enlightening, do not die out in any states of existence. 
“Just as earth set on an adamantine base does not collapse or sink, in the same way the vows of enlightening beings, grounded on the adamantine base of the determination for enlightenment, are not rent apart and do not collapse in any mundane realm. “Just as a diamond does not rot in water, the diamond of the aspiration for enlightenment does not decompose or soften even though it remain in the water of action and affliction for all ages. 
“Just as a diamond is not burnt or heated by fire, the diamond of the determination for omniscience is not burnt by the fires of suffering of the mundane whirl and is not heated up by the fires of afflictions. 
“Just as the seat of buddhas sitting on the site of enlightenment battling the devil and awakening to omniscience cannot be supported by any spot on earth except the earth surface of the adamantine center of the universe, in the same way the great force of power of the roots of goodness of enlightening beings aspiring to perfect enlightenment, carrying out the practice, fulfilling the transcendent ways, entering into tolerance, attaining spiritual station, dedicating roots of goodness, receiving assurance of buddahood, providing the necessities for the path of enlightening beings, and holding the multitudes of teachings of all buddhas, cannot be sustained by mind other than the mind set on omniscience, the adamantine core of all vows and knowledge. 
“The aspiration for omniscience has these and untold other extraordinary virtues; and those who have set their minds on supreme perfect enlightenment are, have been, and will be endowed with such virtues. 
Therefore you have made a great gain in having aspired to supreme perfect enlightenment and seeking the practice of enlightening beings, because of attainment of these virtues. 
“Also, you ask how an enlightening being is to learn and carry out the practice of enlightening beings. 
Go into this great tower containing the adornments of Vairocana and look—then you will know how to learn the practice of enlightening beings, and what kind of virtues are perfected in those who learn this.” Then Sudhana respectfully circumbulated the enlightening being Maitreya and said, “Please open the door of the tower, and I will enter.” Then Maitreya went up to the door of the tower containing the adornments of Vairocana, and with his right hand snapped his fingers; the door of the tower opened, and Maitreya bade Sudhana to enter. 
As soon as he had entered, the door shut. 
He saw the tower immensely vast and wide, hundreds of thousands of leagues wide, as measureless as the sky, as vast as all of space, adorned with countless attributes; countless canopies, banners, pennants, jewels, garlands of pearls and gems, moons and half moons, multicolored streamers, jewel nets, gold nets, strings of jewels, jewels on golden threads, sweetly ringing bells and nets of chimes, flowers showering, celestial garlands and streamers, censers giving off fragrant fumes, showers of gold dust, networks of upper chambers, round windows, arches, turrets, mirrors, jewel figurines of women, jewel chips, pillars, clouds of precious cloths, jewel trees, jewel railings, jeweled pathways, jeweled awnings, various arrays of the floor, chambers of jewels, jeweled promenades, rows of golden banana trees, statues made of all kinds of jewels, images of enlightening beings, singing birds, jewel lotuses, lotus ponds, jewel stairways, ground of masses of various jewels, radiant gems, arrays of all kinds of jewels. 
Also, inside the great tower he saw hundreds of thousands of other towers similarly arrayed; he saw those towers as infinitely vast as space, evenly arrayed in all directions, yet these towers were not mixed up with one another, being each mutually distinct, while appearing reflected in each and every object of all the other towers. 
Then Sudhana, seeing this miraculous manifestation of the inconceivable realm of the great tower containing the adornments of Vairocana, was flooded with joy and bliss; his mind was cleared of all conceptions and freed from all obstructions. 
He was freed from all scattering of attention, and his intellect followed the unobstructed eye of liberation. With physical tranquillity, seeing all objects without hindrance, by the power of production everywhere he bowed in all directions with his whole body. 
The moment he bowed, by the power of Maitreya, Sudhana perceived himself in all of those towers; and in all those towers he saw various diverse inconceivable miraculous scenes. 
In one tower he saw where the enlightening being Maitreya first aspired to supreme perfect enlightenment, what his family was, what his basic goodness was, how he was inspired, how he was encouraged by spiritual friends, how long he lived, what age he lived in, what buddha he met, what land he adorned, what assembly he was in, and what kind of special vows he undertook. 
He also perceived the length of life of the beings and the buddha of that time, and saw himself in the presence of that buddha, and saw all of his works. 
In one tower he saw where Maitreya first attained absorption in love, whence came his name, “The Loving One.” In another he saw where he carried out spiritual practice; in another, where he fulfilled the transcendent ways; in another, where he attained acceptance of things as unoriginated; in another, where he was assured of supreme perfect enlightenment, how he was assured, by whom, and how long it was predicted it would be before he was enlightened. 
In one tower he saw Maitreya as a sovereign king directing people to virtuous action; in another he saw Maitreya as a world guardian bestowing well-being and happiness on the world; in another he saw Maitreya as Indra, fostering detachment in those obsessed with pleasure; in another he saw Maitreya as Brahma, describing to people the measureless pleasure of meditation; in another he saw Maitreya as the chief of the gods of timely portion, describing to people the virtues of attentiveness and diligence; in another he saw Maitreya as the chief of the heaven of contentment, revealin the virtues of enlightening beings bound to become buddhas in one lifetime; in another he saw Maitreya as a king of the heaven of good emanations, showing a company of celestials the array of emanations of all enlightening beings; in another he saw Maitreya as a lord of the heaven of control, explaining to the gods control over all phenomena; in another he saw Maitreya causing the devil to act, showing the gods the impermanence of all states of being; in another he saw Maitreya born in the palace of titans, teaching the titans truth so that they might do away with all conceit, pride, and arrogance, plunge into the ocean of knowledge, enter the ocean of spiritual knowledge, and attain the magic of knowledge of truth. 
In one tower he saw the underworld and saw Maitreya illumine the great hells with light and relieve the hellish pains of the beings in hell. 
In another tower he saw the ghost world and saw Maitreya giving much food and drink to the ghosts, relieving their hunger and thirst. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya guiding the beings in the animal realm. 
In one tower he saw Maitreya expounding the Teaching to world guardians in an assembly of celestial kings; in another he saw him in a group of chief gods of the thirty-three-fold heavens; in another he saw him in a group of chiefs of the heaven of timely portion; in another he saw him in a group of lords of the heaven of contentment; in another he saw him in a group of chiefs of the heaven of good emanations; in another he saw him in a group of kings, of the heaven of control; in another tower he saw Maitreya as a Great Brahma in a group of Brahma lords, expounding the Teaching. 
In one tower he saw Maitreya in a group of dragons and serpents; in another, in a group of goblins and fiends; in another, in a group of titans and demons; in another, in a group of giant serpents; in another, in a group of human chiefs; in another tower, he saw the enlightening being Maitreya in a group of gods, dragons, goblins, fiends, cherubs, titans, birds, minotaurs, serpents, humans, and nonhumans, expounding the Teaching to them. 
In one tower he saw Maitreya in a group of hearers; in another, in a group of individual illuminates; in another, in a group of enlightening beings; in another tower, he saw Maitreya expounding the Teaching to beginning enlightening beings who had just set their minds on enlightenment. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya extolling the excellences of the stages to those who had undertaken practice; in another, to those who had attained tolerance and were irreversible; in another, to those bound to be enlightened in one lifetime who had attained coronation; in another tower, to enlightening beings in the first stage. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya with enlightening beings in stages up to the tenth, extolling the excellence of all the stages. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya speaking of the infinity of fulfillment of the transcendent ways; in another, of impartiality in approaching and entering into all studies; in another, of breadth of entry into concentration; in another, of depth of liberation; in another, of pervasion of the realm of higher knowledge of quiescent meditation, concentration, and trance; in another, of entry into the methods of guidance in enlightening practice; in another, of breadth of performance of vows; in another tower he saw Maitreya with a group of enlightening beings engaged in the same practice as he, speaking of the relevance of providing for the welfare and happiness of all beings, of the various arts and sciences to be employed for the benefit of the world. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya with a group of enlightening beings bound to be enlightened in one life, telling them about coronation with the knowledge of all buddhas. 
In another tower he saw Maitreya perambulating ceaselessly for hundreds of thousands of years; in another, he saw him engaged in recitation; in another, engaged in contemplation of doctrine; in another, engaged in exposition of doctrine; in another, engaged in writing down the Teaching; in another, absorbed in concentration on universal love; in another, absorbed in all the meditations and immeasurables; in another, absorbed in the points of totality and the liberations; in another tower he saw Maitreya absorbed in the practice of bringing forth the higher knowledge of enlightening beings. 
In one tower he saw enlightening beings absorbed in an enlightening concentration which emanated phantoms, and saw multitudes of all kinds of emanations coming from every pore of their bodies. 
From the pores of some he saw multitudes of celestial hosts emerging; from some he saw multitudes of dragons, goblins, cherubs, titans, birds, minotaurs, serpents, Indras, Brahmas, world guardians, and emperors; from some he saw multitudes of princes; from some he saw multitudes of grandees, ministers, and gentlemen; from some he saw multitudes of hearers, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings; from some he saw multitudes of buddha-bodies; from the pores of some he saw measureless multitudes of phantoms of all sentient beings emerge. 
He heard various aspects of the Teaching being broadcast from the pores of some of the enlightening beings—teachings of the virtues of enlightening beings, transcendent generosity, discipline, tolerance, vigor, meditation, wisdom, methods, vows, power, knowledge, the means of integration, the immeasurables, concentrations, trance, superknowledge, mystic spells, intellectual powers of analysis and exposition, tranquillity and observation, means of liberation, interdependent origination, the reliances, summarization of teachings, the points of mindfulness, the right efforts, the bases of mystic powers, the religious faculties and powers, the limbs of enlightenment, the paths, explanation of the vehicle of hearers, explanation of the vehicle of individual illuminates, explanation of the Great Vehicle, the stages, tolerances, practices, and vows—in this way he heard voices expressing all the ways into the Teaching being broadcast. 
In another tower he saw gatherings of the audiences of buddhas, as well as the various differences among those buddhas, their different families, the infinite variety of their physical adornments, the variety of their life spans, the differences in their lands and eras, the variety of their teachings, the variety of the outwardness of their projected manifestations, the differences in the duration of their true teachings, and all the differences in their assemblies. 
In the middle of the great tower containing the adornments of Vairocana he saw one tower which was bigger than all the others and arrayed with adornments surpassing all the other towers. In that tower he saw a billion-world universe, in which he saw a hundred million sets of four continents, with a hundred million Jambudvipas and a hundred million heavens of contentment. 
In those Jambudvipa continents he saw the enlightening being Maitreya being born in a lotus calyx; he also saw Maitreya taking seven steps as Indra and Brahma watched, looking over the ten directions, making the lion roar, showing all the stages of childhood, in the palace, out in the garden, setting out for omniscience, appearing to undertake ascetic practice, finally eating food, going to the site of enlightenment, conquering the devil, awakening to enlightenment, steadily gazing on the tree of enlightenment, being asked by Brahma to teach, and turning the wheel of the teaching, going into the celestial abodes, with various different manifestations of enlightening teaching, using various names of eras in different ways, with various different spans of life, various different arrays of gatherings, with various demonstrations of ways of purification of lands, carrying out various practices and vows, with various structures of teaching used as means to develop and mature all concerned, showing various distributions of relics and bases of maintaining the teachings. 
And everywhere there Sudhana perceived himself at Maitreya’s feet. 
In all those assemblies, in all the manifestations of works, in the varieties of spans of life, by means of the knowledge based on clear recollection, standing on the ground of knowledge, sure to reach omniscience, Sudhana heard, from all the objects in all those towers, the nets of bells and chimes, the drums and songs, and so on, and from the beings therein, the thunder of inconceivable multitudes of voices. 
From some he heard of the variety of aspirations for enlightenment; from some, about the variety of offerings to buddhas; from some, about the variety of arrays of buddha-lands; from some, about the infinite variety of teachings of buddhas—thus he heard the voices of all the teachings as they had been expounded in the past. 
He also heard about setting out for omniscience—in such-and-such a land the enlightening being so-and-so aspired to enlightenment, heard such-and-such a teaching, was inspired by the spiritual benefactor so-and-so, went to such-and-such a congregation at the foot of the buddha so-and-so in such-and-such a land in such-and-such an age, planted such-and-such roots of goodness, heard about such-and-such qualities of buddhahood, undertook such-and-such a variety of vows with such-and-such an intention, will realize supreme perfect enlightenment in so many eons after having carried out practice for so many eons, will be named so-and-so, will live so long, in a buddha-land with such-and-such qualities, with such-and-such higher commitments, such-and-such guidance of beings, such-and-such a congregation of disciples, individual illuminates, and enlightening beings, the true teaching to last for so many ages after the death of the Buddha, with such-and-such benefits. 
He heard another voice saying that in such-and-such a world the enlightening being so-and-so makes so many hundreds of difficult sacrifices in the practice of transcendent giving; the enlightening being so-and-so keeps the precepts, cultivates tolerance, acquires vigor, attains meditations, engages in the investigation of wisdom; the enlightening being so-and-so, in search of truth, relinquishes kingship, wealth, family, hands and feet, eyes and head, and practices self-mortification by fire; the enlightening being so-and-so, advanced in the teaching of those who arrive at Thusness, works as a spiritual preacher, giving the gift of religion, performs the service of religion, raises the banner of religion, beats the drum and blows the horn of religion, showers the rain of religion, preserves the teaching of the enlightened, adorns monuments to the enlightened, has images of buddhas made, comforts beings, and guards the treasury of truth. 
He heard another voice say that the buddha so-and-so now is in such-and-such a world, currently existing and expounding the Teaching, with such-and-such an initiation, in such-and-such an assembly in such-and-such a land in such-and-such an age, with such-and-such a life span, with such-and-such a doctrine guiding people in such-and-such a way, realizing such-and-such vows. 
In this manner, from each object Sudhana heard articulations of an infinite variety of aspects of the Teaching, and by listening to all those voices he heard those facets of the Teaching with a mind flooded with joy. 
From some he got facets of mental command; from others, facets of commitment, tolerance, conduct, transcendence, higher perceptions, mystic knowledge, liberation, and concentration. 
He also saw measureless arrays of reflections in the mirrors, reflections of assemblies of buddhas, circles of enlightening beings, congregations of disciples, groups of self-illuminates, defiled lands, pure lands, defiled and pure lands, reflections of all buddhas in one world, worlds with buddhas, small worlds, large worlds, subtle worlds, gross worlds, worlds in the cosmic net of Indra, inverted worlds, level worlds, worlds of hells, animals, and ghosts, worlds full of celestials and humans. 
He also saw countless enlightening beings on the promenades or sitting on their seats, engaged in various activities. Some were walking around, some were doing spiritual exercises, some were practicing observation, some were projecting universal compassion, some were working on various sciences having to do with the welfare of the world, some were instructing, some were reciting, some were writing, some were asking questions, some were engaged in ripening conduct, concentration, and knowledge, some were undertaking vows. 
He saw webs of jewel lights coming from the pillars, some sapphire, some topaz, some ruby, some white, some crystal, some golden, some emerald, some diamond, some rainbow, some the colors of all lights, delightful to the body and mind, supremely pleasant to the eye. 
He saw some figures bowing, crowned with jewels, with steady gaze, palms joined, in gestures of respect. 
He also saw delicate clouds of pure water imbued with all fragrances coming from the pearl necklaces, and saw long streams flowing from the webs of strings of lapis lazuli. 
He also saw all the jewel parasols embellished with all kinds of ornaments, and he saw the inner chamber adorned with jewel bells, sets of chimes, silk streamers, strings of bells, slivers of jewels, and heaps of various gems. 
He saw countless superb red, blue, and white lotuses growing in the lotus ponds, some a foot across, some a fathom across, some as big as a wagon wheel; and in them he saw arrays of various figures—figures of women, men, boys, girls, Indra, Brahma, the world guardians, gods, dragons, goblins, cherubs, titans, birds, centaurs, serpents, sages, saints, and enlightening beings—bodies in the forms of all living beings, various in appearance, joining their palms and bowing in gestures of respect. He also saw figures of buddhas adorned with the thirty-two marks of great people, sitting in the lotus posture. Also, on the checkerboard lapis-lazuli surface of the ground, he saw inconceivable reflections in each square; here he saw the reflection of a land, there the reflection of a buddha. All the arrays of adornments in those towers he saw reflected in each of the squares. 
Also, in all the flowers, fruits, and buds of the jewel trees he saw golden busts of all kinds of beings—buddhas, enlightening beings, gods, dragons, goblins, cherubs, titans, birds, serpents, Indras, Brahmas, the world guardians, human emperors, princes, grandees, ministers, women, men, boys, girls, monks, nuns, male and female devotees, some with flower garlands hanging from their hands, some with strings of jewels hanging from their hands, some holding all kinds of ornaments, some bowing with their palms joined and gaze steady, paying respect, some singing hymns of praise, some in trance, some with a golden luster, some with a silver luster, some with a frosty luster, some with a sapphire luster, some with a shining jewel luster, some shining with the colors of all jewels, some with a saffron luster, some shining like bodies of light, some with bodies adorned with the marks of greatness. 
From the crescents adorning the towers he saw reflections of countless moons, suns, stars, and planets emerge and illumine the ten directions. 
in one square he saw Maitreya giving away his head; in another, giving away clothing; in another, giving away his topknot jewel; in another, giving the crown jewel of truth; in another, giving away his teeth; in another, giving away his tongue; in another, giving away his ears and nose; in another, giving away his heart; in another giving away his marrow and flesh; in another, giving away his blood; in another, giving away his skin; in another, giving away his limbs; in another, giving away his body; in another, giving away his sons, daughters, and wife; in another, giving away heaps of jewels; in another, giving away village, town, city, and country; in another, giving away the continent; in another, giving away four continents; in another, giving away all powers of rulership; in another, giving away the throne; in another, giving away servants; in another, giving away the palace and harem; in another, giving away parks and retreats; in another, giving parasols, banners, and pennants; in another, giving garlands and perfumes; in another, giving medicines; in another, giving all kinds of food and drink; in another, giving all kinds of implements; in another, giving all kinds of furniture, cushions, and shelters; in another, giving precious copper vessels; in another, giving excellent vehicles; in another, freeing those in bondage; in another, freeing the condemned; in another, giving medical care to the young; in another, showing the right path to those on the path of destruction; in another, navigating the rivers as a boatman; in another, as a wonder horse, rescuing people on the isle of demons in the ocean; in another, as a great seer, practicing the sciences; in another, as a ruler, leading people into the paths of righteous conduct; in another, as a physician, engaged in treating the sick; in another, serving his mother and father; in another, listening to spiritual benefactors; in another, in the form of a Buddhist disciple, engaged in teaching people; in another in the form of a self-illuminate, in another in the form of an enlightening being, in another in the form of a buddha, engaged in teaching people; in another, manifesting existence as paragons of types of beings, developing beings to maturity; in another, as a religious preacher expounding experience of the teachings of buddhas, reciting the teachings, reflecting deeply on them, decorating monuments of buddhas, having statues of buddhas made, enjoining people to honor the buddhas, giving out perfumes, making all kinds of offerings to buddhas, leading people into paths of actions based on virtuous ways, directing people to the precepts, to refuge in the Buddha, the Teaching, and the Community, to listening to the Teaching, to discussion, recital, and profound contemplation of the Teaching, sitting on the lion seat to talk of the Teaching, revealing the enlightenment of buddhas. Thus Sudhana saw Maitreya’s practices of the six ways of transcendence over countless eons, projected from each of the squares of the checkerboard walls. In one tower he saw magical arrays of all the spiritual benefactors whom Maitreya attended, and he perceived himself in the presence of all those spiritual benefactors, being welcomed and told not to be weary, to behold this wonder of the enlightening being. So Sudhana saw these and other inconceivable projections of magnificent scenes from each of the towers and each object in the towers. 
Did you see the excellence of the vows and expertise of buddhas? 
“Here in the south, by that means guiding beings according to their mentalities and according to their capacity for being taught, I live in this tower containing the adornments of Vairocana. 
He will show you the real benefactor. 
“Therefore when you go to Manjushri, do not be faint-hearted, do not become weary in receiving instruction in all virtues. 
Then Manjushri extended his hand over a hundred and ten leagues and laid it on the head of Sudhana, who was standing in the city of Sumanamukha, and said, “Good, good! 
All buddha-lands were purified by becoming made of jewels. 
These ten great lights appeared foreshadowing the manifestation of Universally Good. 
He saw as many auras of light as atoms in all buddha-lands emanate from Universally Good’s body, increasing the ecstasy of all enlightening beings. 
He saw clouds of jewel trees, as many as atoms in all buddha-lands, emanate from every pore, filling all universes in space, adorning them with blooming jewel trees and showering great rains of jewels on the audiences of all buddhas. 
He saw multitudes of all buddha-lands of past, present, and future, as many as atoms in all buddha-lands, emanate from each pore in each mental moment, pervading all universes throughout space as places of rest, salvation, and refuge for beings with no place of rest, no savior, no refuge. 
Having seen and heard this inconceivable miracle of the enlightening being Universally Good, he attained ten states of consummation of knowledge. 
He attained the state of consummation of direct knowledge of the ocean of all truths. 
Then the great enlightening being Universally Good said to Sudhana, “Did you see my mystical projection?” Sudhana said, “I saw, noble one. 
But only a buddha could understand such an inconceivable mystical projection.” Universally Good said, “I practiced for as many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands, seeking the mind of omniscience, and in each immense eon I associated with as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands, to purify the aspiration for enlightenment. 
And in each immense eon I made as many great sacrifices as atoms in untold buddha-lands, extreme sacrifices, seeking the qualities of omniscience. 
I gave away the flesh of my own body and gave blood from my own body to beggars, and I gave away my bones and marrow. 
In each immense eon I honored and served as many buddhas as atoms in untold buddha-lands, providing food and clothing, shelter, furniture, medicine, and other necessities. 
Thus it would take up as many eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands to tell of the accomplishment of my past endeavors. 
“Look at this body I have achieved, produced over endless multitudes of eons, hard to get to appear even in decillions of eons, hard to get to see. 
Beings who have not planted roots of goodness cannot even hear of me, much less see me. 
Some become mature remembering me for one lifetime, some a hundred lifetimes, some up to as many lifetimes as atoms in untold buddha-lands. 
Some become mature by seeing my radiance, some by seeing emanation of light beams, some by feeling the earth quake, some by seeing my physical form, some by being encouraged. 
Thus beings become irreversible toward supreme perfect enlightenment through as many means as atoms in a buddha-land. 
Behold the purity of this body of mine. 
And in each buddha-land he saw the buddhas surrounded by assemblies of enlightening beings. 
And he saw that all those multitudes of lands had various bases, various forms, various arrays, various perimeters, various clouds covering the skies, various buddhas appearing, various enunciations of cycles of the Teaching. 
Furthermore, the light of knowledge and roots of goodness accumulated by Sudhana in going to, meeting, and attending as many spiritual benefactors as atoms in a buddha-land did not amount to even a minute fraction, not to any calculable fraction, of his accumulation of roots of goodness concomitant with seeing Universally Good. 
He traveled and contemplated in a land for an eon, in another for up to as many as eons as atoms in untold buddha-lands, without moving from that land. 
Then the great enlightening being Universally Good, thus explaining courses of eons, as many eons as atoms in the untold buddha-lands in the succession of worlds, went on to make a vow: 
As many buddhas as there may be in any world Throughout the ten directions, throughout past, present, and future, I honor them all, without exception, Pure in body, speech, and mind. 
And those who wish to manifest extinction I petition respectfully to remain For eons as many as atoms in the land For the welfare and happiness of all beings. 
As I am carrying out enlightenment practice, May I recall my lives in all states; In every lifetime, as I die and am reborn, May I always transcend the mundane. 
I will expound the Teaching In the languages of gods and dragons, In the languages of demons and humans, And of all living beings. 
I will traverse the paths of the world Free from compulsion, affliction, and delusion, Like a lotus unstained by water, Like the sun and moon unattached in the sky. 
May I always be in communion With those who share my practice; Physically, verbally, and mentally, I will carry out vows as one practice. 
And may I always be with my benefactors, Who teach me the practice of good; May I never displease them. 
Thus may I perceive the oceans Of buddhas and lands of all times In each point in the ten directions As I practice for myriad eons. 
Learning the teachings of The Lamps of the Worlds to come, I visit all the Guides Who have passed away to eternal rest. 
Pure in body, speech, and mind, Pure in conduct, with a pure land, As the sage is named Good, May I become thus equally. 
May there be no limits to practice, And no limit to virtues; Persisting in infinite practices, I know all their miraculous creations. 
Great is their gain, worthwhile their life, Auspicious their birth as humans; They will soon be like The universally good enlightening being. 
Those who have committed hellish crimes Under the sway of ignorance Will quickly put an end to them all When this practice of good is expounded. 
Buddha knows those who hold this vow to practice good, Who cause it to be told of and taught; The fruit of this is supreme enlightenment— Do not entertain any doubt. 
By the supreme dedication praised by the buddhas of all times I dedicate all this virtue to the practice of highest good. 
Acting in accord with the time, may I remove all obstructions, May I see Infinite Light face to face and go to the land of bliss. 
This would swell the bulk of each volume, and might well produce a situation of chaos rather than order in locating definitions. 
For these reasons, the main terms in which the fundamental points of the teachings of the scripture are cast will be presented summarily in this introduction for easy reference. 
Throughout the text of the scripture the terms “sentient beings” and “living beings” are frequently to be met with. 
These terms, which are used synonymously, require some explanation. 
The implication of “sentient” and “living” is reference to the condition of being dominated or compelled by senses, feelings, emotions, thoughts; of being imprisoned, so to speak, by mundane life, at the mercy of its vicissitudes, without self-mastery or ability to transcend compulsive preoccupation with external and/or internal phenomena. 
It is a fundamental task of enlightening beings to rise above, and help others to rise above, the fetters of mundane life and sense experience. 
This refers to the impermanence of all things and beings. 
It also refers to the virtually constant fluctuation in the mental states of sentient beings. 
That is to say, for example, in a moment of anger one is “born” as a titan; in a moment of craving one is “born” as a hungry ghost; in a moment of folly one is “born” as an animal. 
Ignorance is thus also referred to as the notion that there is something to gain or possess. 
This poison represents the drawing of boundaries and definition of individual self-interest as opposed to the interests of others. 
It is not to be confused with doubt used to pry the mind from fixed conceptions. 
Compulsive doubt and hesitation to accept truth is seen as an extension of self-importance. 
Higher states of sentient beings, which are still worldly or mundane, are represented by celestial realms. 
In addition to these beings, there are also mentioned a number of other mythological creatures from ancient Indian lore. 
For the most part these are of little symbolic value, except perhaps to represent diversity. 
They seem to appear simply as stock items of the cosmology of the civilization in which the scripture was written down. 
The term “vehicle” means a vehicle or method of liberation, a course of understanding and application by which emancipation from mundane bondage may be realized. 
“Two vehicles” refers to what are known in Sanskrit as shravakas and pratyekabuddhas. 
The four grades are: 
The two vehicles of disciples or listeners and self-enlightened ones or individual illuminates are called the small or lesser vehicles because of primary focus on individual liberation, concentration on one teacher or path, and lack of flexibility and compassion to teach people of different temperaments. 
In these senses they are contrasted to the so-called great vehicle of the bodhisattva or enlightening being, which is concerned with universal liberation and consequently involves greater variety and flexibility of approach. 
Seventh is means, which includes skill in application and direction of the elements of enlightening practices and skill in means of liberating other people. 
Eighth is vows, involving the determination of commitment to seek complete perfect enlightenment and to help others realize enlightenment. 
In conjunction with these ways of transcendence, enlightening beings also cultivate what are known as the four immeasurable minds or four pure abodes. 
The hallmark of the enlightening being is to be in the world yet at the same time beyond the world. 
These are means by which the enlightening beings integrate with society in order to carry out their work. 
The “body” of Buddha, which is often mentioned in connection with the omnipresence of Buddha, is the so-called body of reality. 
This reality-body is defined in many ways: 
In one sense it simply means “everything,” without arbitrary conceptual glosses. 
Thusness is also equated with “buddha-nature” and the “realm of reality,” which includes both absolute and ordinary reality. 
The “beings” known to the Buddhas may of course be understood as the various conditions of human beings, though not necessarily limited thereto. 
Knowledge of past and future may be usefully understood as profound understanding of causes and effects, insight into psychological, social, and other developmental processes over a span of time; this type of knowledge is said to include, however, capacities of recollection and reception that generally remain undeveloped and unknown to ordinary people. 
Fearlessness here means that the Buddha’s knowledge is certain and free from doubt and hesitation. 
The eighteen unique qualities of Buddhas are: 
The former knowledge is common to saints, self-enlightened ones, and enlightening beings, while the latter is in the realm of enlightening beings. 
The consummate omniscience of Buddhas, containing the ten powers, is knowledge of all particulars of causality and the overall and specific means of enlightenment. 
The miraculous transformation performed by the Buddha for the enlightenment of sentient beings is, from this perspective, the shifting of the mental outlook to experiencing everything as a learning situation. 
This vision of life as a whole as the scene of enlightenment is one of the major themes of The Flower Ornament Scripture, and is a basic meaning of the statement that there is ultimately only one vehicle of enlightenment. 
The Chinese philosophers of the Huayan school distinguished four general reality-realms in which everything, the cosmos, is included: 
The realm of noumenon refers to the essence of things in themselves, the principle of voidness or emptiness—the lack of inherent nature or intrinsic reality in conditional, dependent things. 
A further illustration of the principle of interdependence and interrelation is afforded by the formation of assemblies in the scripture. 
In reference to the enlightening being, who consciously adopts different guises and deals with people in different ways, this is represented as multiplication of the body of projection of myriad different bodies. 
Some consideration of the metaphorical language of the scripture is therefore called for to gain access to the inner meanings. 
In general, these symbolize virtues, teachings, and also qualities of the world as perceived by a pure mind. 
Jewels and precious substances symbolize enlightening teachings; their variety represents the multitude of doctrines expounded by enlightening beings and Buddhas in adapting to different situations and audiences. 
Flowers are also used to symbolize practices employed to further spiritual evolution, and fruits symbolize the results of those practices. 
Seats, thrones, and residences represent spiritual states, stability, or spheres of awareness and action. 
Personal ornaments such as garlands and jewelry represent virtues, knowledge, skills, or cultivation of one’s faculties. 
Oceans and clouds represent clusters or groups. 
Light symbolizes knowledge or awareness; variegated light represents differentiating knowledge, different kinds of knowledge, or knowledge of different spheres. 
Buddha-lands, or buddha-fields, have several levels of meaning. 
Each realm of sense is a buddha-land, and so is every particle of matter. 
An Introduction to Hua-yen Buddhism . 
Also, the ignorant think that the future perishing of objects of sense from the faculties is nirvana. 
When buddhas and enlightening beings themselves realize enlightenment, they overturn the repository consciousness and realize the knowledge of basic awareness. 
They see sense data without and cling to them as really existing. 
The realm of sages’ own enlightenment is like this. 
They grasp the various manifestations of action of the repository consciousness and fall into the two views of origin and extinction. 
Instructions of Shilpabhijna Sudhana said, “O sage, how does one practice so as to attain this liberation? 
Shilpabhijna replied, “If enlightening beings practice ten things and completely fulfill them, then they can attain this enlightening liberation of higher knowledge of the arts. 
What are the ten? 
Sufficiency of knowledge, diligently seeking good associates, intense vigor, removing obstructing delusions, purity of correct practice, respecting correct teaching, observation of the inherent emptiness of phenomena, destroying false views, practicing the right path, acquisition of true knowledge. 
If enlightening beings can fulfill these ten things, they can rapidly attain this liberation. 
By sufficiency of knowledge, enlightening beings diligently seek good associates; seeing them, they approach them, happily respect them, and think of them as buddhas. 
By associating with them, they are constantly being taught, so they are able to apply intense vigor to difficult practices. 
Once goodness is fulfilled, then they can get rid of all obstructing delusions. 
Having realized that all phenomena are empty, their minds are unobstructed wherever they turn. 
Deeply realizing interdependent origination, they get rid of the notion of causelessness, extinguish the mind of false views, and practice the right path. 
Are that which understands and that which is understood one or two?” “The reality that is personally realized by enlightening beings is neither one nor two. 
By this power it is possible to equally benefit self and others. 
It is like space. 
This truth is subtle, beyond verbalization. 
It abides in no abode, and is the sphere of tranquil sages. 
Its clarity is supreme, its essence is eternal and unperishing. 
Whether or not buddhas appear in the world, the essence of the reality realm is always one and the same. 
It is for this truth that enlightening beings carry out countless difficult practices; having attained realization of this truth, they can benefit all sentient beings and enable sentient beings ultimately to abide in this truth. 
If enlightening beings do not give up on these ten things, they can attain this liberation of light of undefiled knowledge.” Sudhana asked, “How can this liberation be experienced in the present?” Suchandra said, “In the present one should make transcendent wisdom and the mind unite as far as possible; then one can enter this liberation whatever one perceives and cognizes.” Sudhana asked, “Is it realized by hearing talk about transcendent wisdom?” Suchandra said, “No. 
Why not? 
I want to quench my thirst and rest and cool off.’ The man knows, and tells him, ‘Go east. 
they cannot enter the doors of the Teaching only by the understanding that comes from hearing and thinking. 
In this simile, the desert is birth and death, the one coming from the west is sentient beings, the heat is delusions, and thirst is craving. 
Finding pure water and being free from heat and thirst stands for personally realizing real truth. 
“Let me give you another simile. 
Do you think the people would know what the celestial food tasted like when they heard about it and thought about it? 
Of course not. 
And in the same way, one cannot realize the essence of transcendent wisdom just by hearing and thinking about it.” Sudhana said, “How do enlightening beings skillfully explain so as to enable people to really attain experience?” Suchandra said, “The true essence of transcendent wisdom experienced by enlightening beings is the definitive, proper basis of their explanation. 
It is because of having attained this liberation that they can skillfully explain for people. 
What ten? 
Enlightening beings in the second stage who dwell in this liberation attain the body of purity, because they get rid of the defilement of immorality and are always pure in respect to the essence of all the precepts. 
Enlightening beings in the fourth stage who dwell in this liberation attain the body of practice, because they always diligently practice to assemble all the elements of enlightenment. 
Enlightening beings in the seventh stage who dwell in this liberation attain the body of inconceivability, because they assemble the skillful techniques of the buddhas’ teachings and their knowledge and activity is fulfilled. 
Enlightening beings in the ninth stage who dwell in this liberation attain the body of space, because their physical forms are boundless, pervading everything. 
So it is that ordinary people and sages, delusion and enlightenment, causes and effects of defilement and purity, going and coming, advancing and retreating, are all the same one form. 
Now, when I say there is a difference in power, I mean that the properties of the body of buddhas are completely developed and have superior power, unlike the enlightening beings. 
Let me give you a simile to illustrate this. 
Once it is cut and polished so that it sparkles and shines, people value it. 
What are the ten? 
Since the Buddha’s teachings were adapted to the specific needs of individuals and groups according to their stage of evolution, the result was a vast amount of material, a highly complex body of principles and practices. 
It appears to be the product of an esoteric association like the later Sarmoun “Bees” who are said to traverse the world gathering the “honey” of knowledge from relict deposits. 
This final book, of unparalleled beauty and grandeur, recapitulates the entire scheme of the fifty-two stages in the tale of a pilgrimage reflecting the total effort of the original recollectors of the comprehensive teaching of The Flower Ornament Scripture. 
When I translated the complete version of The Flower Ornament Scripture into English years ago, I used both Li’s and Zhengguan’s commentaries. 
No one who reads the latter could fail to be impressed by Zhengguan’s colossal scholarship; more difficult than the scripture itself, that commentary is a tour de force ranging over the enormous domain of Buddhist psychology and philosophy. 
Quite out of keeping with the modern myth that the inner circle of living Buddhism was traditionally a male monkish elite, the story represents a small minority of the teachers as monks, and nearly half as females. 
The second abode, called the abode of preparing the ground, requires certain attitudes towards others: 
In the seventh abode, the abode of nonregression, the practitioner is firm and does not backslide, regardless of what is said about the existence or nonexistence of buddhas, of truth, of enlightening beings, or of the practices of enlightening beings. 
Topics of study in this abode include knowledge, activation, maintenance, observation, and visitation of fields of enlightenment. 
They know innumerable teachings and understand manners. They know the differentiations of the world, they know past and future events, and they know how to explain both conventional and ultimate truth. 
In this abode they also study the skills, manners, contemplations, power, fearlessness, and repose of spiritual monarchs. In the tenth abode, the abode of coronation, the spiritual monarchs analyze, illumine, support, visit, and purify countless worlds; they observe and teach countless people, knowing their faculties, and cause countless people to strive for enlightenment and realize peace and harmony. 
The first one, called the practice of joy, or giving joy, is based on transcendent generosity. 
In this way the practitioner develops pure generosity without taking pride in it. 
Second is what is known as beneficial practice, based on transcendent morality. 
The practitioner maintains pure discipline and self-control, free from attachment to material senses, without seeking power, status, wealth, or dominion. 
They transcend suffering by reflecting on the ultimate unreality of the body, detaching from the idea of self and all that pertains to it. 
The fourth, the practice of indomitability, is based on transcendent energy. 
Practitioners attain true knowledge of phenomena and develop an increasingly vast sense of compassion. 
The sixth, called the practice of good manifestation, is based on transcendent wisdom. Here practitioners are pure and nonacquisitive in thought, word, and deed, realizing that thoughts, words, and deeds have no absolute existence. 
Free from falsehood, they are accordingly freed from bondage; they abide in the absolute essence of reality yet appear in life expediently, having no retribution for their actions. 
Practitioners realize the transcendental truth of emptiness, the inconceivability of reality; yet they never give up the will to enlighten others and always expand their sense of compassion. 
Practitioners neither form attachments to the sacred nor feel aversion towards the mundane, holding the Teaching without proprietary sentiments and teaching people without emotional involvement. By virtue of their great commitment and will power, practitioners remain secure while teaching others, not becoming disturbed or discouraged, having attained nonattachment and independence. 
The ninth, the practice of good teaching, is based on transcendent power. 
Here practitioners attain inexhaustible intellectual powers and boundless versatility in teaching, their compassion extending to all beings. 
Practitioners of good teaching are able to do this by discovery of the boundless resources of the potential of enlightenment, by attainment of the light of all truths, and by fulfillment with universal knowledge. 
Practitioners preserve the right teachings of the buddhas of all times for the benefit of all people and reach the source of the reality of the teachings of buddhas. 
Practitioners dedicate their virtues to enabling others to fulfill their vows, perfect transcendent practices, stabilize an indestructible determination for enlightenment, give up conceit, and attain the clear, sharp senses of the enlightened. Fourth is dedication reaching all places. 
They dedicate all their virtues to all fields of enlightenment, to all those working for enlightenment, to all the enlightened, to enlightenment itself, to all universal vows, to all essential ways of emancipation, to purifying all realms of being, to seeing the enlightened appear in all worlds, to seeing the life of the enlightened as infinite, to seeing the enlightened teaching throughout the cosmos, and to assuring the development of all people. 
Practitioners exercise all manner of generosity, including the giving of right teachings and the giving of protection. 
When they give material things to people, they pray that people may attain corresponding qualities: 
Seventh is dedication according to all sentient beings. 
In dedicating their virtues, they pray that people may lack nothing material or moral, experience peace and happiness, get rid of confusion and delusion, attain pure impartial minds, and attain all knowledge without difficulty. 
Practitioners of this dedication attain clear and perfect recollection and get beyond confusion and disturbance. 
Ninth is dedication without bondage or attachment. 
Tenth is infinite dedication equal to the cosmos. 
For practitioners of this dedication, the giving of teaching is paramount, establishing the will for enlightenment in others. 
They are impartial, tireless in practicing good works, pure of heart, independent in knowledge. 
They vow to develop the ability to perfect all perspectives of universal freedom; the ability to absorb, retain, and expound true teachings; and to cultivate enlightening practice for the benefit of one and all. 
The next ten teachers represent to Sudhana the ten stages, which are expounded in the twenty-sixth book of The Flower Ornament Scripture. 
The practitioners of this stage become extremely joyful thinking of the enlightened ones and their teachings, of those working for enlightenment and their practices, of the ways of transcendence, and of the ability to help people. 
Second is the stage of purity, which is sought by way of ten dispositions of mind: 
Practitioners attain this stage by entering into the radiance of the Teaching through ten ways of contemplation: 
They also develop the bases of spiritual powers, the elements of the path to liberation, and the various branches of enlightenment. 
They observe the formation and disintegration of worlds, they realize that the origins of worldly ways are all rooted in attachment to self. 
This leads them to a thorough examination of the process of conditioning, followed by liberating absorption in emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness. 
Practitioners in this stage furthermore develop unbreakable intent and become immune to delusive influences. 
In this stage practitioners fully realize that all things are nonconceptual, accessible to nonconceptual knowledge. 
Practitioners in this stage gain accurate knowledge of good, bad, neutral, mundane, and transmundane actions. 
Tenth is the stage of cloud of teaching, emblematic of the ability of practitioners to teach like clouds showering rain. 
In this stage—which is also called the stage of anointment or coronation, symbolizing anointment or coronation with the crown of all knowledge—practitioners attain incalculable numbers of special concentrations and gain access to the higher knowledges characteristic of the enlightened. 
The next ten teachers after this represent the eleventh stage, the practice of Universal Good. 
Universally Good, the name of the supernal bodhisattva Samantabhadra, who represents the active manifestation of the totality of all enlightening practice, is the fifty-third and final benefactor visited by the pilgrim Sudhana in the tale of the Gandavyuha. 
These teachers of the eleventh stage transmit ten major aspects of this totality: 
producing knowledge from compassion, consistently remembering all truths through mastery of knowledge and compassion, teaching worldly principles everywhere, penetrating the mysteries of writing and higher knowledge of arts, helping people by both conventional and mystical arts and sciences, pure liberation by being in the world without clinging thoughts, illumination by pure knowledge working in the world, finding infinite forms in formlessness, speaking so as to reveal truth, and living in the world with complete knowledge and compassion. 
The fifty-first teacher is Maitreya, the Loving One, who is thought of as the Buddha of the Future. 
Maitreya opens the door to a building of cosmic proportions, the inner dimensions of which Sudhana finds even greater, containing infinite numbers of buildings of equal size. 
Maitreya finally sends Sudhana back to Manjushri, who first sent him on his journey for knowledge and who now becomes his fifty-second benefactor. 
Manjushri in turn, reaching out to Sudhana beyond time and space, illumines him with the light of infinite knowledge and leads him into endless mental command, presence of mind, concentration, and higher knowledge, plunging him into the sphere of practice of Universal Good. 
The vision of Samantabhadra, the Universally Good bodhisattva, finally ushers the pilgrim Sudhana into the ultimate range of the enlightenment experience. 
“Universal Good always fills the universe with various bodies flowing everywhere, with concentration, psychic power, skill and strength, teaching widely without hindrance in a universal voice.” Then the final chapter of the final book of the scripture describes the cosmic vision of Universal Good and the merging of the pilgrim with the total being of Universal Good and the final realization of enlightenment. 
In the infinite realm where all beings and objects reflect one another, buddha-lands are multiplied and remultiplied, sages and ordinary people are the same whole, and the forms of objects interpenetrate. 
And when one subtle sound pervades the universe, a single hair measures infinity, views of great and small disappear, others and self are the same body, conditioned consciousness and feelings are gone, and knowledge pervades without obstruction, this is called entry into the realm of reality. 
It is as when clouds disperse in the sky; the sky is itself clear, so there is no further search for clear sky. 
So once Sudhana had awakened the thought of enlightenment, he asked Manjushri how to learn to act as an enlightening being and practice the path of enlightening beings—he asked no more about the thought of enlightenment. 
He saw the body of buddhas to be free of both being and nonbeing. 
Therefore Meghashri told Sudhana that he always saw infinite buddhas of the ten directions and knew the teaching of universal vision through the light of knowledge attained by recollection of the realm of buddhas. 
Next Sudhana went to the country of Sagaramukha , saw the monk Sagaramegha , and realized the abode of preparing the ground. 
Being tossed about on the waves of pain in an endless circle, temporary students of individual liberation reject this in disgust and do not conceive great compassion. 
Because enlightened action is always in accord with knowledge, the flower covered the whole ocean. 
As objectless compassion responds without contrivance, the spirits bowed in reverence. 
As knowledge is invincible, the embodiment of the buddha sitting on the lotus blossom was immensely tall. 
The reflection and combination of knowledge and action is represented by the buddha’s laying his hand on Sagaramegha’s head. 
Therefore Sudhana saw the monk Supratishthita walking in the sky; because he dwelt neither in the world nor beyond the world, he “traveled in the sky.” Because the voice of the teaching had universal influence and the light of knowledge destroyed illusion, therefore the rain spirits produced thunder and lightning as offerings to the monk. 
Because of his mastery of use of the ten transcendent ways to benefit beings, the monk was honored by ten kings. 
Because he had entered the door of freedom through great knowledge, the monk was unhindered by barriers of defilement and purity; all false states of existence melted away on contact, to become like the sky. 
All mundane phenomena are transmundane phenomena, and all transmundane phenomena are mundane phenomena. 
Therefore the absolute and the mundane, existence and nonexistence, completely change into each other and embellish each other. 
Since the totality, individuality, sameness, difference, integration, and disintegration of all phenomena simultaneously revolve around each other in an interrelated array, this is called the method of arrays of revolving letters. 
Mundane truth should obey absolute truth, so when Megha heard that Sudhana had awakened the thought of enlightenment, he immediately got down from his seat and bowed. 
Because he wanted to inspire Sudhana to further progress, Megha told him that he only knew this teaching method of concentration spells of subtle sound. 
Next Sudhana went to Vanavasin , saw the distinguished man Muktaka , and realized the abode of full equipment with skill in means. 
When Sudhana saw Muktaka he threw himself bodily on the ground, because the essence of the body-mind cluster is itself meditation; he also joined his palms, symbolic of the nonduality of the absolute and mundane. 
Because the subject of trance is immensely deep, all-pervasive, and completely fulfilling, Muktaka entered absorption into a concentration formula for the whirlpool of boundless buddha-fields, whereat there appeared in the ten directions the enlightenment sites of buddhas as numerous as atoms in ten buddha-fields. 
There is no country outside mind, no buddha outside mind, so the Liberated One Muktaka said that if he wanted to see buddhas such as the Buddha of Infinite Light in the World of Bliss, he could see them as soon as he thought of them. 
Because the whole realm of the infinite compassionate acts of all knowledge is a meditation community, inherently unimpeded, Muktaka said he had only delved into the ins and outs of this way to liberation through unimpeded manifestation. 
By knowledge Saradhvaja magically produced actions similar to those of sentient beings yet was without desire himself, so wizards as numerous as sentient beings issued from his waist. 
Because the practices of all vehicles are not left out in the development of sentient beings yet the two vehicles of individual liberation turn their backs on the great function of the compassion and knowledge of buddhas, multitudes of followers of the two vehicles of individual liberation issued from Saradhvaja’s back. 
In the midst of birth and death, practical wisdom is foremost, so enlightening beings issued from Saradhvaja’s head. 
This all illustrates the use of knowledge of emptiness to produce various bodies, creating multitudes of emanations filling the ten directions, developing, educating, and adorning sentient beings while in essence being like space, completely free from cogitation. 
Sudhana also saw Saradhvaja producing countless light beams from his pores—his whole body was the unimpeded light of truth of the body of reality. 
Next Sudhana went to Samudravetali, saw Asha, and realized the abode of nonregression. 
Being greatly compassionate yet unaffected, Asha was a lay devotee. 
Sudhana saw the park and its buildings, ponds, and other features as being adorned with jewels and saw Asha’s features to be ineffably beautiful, because they were an environment and a person produced by respect for the enlightened and service to life, the countless practices of knowledge and compassion. 
Because of the combining of compassion and knowledge, Asha said that the buddhas of the ten directions all came to explain truths to her. 
The land of Nalayur is called Not Lazy, in the sense of the homeland of the seer being the use of effortless knowledge to help beings tirelessly. 
Because the realms of the “dusts”—sense experiences—all return to the “ground” of knowledge, Sudhana cast his body on the ground. 
Because the seer’s union of knowledge and environment was comprehensive, when he took Sudhana’s hand the pilgrim saw himself going to buddhas in the ten directions as numerous as atoms in ten buddha-fields. 
Once one has entered reality, one is always thus of one’s own power, just as one does not carry a boat about after crossing a river in it. 
Then Sudhana went to Ishana, saw Jayoshmayatana, and realized the abode of the spiritual prince. 
The golden fences stand for outward strictness in discipline. 
The medium of the total array refers to one rank including all ranks. 
Meghashri elucidated the way of meditation to bring out the buddha-knowledge in one’s own mind and see the realms of the buddhas everywhere. 
Sagaramegha elucidated the way to contemplate the twelve conditioning links in the ocean of birth and death as the fundamentally pure ocean of buddha-lands. 
Muktaka elucidated the way of spontaneous meditation on the body containing the countless realms of buddha-fields. 
Saradhvaja elucidated the way to the unimpeded spiritual power of tranquil function freed from bondage. 
Bhishmottaranirghosha elucidated the way to appear similar to misguided people by means of effortless knowledge. 
The mendicant’s appearance as a young man signifies ability to carry out practical actions. 
His fingers were webbed, symbolic of using the Teaching to scoop sentient beings up out of the ocean of suffering. 
As he used meditation to manifest the production of knowledge and wisdom, so the earth spirits revealed jewel mines to him. 
Because he was elevated yet humble, the polar mountain spirits bowed to him. 
Then Sudhana went to Sumukha, saw the boy Indriyeshvara by a river, and realized beneficial practice. 
For him the substance of discipline was in using practical and artistic genius to enter the world and yet go beyond the world, just as for Sagaramegha the substance of discipline was in identifying the ocean of birth and death with the ocean of knowledge. 
For the night goddess of joyful eyes, another teacher, the substance of discipline was great compassion.2 According to the rank, progress is not the same; but when knowledge penetrates, every rank is included. 
Then Sudhana went to Samudrapratishthana, saw the lay-woman Prabhuta, and realized the practice of nonopposition. 
Prabhuta was called Perfected because she perfected all practices through patience and tolerance. 
Then Sudhana went to Mahasambhava, saw the householder Vidvan, and realized the practice of indomitability. 
In the tenth abode, knowledge and compassion help everyone, one ascends to the rank of coronation, and one is born in the house of the enlightened. 
Thus Vidvan said that his companions had already been reborn in the family of buddhas. 
Then Sudhana went to Simhapota, saw the eminent Ratnachuda, and realized the practice of nonconfusion. 
The body of concentration pervades all practices: 
On the first floor of the building, food was being distributed, representing generosity. 
Ratnachuda said that in the remote past he had played music and burned a ball of incense in offering to a buddha who came to the city and dedicated the merit to three points; and that for this he had been rewarded with such an abode. 
The remoteness of that past event symbolizes the trancendence of feelings and entry into concentration. 
This represents producing insight through concentration. 
Ratnachuda’s attainment of liberation of the treasury of infinite blessings means fulfillment of myriad practices within meditation. 
Then Sudhana went to Vetramulaka, saw the perfumer Samantanetra, and realized the practice of good manifestation. 
Because insight into emptiness has no boundaries, the streets were wide and even. 
Jaundices represent people with too much desire, an affliction cured by contemplation of impurity. 
Mental illnesses represent people who cling to subtle forms and are not free from bewilderment and extraordinary perceptions, an affliction cured by contemplation of the emptiness of phenomena. 
Samantanetra also said he was skilled at compounding perfumes. 
This was why he had been rewarded with such splendor, to make it clear that he would, on the contrary, have been doomed if he had been torturing people intentionally because of his own subjective feelings. 
Then Sudhana went to Suprabha, saw the king Mahaprabha, and realized the practice of the difficult-to-attain. 
So when he had reached the city he inquired further of the longtime inhabitants. 
The story says the city was octagonal, with ten leagues to a side, and also that it had ten million streets, on each of which lived countless beings. 
Ten million streets could not fit into a ten-league octagon; these are not worldly measurements, but representative of the great metropolis of fundamental knowledge, with streets representing the infinity of interactions of the ten ways of transcendence. 
When one uses independent knowledge to enter into minds as many as beings and identify with them, there is no separate nature—the sentient and insentient are of one nature, and all are transformed according to knowledge into agents of buddha-work. 
In the world when a national leader is enlightened, even the animals dance, and phoenixes appear. 
When ordinary people are perfectly filial, they also experience phenomena like finding leaping fish in frozen ponds and bamboo shoots sprouting in winter. 
Then Sudhana went to the kingdom of Sthira, saw the devout woman Achala, and realized the practice of good teaching. 
At that time she was inspired with the thought of enlightenment on seeing the magnificence of the buddha, and in all the eons since that time she had not so much as had a lustful thought, let alone acted on lust. 
The buddha of that time was called Arms Extended Downward, representative of carrying out transcendent vows from effortless knowledge to guide sentient beings. 
In this case, Sarvagamin appeared to be an outsider, helping beings according to type, yet in reality he was not an outsider. 
Sudhana saw Sarvagamin walking around on the flat mountaintop: 
After this the ten dedications are set up. 
Therefore the ten dedications are needed. Then Sudhana went to Prthurashtra, saw the eminent perfumer Utpalabhuti, and realized dedication to saving all beings without clinging to any image of beings. The land is called Vast Territory to represent far-ranging vows. 
Then Sudhana went to the city of Kutagara, saw the mariner Vaira, and realized indestructible dedication. 
Being profoundly calm and unshakable in the middle of the ocean of birth and death, Vaira said he knew all the treasure islands in the ocean. Knowledge of the locations of precious substances refers to the empty and nonempty matrices of enlightenment. Knowledge of categories of precious substances refers to countless natural virtues. 
Knowledge of types of precious substances refers to the realization of buddha-nature. 
Knowledge of precious vessels refers to understanding of beings’ faculties. 
Extraction of precious substances refers to setting up teachings according to faculties in order to bring out knowledge and virtue. 
Part of the enlightening beings of the pure lands are free like dragons; when purity and pollution have not been forgotten, this is the danger zone of the dragon abodes. 
Conditional illuminates dwell in the ocean of nirvana, so buddha-knowledge does not appear; this is the danger zone of goblins. 
Vaira also knew the movements of the sun, moon, and stars, meaning that he understood the mysterious signs of yin and yang in the world and used this to help people. 
Then Sudhana went to Nandihara, saw the eminent Jayottama, and realized the dedication equal to all buddhas. Nandihara was called the City of Happiness because the eminent grandee Jayottama skillfully settled people’s affairs and because he skillfully examined truths, to the delight of the people. Jayottama was called Supreme Victor because of the supremacy of his practice of patience. 
Jayottama said he knew the pure method of cultivating enlightening practices everywhere, because the practice of dedication equal to all buddhas reaches everywhere. 
Sinhavijurmbhita was called Lion Stretch to symbolize the tirelessness of her practice of kindness. 
Kingship symbolizes knowledge; this means that in this rank of energy and diligence one combines patience, knowledge, and kindness to comprehend the practices of the five ranks in one spiritual realm. 
Then Sudhana went to the land of Durga, saw the woman Vasumitra, and realized dedication of infinite stores of virtue. 
In the realm of the magic of knowledge of Universal Good one’s own body is like a magical effect, the world is like a projected image; with no mind influenced by objects, there are no objects that can influence the mind. 
One attains the joy of meditation just by believing in this, so Vasumitra said that anyone who looked at her became free from desire and attained absorbing joy. 
Vasumitra also said that in the time of a past buddha, Manjushri had fostered her inspiration to enlightenment; and that upon her inspiration with the thought of enlightenment she had distributed all of her wealth and thereby attained this liberation. 
Veshthila is called the Embracer, illustrating the vastness of his knowledge and wisdom, which embraced all things. 
When you understand that essence is spacelike and find that appearances are like projections, you open up enlightened knowledge and vision; then there is no beginning and no end, no present and no past. 
This is one of the three laws that make up the virtues of Vairocana, the Illuminator Buddha; the other two are the subtle principle of the spiritual body represented by Manjushri and the myriad acts of the body of knowledge represented by Samantabhadra. 
Avalokiteshvara lives on a mountain of little white flowers to show people they should not do even a little wrong and should not abandon even a little good. 
West is the direction associated with killing and punishment, meaning a place calling for the practice of compassionate education. 
The great compassion of the enlightening being is paramount, intent on the benefit of beings and not dwelling on personal rewards, so he lives in the material world of sentient beings, represented by the mountainside. 
The fragrant plants represent fine words that please people, while spiraling to the right symbolizes sentient beings going along with the teaching. 
The enlightening being said he had perfected liberation of great compassionate action, showing how Avalokiteshvara represents the universal compassion of buddhas of all times. 
Ananyagamin coming to where Avalokiteshvara was represents great knowledge coming back to compassion. 
Then Sudhana saw the enlightening being Ananyagamin and realized dedication characteristic of true Thusness. 
Then Sudhana went to Dvaravati, saw the celestial Mahadeva, and realized dedication without bondage or attachment. 
All nature spirits are reflections of enlightening beings, beyond the psychic power of mundane ghosts. 
Mahadeva manifested heaps of gold, silver, and jewels, then gave them to Sudhana for him to practice giving to others. 
Then Sudhana saw the earth goddess Sthavara at the site of enlightenment and realized infinite dedication equal to the cosmos. 
Sudhana saw Sthavara with a million earth goddesses, all radiating light and causing the earth to tremble; this illustrates how compassion and knowledge are completely fulfilled at this point, so habits that defile purity disappear. 
As they are in the spiritual ranks—in charge of protecting and helping the world—even though they do not physically leave the Buddha’s assembly, they still can project their appearances throughout the ten directions. 
Then Sudhana saw the night goddess Samantagambhirashrivimalaprabha at the site of enlightenment and realized the stage of purity. 
The night goddess said she had attained liberation through the bliss of tranquil meditation going everywhere. 
She said that while she focused her mind wholly on the salvation and protection of living beings, she practiced the various stages of meditation up to the extinction of irritation and affliction in sentient beings. 
She also emanated multitudes of bodies like various beings and multitudes of bodies like human and celestial rulers, pervading the ten directions, adapting and assimilating everywhere to liberate others. 
Then at the same assembly Sudhana saw the night goddess Samantasattvatranojahshri and realized the stage of blazing radiance. 
In this rank knowledge and compassion are completed and one is born in the house of the enlightened, never parting from enlightenment; hence the goddess was in this assembly at the Buddha’s site of enlightenment. 
Entertainment represents delight in truth. These incarnations all represent practices according to rank within the realization of enlightenment. 
As one has these skills without becoming alienated from the essence of enlightenment and the practice of diligence, the goddess’s place is said to be “not far from here.” The goddess is called Possessed of an Ocean of Tranquil Sound. 
This illustrates how the body of concentration is uncontrived yet its response is universal. 
This night goddess was the mother of the night goddess of universal salvation, representing the ability of the body of concentration to produce energetic action. 
The goddess also mentioned one hundred buddhas and said she had served them all: this represents cultivating the fruits of interdependent progress of all ten stages within the sixth stage. 
The king was Vairocana and the young woman Jewel Light was the night goddess; this represents the stage of practical compassion in a bad time when there is a lot of suffering. 
That the king was Vairocana Buddha represents knowledge being the fruit of action in the ordinary world. 
Then at the site of enlightenment Sudhana saw the night goddess Sarvajagadrakshapranidhanaviryaprabha and realized the stage of immovability. 
This represents the body of knowledge appearing in context. The night spirit said she had attained liberty to teach beings in ways that promoted goodness. 
In the stage of good mind, subtle insight and intellect are completed, and one is good at explaining teachings; hence the spirit is called Glory of the Sphere of Good Power. 
The Buddha also appeared to be born in each Lumbini grove in the billion-world universe and in each atom of all worlds in the ten directions. 
The ascent from this stage to the tenth stage is referred to as a hundred years; being born in all places means that since unfabricated knowledge is like space, like magic, even a single moment of the descent of the spirit pervades the real universe, without any here or there, coming or going, or interruption in time. 
The setting symbolizes the essence and function of knowledge and compassion reaching everywhere, immaterial yet nurturing and supporting all beings. The setting is the same as that of the first stage because knowledge and compassion are simultaneous. 
Knowledge attuned to reality is omnipresent; it cannot be discussed in terms of matter, cannot be understood in terms of form or appearance. 
It manifests similarity to humans and demonstrates humanlike laws, it manifests similarity to celestials and demonstrates celestial ways; it is variegated according to the species to which it appears; it cannot be known by one practice, cannot be understood by one body. 
The qualities of knowledge are briefly described in ten ways. First, the body of knowledge rests on nothing, manifesting characteristics according to the subject. 
Second, appearances of knowledge are like reflections in essence, without any material conventionality. Third, reflections of knowledge originally do not exist; the subject appears according to the mind. Fourth, knowledge has no “here” or “there”—it responds to objects like an echo. Fifth, sentient beings see it falsely, but that is not the doing of knowledge itself. 
Eighth, the spacelike power of intention appears responsively throughout the ten directions. 
Ninth, uncontrived, great compassion pervades the ordinary world to benefit beings. 
Tenth, knowledge is common to all conscious beings, so observation of the ordinary is always real. 
These ten aspects of the Teaching are Gopa’s practice. 
Welcoming represents knowledge and kindness meeting. Sudhana saw Gopa surrounded by eighty-four thousand maidens of royal lineage, representing the eighty-four thousand afflictions. 
The ten teachers who follow Gopa represent the practice of Universal Good in the eleventh stage. 
“This world” symbolizes the realm embraced by great compassion, without distinctions of far and near, inside and outside. 
Lady Maya represents the effortless great compassion that is always in the world. 
The fact that she is the mother of Buddha symbolizes great compassion magically producing great knowledge. 
This means that the ocean of great compassionate practices of Universal Good is endlessly vast, like space. 
Maya also said she had attained this liberation of the magic of knowledge inconceivable eons before, making it clear that it is not possible to calculate in ordinary relative terms—it is necessary that calculation be forgotten, feelings end, and knowledge become manifest before one could know how long it had been since she had attained this liberation. 
The god Smrtimati appeared in an earlier book of The Flower Ornament Scripture, and here is called a king, who also has a daughter. 
The goddess said she had attained liberation of unimpeded recollection, meaning that the extent of the eons of past, present, and future was perfectly clear to her, manifest in the immediate present. 
The goddess said that she served all the buddhas in countless eons. 
Because the timeless realm of knowledge is instantly all-pervasive, this is not a result of fabrication. 
After this the teachers are lay people, not presented as supernatural, to show that the Way of transcendence is fulfilled, but there may be lack of breadth of freedom in helping living beings. 
Then Sudhana saw the young teacher Vishwamitra in the city of Kapilavastu and realized how to be a teacher of worldly principles everywhere. 
Vishwamitra did not tell Sudhana anything but sent him to see Shilpabhijna, illustrating the rule for teacher-exemplars, which is properly not to instruct personally but to leave this to assistant mentors, just answering questions about unresolved matters. 
This represents the fact that the virtuous are never alone, always having associates to assist in the development of education. 
Then Sudhana saw Shilpabhijna and realized universal knowledge of writing. 
He said he had attained liberation with higher knowledge of arts. 
Because these phenomena include all writings, to hold one in mind is to hold all in mind, and to hold all in mind is to hold one in mind—this is the portal of wisdom. 
Pronouncing Ra, he entered the facet of transcendent wisdom in which there are infinite differentiations, as Ra represents the realm of differentiated knowledge and practice of Universal Good. 
Then Sudhana saw the Buddhist laywoman Bhadrottama and realized how to help people by conventional and mystical arts and sciences. 
Bhadrottama is called Best of the Good because she understood all principles. 
Because she was in the material world helping beings, sometimes she was a diviner, sometimes a curer, sometimes an appraiser of jewels, sometimes a writer. 
This is liberation. Then Sudhana saw the householder Suchandra in the same city and realized the way to illumination by pure knowledge working in the world. 
The city Roruka represents the great vows that produce spiritual practices. The householder Ajitasena represents victory over the demons of birth and death. 
The city represents subtle practice within knowledge, the boy and girl represent desireless, unaffected gentility and humility, with equal knowledge and compassion. 
The boy and girl said they had attained the liberation of illusoriness, meaning they had realized that the realms of buddhas and sentient beings are both illusory products of knowledge. 
the body and the environment interpenetrate, their radiance and reflections multiply ad infinitum. 
These are all characteristics of presence in the midst of origination and destruction with knowledge of illusoriness. 
It is like the power of actions of sentient beings, which arises and disappears without any graspable substance or appearance of coming and going. 
In addition, the infinitely adorned body of enjoyment developed by the differentiating knowledge of the ocean of practical vows of Universal Good would not allow Sudhana to stick to limited practices projected to inspire ordinary people. 
Opening means the disappearance of delusion and the appearance of knowledge. 
Sudhana saw the interior of the building to be infinitely vast as space. 
the past, present, and future practices of Maitreya, as well as the buddhas with whom he worked and his spiritual friends, who also expounded various truths to Sudhana. 
Because the realm of knowledge of the body of reality is by natural law always so, no thing is not spiritual, no phenomenon is not wonderful—these are spiritual scenes. Because past, present, and future are not beyond a moment, Sudhana saw events of all times. 
When Maitreya withdrew his spiritual force, the scenes that had been manifested now disappeared. 
This is because the identities of phenomena are like dreams, like illusions, like shadows, like reflections, always there and yet always gone, always one and yet always different. 
Then he had Sudhana fulfill countless teachings, and had him enter the sphere of the practice of Universal Good. 
After establishing Sudhana in his own place, Manjushri disappeared, illustrating how after the fruition of buddhahood one is not different from when one was among ordinary mortals. 
After one attains buddhahood, buddha is basically nonexistent, so Manjushri “disappeared.” Sudhana saw as many spiritual benefactors as atoms in a billion-world universe, in the sense that knowledge of the body of reality pervades the real universe evenly, so he saw everything everywhere as no different from the body of Manjushri, the personification of wisdom. 
This means that the aftermath of the fruition of buddhahood is ultimately not apart from the subtle principle of enlightenment, the diamond mine of knowledge, in the first attitude of faith, yet it activates the cosmic network of perpetual practice. 
And just as Samantabhadra lay his hand on Sudhana’s head here, so did each Samantabhadra before every buddha in every atom of every world in the ten directions also lay his hand on Sudhana’s head, and Sudhana attained the same spiritual experience. 
It also illustrates how the fulfillment of practice is not apart from cause—time does not shift, knowledge does not alter. 

Obeisance to all the buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
Ten topics serve to encompass the bodhisattvas’ path of the Great Vehicle, together with its result. 
What are the ten? 
What is the support?100 In this case, the bodhisattva’s own spiritual lineage, the initial act of generating enlightenment mind, and all the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment101 are called the “support.” Why is that? 
In this context, through depending upon and relying upon the spiritual lineage, a bodhisattva becomes fit for and capable of attaining unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Therefore, the spiritual lineage is called a support in that it is a capability. 
In this context, through depending upon and relying upon the initial development of enlightenment mind, the bodhisattva applies himor herself to generosity, and he or she applies himor herself to morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom. 
Similarly, one applies oneself to the six perfections, the accumulation of merit, the accumulation of wisdom, and all of the entities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
Therefore, the initial act of generating enlightenment mind is called a support in that it is a bodhisattva’s means of application to the practice. 
In this context, through relying upon and depending upon that very means of application to the bodhisattva practice, a bodhisattva will bring to completion unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Therefore, the activity of applying oneself to the bodhisattva practice is called a support in that it brings to completion great enlightenment. 
Because a person who does not abide in the spiritual lineage lacks that spiritual lineage, he or she is not capable of bringing to completion unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, even though he or she may generate mind and put forth effort . 
Conversely, it should be understood that the spiritual lineage is a support even for a bodhisattva who has not yet developed mind and who has not yet commenced the bodhisattva practice. 
But if someone who abides in the spiritual lineage both fails to generate mind and fails to undertake the conduct that leads to enlightenment, then despite having the capacity to achieve enlightenment, he or she will not attain enlightenment quickly. 
it should be understood that someone who is the opposite of that102 will attain quickly. 
In brief, the spiritual lineage is of two types: 
that which exists naturally109 and that which has been developed.110 Regarding this , the spiritual lineage that exists naturally is a quality of bodhisattvas’ six bases.111 Its is such that it has existed as an unbroken series since beginningless time and it is obtained through the natural order of things. 
The form of spiritual lineage that is developed is one that is obtained through the prior cultivation of virtue roots. 
In the present usage, is meant to apply to both types. 
This spiritual lineage,112 moreover, is also called a “seed,”113 a “constituent element,”114 and a “fundamental nature.”115 Additionally, the form that has not yet borne fruit116 is subtle, because of the absence of any fruit. 
The form that has borne fruit is distinct, by virtue of the presence of that fruit. 
Since the bodhisattvas who are endowed with this spiritual lineage surpass all the listeners and solitary realizers, let alone all other sentient beings, it should be known as a quality that is unsurpassed. 
Why is that? 
In brief, there are two types of purity: 
the purity the obscurations of the mental afflictions117 and the purity the obscurations to that which needs to be known.118 Regarding these, the spiritual lineage that is possessed by listeners and solitary realizers brings a purity that is gained through the removal of the obscurations of the mental afflictions, but not through the removal of the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
However, the spiritual lineage of the bodhisattvas brings them a purity that is gained through the removal of both the obscurations of the mental afflictions and the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
Therefore, is the most outstanding of all, and thus it is said to be “unsurpassed.” In addition, there are four ways in which the bodhisattvas should be known as superior to the listeners and the solitary realizers. 
What are the four? 
Regarding this , the superiority that is due to their faculties is the following. 
A bodhisattva is naturally one who possesses sharp faculties, whereas a solitary realizer possesses middling faculties, and a listener possesses weak faculties. 
Regarding this , the superiority that is due to their pursuit is the following. 
Bodhisattvas are dedicated not only to pursuing what is beneficial to themselves, but also to pursuing what is beneficial to others, what is beneficial to a multitude of people, and what brings happiness to a multitude of people. 
They are also their compassion for the world and are dedicated to the welfare, benefit, and happiness of gods as well as humans. 
Regarding this , the superiority that is due to their skill is the following. 
Listeners and solitary realizers develop skill in relation to the heaps, the bases, the constituents, dependent origination, proper and improper conditions, and the truths.119 Bodhisattvas do so in relation to these as well as all the other branches of learning.120 The superiority that is due to their result is the following. 
Listeners attain the result that is the listeners’ enlightenment. 
Solitary realizers attain the result that is the solitary realizers’ enlightenment. 
Bodhisattvas attain the result of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
There are six signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfections. 
by which others can realize that someone is a bodhisattva. 
They are the signs of the spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of generosity and the signs of the spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfections of morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom. 
Regarding this , these are signs of the spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of generosity: 
In this case, a bodhisattva naturally takes pleasure in being generous. As long as one continues to have and possess objects that are suitable for giving, one is inclined to share them with others continually and without interruption. 
One gives with a joyous mind, not with a mind that is distressed. 
One will share even though one may only have a small amount . 
feels shame at having failed to practice generosity.121 One extols generosity to others and instills in them a desire to be generous. 
Upon seeing someone who is being generous, is delighted and feels very happy. 
He or she rises before those persons worthy of honor,122 those who are elders, those worthy of being venerated,123 and those worthy of being shown respect, and offers them a seat. 
Whether asked to do so or not, gives suitable instruction concerning the different activities that sentient beings ought to carry out and that will enable them to remain free of misfortune in both this world and the next.124 One gives protection to those beings who are threatened by such fear as the king, robbers, enemies, water, and the like. 
To the fullest extent of one’s powers, one protects those from those diverse and extensive kinds of serious danger. 
If one borrows from others, one will not cheat them or default on the loan. 
One will not cheat or seek to defraud those relatives with whom an inheritance is shared. 
One truthfully informs an individual who is confused or who has formed a mistaken opinion about various types of objects of value, such as gems, pearls, lapis lazuli,125 conch shells, crystals, coral, gold, silver, emeralds, sapphires, rubies, turn to the right, and so forth, so that they will not be cheated by others. 
is someone who has a natural propensity for great wealth and gives thought to all forms of extensive wealth and property. 
is also someone who has a propensity for wide-ranging business activities, not for those that are minor sources of revenue. 
He or she exhibits shame and abashment.126 does not develop great attachment even after acquiring extensive wealth, let alone a small . 
These and other similar qualities should be understood as the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of generosity. 
In this case, a bodhisattva naturally comes to have weak forms of nonvirtuous deeds of body and speech;127 he or she does not those that are exceedingly violent or that cause great injury to sentient beings. 
After having committed an evil deed, one feels remorse very quickly. 
Moreover, one feels shame while carrying out that ; one does not feel pleased . 
is also a type of person who avoids doing injury to other beings with such things as one’s hand, a lump of earth, a club, or a weapon. 
One honors those who are worthy of being shown respect at appropriate times with acts of reverential salutation and prostration, by standing up in their presence, making the gesture of joined palms, and engaging in respectful behavior. 
One is sincere, polite, and willing to comply with the wishes of others. 
One smiles, extends a pleasant facial expression, does not frown, and speaks in an agreeable manner.128 is grateful and appreciative toward those persons who have been helpful . 
One behaves in an upright manner toward those who ask for something. 
One does not mislead them with deceitfulness129 and guile.130 One obtains wealth not in an unjust manner but by adhering to what is right and without engaging in cruelty.131 is naturally desirous of virtue. 
One takes an interest132 in the meritorious activities of others, needless to say in one’s own. 
is greatly upset by the doing of harm to others, such as when he or she has seen or heard that others have been killed, bound, cut, beaten, reviled, threatened, and the like. 
is serious about taking up the Dharma and serious about future lives, apprehensive about even a very minor objectionable act,133 much less one that is great. 
One does not engage in quarreling, verbal condemnation, contentiousness, disputes, or activities that are harmful to others, or that bring harm, disadvantage, or suffering both to oneself and others. 
One stops others from engaging in improper activities, such as the ten evil and nonvirtuous karmic paths. 
As equally patience and morality, one will give up one’s own activities and allow oneself to be directed by others in whatever manner they may desire to carry out their activities. 
One does not maintain a hostile or angry state of mind for a long period of time; one instantly changes that state of mind into one that is pleasant. 
does not speak in an incoherent manner about things that are useless or meaningless, or without giving due consideration . 
One has a high regard for virtuous qualities and voices genuine136 praise of others. 
These and other similar qualities should be understood as the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of morality. 
These are the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of patience: 
In this case, when a bodhisattva is harmed by others, he or she naturally avoids displaying a hostile state of mind and also does not undertake to do harm . 
Upon being directed to do something, one accepts that directive quickly. 
One also does not hold on to rancor137 and does not maintain a hostile attitude that lasts for an extended period of time. 
These should be understood as the types of signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of patience. 
These are the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of effort: 
In this case, a bodhisattva is naturally energetic. 
One rises at daybreak and goes to sleep at the end of the day. One does not indulge excessively in the comfort of sleep, the comfort of lying down, or the comfort of lying on one’s side. 
When an activity is being carried out, one gives careful consideration to being overcome by the disinclination to act and idleness, in order to insure that the activity is brought to completion. 
One is also firmly resolute with regard to all activities that have been undertaken. 
Nor does one hold a low opinion of oneself. 
These should be understood as the types of signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of effort. 
These are the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of meditative absorption: 
In this case, a bodhisattva naturally avoids becoming greatly distracted when reflecting upon a Dharma topic. 
Whenever one sees or hears about remote forest retreats, places for sleeping and sitting that are in outlying regions, that have the quality of being isolated from human beings, and that are free of evil persons and suitable for engaging in inner contemplation, one develops a fervent eagerness for departure and living in solitude, and thinks to oneself: 
Evil, improper thoughts do not greatly disturb the mind of who has gone into seclusion and who is investigating the subjects that are of concern, nor do remain when they have seized control . 
One is able to develop a state of loving-kindness very quickly even toward the class of beings that represent enemies, to say nothing of the class of friends and that of neutral persons. 
Whenever one hears about or sees the suffering of sentient beings who are undergoing many different kinds of suffering, one generates an attitude of great compassion and takes action with all one’s abilities and with all one’s strength to remove the suffering of those beings. 
One is naturally desirous of benefiting sentient beings and of providing them with happiness. 
remains steadfast of mind140 with regard to those who have experienced misfortune, with regard to a relative in difficulty, with regard to someone experiencing distress relating to material wealth, with regard to someone who has undergone corporal punishment, imprisonment, or banishment, as well as with regard to those who have experienced any other similar kinds of misfortune. 
is intelligent, able to take up, retain, and comprehend Dharma teachings, and endowed with strong recollection. 
One is able to recall even something that was done or said long ago. 
One is also able to cause others to remember . 
These should be understood as the types of signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of meditative absorption. 
These are the signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of wisdom: 
In this case, a bodhisattva is endowed with the innate wisdom to take up all the branches of learning and all the objects that need to be realized. 
He or she is not slow-witted, weak of mind, or a type of person who is bewildered. 
He or she possesses the strength to reflect carefully on the various that put a stop to the causes of lack of mindfulness.141 These should be understood as the types of signs of a bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage that occur in relation to the perfection of wisdom. 
All of these should be understood as the types of distinct signs through which one can infer the bodhisattva’s spiritual lineage. 
However, with regard to the ascertainment of its actual existence, only the buddhas, the blessed ones, perceive directly. 
Moreover, because the spiritual lineage of bodhisattvas is naturally endowed with good qualities, excellent, virtuous, and possessed of pure spiritual attributes, it serves as a cause for attaining the supreme, eternal, unsurpassed status of a tathāgata that is beyond ordinary thought and so difficult to gain. 
In addition, a bodhisattva naturally will continue to possess these pure spiritual attributes, as long as he or she does not become afflicted by some or all of the four states of mental affliction142 that oppose those pure spiritual attributes. 
At those times when he or she does become afflicted , those pure spiritual qualities will not be evident and he or she occasionally will be reborn in the lower realms.143 But even when a bodhisattva is born in the lower realms, it should be understood that, due to the spiritual lineage, there is a great difference between him or her and the other sentient beings who have been born in the lower realms. 
In this case, a bodhisattva is born in the lower realms only occasionally and once in a great while. 
Having been born in the lower realms, he or she quickly escapes from there. 
He or she does not undergo the kind of severe experiences of suffering associated with the lower realms that other beings born there must undergo. 
When does undergo those lighter forms of suffering, he or she generates great aversion . 
Moreover, urged by the spiritual lineage that is the cause for a buddha’s great compassion, he or she also generates a compassionate attitude toward the suffering beings who have been born there. 
It should be understood that these are the kinds of characteristics that distinguish a bodhisattva who has been born in the lower realms from the other beings who have been born there. 
What are the four states of mental affliction that oppose a bodhisattva’s pure spiritual qualities? 
The first state of mental affliction is the condition of possessing strong mental afflictions and mental afflictions that continue for extended periods of time, due to having previously been a heedless person who repeatedly developed the mental afflictions. 
The second state of mental affliction is the associating with evil companions that is engaged in by a foolish person who is lacking in judgment. 
The third state of mental affliction is the lack of freedom and the mental trepidation that is experienced by someone who is under the control of a superior, a king, a robber, or an adversary, and the like. 
The fourth state of mental affliction is the need to obtain a livelihood that is experienced by someone who does not have a means of subsistence. 
There are also four causes that prevent a bodhisattva who possesses the spiritual lineage from attaining unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
What are the four? 
In this case, a bodhisattva may not meet initially with a spiritual teacher, a buddha, or a bodhisattva who can reveal the unerring path to enlightenment. 
This is the first cause. 
Then again, even though a bodhisattva has met with a spiritual teacher, he or she may wrongly grasp the bodhisattva trainings and wrongly cultivate them. 
This is the second cause. 
Furthermore, even though a bodhisattva has met with a spiritual teacher and is cultivating the bodhisattva trainings unerringly, he or she may become lax in carrying out the practice. 
He or she may become lazy and fail to develop a strong and continuous form of effort. 
This is the third cause. 
In addition, even though a bodhisattva has met with a spiritual teacher, is cultivating the bodhisattva trainings unerringly, and has generated effort in relation to the practice, he or she may not possess faculties that are matured and may not have completed the collections enlightenment, because he or she has not gained mastery of the qualities that are conducive to enlightenment for a long period of time. 
This is the fourth cause. 
Even if someone possesses the spiritual lineage, he or she will not attain enlightenment due to the deficiency by these causes. 
However, it should be understood that if someone does not possess the spiritual lineage, he or she will absolutely never, under any circumstances, attain enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the first chapter, entitled “The Spiritual Lineage.” A bodhisattva’s initial development of mind is the first correct aspirational prayer144 among all the correct aspirational prayers of a bodhisattva and the one that causes all the other correct aspirational prayers to be undertaken. 
Therefore, its essential nature is that of a correct aspirational prayer that occurs at the beginning. 
The bodhisattva who is aspiring to enlightenment formulates the following thought and states the following words: 
“Oh, how I wish to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment! 
May I be one who accomplishes the welfare of all sentient beings, and may I establish them in the nirvana that is an absolute termination145 and in the knowledge of a tathāgata.” In this way, he or she generates mind by being one who desires both enlightenment and the welfare of sentient beings. 
Therefore, the generating of mind is whose aspect is desire. 
Moreover, the generating of mind develops its desire by relying upon both enlightenment and the welfare of sentient beings as its objects;146 it does not do so in the absence of objects. 
Therefore, the generating of mind possesses both enlightenment and the welfare of sentient beings as its objects. 
Because it is also a necessary antecedent147 for the collection of all the roots of virtue that are conducive to enlightenment, the act of generating mind is virtuous148 and endowed with supremely virtuous qualities; it is excellent149 and supremely excellent; and it is good150 and supremely good. 
It opposes all the misdeeds of body, speech, and mind that reside within sentient beings. 
Compared to all other virtuous, correct aspirations that relate to any of the mundane or transcendent aims, the bodhisattva’s initial development of mind is the unsurpassed and most supreme correct aspiration. 
In this way, the initial development of mind should be understood in terms of these five characteristics: 
As soon as a bodhisattva has generated enlightenment mind, he or she becomes one who has entered into the unsurpassed Great Vehicle enlightenment and also is counted among those who are referred to as bodhisattvas, according to the conventions of everyday usage.151 Therefore, the act of generating mind is considered to represent the point of entry. 
Once a bodhisattva has generated this mind, he or she will eventually attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; this is not the case for anyone who has not generated . 
Therefore, the act of generating enlightenment mind is the root of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
It is through feeling compassion toward suffering beings and developing the intention to save them that a bodhisattva generates mind. 
Therefore, the act of generating mind is a natural outcome152 of compassion. 
Moreover, it is by depending upon and relying upon this mind that a bodhisattva applies himor herself to the bodhisattva training, the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment and the activities that are beneficial to sentient beings. 
Therefore, the act of generating mind serves as the support153 for the bodhisattva training. 
In this way, the initial development of mind should be understood in terms of the way in which it is considered,154 as well as in terms of its being a root, a natural outcome, and a support. 
The bodhisattva’s initial development of mind is also briefly of two types: that which leads to emancipation and that which does not lead to emancipation. 
Regarding them, the that leads to emancipation is that which, once developed, perpetually engages and does not turn back . 
The form that does not lead to emancipation is that which, once developed, does not perpetually engage and does turn back . 
Moreover, the turning back of the mind that was generated is of two types: 
one that is permanent and one that is not permanent. 
Regarding them, the one that is permanent is the mind that, once reversed, does not develop again the intention to pursue enlightenment. 
By contrast, the one that is not permanent is the mind that, after being reversed, does again develop repeatedly the intention to pursue enlightenment. 
It should be understood that the act of generating mind by four contributing factors, four causes, and four strengths. 
Upon seeing or hearing this, he or she may have the following thought: 
“How great is the power of enlightenment! 
that to see or hear about such spiritual power or such a miraculous act by who resides in it or who has undertaken to attain it.” Having developed a strong feeling of devotion toward supreme enlightenment on the strength of having seen or heard about this spiritual power, he or she may then generate the thought to supreme enlightenment. 
This is the first contributing factor for generating mind. 
Having heard this teaching from the bodhisattva collection , he or she may then develop faith . 
Having developed this faith and having developed a strong feeling of devotion toward the knowledge of a tathāgata on the strength of listening to the true Dharma, he or she may then generate the intention to attain a tathāgata’s knowledge. 
This is the second contributing factor for generating mind. 
He or she may not hear the Dharma but may observe that the true Bodhisattva Dharma is on the verge of disappearing. 
Having observed this, he or she may then have the following thought: 
“Oh, how much the continued existence of the true Bodhisattva Dharma does serve to remove the suffering of immeasurable numbers of beings! 
Therefore, I must generate mind in order to preserve the true Bodhisattva Dharma for a long time so that the suffering of those beings might be removed.” Having developed a strong feeling of devotion toward the knowledge of a tathāgata on the strength of this very preserve the true Dharma, he or she may then generate the intention to attain a tathāgata’s knowledge. 
This is the third contributing factor for generating mind. 
He or she may not observe that the true Dharma is about to disappear but may observe that during a final era and a final age the constitution of beings in such an age is inferior in that they are afflicted by the following ten secondary mental afflictions: 
a high degree of ignorance, a high degree of shamelessness and absence of abashment, a high degree of jealousy and stinginess, a high degree of suffering, a high degree of indisposition, a high degree of mental afflictions, a high degree of misdeeds, a high degree of lack of mindfulness, a high degree of laziness, and a high degree of lack of faith. 
Having observed this, he or she may then have the following thought: 
“Oh, how great is the degeneracy157 of the present era! 
During a time when are afflicted in this way, it is rare for anyone to generate even the intention to attain the lesser forms of enlightenment listeners and solitary realizers, much less for anyone to generate the intention to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Therefore, let me generate mind myself and may this also lead others to emulate me and generate as well.” Having developed a strong feeling of devotion toward supreme enlightenment on the strength of generating mind is so unlikely to occur during a final era, he or she may then generate the intention supreme enlightenment. 
This is the fourth contributing factor for generating mind. 
What are the four causes? 
Excellence of spiritual lineage is the first cause a bodhisattva to generate mind. 
Receiving assistance from a buddha, bodhisattva, or spiritual teacher is the second cause to generate mind. 
Having compassion for sentient beings is the third cause a bodhisattva to generate mind. 
Lack of fear regarding the suffering of samsara and the suffering difficult activities, both of which are long-lasting, have many varieties, are intense, and occur uninterruptedly is the fourth cause to generate mind. 
The excellence of a friend should be understood as being of four types. 
In this case, for a bodhisattva’s friend at the very outset not to be stupid or have a slow intellect, to be learned and discerning , and not to be one who has taken on bad views is the first excellence of a friend. 
For him or her not to direct to engage in lack of mindfulness158 or provide any opportunity to engage in lack of mindfulness is the second excellence of a friend. 
For him or her not to direct to engage in misdeeds or provide any opportunity to engage in misdeeds is the third excellence of a friend. 
For not to turn away from those qualities of faith, aspiration, undertaking, effort, or method that relate to a higher purpose and then cause that to pursue qualities of faith, aspiration, undertaking, effort, or method that relate to a lesser purpose is the fourth excellence of a friend. 
A bodhisattva becomes one who possesses an abundance of compassion toward sentient beings due to four causes. 
Among the limitless world spheres of the ten directions there are world spheres in which suffering is not found. However, a bodhisattva takes birth in a world sphere where there is suffering and where suffering is found, not one where suffering is absent. 
He or she observes that others have been affected, stricken, and overcome by some particular form of suffering. 
Moreover, he or she observes that either others, or , or both have been affected, stricken, and overcome by many different kinds of long-lasting, intense, and continuous forms of suffering. 
Therefore, on the basis of his or her spiritual lineage, due to his or her natural goodness, and because of these circumstances that are perceived and these factors, a bodhisattva develops a compassion that can be small, middling, or great, without having engaged in the continuous practice . 
Once a bodhisattva has manifested compassion toward sentient beings, there are four causes that keep him or her from become afraid of or alarmed by even samsaric suffering that is long-lasting, of many varieties, intense, and continuous, much less that is small. 
He or she is naturally courageous, steadfast, and strong. 
This is the first cause. 
This is the second cause. 
He or she possesses strong devotion toward unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
This is the third cause. 
This is the fourth cause. 
What are the four strengths? 
Regarding these, the desire for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment that is developed through one’s own abilities is called the bodhisattva’s strength for generating mind that relates to oneself. 
By contrast, the desire for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment that is caused to arise through the influence of another person is called the bodhisattva’s strength for generating mind that relates to others. 
The previous practice160 by a bodhisattva of virtuous qualities associated with the Great Vehicle that now161 quickly leads him or her to generate mind merely by seeing a buddha or bodhisattva or hearing them being praised, let alone by hearing the true Dharma or seeing spiritual power, is called the causal strength for generating mind. 
The long-term cultivation of virtuous activities by a bodhisattva in this life— such as serving a true spiritual being and listening to and reflecting upon the true Dharma—is called the strength for generating mind that derives from practice. 
Regarding this , whether a bodhisattva relies upon these four contributing factors and four causes either in their entirety or only partially, if he or she develops mind by means of the strength that relates to oneself and the causal strength in combination or either one individually,162 then it will be firm, strong, and unwavering. 
However, the mind that arises through the strength that relates to others and the strength that derives from practice should be understood as one that will not be firm. 
There are four causes that turn a bodhisattva away from mind. 
What are the four? 
He or she does not possess the spiritual lineage. 
He or she is under the control of an evil companion. 
He or she has little compassion for sentient beings. 
He or she is afraid of the suffering of samsara that lasts for a long time, has many varieties, is intense, and occurs uninterruptedly. 
He or she fears it and is alarmed by it to a very great degree, and falls into a state of terror . 
These four causes that turn one away from mind should be understood as being the opposite of the four causes for developing mind that were described above at length. 
A bodhisattva who has newly generated a firm mind possesses two marvelous and wonderful qualities that are not shared by the world at large. 
What are the two? 
He or she embraces all sentient beings in the manner that a spouse163 and yet is untainted by the fault of embracing a spouse. 
Regarding this , the fault of embracing a spouse is the following. 
It is the two qualities of developing afflicted forms of affection and hostility in response to favorable or injurious actions by one’s spouse. 
Neither of these is found in a bodhisattva. 
A bodhisattva who has newly generated a firm mind exhibits two salutary forms of superior attitude164 toward sentient beings. 
They are the beneficial superior attitude and the superior attitude that relates to happiness. 
Regarding these, the beneficial superior attitude is the desire to cause to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
The superior attitude that relates to happiness is the desire to provide those sentient beings who have fallen into misfortune, who have no protector, and who have no shelter with the things that will assist them and free them from their state of affliction. 
A bodhisattva who has newly generated a firm mind employs two application: 
the application that relates to superior attitude and the application that relates to conduct. 
The application that relates to superior attitude is the daily strengthening of the superior attitude that wishes to benefit and make happy. 
The application that relates to conduct is both daily activities to ripen the spiritual qualities of a buddha within oneself and, relying upon the application that relates to superior attitude, activities to provide sentient beings with as much benefit and happiness as power and strength will allow. 
There are two great doors by which a bodhisattva who has newly generated a firm mind gains virtuous qualities: 
the application that pursues one’s own aim in order to achieve unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and the application that pursues the aims of others in order to liberate all sentient beings from every form of suffering. 
As with the two sources of virtuous qualities, a similar the two great stores of virtuous qualities and the two immeasurable heaps of virtuous qualities. 
From the time that first generates mind, there are two forms of superiority regarding the acquisition of virtue for the sake of enlightenment by one who has newly generated mind as compared with the acquisition of virtue by anyone other than that . 
The acquisition of virtue by a bodhisattva is indeed the cause for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, and is the result of that . 
This is not the case for the acquisition of virtue by all those other listeners and solitary realizers, much less by any beings other than . 
Therefore, the acquisition of virtue by bodhisattvas is abundantly superior to the acquisition of virtue by all others, both in terms of its causal nature and in terms of its result. 
These are the two benefits of generating mind that are gained by a bodhisattva who has newly generated a firm mind: 
As soon as has generated mind, becomes worthy of being venerated165 by all sentient beings; becomes worthy of honor;166 becomes a field of merit and is like a father to all beings. 
One also acquires the merit that will keep one from being harmed. 
Regarding this , the merit that keeps from being harmed is such that the bodhisattva who possesses it is safeguarded in a manner that is twice as great as the protection by a wheel ruler.167 Because it is a form of protection that is always present, neither malicious beings, nor harmful spirits, nor demons, nor local guardian spirits are able to harm , even when he or she is asleep, or in an excited168 or inattentive state of mind. 
Even after a bodhisattva has taken on a different life, he or she meets with little harm and is by nature free of illness through the possession of that merit. 
He or she also does not experience harm that is long-lasting or intense. 
When is striving physically or verbally the welfare of beings or activities on behalf of sentient beings, or when is teaching the Dharma, body does not experience excessive weariness, recollection does not become clouded, and mind does not become impaired. 
A bodhisattva who is established in the spiritual lineage is a person in whom indisposition169 is naturally weak. 
And once he or she has generated mind, then becomes one in whom indisposition is much more weak, in terms of both indisposition of the body and indisposition of the mind. 
The mantra formulas and vidyā spells to ward off the disease, misfortune, and contagion of sentient beings but that prove unsuccessful in the hands of someone else do succeed when carried out by that . 
Needless to say, those that are successful . possesses an abundance of patience and gentleness; he or she endures the pain inflicted by others and does not inflict pain upon others. 
He or she is also greatly distressed upon learning170 that someone is inflicting pain upon another person. 
The intensity of his or her secondary mental afflictions such as anger, envy, guile, dissembling,171 and the like has been blunted. 
The kinds of fears, sources of terror, scarcity of provisions, and other faults that can occur in an inhabited region, as well as the misfortunes that are caused by both human beings and spirits, do not occur is residing there. 
If a bodhisattva who has newly generated mind should take birth on a particular occasion in the hells that represent a level of the lower realms, he or she will ever so quickly escape from that hell because of possessing the merit that keeps one from being harmed. 
He or she will also only experience the slightest form of suffering there and will generate both an extremely strong form of aversion and the mental state of compassion toward those beings. 
These are the numerous kinds of benefits that a bodhisattva who has newly generated mind experiences because he or she possesses the merit that keeps one from being harmed. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the second chapter, entitled “Generating Mind.” What is the bodhisattva practice by those bodhisattvas who have generated mind in the manner ? 
In sum, the phrase “bodhisattva practice” refers to the combination of everything that is included : 
in relation to which the bodhisattvas train themselves, the manner in which they train themselves, and those who train themselves. 
What, then, are in relation to which bodhisattvas train themselves? 
They train themselves in relation to seven subjects.172 What are the seven subjects? 
One’s own and others’ aims, the meaning of reality, Power, the twofold ripening of beings And of a buddha’s qualities in oneself, And the seventh is supreme enlightenment. 
What are one’s own and others’ aims? 
In sum, one’s own aim and that of others should be understood as having ten aspects: 
Regarding these , the quality of being exclusive as it relates both to one’s own aim and to the aims of others should be fully understood and then rejected by a bodhisattva, because violates and is not in agreement173 with the bodhisattva’s code of conduct. 
The following are examples of a bodhisattva’s one’s own aim that are exclusive and that he or she should fully understand and reject: 
the seeking after and experiencing of forms of enjoyment by who is desirous of pleasure for himor herself; the seeking after and retaining of Dharma that buddhas and bodhisattvas have taught, by who exercises stinginess regarding the Dharma; the way of life that is engaged in by who is desirous of a celestial realm174 in which he or she initiates morality and effort and undertakes meditative absorption and wisdom in order a celestial realm; the worshipping of a tathāgata caitya175 by who is desirous of the result of worldly material things176 and who engages in this act as a means of attaining worldly material things; the meaningless177 and false utterings made to others by who is desirous of material gain in which tries to please by telling them that they possess manifold good qualities in order to material gain and procure material gain; the attracting of a group in a manner that is contrary to the Dharma and that is not in keeping with the Dharma by who is desirous of obtaining acts of service for himor herself and in order to obtain acts of service; the freeing of beings who were the servants of others from their state of servitude, so that a state of servitude to you; the freeing of beings who were bound in prison from their imprisonment only to bring them under your control so that they may be made to perform work for you; the freeing of beings who are threatened by others with the dangers of undergoing punishment and the like178 in order to make them subject to the same dangers from you; and the remaining in a state of ease during this life by a bodhisattva, without engaging in careful reflection about the welfare of others. 
These should be understood as one’s own aim is being pursued exclusively. 
These and other similar kinds of bodhisattva activities that are understood to represent the exclusive pursuit of one’s own aim are that a bodhisattva should fully understand and reject. 
On the other hand, a bodhisattva’s generosity and patience, whether they are preceded by compassion, dedicated to enlightenment, or for the sake of a celestial realm, should be understood as always being one’s own aim is related to others.179 Therefore, excluding those types that were presented , all other one’s own aim that are the opposite of those should be understood as is related to the aims of others.180 The following are a bodhisattva’s activities that exclusively carry out the aims of others and that a bodhisattva should fully understand and reject: 
the generosity of who holds a mistaken view, who does not consider that anything will come , and who does not believe fruit; and the teaching of Dharma to others by whose morality has been damaged and who does not cultivate the practice. 
the carrying out of virtuous qualities that relate to a lower stage by who has transcended such a lower stage,181 as well as by a bodhisattva who is skilled at turning back182 the meditative absorptions. 
the performance of beneficial activities for the sake of manifold sentient beings by a bodhisattva who has attained mastery of the controlling powers183 and by a great variety of emanations into the ten directions; and the performance of immeasurable forms of beneficial activities for the sake of an immeasurable number of sentient beings by a muni and a tathāgata who has completed his own aim and on the basis of the unique qualities of a buddha,184 which include the powers, the forms of intrepid confidence, and so forth. 
Regarding these , the first two that were presented are that should be fully understood by a bodhisattva and rejected. 
However, should train with an ever-increasing degree of diligence in relation to the other the aims of others in an exclusive manner. 
Therefore, with the exception of those types , all bodhisattvas the aims of others—including those that are the opposite —represent that are also related to one’s own aim. 
a bodhisattva should train in relation to them as well. 
What is a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that is linked to what is beneficial? 
In brief, it should be understood to have five aspects: 
Regarding these, whatever acquisition of virtue or accumulation of virtue, whether small or great, that a bodhisattva carries out, as well as acquisition of virtue or accumulation of virtue, whether small or great, that he or she causes others to adopt, leads them , introduces them to, and establishes them in, should be understood as the characteristic of being irreproachable as it relates to a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that is linked to what is beneficial. 
Whatever happiness a bodhisattva might provide for himor herself or for another that is free of affliction, whether it be a state of happiness that arises from the providing of assistance186 or a state of happiness of the meditative absorptions, this should be understood as the characteristic of being favorable as it relates to a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that is linked to what is beneficial. 
There are a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that are beneficial to this life but not future lives; to future lives but not this one; both to this life and to future lives; and beneficial neither to this life nor to future lives. 
These four one’s own and others’ aims should be recognized, in the same order and in the appropriate manner, as being related to the four ways of taking up what is right. 
What are the four ways of taking up what is right?187 There are ways of taking up what is right that bring happiness in the present but have a ripening in the future that consists of suffering;188 that bring suffering in the present but have a ripening in the future that consists of happiness;189 that bring happiness in the present and also have a ripening in the future that consists of happiness;190 and that bring suffering in the present and also have a ripening in the future that consists of suffering.191 These categories should be understood in the manner in the sutras. 
Regarding this , in brief the worldly and transcendent qualities that either constitute nirvana, cause nirvana to be attained, or are conducive to nirvana constitute a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that is linked to what is beneficial— promotes tranquility. 
should be understood as the most outstanding and unsurpassed . 
What is a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that is linked to a state of happiness? 
In brief, it should be understood as being made up of five types of happiness. 
The five types of happiness are the causal happiness; the experiential happiness; the happiness that is an antidote to suffering; the happiness that cuts off feelings; and the happiness that is freedom from harm. 
Regarding these, the two types of faculty and object that are related to pleasant experiences, the contact that is caused by them192 and that will lead to a pleasant experience, and any form of karma that will have a desirable result either as a seen event193 or in some future life—all taken together as one—are called “the causal happiness.” There are no beyond these and no more than these. 
The experience194 that is favorable to body and mind and is produced by those very three causes included in the causal aspect of happiness, irrespective of the abatement of suffering,195 is called “the experiential happiness.” Moreover, it is of two types: 
that which is related to the outflows and that which is free of the outflows.196 Regarding them, that are free of the outflows can be both a quality of who is still undergoing training197 and a quality of who is beyond training.198 Further, that are related to the outflows are those of the three realms— those that are related to the desire, form, and formless realms. 
All these of the three realms can further be distinguished, in the appropriate manner, as being of six types according to the basis199 , ranging from those that arise from contact with the eye to those that arise from contact with the mind.200 These six types are also two types: 
Regarding , that are related to the five collections of consciousness are corporeal, and the ones that are related to mind consciousness are mental.201 The notion of well-being that arises in relation to the mere quieting of an unpleasant experience, due to the abatement of the many diverse and varied forms of unpleasant that can occur—such as cold, heat, hunger, thirst, and the like—through counteracting that cold, heat, hunger, thirst, and the like, is called “the aspect of happiness that is an antidote to suffering.” The state of composure that causes the cessation of conceptions and feelings202 is called “the aspect of happiness that cuts off feelings.” In brief, the happiness that is freedom from harm is of four types: 
of a person who has left home properly and entered the homeless state by faith, and who has thereby gained freedom from the multiple forms of suffering that arise from attachment to the householder state, is called “the happiness of departure.” The joy and ease that is born of separation in the first meditative absorption through the separation through having abandoned the objects of desire203 as well as evil and nonvirtuous qualities, is called “the happiness of separation.” in the second meditative absorption and above, through having quelled deliberation and reflection,204 is called “the happiness of tranquility.” The happiness that arises both through having permanently freed oneself from all the mental afflictions and through having attained complete and perfect realization of entities that need to be known as they truly are is called “the happiness of complete enlightenment.” The causal aspect of happiness is identified as happiness in that it is the cause of happiness; it does not represent happiness in terms of its essential nature. 
The experiential aspect of happiness is not by virtue of its causal nature; however, in terms of its essential nature. 
The aspect of happiness that is an antidote to suffering is not either by virtue of its causal nature or in terms of its essential nature; rather, it is happiness only in the sense of quieting suffering— by virtue of the fact that it brings about the removal of suffering. 
The aspect of happiness that cuts off feelings is not either by virtue of its causal nature, in terms of its essential nature, or in the sense of bringing about a removal of suffering; however, it is happiness in that it is a state that one abides in for a limited period of time and that constitutes the cessation of suffering in its highest sense, as in the phrase: 
“Whatever feeling here is suffering.” The final form205 included in the happiness that is freedom from harm—that is, the happiness of complete enlightenment—represents happiness in the sense that it is the permanent cessation in the future206 of that very same suffering in its highest sense and, as a seen event,207 the permanent removal of the forms of indisposition present in one’s being208 that are related to the mental afflictions. 
Regarding this , the bodhisattva should provide for sentient beings happiness that support what is beneficial, not that support what is harmful. 
Moreover, after having fully and accurately realized with his or her wisdom the happiness that support what is harmful, should cause beings to give up any desire for them and, to the best of his or her ability, strive to draw them away and divert them from them. 
Through reliance upon skillful means, a bodhisattva should also provide for sentient beings what is beneficial , even though it may be followed by unpleasantness and they might not desire it because it is accompanied by pain and mental unhappiness. 
What is the reason for this? 
It should be understood with certainty that providing for what is beneficial it is accompanied by unpleasantness and turning them away from what is harmful it is accompanied by pleasantness is so that sentient beings happiness in the future. 
Therefore, it should be recognized that the bodhisattva who desires what is beneficial for sentient beings also, in fact, desires happiness . 
Whoever provides what is beneficial should also be recognized as providing happiness, because what is beneficial represents a cause and what is happiness represents a result. 
Therefore, anything that possesses being beneficial for sentient beings should be understood as possessing bringing them happiness. 
With regard to this , a bodhisattva should, unhesitatingly and as one’s sole aim, provide sentient beings with whatever karma both having a desirable result—either as a seen event or in a future life—and are included in the causal aspect of happiness; with whatever happiness are an antidote to suffering; with whatever happiness are cuts off feelings; and with whatever happiness are is freedom from harm. 
these are both beneficial and free of reproach. 
should not, however, provide with either the experiential aspect of happiness or object, faculty, or contact contained within the causal aspect of happiness that are afflicted in that they will lead to a state of affliction, and that are, reprehensible,209 harmful, and unwholesome. 
This should be understood as the bodhisattvas’ one’s own and others’ aims that is linked both to what is beneficial and to what happiness. 
There are no beyond these, and there are no other than these. 
What are a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that are included within a cause or a result? 
In brief, it should be understood that there are three types of causes and three types of results: 
the causes of the maturations, the results of the maturations, the causes of merit, the results of merit, the causes of wisdom, and the results of wisdom. 
What are the maturations? 
A bodhisattva’s excellence of life span is the quality of possessing a long life span and the condition of remaining for a long period of time. 
Excellence of physical appearance is the qualities of having a superior physical form, being very good-looking, and having a pleasing appearance. 
Excellence of family is the quality of being born into an eminent family. 
What are the causes of the maturations? 
Giving light and bright214 clothing are causes for excellence of physical appearance. 
Giving to beggars and to those who lack material necessities215 is a cause for excellence of power. 
Speaking the truth and cultivating the avoidance of divisive speech, harsh speech, and idle talk are causes for the quality of having one’s speech accepted. 
Veneration of the Three Jewels and veneration of those worthy of honor216 by one who has made prayers of aspiration217 that he or she might gain a variety of spiritual qualities in the future are causes for the quality of being regarded as eminent. 
Admiration for male qualities and aversion toward the female state, regarding that as having disadvantages, and instilling in others the two causes for attaining the male state— reversing the desire for the female state that is held by women who delight in female qualities and , in a proper manner,218 to set free those men who have been seized and are being led away to have their male faculty destroyed—are causes for the quality of being a man. 
Physically carrying out yourself on behalf of others whatever duties they may have or assisting them , with all your strength and ability, in a proper manner, and without being careless; and providing beings with food boiled grain, porridge, rice gruel, and drink that will strengthen and invigorate them, are causes for excellence of strength. 
These should be understood as the eight types of causes for the eight types of maturation. 
Furthermore, there are, in brief, three conditions that augment these causes so that they will bring about an acquisition of maturations that are complete, abundant, and extensive. 
What are the three conditions? 
They are purity of mind, purity of application, and purity of field. 
Regarding these, the purity of attitude, in the sense of dedicating these virtue roots219 to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; the intensity of attitude, in the sense of carrying out with deep sincerity and great clarity220 ; the joy at the sight of one who is an exemplary Dharma follower; and the extensive reflection and deliberation, at every moment of each day, upon just those things that are in accord with these are what is called purity of mind. 
Regarding , in brief it should be understood that the purity of field through the correct performance of the application and the stability of the properly application in relation to a result.221 Regarding this , what are the results of the maturations? 
A bodhisattva who is endowed with excellence of life span apply himor herself for a long period of time to that pertains to virtue222 and to accumulate a great quantity of the virtue roots that pertain to one’s own aim and that of others. 
A bodhisattva who is endowed with excellence of physical appearance is liked by a great multitude of persons. 
Because of this quality of being liked, he or she becomes someone whom others wish to approach. 
And since the quality of having an attractive physical form causes to come directly into his or her presence, a great multitude of persons will also regard his or her speech as something that ought to be heard. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s excellence of physical appearance. 
A bodhisattva who is endowed with excellence of family is thought highly of by a great multitude of persons and is also revered and praised. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s excellence of family. 
A bodhisattva who is endowed with excellence of power attracts beings and ripens them through generosity. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s excellence of power. 
A bodhisattva whose speech is accepted attracts beings and ripens them through agreeable speech, beneficial conduct, and sameness of purpose.223 This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s quality of having his or her speech accepted. 
A bodhisattva who is regarded as eminent benefits beings by assisting them with a variety of activities that need to be done. 
Because of this benefit, beings feel a sense of obligation and, out of respect and gratitude toward , they very quickly carry out his or her bidding in a courteous and respectful manner. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s quality of being regarded as eminent. 
A bodhisattva who is a male and who possesses the male faculty is a vessel for all qualities, all activities strenuous exertion, and all discernment224 that pertain to that need to be known. 
He also is dauntless and his movements are not restricted with regard to traveling, conversing, residing,225 and sharing meals with other persons at any time, with regard to dwelling alone in secluded places. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s quality of being a male. 
A bodhisattva who is endowed with excellence of strength does not become weary from undertaking to acquire virtuous qualities or from undertaking to help sentient beings. 
He or she is one who has developed effort, one whose effort is strong, and one whose supernatural knowledge226 takes effect swiftly. 
This should be understood as the result that relates to a bodhisattva’s excellence of strength. 
These are the eight results of the eight maturations that favor and support bodhisattvas to benefit sentient beings and to develop the qualities of a buddha. 
The bodhisattva who has become established in the maturation results is also competent and able to accomplish a great number and variety of aims that pertain to sentient beings. 
will also become disciples who are willing to be directed to carry out activities according to his or her wishes—that is to say, that relate to the accomplishing of their own aims. 
if a bodhisattva is able , but his or her disciples are unwilling to act as they have been directed, then the activities that he or she performs on behalf of beings will be neither abundant nor favorable, and he or she will be unable to accomplish the aims of others. 
if a bodhisattva is neither competent nor able, then even though other beings become disciples who are willing to be directed to carry out activities that relate to the accomplishing of their own aims, the activities that bodhisattva performs on behalf of beings will be neither productive nor favorable, and he or she will be unable to accomplish the aims of others. 
Therefore, it is when both are present and both exist that a bodhisattva’s activities on behalf of beings will be productive and favorable such that he or she is capable of accomplishing the aims of others. 
A bodhisattva who finds himor herself in circumstances will quickly ripen the qualities of a buddha in himor herself, and he or she will quickly ripen beings in relation to the three vehicles. 
He or she will also attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and liberate those sentient beings who have been ripened. 
Because the eight types of maturation results enable bodhisattvas to bring about the benefit and happiness of sentient beings in this way, the samsara that for all sentient beings is barren and meaningless becomes something that for is productive and endowed with great meaning. 
What is merit? 
What is wisdom? 
In brief, three of the perfections are called “merit”: 
the perfection of generosity, the perfection of morality, and the perfection of patience. 
Wisdom, however, is made up of one of the perfections—that is, the perfection of wisdom. 
On the other hand, the effort that is relied upon to apply oneself to the wisdom— those that derive from learning, reflection, and meditation; to develop skill regarding the heaps,228 skill regarding the constituents,229 skill regarding the bases,230 skill regarding dependent origination, and skill regarding proper and improper conditions;231 to investigate suffering as to the way in which it constitutes suffering, origination as to the way in which it constitutes origination, cessation as to the way in which it constitutes cessation, and the path as to the way in which it constitutes the path; and to examine and investigate, as they truly are, those entities that are virtuous or nonvirtuous, those entities that arise dependently and are classified as being black or white, blameworthy or beyond reproach, to which one ought to devote oneself or to which one ought not to devote oneself, and that are inferior or excellent are the ones that are called the effort that promotes wisdom. 
The meditative absorption that are relied upon to practice generosity, to undertake and preserve morality, to cultivate the immeasurable practices of loving-kindness and the rest, and that are of the same kind make up the meditative absorption that promotes merit. 
On the other hand, the meditative absorption that is relied upon to apply oneself to the wisdom— those that derive from learning, reflection, and meditation; to develop skill regarding the heaps, etc.— the entire is to be stated in the same manner as was previously done with regard to effort. 
This represents a brief of the six types of merit and wisdom. 
However, it should be understood that would be immeasurably large if an classification of every one of their individual forms was made. 
What are the causes of merit and wisdom? 
In brief, it should be understood that there are three causes of merit and wisdom: 
the aspiration to acquire, maintain, and increase merit and wisdom; the conditions that are advantageous and favorable ; and the prior cultivation of merit and wisdom. 
With regard to these , the conditions that are favorable are the state in which adverse conditions are not present or near at hand as well as the state in which propitious conditions are present or near at hand. 
Regarding this , erring instructions about merit and wisdom that occur through having met with an evil companion or erring notions that come about through erring forms of attention232 are called “the presence of adverse conditions.” the opposite of this and that represent the side of purity233 should be understood to constitute the presence of propitious conditions. 
In addition, those conditions that remove and prevent the arising of obstacles for someone who has undertaken to acquire, maintain, and increase merit and wisdom are said to be “the favorable conditions” for a bodhisattva’s merit and wisdom. It should be understood that the absence of any of these three causes prevents merit or wisdom from being generated. 
What are the results of merit and wisdom? 
On the basis of merit, a bodhisattva remains uninjured234 as he or she transmigrates in samsara and avoids being afflicted excessively by suffering. 
He or she is also able to benefit beings and accomplish their aims, in whatever way may be desired. 
On the basis of wisdom, a bodhisattva collects merit correctly and not in a wrongful manner, and, employing skillful activities of immeasurable variety, until unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment has been attained. 
In brief and in a manner that is appropriate , these should be understood as the four types of results that relate to merit and wisdom. However, would be immeasurably large if an classification of the types were made. 
Regarding this , all of the maturations, as well as all the causes of the maturations, and all the results of the maturations are based upon merit and arise from merit. 
For its part, merit is based upon wisdom and arises from wisdom. 
Therefore, both are essential factors for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
While merit is an essential factor, wisdom is further that is unsurpassed. 
If a bodhisattva lacks either merit or wisdom, he or she cannot attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
This should be understood as representing a bodhisattva’s one’s own and others’ aims that are contained within a cause or a result. 
The acquisition of wealth through exercising a proper form of human effort at some type of craft or occupation;235 the exercise of moderation in the use of those very forms of wealth that one has acquired; the experiencing of results in this life that are the ripening of favorable karma previously; the resorting to states of meditative absorption by a bodhisattva who is skilled at turning them back,236 so that he or she may abide in a state of ease in this life and so that, by resorting to in this very life, he or she may accomplish the aims of others; the entering into nirvana in this life by a person who has become a tathāgata; and the conditioned entities, whether worldly or transcendent, that cause nirvana to be attained in this life are called “ a bodhisattva’s own aim that relates to this very life.” When other beings who have been spiritually tamed by such a bodhisattva also the same qualities that he or she has, this should be understood as others’ aims . 
The excellence of material wealth and individual existence that occurs in the desire realm, along with both its causes and results, and the mundane purity240 of ordinary beings, along with both its causes and results, are one’s own and others’ aims that are not perpetual. 
The permanent abandonment of all the mental afflictions,241 the eightfold ārya path, and the worldly virtuous entities that are attained on the basis of that are what are called “one’s own and others’ aims that are perpetual.” Regarding this point, it should be understood that the qualities of being perpetual and not perpetual are due to three reasons: 
Regarding these , nirvana is perpetual in terms of its essential nature. 
The eightfold ārya path is perpetual because it is not subject to deterioration and because the experiencing of its result does not come to an end. 
in relation to which the training is undertaken by bodhisattvas with all their ability and with all their strength. 
There is nothing of greater significance than and nothing besides them. 
All those who have trained themselves in the past and those who will train themselves in the future with regard to one’s own and others’ aims, have done so and will do so with regard to these very same ten aspects of one’s own and others’ aims; there is nothing of greater significance than these and nothing besides these. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the third chapter, entitled “One’s Own and Others’ Aims.” What is the nature of reality?244 In brief, it is twofold: 
the true state245 of entities, which relates to the mode of being that represents their true nature,246 and the totality of entities, which relates to the mode of being that represents their full range.247 Thus, reality should be understood in the most comprehensive sense as the true state and the totality of entities. 
Moreover, this reality is fourfold in terms of the different types that are to be distinguished: 
that which is recognized in the world; that which is recognized on the basis of reasoning; the object that is perceived248 by the knowledge that removes the obscurations of the mental afflictions;249 and the object that is perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations to that which needs to be known.250 Regarding this that substance251 toward which all worldly beings252 share the same view, based on judgments that operate through gaining familiarity with convention and accepted usage, such as when about the earth : 
in relation to pleasure and suffering, “This is suffering; it is not pleasure”; or, “This is pleasure; it is not suffering.” In short, it is any thing that is an object of settled and firm belief for all worldly persons, “ this is this; it is not that”; or, “This in this manner; it does not in some other manner.” is recognized with their own conceptual thought on the basis of the traditional usage of terms; it is not held through having engaged in reflection, contemplation, and investigation. 
This is called “the reality that is recognized in the world.” What is the reality that is recognized through reasoning? 
a knowable substance that has been well perceived and well determined by wise persons who are skilled in what is reasonable, who perceive things clearly, who are logicians, who engage in rational investigation, who are devoted to that which falls within the domain of logic, derives from their own ordinary253 intelligence and that represents the sphere of rational investigation. 
on the basis of authoritative knowledge254 direct perception, inference, or the testimony of a reliable person, and it is proven and established through the application that relates to demonstrating correctness.255 This is called “the reality that is recognized on the basis of reasoning.” What is the reality that is the object perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations of the mental afflictions? 
The objects that are perceived by the uncontaminated256 knowledge of all the listeners and solitary realizers, as well as by their mundane knowledge that brings forth that uncontaminated knowledge257 and that occurs subsequent to that uncontaminated knowledge258 are called “the reality that is the object perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations of the mental afflictions.” Through apprehending those , the awareness becomes purified of the obscurations of the mental afflictions and also remains free of those obscurations in the future. 
Therefore, this is called “the reality that is the object perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations of the mental afflictions.” What, then, is that reality? 
It is the four noble truths— suffering, origination, cessation, and the path. 
Knowledge of these arises through investigating and attaining a realization of the four noble truths, and also in relation to after a realization of them has been attained. 
Moreover, this realization of the truths arises for the listeners and solitary realizers when, as a result of their having employed the wisdom that is united with the arising and passing away of dependently arisen conditioned entities to cultivate the view that no person exists apart from the heaps, they perceive the mere heaps 259 and they do not perceive a self that is a distinct entity and separately from the heaps. 
What is the reality that is the object perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations to that which needs to be known? 
the opposition to knowledge regarding that which needs to be known is called “an obscuration.” The object that comes within the range of perception of the knowledge that has been freed of the obscuration to that which needs to be known should be understood to constitute the reality that is the object perceived by the knowledge that removes the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
What, then, is that ? 
It is the object that bodhisattvas in order to attain the insubstantiality of entities and that the buddhas, the blessed ones, have attained with their extremely pure . 
“duality” refers to being and nonbeing. 
With regard to these , “being” is that which is posited as the essential nature a designating assertion.262 This has been adhered to by the world in just this manner for a long time. 
It is the root of all the world’s conceptual thoughts263 and elaborations.264 These include, for example, “form,” “feeling,” “conception,” “formations,” and “consciousness”; “eye,” “ear,” “nose,” “tongue,” “body,” and “mind”; those of “earth,” “water,” “fire,” and “air”; those of “ form,” “sound,” “smell,” “taste,” and “tangible object”; “virtuous,” “nonvirtuous,” and “indeterminate”; “origination,” “disappearance,” and “dependently arisen”; “past,” “future,” and “present”; “conditioned ” and “unconditioned”; “this world” and “the next world”; the pair of “the sun and the moon”;265 “seen,” “heard,” “considered,” or “perceived”; “attained” or “sought”; “deliberated upon” or “reflected upon” with the mind; as well as the range of others that end with “nirvana.” These and other similar kinds of essential natures that pertaining to entities and that are conceived of on the basis of designating assertions are what is called the world’s266 “being.” Regarding this , nonbeing the insubstantiality267 and lack of causal efficacy268 of those very designating assertions which posit that begins with “form” and ends with “nirvana” the complete and total nonexistence and absence of the underlying support of designating assertions and which designating assertions are dependent upon in order to occur. 
This absence of duality is the middle way that avoids the two extremes and that is described as being “unsurpassed.” It should be understood that the knowledge of this reality that is possessed by the buddhas, the blessed ones, is perfectly pure. 
On the other hand, the knowledge of it that is possessed by bodhisattvas should be understood to represent the path that is being pursued by those who are still undergoing training. 
This wisdom is also a bodhisattva’s great means for the attainment of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Why is that? as follows. 
A bodhisattva who applies himor herself using conviction270 about emptiness during various births as he or she continues to be reborn in samsara in order to ripen sentient beings and also to ripen the qualities of a buddha in himor herself will understand samsara as it truly is. 
will also not allow his or her mind to become upset by samsara through the aspects of impermanence, etc.271 fails to understand samsara as it truly is will be unable to maintain a mind that is unaffected by all the mental afflictions of desire, hatred, and ignorance, etc. 
And who cannot maintain a mind that is largely unaffected will become a person who wanders in samsara with an agitated mind and who can neither ripen the qualities of a buddha nor ripen sentient beings. 
Moreover, if a bodhisattva allows his or her mind to become upset by samsara through the aspects of impermanence, etc., then he or she, having developed such , will very quickly bring about complete extinction . 
The bodhisattva who very quickly brings about complete extinction will, in that way, also fail to ripen the qualities of a buddha in himor herself and fail to ripen sentient beings, much less attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Moreover, the bodhisattva who applies himor herself using conviction about emptiness will neither become frightened by nirvana nor desire to attain nirvana .272 If a bodhisattva should become frightened by nirvana, he or she will not, from that point forward, complete the accumulations nirvana because, through having developed this frightened attitude, he or she will become a bodhisattva who fails to see the benefits of nirvana and who has abandoned the faith and the steadfast devotion toward nirvana that derive from recognizing the good qualities that are gained by its attainment. 
If a bodhisattva becomes one who abides frequently in wanting to attain nirvana, he or she will quickly bring about complete extinction . 
And a person who quickly brings about complete extinction can neither ripen the qualities of a buddha nor ripen sentient beings. 
Regarding this , the continuous rebirth in samsara by whose mind is subject to the agitation because he or she does not understand samsara as it truly is; the swift extinction by whose mind has been upset by samsara; the failure to complete the accumulations that by whose mind has become frightened ; and the swift attainment of the complete extinction by who abides frequently in wanting to attain nirvana should be understood as a bodhisattva’s lack of means with regard to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
On the other hand, the continuous rebirth in samsara by whose mind is not subject to the agitation because he or she does understand samsara as it truly is; the avoidance of a swift extinction by whose mind has not been upset by samsara; the complete the accumulations that by whose mind has not become frightened ; and the avoidance of a swift extinction by who does recognize the benefits and good qualities of nirvana but does not long for it excessively are a bodhisattva’s great means for the attainment of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Therefore, meditation upon a conviction about supreme emptiness represents within a bodhisattva’s path of training that is called a “great means”—which is to say, to the attainment of a tathāgata’s knowledge. 
Indeed, a bodhisattva who has realized the ineffable nature of all entities as it truly is with the knowledge of the insubstantiality of phenomena that has long since penetrated does not form any type of conceptual thought whatsoever and does not grasp anything other than the bare substance273 and bare suchness. 
also does not think to himor herself: 
“This is the bare substance ,” or “This is the bare suchness .” Rather, the bodhisattva engages the import.274 Engaging this ultimate object, he or she perceives, with his or her wisdom, all entities as they truly are— that they are exactly the same in relation to this suchness. 
On the basis of , he or she does not, because of any fatigue or the occurrence of any discomfort, give up being continuously devoted to the development of skill in all the branches of learning. 
With a body and a mind that are exempt from weariness, will quickly perfect these skills. 
He or she will also achieve a great strengthening of recollection. 
Yet will not become swollen with pride because of these skills. 
Nor will be one who withholds instruction from others. 
He or she will not develop a dejected mind toward any of the skills but will be energetic and one whose progress is unimpeded. 
Maintaining a firm, armor-like practice, the more encounters exceptional forms of suffering while undergoing rebirth in samsara, the more he or she will increase exertion toward unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
The more attains extraordinary positions of eminence, the more he or she will become completely devoid of pride in the presence of sentient beings. 
The more attains extraordinary knowledge, the more he or she will realize to an ever-greater degree he or she is criticize or quarrel with another person, engage in rambling conversation,275 the root or secondary mental afflictions, or engage in mistaken forms of conduct, and will keep his or her mind in a heightened state of equanimity. 
The more spiritual qualities increase, the more he or she will be inclined to conceal his or her virtuous character. 
He or she will not seek to be known as of high rank or gain and honor. 
These are the numerous kinds of benefits that are conducive to enlightenment and conform to enlightenment, and that by the bodhisattva who relies upon knowledge. 
Therefore, all those who have attained enlightenment , who are attain it , and who will attain it do so by relying upon this very knowledge, not some other lesser or one that is more distinguished. 
The bodhisattva who has undertaken the system that is free of elaboration276 in this way and has gained these numerous benefits becomes one who is correctly established in the practice to ripen the qualities of a buddha in oneself and to ripen the spiritual qualities of the three vehicles in others. 
Moreover, the way in which he or she becomes one who is correctly established in the practice is as follows. 
becomes one who has no craving for possessions or for his or her own individual existence.277 He or she also trains in relation to this freedom from craving in order to give both his or her possessions and self to sentient beings for the exclusive benefit of sentient beings. 
He or she trains in body and speech with regard to the restraint,279 in order to develop a natural aversion to evil and a character that is naturally good and virtuous. 
He or she is forbearing of every harm and act of hostility that is carried out by others. 
He or she also trains to develop forbearance so that he or she will be slow to anger and will not inflict harm upon others. 
He or she is either intent upon or has become a master of all the branches of learning, both to dispel the doubts of sentient beings and to provide them with what is beneficial, as well as to obtain the causes of omniscience. 
He or she also becomes one whose mind remains fixed inwardly and one who is well-established in the states of composure. 
He or she trains with regard to mental stability,280 in order to refine the four divine pleasurable states281 and develop an effortless mastery of the five forms of supernatural knowledge,282 in order to both accomplish the aims of sentient beings and remove any fatigue that may arise from applying oneself to the topics about which one should become skilled.283 He or she is perceptive284 and knowledgeable about the supreme form of reality. 
He or she also trains in order to become one who has comprehended fully the ultimate form of reality and so that in the future, within the Great Vehicle, he or she can attain complete nirvana. 
The bodhisattva who is thus correctly engaged attends to those beings who are endowed with virtuous qualities by venerating them and bestowing gain and honor upon them. 
One maintains an attitude of utmost compassion and pity toward those beings who are guilty of wickedness. 
With all one’s ability and strength, one undertakes to eliminate the faults of those . 
One maintains an attitude of loving-kindness toward those beings who carry out harmful acts. 
With all one’s ability and strength, and keeping oneself free of both guile and deceitfulness, one provides those harmful beings with happiness and well-being, with the aim of inducing them to abandon the hostile states of mind that are caused by their own wicked thoughts and deeds. 
With gratitude toward those who carry out beneficial acts, one strives to repay with a benefit that is equal to or greater . 
With all one’s ability and strength, one fulfills virtuous aspirations. 
One ponders, “How can it be made known that I am unable , not I am unwilling ?” It should be understood that these are the kinds of correct practice by a bodhisattva who has undertaken the system that is free of elaboration and who is relying upon the knowledge of the supreme form of reality. 
Regarding this , what is the application285 by which the ineffable nature of all entities can be understood with precision? 
It should be understood that any designation of a unique characteristic that occurs in relation to those entities that were earlier that range from “form” and “feeling”286 up to “nirvana” is nothing more than a designation. 
neither a essential nature nor something separate from or different from that represents a thing to which speech refers or that is an object of speech. 
That being the case, the essential nature of entities does not exist in the way it is described in words. 
However, it is also not the case that it is completely and totally nonexistent. 
If does not exist in that manner287 and it is also not something that is completely and totally nonexistent, how, then, does it exist? 
It is both the avoidance of a failure of understanding that represents the imputation of something that does not truly exist288 and the avoidance of a failure of understanding that represents the denial of something that does truly exist.289 Moreover, it should be understood that this essential nature of all entities in an ultimate sense is an object that is perceived exclusively by a knowledge that is free of conceptual thought.290 On the other hand, if entities or a substance291 actually did possess the very nature that is indicated by the verbal expressions that occur in relation to them, then a single entity or a single substance must be of many different kinds and possess a multiplicity of essential natures. 
Why is that? in the following way. 
Many designations and figurative expressions of many different kinds can be made using numerous terms in relation to a single entity or substance. 
Yet among these many and diverse designating assertions, no determination whatsoever can be made which that the essential character, composition, or nature of some entity or substance by one particular designating assertion is correct, and that by the other remaining designating assertions are not . 
Therefore, all entities and substances lack the essential character, composition, or nature by all designating assertions, both the ones that sound and the ones that are flawed. 
Moreover, suppose that the entities of form, etc., as they were described previously, did possess the essential nature a designating assertion. 
In that case, a substance first and then, afterward, a designating assertion could be applied to it, according to the wish . 
prior to the application of the designating assertion, when the designating assertion had not yet been made, such an entity or substance would not possess an essential nature. 
And if no application of a designating assertion is made, then it should not be right for an entity or substance to possess essential nature a designating assertion. 
If that were so, then even without the application of a designating assertion “form,” an awareness of form should occur in relation to the entity that is known as “form” and the substance that is known as “form.” But does not occur . 
For this reason and by means of this application, it can be understood with precision that all entities possess an essential nature that is ineffable. 
Just as with regard to form, the same should be understood for the entities as they were described from feeling, etc., up to nirvana. 
It should be understood that the following two are lost to this Dharma and Vinaya:293 who, due to having ascribed to the entities of form, etc., or the substance of form, etc., a unique characteristic that does not truly exist and that represents an essence a designating assertion, then adheres to ; and who, by repudiating the substance that truly exists as ultimate truth in the form of an ineffable essence, and that is also the basis for the signs designating assertions and the support for the signs designating assertions , repudiates it that it is completely and totally nonexistent. 
The errors that occur when there is an imputation of something that does not truly exist have already been investigated, laid open, made evident, and revealed above.294 Because these are the errors that cause something that does not truly exist to be ascribed to the substance of such as form, etc., it should be understood that become lost to this Dharma and Vinaya. 
For someone who denies the bare substance of such entities as form, etc., neither reality nor designations exist; they are both invalid. 
The designation of a person is valid only if the heaps of form, etc., exist.295 It would not be valid if they do not exist, the designation of a person would be one that is not based upon an substance. 
Similarly, as long as the bare substance of the entities of form, etc., does exist, then the application of designating assertions to the entities of form, etc., is valid. 
It would not be if did not exist, the application of designating assertions would be that is not related to a substance. 
According to this , since no substance exists in association with a designation, that designation lacks an basis and it, too, does not exist. 
Therefore, certain individuals296 who have listened to the profound sutras associated with the Great Vehicle that are difficult to understand, that relate to emptiness, and that present a topic expressed with an underlying thought297 have failed to comprehend in a proper manner the meaning that is being taught . 
“Everything is nothing but a designation and this represents reality. 
Whoever perceives in this way perceives correctly.” Because, according to them, the bare substance that is the basis of a designation does not exist, the designation itself does not exist at all. 
How, then, could a mere designation represent reality? 
On the basis of this method , these have repudiated both reality and designations. 
And because of this repudiation of both designations and reality, it should be understood that this is a preeminent nihilist.298 Those intelligent persons who are pursuing a pure spiritual life should not converse or associate with such a nihilist. 
Doing so not only brings ruin upon oneself, misfortune will also befall any region where the views of such a person are looked upon with approval. 
This was the intent of the Blessed One when he declared: 
“It would be better here for someone to hold a view that believes in a person than for someone to grasp emptiness wrongly.” Why is that? 
That does not cause to be reborn in the lower realms.299 Nor does mislead or betray the trust of others who seek the Dharma and who wish to free themselves from suffering. 
He or she also will not become lax in the precepts of training. 
On the other hand, by wrongly grasping emptiness one is both confused about a knowable substance and also discredits all objects of knowledge. 
He or she brings ruin to those others who are devoted to Dharma and who wish to free themselves from suffering. 
He or she becomes lax in the precepts of training. 
This is how the person who repudiates a truly existent substance becomes lost to this Dharma and Vinaya. 
How, then, does emptiness become wrongly grasped? 
If an ascetic or brahmin neither assents to that of which are empty nor assents to that which constitutes emptiness, this is the way in which emptiness is said to be wrongly grasped. 
Why is that? 
The validity of emptiness is the nonexistence of that of which are empty and the existence of that which constitutes emptiness. 
But if it is a complete nonexistence, what could be in relation to which this empty might occur, what could this empty consist of, and what could be empty of? 
It would also not be possible for emptiness pertains to this or for it to be empty of this . 
Therefore, this is how emptiness becomes wrongly grasped. 
How, then, does emptiness become correctly grasped? 
Because a certain does not exist in relation to some , one perceives: 
“This is empty of that .” Moreover, one truly realizes in relation to what remains there: 
“This is real and it does exist here.” This is called “the true and unerring entry into emptiness.” That is to say, that there does not exist any entity that possesses the nature a designating assertion, such as those of “form,” etc., in relation to those substances known as form, etc., that were indicated . 
Therefore, the substances that are known as form, etc., are empty of that nature designating assertions such as “form,” etc. 
What, then, is there that remains in relation to the substance that is known as form, etc.? 
It is just that which constitutes the basis for the designating assertions such as “form,” etc. 
the bare substance and the mere designation that exists in relation to that bare substance. 
Moreover, one does not falsely attribute that which does not truly exist nor does one repudiate that which does truly exist. One does not engage in either augmentation or diminution. 
There is a true realization of the genuine suchness and the ineffable essential nature . 
This is called “the emptiness that has been correctly grasped and well penetrated by means of correct wisdom.” This favorable form of application that relates to demonstrating correctness is the one by which the ineffable essential nature of all entities can be understood with precision. 
As the Blessed One declared in the Sutra on Passing Over to a Existence,300 this very meaning is clarified in a verse recitation: 
Verily, by whatever names Entities may be expressed, That is not to be found there.301 This, indeed, is the true nature of entities. How, then, does this verse set forth its meaning? 
A name is , such as “form,” etc., for the entities that are known as form, etc. 
By whatever names—such as those of “form,” etc.—the entities known as form, etc., are expressed and verbally described— “form,” “feeling,” at length up to “nirvana” … It is not the case that the entities known as form, etc., themselves, possessing the nature of form, etc., there. 
It is also not the case that some other entity possessing the nature of form, etc., is to be found in those . 
On the other hand, the ineffable mode of existence that pertains to the entities known as form, etc., should be understood to constitute their true essential nature in an ultimate sense. 
The Blessed One also declared in the The Sections on Objects:302 Whatever things are agreed upon in the world, The Muni does not admit to any of them. 
The designations such as “form,” etc., that are made in relation to the substances that are known as form, etc., are what are referred to as “the things that are agreed upon.”303 does not admit304 that the things that are agreed upon possess a real substantive essence that is identical in nature with those designations. 
Why is that? 
Therefore, he is said to be “one who does not assent,”305 in the sense that he does not have a view that maintains an error. 
Being one who does not assent in this way, why would anything be grasped repeatedly? 
This is what is seen by him. 
Whatever words are heard regarding an object of knowledge in just this way constitutes what is heard by him. 
he neither develops nor strengthens any craving toward that which is seen or heard. 
This is the way in which he avoids generating desire. 
The Blessed One again declared to Saṃtha Kātyāyana: 
Here, Saṃtha, a bhikṣu does not rely upon earth when he meditates. 
He does not rely upon water, fire, or air ; the sphere of space, consciousness, nothingness, and neither conception nor absence of conception;306 this world and the next world; the pair of the sun and moon; that which is seen, heard, considered, or perceived; or that which is attained, sought, deliberated upon, and reflected upon with the mind. 
He does not rely upon anything when he meditates. 
How does he meditate so as not to rely upon earth when he meditates, so as not to rely upon anything when he meditates? 
Here, Saṃtha, the conception of earth that occurs in relation to earth has been eliminated by the bhikṣu. 
The conception of water that occurs in relation to water, and so on, up to the conceptions that occur in relation to everything have been eliminated . 
This is how a bhikṣu meditates so as not to rely upon earth when he meditates, and so on, up to meditates so as not to rely on anything when he meditates. 
Homage to you, O noble of men. Homage to you, O best of men. What is it that we cannot realize about you And which you rely upon when meditating? How, then, does this sutra passage set forth its meaning? 
The designation of a conventional name,307 such as that of “earth,” etc., to the substance known as earth, etc., is what is called “the conception of earth,” etc. 
holds that the bare substance that represents ultimate nature is to be rejected is said to be the conception that denies . 
These are what are eliminated from conceptions. 
Their abandonment and relinquishment are what is called their “elimination.” Therefore, it can also be understood on the basis of scripture— through the Tathāgata’s supremely trustworthy word—that all entities have an nature that is ineffable. 
If it is true that all entities possess such an ineffable nature, why is it that words are used in relation to them? 
Without words, it would not be possible for that ineffable true nature to be expressed to others nor to be heard . 
Moreover, without speech and the hearing , it would also not be possible for that ineffable nature to be realized. 
Therefore, words are used so that might be heard and realized. 
Because they have not fully realized this very suchness in the manner , immature beings308 develop the eight types of conceptual thought that give rise to three substance and that bring forth the entire world of sentient beings and their physical environment. 
the conceptual thought of an essential nature, the conceptual thought of a distinguishing characteristic, the conceptual thought that grasps a collection , the conceptual thought of an “I,” the conceptual thought of “mine,” the conceptual thought of agreeable, the conceptual thought of disagreeable, and the conceptual thought of the opposite of both of these.309 Which of these eight types of conceptual thought give rise to the three substances? 
Three conceptual thoughts—that is, the conceptual thought of an essential nature, the conceptual thought of a distinguishing characteristic, and the conceptual thought that grasps a collection —give rise to the substance that is known as form, etc., and that serves as the basis for conceptual thought and elaboration310 and the mental support of conceptual thought and elaboration. 
While continuously generating elaborations on the basis of , the conceptual thought that is both controlled by and governed by expressions recognition of name operates in numerous ways and in many different forms in relation to this very same substance. 
This is the manner in which the eight types of conceptual thought operate to bring about the three types of substance—that is, the substance elaboration and is the basis of conceptual thought; the view and egoistic pride; and desire, hatred, and ignorance. 
Regarding these, the basis for the view of the perishable collection and egoistic pride is the substance conceptual thought and elaboration. 
Desire, hatred, and ignorance are based upon the view of the perishable collection and egoistic pride. 
The aspect of all the worlds that relates to their progression315 is explained exhaustively by means of these three substance. 
Regarding , what is the conceptual thought of an essential nature? 
The conceptual thought “form,” etc., in relation to the substance that is known as form, etc., is called “the conceptual thought of an essential nature.” What is the conceptual thought of a distinguishing characteristic? 
The conceptual thinking that is based upon the conceptual thought of an essential nature and that forms a mental construct with some distinct meaning in relation to that very substance known as form, etc., such as, “This is material,”316 “This is immaterial,” “This is visible,”317 or “This is not visible,” or that similarly in an immeasurable variety of ways including, “This possesses resistance,”318 “This lacks resistance,” “This is related to the outflows,”319 “This is free of the outflows,” “This is conditioned,”320 “This is unconditioned,” “This is virtuous,”321 “This is nonvirtuous,” “This is determinate,”322 “This is indeterminate,”323 “This is of the past,” “This is of the future,” or “This is of the present,” as well as of the same kind as these, is called “the conceptual thought of a distinguishing characteristic.” What is the conceptual thought that grasps a collection ? 
that occurs in relation to that very substance known as form, etc., is accompanied by such conventional names as “self,” “sentient being,” “living being,” or “living creature,”324 and is caused by grasping a collection that consists of a multiplicity of entities that have been combined into a mass, as well as in relation to such as a house, an army, and a forest, etc., or food, drink, a vehicle, and clothing, etc., and is accompanied by the conventional name for those things, is what is called “the conceptual thought that grasps a collection .”325 What are the conceptual thoughts of an “I” and of “mine”? 
The false conceptual thought that arises in dependence upon the substance that is related to the outflows and is related to the act of being grasped, that for a long time has been habitually thought of, adhered to, and familiarly regarded as an “I” or a “mine,” and that, because of this habituation to a mistaken understanding, represents the substance that constitutes the object of own views, is called “the conceptual thought of an ‘I’ and of ‘mine.’” What is the conceptual thought of agreeable? 
It is the conceptual thought whose mental support326 is a substance that is beautiful and attractive. 
It is the conceptual thought whose mental support is a substance that is ugly and unattractive. 
What is the conceptual thought of in a way that is the opposite of both agreeable and disagreeable? 
It is the conceptual thought whose mental support is a substance that is neither beautiful nor ugly, and neither attractive nor unattractive. 
Both of these should be understood as having existed since beginningless time and as having been each other’s reciprocal cause. 
Moreover, a present substance that has been caused to appear and that is the mental support for a conceptual thought the cause for the appearance of the present conceptual thought for which it constitutes a mental support. 
Regarding this , the current lack of thorough knowledge regarding a conceptual thought for the appearance of a substance in the future that will become the mental support for that . 
Moreover, because of the arising of that , inevitably the appearance of a conceptual thought for which that serves as the basis and the support will also occur. 
How, then, does the thorough knowledge of these conceptual thoughts occur? 
by means of the four investigations and the four forms of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are. 
What are the four investigations?327 the investigation of names, the investigation of substances, the investigation of the designation of an essential nature, and the investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic. 
Regarding these, the investigation of names is that which a bodhisattva perceives, in relation to a name, that it is merely a name. 
The investigation of the designation of an essential nature is the perception that the designation of an essential nature is merely the designation of an essential nature. 
The investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic is the perception that the designation of a distinguishing characteristic is merely the designation of a distinguishing characteristic. 
perceives both the defining attributes of names and substances that are distinct , as well as the defining attributes that connect them.328 He or she also realizes that the designation of an essential nature and the designation of a distinguishing characteristic are based upon the connection between a name and a substance. 
What are the four forms of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are?329 They are the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of names, having completed the investigation of substances, having completed the investigation of the designation of an essential nature, and the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic. 
What is the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of names? 
Having examined, with regard to names, the quality of being a mere name, a bodhisattva gains the following thorough knowledge regarding the true nature of names: 
This is the extent of the import of a name that is established in relation to substance: 
its nominal import,330 its theoretical import,331 and its suppositional import.332 If a name such as “form” is not applied to a substance, such as one that is known as form, etc., then one will not form the conception of any substance whatsoever as being “form,” etc. 
When no conception is made , then one will not adhere to it in the sense of ascribing . 
When no adherence is made, then one will not make verbal assertions about it. 
truly discerns how this occurs, that is called “the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of names.” What is the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of substances? 
Through having investigated, with regard to substances, the nature of being a bare substance, a bodhisattva perceives the substance that is known as form, etc., as being separate from all expressions and incapable of being described. 
This is the second form of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are, one that is gained by having completed the investigation of substances. 
What is the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of the designation of an essential nature? 
Through having investigated, in relation to the designation of an essential nature that occurs with regard to the substance that is known as form, etc., the quality of being a mere designation, a bodhisattva realizes and understands, as it truly is, that a substance that lacks this essential nature appears to possess it because of the manner in which the designation of an essential nature occurs. 
His or her perception that this essential nature is like a emanation, a reflection, an echo, a false image, the moon in water, a dream, or a magical illusion, and that this appearance is not made up of that , constitutes the third form of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are, one whose field of action is a profound object. 
What is the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic? 
Through having investigated, in relation to the designation of a distinguishing characteristic, the quality of being a mere designation, a bodhisattva perceives, in relation to the substance that is known as form, etc., the designation of the distinguishing characteristic in a nondual sense— that a substance is neither a thing that exists nor a thing that does not exist. 
Because its verbally described nature does not constitute an absolute mode of being,333 it is not a thing that exists. 
On the other hand, it is also not a thing that does not exist, because it is characterized by a nature that is ineffable. 
Just as with of being a thing that exists or a thing that does not exist, and those of being material or immaterial, all the instances of designating a distinguishing characteristic, such as those of being visible or not visible, etc., should be understood according to this method . 
That which is realized in this way as it truly is— in this nondual sense—about the designating of a distinguishing characteristic is called “the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are having completed the investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic.” Regarding this , the eight types of improper conceptual thought, which cause immature beings to give rise to the three substances334 and which bring forth the world , arise because of lack of competency about and failure to establish the four forms of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are. 
Furthermore, affliction from the improper conceptual thought; continuous rebirth in samsara from affliction; and the suffering of birth, old age, illness, death, etc., that follow samsaric existence arises from being reborn continuously in samsara. 
When a bodhisattva relies upon the four forms of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are, he or she develops thorough knowledge of the eight types of conceptual thought. 
Through having developed this true and thorough knowledge in the present life, there will be no appearance in future of the substance that constitutes the basis and mental support for those and that bring about the occurrence elaboration. 
Because that does not arise or appear, there will also be no appearance in future of the conceptual thought for which that a mental support. 
This cessation of conceptual thought together with its substance should be known as the cessation of all elaboration. 
The cessation of elaboration that occurs in this manner should be known as the bodhisattva’s complete nirvana the Great Vehicle.335 Through having perfected in one’s present life the knowledge that has this supreme form of reality as its field of action,336 a bodhisattva becomes one who has attained a mastery of the universal controlling powers,337 such as a variety of emanation bodies by means of the miraculous power that produces emanations, a variety of supernatural transformations by means of the miraculous power that transforms objects, knowledge regarding all objects of knowledge, remain for as long as one wishes, and pass away without any physical harm, according to one’s desires. 
who has attained such powers becomes the most excellent of all sentient beings and one who has no superior. 
It should be understood that the bodhisattva who has attained this universal mastery gains five most excellent beneficial qualities. 
He attains a supreme mental peace that is due to the tranquility abiding ;338 it is not due to the tranquility the mental afflictions. 
He applies unimpeded, thoroughly purified, and completely accomplished knowledge-vision to all the branches of learning.339 He does not become weary at having to be reborn successively in samsara in order to the welfare of sentient beings. 
He becomes one who cannot be led away from devotion to the Great Vehicle, because he does not have to rely upon others . 
It should further be understood that these five forms of benefit have five types of action. 
of a bodhisattva who is thoroughly familiar with the practices that are directed toward enlightenment to abide in a supreme state of ease in the present life so that he may overcome any physical and mental weariness caused by that exertion should be understood as the action that pertains to the beneficial quality of a state of mental peace. 
A bodhisattva’s to ripen all the qualities of a buddha should be understood as the action that pertains to the beneficial quality of the state in which his knowledge is unimpeded in relation to all the branches of learning. 
A bodhisattva’s to ripen sentient beings should be understood as the action that pertains to the beneficial quality of the state in which he does not become weary in samsara. 
to eliminate any and all doubt that might arise of those persons who are suitable to be trained , as well as to maintain and preserve the Dharma guidance for a long time by being thoroughly aware of, exposing, and overcoming those who a false likeness of the true Dharma and who the disappearance of the teaching should be understood as the action that pertains to the beneficial quality of understanding all the enigmatic statements . 
to refute all those who assert verbal challenges, his strong spiritual fortitude, and his ability to avoid falling away from the aspirational prayers should be understood as the action that pertains to the beneficial quality of being one who cannot be led astray because of not having to rely upon others . 
This is the way in which everything whatsoever that pertains to a bodhisattva and represents the things that a bodhisattva ought to accomplish is included within these five beneficial qualities and their related actions. 
They are a happiness for oneself that is free of affliction, the ripening of a buddha’s qualities , the ripening of sentient beings, the preservation of the true Dharma, and the refutation of objections by being one who is unwavering in his or her aspirational prayers and one in whom intense fortitude has been kindled. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that the first two of the four categories of reality are inferior forms, the third is a middling form, and the fourth is the supreme form . 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the fourth chapter, entitled “The Nature of Reality.” Now then, what is the power341 of the bodhisattvas? 
In terms of its variety, this of the buddhas and bodhisattvas is of five types: 
These two types also consist of many kinds when they are distinguished according to their varieties. 
What are the varieties of transformational miraculous power? 
Regarding this , blazing is when fire blazes forth from the upper part of the body, while jets of cold water stream forth from the lower part of the body. 
Or it is when fire blazes forth from the lower part of the body, while jets of cold water stream forth from the upper part of the body. 
It is also when the fire element is meditated upon and then fire blazes forth from the entire body. 
It is when the entire body is ablaze and light rays of different colors—blue, yellow, red, white, pink, and crystal—are emitted from the body. 
Regarding this , pervading is when a house is filled with light, or a temple building, and so forth, up to countless, immeasurable numbers of great triple-thousand world spheres are filled with light, as with the previous description made in relation to shaking. 
Regarding this , revealing is when a tathāgata or a bodhisattva reveals the lower realms that lie below to an assembly of ascetics, brahmins, listeners, bodhisattvas, gods, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kinnaras, and mahoragas346 that have gathered and are seated comfortably; or reveals the gods and humans that lie above ; or reveals other buddha fields and buddhas and bodhisattvas that reside in them. 
as far as to reveal a buddha field that lies beyond buddha fields as numerous as the sands of the River Ganges and the tathāgata who resides there, as well as to identify the name by which that buddha field is known and the name of the tathāgata . 
to reveal and identify whatever wishes , and to do so for as long as wishes to , both those that lie nearer than such and those that lie farther away. 
Regarding this , causing a change in condition is when a firm desiderative intention is developed347 in which earth is conceived of as water and it takes on that very nature and not any other, or when it is conceived of as fire or wind, and it also takes on that very nature and not any other. 
It is when a firm desiderative intention is developed in which water is conceived of as earth or it is conceived of as fire or wind; when fire is conceived of as earth or it is conceived of as water or wind; or when wind is conceived of as earth or it is conceived of as water or fire; and all take on these very natures and not any other. 
Just as the act of causing a change in condition can be carried out in the form of reciprocal transformation with regard to the great elements, it should be understood that the same is true for form, smells, tastes, and tangible objects.348 is also when a firm desiderative intention is developed in which such objects as grass, leaves, cow dung, and earth are conceived of as food, drink, a vehicle, clothing, an ornament, a household article or implement, a fragrant substance, a garland, or fragrant oil; or when a firm desiderative intention is developed in which such objects as a stone, a pebble, or a pottery shard are conceived of as a jewel, a pearl, lapis lazuli, shell, crystal, or coral; or when a firm desiderative intention is developed in which all mountains, beginning with the great snow-filled king of mountains, are conceived of as gold; and all take on these very natures and not any other. 
Similarly, it is when a firm desiderative intention is developed in which beings of an excellent appearance are conceived of as having an inferior appearance, or when those of an inferior appearance are conceived of as having an excellent appearance, or when those who are neither of those two types are conceived of as having either an excellent appearance or an inferior appearance, or as having both types of appearance; and, just as with the qualities of an excellent or inferior appearance, it is also when who are either deficient in their limbs or who have all their limbs intact, or who are thin or stout, etc., are conceived of in some way that is different from their actual nature and is a form that is capable of being conceived of, causing all these take on the natures that they are conceived of as having. 
Regarding this , going and returning is when passes through a wall, a mountain, or a rampart, etc., without his or her body being obstructed, up to when travels to and returns from as far away as Brahmā’s realm, and when he or she travels upward going as far away as and returning from “Below None.”349 It is also when travels horizontally, going as far away as and returning from countless, immeasurable numbers of great triple-thousand world spheres with his or her coarse body that is composed of the four great elements. 
It is also when travels to and returns from a distant place by making the firm conviction that it lies nearby, or when he or she does so with a swiftness like that of the mind.350 Regarding this , contracting and expanding is when even the snow-filled king of mountains is compressed to a mere atom and when even an atom is increased to the snow-king of mountains. 
Causing all form to enter one’s body is when, in the presence of a great and varied gathering causes a physical mass, one that may include a village, a town, a grassy area, a forest, an earthen region, or a mountain, to enter his or her own body. 
It is also when that entire gathering realizes that they have entered his or her body. 
And these are not able to discern who the one that has disappeared was. 
Following that, he or she similarly reappears and makes himor herself visible again. 
Regarding this , exercising control is when causes the beings of a particular realm, whatever its extent may be, to engage in activities such as coming, going, and remaining stationary. 
, “He must stay,” then does stay. , “He must come,” then does come. 
, “He must speak,” then does speak. 
Regarding this , overwhelming the miraculous powers of others is a tathāgata to overcome the effort of all other than who possess miraculous powers to perform a miraculous feat, and then to cause everything376 to arise in whatever manner he wishes. 
A bodhisattva who has reached perfection377—whether one who is subject to one birth378 or one who is in his last existence379—is to overcome the effort by all other who possess miraculous powers to perform a miraculous action, with the exception of a tathāgata and a bodhisattva who is equal in stature . 
All other bodhisattvas are to overcome the effort by all other who possess miraculous powers to perform a miraculous action with the exception of those bodhisattvas who have entered a higher stage and those bodhisattvas who are equal in stature to them. 
Regarding this , bestowing eloquence380 is when provides eloquence to a person whose eloquence has become exhausted. 
Regarding this , bestowing recollection is when provides recollection to a person whose recollection has become clouded in relation to entities.381 Regarding this , bestowing ease is when who is teaching Dharma provides to persons who are listening a specific form of ease that consists of agility382 and is beneficial to the body and mind. 
allows those persons to listen to the Dharma in a manner that is free of any hindrance. 
Moreover, it quells in a temporary manner the harms that are caused by an imbalance of the elements, physical injury, or unleashed by spirits; not permanently. 
Regarding this , emitting rays of light is when a bodhisattva or a tathāgata uses miraculous power to emit the following kinds of light rays from his or her body: 
Some into the ten directions and reach countless, immeasurable numbers of world spheres where they quell the hellish suffering beings in the hells. 
Some of them reach the illustrious deities, nāgas, yakṣas, gandharvas, asuras, garuḍas, kinnaras, and mahoragas that reside in the divine realms, urging them to come to this . 
Likewise, some of them countless, immeasurable world spheres of the ten directions and urge the bodhisattvas who reside in those other worlds to come to this . 
In brief, the tathāgatas accomplish countless, immeasurable, and diverse aims of immeasurable beings with countless, immeasurable, and manifold kinds of light rays. 
Moreover, it should be understood that if all of these types of transformational miraculous power were classified individually, they would be beyond measure and beyond number. 
When an object that has one natural condition is caused to take on a form that is different, this is called a “transformation.” That is why these are called “transformational miraculous power.” Regarding this , what is creative miraculous power? 
In brief, a magical creation383 is that is insubstantial.384 produces in whatever shape is desired by a mind that generates magical creations is called “creative miraculous power.” This has many forms: 
The magical creation of a body, furthermore, creates that may or may not resemble oneself, or may or may not resemble another being. 
In addition, the magical creation of a body that either does or does not resemble oneself or some other being creates that possesses a semblance of faculties and possesses the seat of faculties, but it does not create faculties.385 also produces magical creations that resemble objects. 
It creates, in whatever manner is desired, any and all outer objects that are composed of form, smell, taste, and tangible properties—such as food and drink, etc., as well as jewels, pearls, lapis lazuli, etc. 
resemble but are distinct from them.386 Moreover, “like oneself”387 can be of many different types— it can have the appearance of a god, nāga, yakṣa, asura, garuḍa, kinnara, or mahoraga; the appearance of a human; the appearance of an animal, hungry ghost, or hell being; the appearance of a listener; the appearance of a solitary realizer; the appearance of a bodhisattva; or the appearance of a tathāgata. 
If a bodhisattva creates a magical creation that is like himor herself , then, that magical creation is “like oneself.” However, if the magical creation is different , then it is “unlike oneself.” If creates that resembles another being that is a god, then magical creation is “resembles another.” If creates that does not resemble another being, then it is “unlike another.” It should be understood that the same descriptions that were made in relation to a god can also be made up to a tathāgata. 
Regarding this , what is the magical creation of a multitude of bodies? 
It is when a tathāgata or a bodhisattva in this world simultaneously accomplishes the aims of countless, immeasurable numbers of sentient beings in immeasurable and countless world spheres that lie in the ten directions, by means of manifold magical emanations that appear in a variety of forms. 
In addition, some magical creations are established in such a way that they continue to carry out even after the tathāgata or bodhisattva has passed away. 
Some magical creations of buddhas and bodhisattvas are simply intended to reveal illusory objects to sentient beings. 
On the other hand, some are emanated as actual objects such as food, drink, a vehicle, clothing, etc., or jewels, pearls, lapis lazuli, shell, crystal, coral, etc. 
This , then, represents magical creations of a body and magical creations of an object. 
Moreover, there are magical creations of speech that possess excellence of voice. 
Regarding this , excellence of voice the magically created verbal expressions of buddhas and bodhisattvas that are profound and thunderous, that resemble the pleasing sound of the kalaviṅka bird, that touch the heart and give rise to joy. 
This magically created speech is also urbane,388 beautiful, clear, informative, worthy of being heard, free of anything disagreeable, independent , and unlimited. 
He or she can cause his or her voice to be understood throughout a double-thousand world spheres, or a great triple-world spheres, or as far as countless, immeasurable numbers of world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
Dharma teachings that are directed toward sentient beings and that are of many different kinds emanate from this voice, and that come into being for the sake of sentient beings. 
Regarding this , a magical creation of speech that is connected with oneself is one that teaches Dharma or admonishes the heedless with speech that was magically created by oneself. 
By contrast, that is connected with others is one that teaches Dharma or admonishes the heedless with speech that was magically created by another being.391 Regarding this , a magical creation of speech that is unconnected is when speech magically emanates from the sky and is not created from the continuum of a sentient being. 
a magical creation of a body, a magical creation of speech, and a magical creation of an object. 
Moreover, it should be understood that if this were distinguished in its various individual forms, they would be beyond measure and number. 
Moreover, in brief, this twofold394 form of miraculous power of buddhas and bodhisattvas also causes two aims to be achieved: 
once sentient beings have been won over through the displaying of marvelous abilities,395 they are caused to take up the Buddha Dharma; and many different kinds and varieties of benefit are provided to sentient beings who are undergoing suffering. 
Regarding this , what is the buddhas’ and bodhisattvas’ knowledge of an existence in the past? 
In this world, a tathāgata or a bodhisattva recalls his or her own former existences.396 He or she recalls everything , including such things as the group of sentient beings , as at length in the sutras with language that states in part, “The sentient beings where I lived such and such a name. 
I was named thus ....” Just as one recalls one’s own , one also causes others to recall their . 
One also recalls of others. 
One recalls the groups of sentient beings that existed at a previous time and also causes others to recall , as described at length in the sutras with language that states in part, “The sentient beings where I lived such and such a name. 
I was named thus ...” also recalls those sentient beings in all the existences of the past in just the same way that does in one’s own present life. 
also remembers minute things , whatever infrequent or numerous former actions and former that, once considered, had been lost from memory. 
In addition, he or she remembers uninterrupted moments— the precise order in which something was done continuously and in an uninterrupted manner. 
He or she remembers as well a measure that is capable of being counted in terms of a discrete number of kalpas. 
He or she also remembers an immeasurable and countless that is incapable of being counted in terms of a discrete number of kalpas. 
In short, this knowledge of existences in the past operates in an unobstructed manner—wherever, in whatever manner, and for however long may be desired. 
Such is the nature of a bodhisattva’s or a tathāgata’s power that pertains to existences in the past. 
By means of the knowledge that recalls former existences, he or she reveals to sentient beings the varied and numerous kinds of previous births in which supremely marvelous bodhisattva activities were carried out, in order to cause to develop faith and devotion toward the Buddha, the Blessed One, and in order to engender aversion . 
He or she also reveals events from bygone times that relate to the ripening of the karmic fruit of sentient beings. 
, he or she can destroy the eternalistic views of those who uphold an eternalistic doctrine—namely, those eternalists who form a speculative doctrine based upon the past that views as eternal, and that views a portion of to be eternal.397 What is the buddhas’ and bodhisattvas’ knowledge the divine ear? 
In this world, a tathāgata or a bodhisattva hears, by means of the divine ear, sounds that are divine and human, noble and vulgar, powerful and minute, distinct398 and indistinct, that are magical creations and that are not magical creations, and distant and near. 
If makes such an effort, he or she will also hear sounds from the upper regions that lie beyond there and that occur in other world spheres. 
Regarding this topic, human sounds are those that occur horizontally400 and beings who have been born in all of the four continents. 
Regarding this topic, noble sounds are those made by buddhas, the buddhas’ listeners, bodhisattvas, and solitary realizers. 
For example, these are that relate both to taking up virtue and to abandoning nonvirtue, and that have the nature of revealing , that induce others to take up , that generate enthusiasm , and that gladden . 
Similarly, it includes of those individuals whose minds are not disturbed and explaining , reciting , settling , correctly admonishing , causing to recall , and giving instruction401 and counsel.402 It is also any other form of good speech, good conversation, or meaningful . 
These are called “noble sounds.” Regarding this topic, vulgar sounds are the sounds of sentient beings that constitute lying, slander, harsh speech, and idle speech, whether they have been born below in the lower realms,403 who have been born above in the divine realms, or who have been born horizontally among humans. 
Regarding this topic, powerful sounds are the sounds made by a great assembly of beings, the cries of pain made by those who are undergoing various kinds of harm, of those who are weeping, of those who are calling out, the sound of thunder, or sounds a conch shell, a bherī or paṭaha kettledrum. 
Faint sounds are the sounds that are as slight as a whisper in the ear. 
Distinct sounds are those in which a meaning is understood. 
Indistinct sounds are those in which a meaning is not understood—for example, of Dravidian mantras,404 as well as of the wind, large forest trees, parrots, mynas,405 cuckoos, pheasants,406 and the like. 
Regarding this topic, sounds that are magical creations are those that are produced by the miraculous power of those who possess miraculous powers and who have attained mastery of their mind. 
Distant sounds are those sounds other than the ones that occur in a village, field, or hall, in which a tathāgata or bodhisattva is present, as far away as countless, immeasurable world spheres. 
What is the buddhas’ and bodhisattvas’ knowledge regarding death and rebirth? 
In this world, a tathāgata or a bodhisattva, by means of the pure divine eye that surpasses that of humans, sees beings at the time of their death and also sees the good or bad appearance of those who have died407 and the inferior or excellent circumstances into which they are reborn in the future. 
In addition, that , due to the development and ripening of their faculties and with the variety of their physical exertions, will engage in virtuous, nonvirtuous, and indeterminate . 
If makes an effort that relates to seeing the form present in other world spheres that lies in a downward, upward, or horizontal , sees all the form that exists, reaching as far away as countless, immeasurable world spheres. 
even sees all the individual tathāgatas in all the different buddha fields who are seated in the midst of a great assembly-circle made up of a great variety and teaching the Dharma. 
With regard to this , having seen by means of his or her divine eye the good and bad physical acts in the ten directions, a tathāgata or bodhisattva acts in a fitting manner and in an appropriate manner with regard to those sentient beings. 
In addition, having heard by means of his or her divine ear the good and bad verbal acts, acts in a fitting manner and in an appropriate manner with regard to those sentient beings. 
In brief, this is how a bodhisattva or a tathāgata carries out deeds by means of the divine eye and the divine ear. 
Regarding this , what is the buddhas’ and bodhisattvas’ knowledge regarding diverse states of mind?409 In this world, a bodhisattva or a tathāgata knows the minds of other beings that have been perturbed by the mental afflictions, in countless, immeasurable world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
He or she also knows the minds that have been freed of the perturbation caused by the mental afflictions, as well as those that have a connection with the mental afflictions and are associated with the latencies,410 those that have no connection with the mental afflictions and are free of the latencies, as well as those that possess an aspiration that is directed improperly—such as the minds of heretics and any unafflicted minds of individuals whose intentions are driven by corporeal desire.411 He or she also knows the minds that are the opposite of that—namely, the minds that possess an aspiration that is directed correctly.412 also knows inferior minds—that is to say, those of all sentient beings who have been born in the desire realm, including forest animals and birds. 
He or she knows middling minds—that is to say, of all sentient beings who have been born in the form realm. 
He or she knows superior minds—that is to say, of all sentient beings who have been born in the formless realm. 
He or she also knows minds that are accompanied by pleasure, minds that are accompanied by pain, and minds that are accompanied by a feeling that is neither pleasurable nor painful. 
With a single knowledge of other beings’ minds, realizes, immediately and accurately, what manner of mind is present in any given individual, what form it has taken, and how long it will remain in existence. 
With a single knowledge of other beings’ minds, he or she can also realize, immediately and accurately, what manner of mind is present in those beings, what forms those minds have taken, and how long they will remain in existence. 
Moreover, this form of supernatural knowledge that is possessed by a buddha and by bodhisattvas is to gain knowledge regarding the superior and inferior faculties of sentient beings, to gain knowledge regarding their diverse forms of devotion, to gain knowledge regarding their diverse constituent elements and their tendencies to develop unfavorable mental traits, so that he or she might correctly and in whatever manner is appropriate establish in the various paths that lead to nirvana.413 It should be understood that this is the action by this . 
Regarding this , what is the buddhas’ and bodhisattvas’ knowledge regarding termination of the outflows? 
In this world, a tathāgata or a bodhisattva realizes truly the attainment of the termination of the mental afflictions, which is to say that he or she , “I or others have attained or have not attained the termination .”414 also realizes truly, as pertains to himor herself as well as to others, the means to the attainment of the termination of the outflows. 
Just as with the means , he or she also realizes truly what does not constitute a means . 
also realizes truly the exaggerated pride415 of others in relation to the attainment of the termination of the outflows, and he or she also realizes truly the absence of exaggerated pride. 
Although a bodhisattva realizes all of this, he or she does not bring about his or her own termination of the outflows. 
Therefore, a bodhisattva does not generate overt forms of the entities that are related to the outflows and he or she also does not abandon the substantive form of the entities that are related to the outflows together with the outflows.416 Regarding this , investigates the entities that are related to the outflows and he or she also avoids becoming afflicted by them. 
It should be understood that, among all the powers, this one is greatest power. 
Indeed, it is through this knowledge of the termination of the outflows that buddhas and bodhisattvas prevent themselves from becoming afflicted. 
It is also they identify others and destroy the exaggerated pride . 
It should be understood that this is the action by this . 
Regarding this , what is the power of spiritual qualities? 
It is the power of generosity, as well as the powers of morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom. 
Moreover, in brief, this power of the spiritual qualities of generosity, etc., should be understood in terms of four aspects: 
By practicing generosity, a bodhisattva abandons stinginess, directly opposes generosity. 
His or her generosity also constitutes an accumulation enlightenment. 
By means of the generosity that is one of the principles for attracting a following,418 also brings about the spiritual ripening of sentient beings. 
Prior to giving, one’s mind is favorably disposed; while giving, one gladdens one’s heart; after having given, one avoids any sense of regret. 
By maintaining a joyfulness of mind in relation to the three times,419 benefits himor herself. 
He or she also benefits others by dispelling the suffering that they undergo due to hunger, thirst, cold, heat, illness, unfulfilled desires, and danger. 
Wherever is reborn in a future existence, he or she becomes wealthy, has many possessions, is endowed with many friends, and has a large following. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of generosity. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
A bodhisattva who takes up the morality of restraining oneself in body and speech abandons misconduct, directly opposes morality. 
The taking up of morality by him or her also constitutes an accumulation enlightenment. 
By means of sameness of purpose420 that is one of the principles for attracting a following, also brings about the spiritual ripening of sentient beings. 
Through abandoning the fear, objectionable acts,421 and enmity that are occasioned by immorality, he or she benefits himor herself. 
He or she sleeps contentedly and wakes up contentedly. 
Similarly, the person who possesses morality benefits himor herself by qualities that range from absence of regret and joyfulness up to one-pointedness of mind. 
Through avoiding all forms of injury , he or she bestows a sense of safety upon all sentient beings. 
Because of this, following dissolution of the body he or she is reborn in a happy migratory state422 among the gods in a celestial realm. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of morality. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
A forbearing bodhisattva abandons impatience, directly opposes patience. 
His or her patience also constitutes an accumulation enlightenment. 
By means of sameness of purpose, ripens sentient beings. 
Protecting both himor herself and others from great fear,423 by means of this patience, also benefits himor herself and others. 
Because of this, in future , a bodhisattva will be largely free of enmity and alienation , as well as largely free from pain and mental suffering. 
In the present life he or she will also die free of remorse. 
Following dissolution of the body, he or she will be reborn in a happy migratory state among the gods in a celestial realm. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of morality. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
A bodhisattva who has initiated effort and maintains it abandons laziness, directly opposes effort. 
This effort constitutes an accumulation enlightenment; it is also a support .424 By means of this sameness of purpose, also ripens sentient beings. 
Furthermore, who has initiated effort remains in a state of ease and avoids becoming filled with evil, nonvirtuous qualities. 
Having applied oneself to that pertains to virtue, one also does not harm others by body or speech. 
One instills in others a desire to initiate effort. This is how also benefits others. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of effort. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
A bodhisattva who achieves meditative absorption abandons the mental afflictions and the secondary mental afflictions of discursive thought,426 joy, ease, and the conceptions of form, etc., which are directly oppose meditative absorption. 
His or her meditative absorption also constitutes an accumulation enlightenment and a support427 of enlightenment. 
By means of this very sameness of purpose, also ripens sentient beings. 
Through abiding in ease during the present life, benefits himor herself. 
Through a mind that is tranquil, completely pacified, and free of attachment, avoids being harmed or angered in the midst of sentient beings and is also benefit others. 
The results of meditative absorption are purity of knowledge,428 generating supernatural knowledge, and rebirth among the pure gods429 in his or her future existences. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of meditative absorption. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
A bodhisattva who possesses wisdom abandons ignorance, directly opposes wisdom. 
His or her wisdom also constitutes an accumulation enlightenment. 
ripens sentient beings by means of generosity as well as agreeable speech, beneficial conduct, and sameness of purpose.430 He or she benefits himor herself by means of the great joy and great delight that is accompanied by accurate and specific knowledge of the objects that need to be realized. 
Through instruction that is proper in every way, also benefits sentient beings both in their present and in their future lives with assistance and happiness. 
By means of that , he or she also acts correctly to acquire every the roots of virtue. 
In future lives, he or she will also to attain separation431 from the two types of obscurations—that is, separation from the obscurations of the mental afflictions and separation from the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
These are the four aspects that make up the power of wisdom. 
It does not consist of anything superior to this or anything beyond this. 
This is what is called the power of spiritual qualities. 
What is the natural power that is possessed by buddhas and bodhisattvas? a natural ability to recall births. 
the ability to endure long-lasting, varied, intense, and continuous hardships after having investigated what promotes the welfare of sentient beings. 
a joyful willingness suffering that will bring about the welfare of sentient beings and that is exclusively for the sake of sentient beings. 
also include for who has taken birth among the Tuṣita Heaven to remain among the Tuṣita Heaven for the duration of his life. 
It is the quality by which he surpasses the other deities who have been born in Tuṣita Heaven in three respects: divine life span, divine physical beauty, and divine fame. 
When is entering the belly of his mother, he also permeates the world sphere with great light. 
When he enters his mother’s belly and remains there, as well as when he emerges and is born, he does so with correct awareness. 
As soon as he is born, he takes seven steps upon the earth without being held by anyone, and he also utters speech. 
Once born, he with supremely excellent acts of worship by exalted gods, nāgas, yakṣas, asuras, garuḍas, kinnaras, and mahoragas, who offer him celestial flower garlands, music, incense, garments, parasols, banners, flags, and the like. 
His body is well marked with the thirty-two unsurpassed marks of a great being. 
In his last existence and final birth, he is incapable of being harmed by any hostile beings, followers of Māra,433 or any violence. 
When seated at the place of enlightenment, he conquers all of Māra’s forces by means of his loving-kindness. 
In all his joints and in single one he possesses the strength of Narāyaṇa. 
As a small boy and without having undergone any training,434 he very quickly and on his own develops an understanding of all the secular arts. 
Without a spiritual guide and entirely on his own, he achieves the great enlightenment that extends throughout a triple-thousand . 
Approached by Brahmā himself, lord of the Sahā435 world sphere, he is beseeched to teach the true Dharma in the world. 
Without recognizing great thunder, he does not arise from a state of meditative composure a peaceful state. 
Wild beasts, birds, and even small animals regard the bodhisattva with utmost trust, approaching him at all times and remaining next to him for as long as they wish. 
For example, a monkey once presented raw436 honey to the Tathāgata. 
When the Tathāgata accepted it, the monkey was greatly pleased and withdrew dancing.437 When a tathāgata bathes, clouds move toward the blessed one they deliberately formed the intention to bathe him. 
When a bodhisattva or tathāgata is seated at the foot of some particular tree, its shadow does not move away from his body even though the shadows of all trees have become inclined toward the east. 
Even though Māra looks for an opportunity the tathāgata for six years after he has attained supreme enlightenment, no opportunity is found. 
Because recollection is always present, he is constantly and continuously in a state of well-placed . remains in a state of recollection with regard to the arising, continuous existence, and cessation of each of the feelings, conceptions, and thoughts that he experiences. 
Similarly, buddhas possess a natural power that brings benefit by being seen, as well as a natural power that relates to excellence of movement and remaining at rest.438 Examples in which benefit by being seen are the following: 
After seeing a tathāgata, those who are insane or mentally disturbed regain mind. 
Women whose wombs are irregular obtain a normal womb. 
Those who are blind gain their sight. Those who are deaf gain their hearing. 
Those who are filled with desire become free of the perturbation439 of desire; those who are hateful of the perturbation of hatred; and those who are ignorant of the perturbation of ignorance. 
These kinds of occurrences should be understood as forms of the natural power benefit by being seen. 
Regarding the natural power that relates to excellence in moving about and remaining at rest, the following are examples: 
prepares to sleep by lying on his right side in the manner of a lion. 
Grass and leaves are spread out for him to lie down upon on one side. 
The wind does not blow his monks’ robes away from his body. 
He moves with the gait of a lion. He also moves with the gait of a bull. 
He raises his right foot first , followed by his left foot. 
When he walks, elevated areas descend and lower ones rise up, becoming as even as the palm of the hand and free of stones, pebbles, and shards. 
He enters a town with a mind that is intent on solitude. 
When he enters , low doors become elevated . 
When he eats food, he does not ingest even a single lump of boiled rice without having separated it .440 He does not take a second morsel if there is still some remainder . 
These kinds of should be understood as natural power that relates to excellence in moving about and remaining at rest. 
At the time of parinirvana, the great earth shakes, meteors are seen to fall, a fire-like glowing appears on the horizon, the sounds of divine drums are heard in the sky. 
These phenomena are also instances of the natural power of the tathāgatas; they are not creations of supernatural knowledge. 
This is what is called the natural power of buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
What is the power of buddhas and bodhisattvas that is not shared with listeners and solitary realizers and what is that is shared with them? 
In brief, that is not shared should be understood as having three aspects that relate to subtlety, types, and constituents. 
In this world, a tathāgata or a bodhisattva knows exactly how to do what is beneficial for countless, immeasurable numbers of sentient beings, by employing countless, immeasurable means. 
possesses every type of power—the power of supernatural knowledge, the power of spiritual qualities, and natural power. 
All the world spheres and all the constituent elements that are possessed by sentient beings represent the scope of powers. 
This represents that relates to constituents.441 By contrast, the scope of the supernatural knowledge that is possessed by listeners is a double-thousand world spheres together with the types of sentient beings . 
The scope of the supernatural knowledge that is possessed by solitary realizer is the entirety of a triple-thousand . 
Why is that? 
It is because each is only devoted to bringing about his or her own self-control, not that of all sentient beings. 
Therefore, the maximum scope of their spiritual power does not extend beyond one world sphere. 
With the exception of those aspects , all other power that are possessed by buddhas and bodhisattvas should be understood as being shared with the listeners and solitary realizers. 
Even so, listeners and solitary realizers do not possess supernatural knowledge that is equal in its reach to that of the buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
within the power of supernatural knowledge: 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the fifth chapter, entitled “Power.” Regarding this , what is ripening? 
In brief, ripening should be understood in terms of six aspects: 
essential nature, persons who are to be ripened, varieties of ripening, means of ripening, persons who ripen others, and attributes of a ripened person. 
Immediately after this point has been reached, becomes fit and sufficiently strong to bring about the abandonment of either the obscurations of the mental afflictions or the obscurations to that which needs to be known, irrespective of whether he or she has met with the Master449 or has not met with the Master.450 For example, immediately after a boil has reached the ideal state for lancing, it is ready to be lanced and it is said to be ripe. 
Immediately after a household object made of clay—such as a pitcher, a water jar, or a plate, etc.—has reached the ideal state for being put to use, it is ready to be used and it is said to be ripe.451 Immediately after fruit such as a mango or a breadfruit, etc., has reached the ideal state for eating, it is ready to be consumed and it is said to be ripe. 
In just the same way, right practice has reached a state of culmination through having diligently engaged in virtuous qualities is one that is followed immediately by the purification . 
This is the essential nature of having become ripe. 
Regarding this , in brief, there are four persons who are to be ripened. 
An individual who possesses the spiritual lineage of a solitary realizer is to be ripened in relation to the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle. 
An individual who possesses the spiritual lineage of a buddha is to be ripened in relation to the Great Vehicle. 
An individual who does not abide in any spiritual lineage is to be ripened so that he or she can proceed to a happy migratory state.452 These are the four persons who are to be ripened in relation to those four worthy objects.453 This is how the aspect of ripening that relates to persons who are to be ripened should be understood. 
Regarding this , what are the varieties of ripening? 
In brief, there are six types: 
the ripening of faculties, the ripening of roots of virtue, the ripening of knowledge, and weak, middling, and great ripening. 
Regarding this , the ripening of faculties refers to excellence of life span, physical appearance, family, and power, having one’s speech accepted, being regarded as eminent, being human, and having great strength. 
Through having attained a basis that possesses these excellent maturation results,454 one becomes fit for fervor455 in one’s spiritual practice, and one remains free of mental weariness about the constant exertions in order to gain full knowledge of all the branches of learning. 
What is the ripening of roots of virtue? 
Through having such a quality, one’s mind naturally avoids going toward evil, nonvirtuous qualities. 
In addition, one is hindrances456 are weak, discursive thoughts457 are weak, and who is upright and duly observant.458 What is the ripening of knowledge? 
one possesses recollection and learning and is able to perceive, comprehend, retain, and fathom the meaning of teachings that are well explained as well as those that are poorly explained. 
is endowed with a natural wisdom that, once gained, makes him or her suitable and capable of freeing his or her mind completely and permanently of all the mental afflictions. 
Regarding , the ripening of faculties causes one to become free of the maturation obscurations;459459 the ripening of the roots of virtue causes one to become free of karmic obscurations;460 and the ripening of knowledge causes one to become free of the obscurations of the mental afflictions. 
There are two reasons that spiritual ripening is weak: 
the causes that ripen the faculties, roots of virtue, and knowledge have not been practiced for a long period of time; and the causes that are being practiced have not been fully nurtured and are deficient . 
A great form of ripening should be understood as neither of these two conditions is in effect. 
What is the means of ripening? 
It should be understood as having twenty-seven forms: 
Regarding this , what is “nurturing the constituent element”?461 The generating of a progressively greater development and the maintaining of a supreme development of the seeds of virtuous qualities on the basis of the natural excellence of the seeds of virtuous qualities and through having cultivated virtuous qualities in the past is called “nurturing the constituent element.” Regarding this , what is “implementing present conditions”? 
It is the unerring teaching of the Dharma, the unerring form of understanding462 in relation to that , and the correct form of practice that accords with Dharma,463 during present life. 
Regarding this, nurturing the constituent element represents the prior cause through which present conditions come into being. 
Implementing present conditions should be understood as being causes that exist in the present and ripening in the present. 
For a householder, it is the acceptance of precepts that separate him or her from misdeeds on the strength of having developed faith. 
Or, for an individual who has gone forth, it is the acceptance of precepts that separate him or her from the sense objects the homeless state. 
It is the delight that is felt toward this well-spoken Dharma and Vinaya, due to one’s having resorted to the path that leads to deliverance from all suffering and the path that is characterized by ease and the avoidance of the extremes of sensory pleasures and self-mortification. 
Regarding this , what is “the initial form of setting out”? 
Having previously developed aversion for those qualities toward which one ought to develop aversion, devoting oneself to attainment of the proper aim464464 once the benefits of doing so have been understood is referred to as “the initial form of setting out.” What is “not the initial form of setting out”? 
It is the manner in which ripening progresses to an ever-higher degree for a person who has already entered and who is currently engaged in the process of bringing about his ripening, through avoiding disdain toward bodhisattvas and buddhas and through receiving continuous clarification of the subjects that have already been revealed. 
Regarding this , what is “remote purity”? 
It is the condition which, due to laziness or the absence of conditions, renders fit to attain complete purification after a very long period time and with the passage of a multitude of lives or the passage of a multitude of kalpas. 
The opposite of this condition should be understood as “purity that is near.” Regarding this , what is “application”? 
It is the continual and respectful safeguarding of the precepts, due to a strong aspiration to achieve one’s aims or due to either the fear of falling into a state of downfall465 in future lives or the fear of being held in low esteem by others in this life. 
It is the firm belief in the knowledge by others based upon the that one becomes incapable of being led away from this Dharma and Vinaya through the forbearance that arises from correct reflection466 upon topics, as well as the quality of having unwavering faith in the Three Jewels and in the attainment of one’s own aims based upon one’s esteem for virtuous qualities.467 What is “providing material objects”? 
It is the providing of food and drink, etc., to those who are completely lacking in any kind of food and drink, etc., and it is the providing of suitable forms of food and drink, etc., to those who are lacking in suitable forms of food and drink, etc.468 Regarding this , what is “providing Dharma”? 
It is the bestowing of Dharma either by giving explanations of scriptural texts or by giving correct explanations of meanings. 
It is the displaying of the marvelous ability of miraculous powers469 by who possesses miraculous powers, out of compassion for beings and for the purpose of a pure mental attitude or a pure form of practice. 
In doing so, thinks, “Through seeing or hearing about this marvelous ability, these beings will obtain a pure mental attitude toward the teaching or they will apply themselves properly.” In addition, through having had their minds won over by this marvelous abilities, it is the developing of a pure attitude or the undertaking of a proper form of practice by such . 
It is the act of teaching a form of true Dharma to someone who is unable to attain his or her aim by himor herself that will aid that person in developing a correct form of practice. 
It is also the act of teaching someone who is able so that he or she will attain a swift realization . 
Regarding this , what is “imparting secret Dharma”? 
It is the act of teaching a Dharma subject that is not revealed to beings whose wisdom is undeveloped due to its extremely wide and deep meaning that subject in a manner that is clear, easily understood, and an easy means of realization. 
It is the act of providing detailed explanation of an extremely wide and deep subject to beings whose wisdom is great and who already possess a good understanding of the doctrine contained in the Buddha’s teaching. 
It is one that is both lacking in continual application and lacking in zealous application. 
What is “middling application”? 
It is one that is characterized by either of these two forms of application—namely, that which is lacking in continual application and that which is lacking in zealous application. 
It is one that is endowed with both forms of application—that is, it is endowed with both continual application and zealous application. 
Regarding this , what is “learning”?470 It is the diligent effort put forth by who is devoted to the Buddha’s word to take up, retain, and recite the Dharma teachings that are contained in the sutras, etc. 
It is considering, analyzing, and ascertaining471 the meaning in a solitary place by who is attentively engaged in contemplation of the Dharma. 
It is dedicating to the repeated practice of quiescence, insight, and equanimity, which is accompanied by correct attention to the causes that are associated with quiescence, retention,472 and equanimity. 
It is a variety of individual forms of service475 . 
For example, it is the service of attending to those who are ill; the service of robes, food, seats, bedding, and medicine for curing the ill in a manner that accords with the Dharma; the service of dispelling sorrow and remorse; and the service of dispelling afflicted states of mind. 
These and other activities of a similar type should be understood as representing the variety of forms of service. 
What is “suppressing”?476 After fixing guard oneself from developing an afflicted state of mind, it is admonishing477 about the wrongfulness of a minor transgression; censuring478 in relation to a middling transgression; and banishing in relation to a great transgression. 
Regarding this , the acts of admonishing and censuring are done for the benefit and well-being of those as well as others. 
The form of banishing that permits a subsequent return is also done for the benefit and well-being of those as well as others. 
That is, when others become aware of the transgression that was the cause for banishing of certain individuals, they will decide not to commit such a transgression themselves. 
How does one personally accomplish the ripening ? 
teaches suitable Dharma that cause to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and to become established in opportunities virtuous . He or she also conducts himor herself in the manner that he or she tells . 
“You yourself are not yet someone who has turned away from opportunities nonvirtuous and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
Why do you think that you can cause others to take up that , urge them , and remind them ? 
to persuade them to engage in the activity of ripening . 
The form of ripening that is both done by oneself and that others are requested should be understood through the combination of these two . 
It should be understood that the successful attainment of the six varieties of ripening—that is, the ripening of faculties, the ripening of roots of virtue, the ripening of knowledge, and the weak, middling, and great ripening— on the basis of this means of ripening that is made up of twenty-seven types. 
Regarding this , who are the persons who bring about spiritual ripening ? 
In brief, the six bodhisattvas who are situated on six of the bodhisattva stages482 are the ones who cause sentient beings to become spiritually ripened. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion483 is one who practices devotion. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of a pure superior attitude484 is one whose superior attitude has become pure. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of practicing conduct485 is one who is engaged in practicing conduct. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of certainty486 is one who has reached a state of certainty. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of certain conduct487 is one who is engaged in the practice of conduct that is certain. 
The bodhisattva who is situated on the stage that is the perfect manner of going488 is one who has reached perfection. 
Regarding this , the ripening of those persons who abide in a state that lacks spiritual lineage— which is intended to lead to a happy migratory state—is repeatedly subject to reversal and must be accomplished again and again. 
Regarding this , the characteristics of spiritually ripe are to be described. 
They are described as follows.489 What are the characteristics of those persons who are spiritually ripe? 
When a listener who has practiced virtue in the past abides in a state a weak form of ripening, he or she possesses a weak aspiration and a weak application. 
He or she also fall into the lower realms and in the present life will neither achieve the fruits of asceticism nor complete emancipation.490 When abides in a state a middling form of ripening, he or she possesses a middling aspiration and a middling application. 
He or she no longer falls into the lower realms and does achieve the fruits of asceticism in the present life. 
who abides in a great ripening possesses a great aspiration and a great application. 
He or she does not fall into the lower realms, does achieve the fruits of asceticism in the present life, and also does achieve complete emancipation in the present life. 
The solitary realizer should be understood in the same manner as the listener. 
Why is that? 
It is because his or her path is of the same kind as that of the listeners. 
However, the following is a difference between a solitary realizer and listeners. 
In final existence, when he or she has obtained final physical form, realizes the status of an arhat through abandoning all the mental afflictions and after having meditated on the thirty-seven spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment,491 without a teacher and on the strength of former practice. 
A bodhisattva who is situated on the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion should be understood as having a weak form of ripening. 
who possesses a pure superior attitude492 as having a middling form of ripening. 
who has achieved certainty and one who has achieved perfection have a great form of ripening. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is established in a state of weak ripening possesses a weak aspiration and a weak application; he or she also go to the lower realms. 
It should be understood that is within the first periods of countless kalpas. 
In addition, he or she lacks any of the virtues that are conducive to enlightenment in a form that possesses intensity, steadfastness, and complete purity.493 A bodhisattva a middling form of ripening possesses a middling aspiration and a middling application. 
He does not go to the lower realms and is within the second periods of countless kalpas. 
A bodhisattva who is established in a great form of ripening possesses a great aspiration and a great application. 
He does not go to the lower realms and is within the third periods of countless kalpas. 
He is endowed with all the virtues that are conducive to enlightenment in a form that possesses intensity, steadfastness, and complete purity. 
Regarding this , are said to be “intense” because they are naturally strong and splendid and because they exceedingly great fruits and they have many benefits. 
They are said to be “steadfast” because they are irreversible, they are not subject to being lost, and they become excellent. 
They are said to be “completely pure” because they within the bodhisattva stages in which they are unsurpassed. 
Regarding this , these five forms of ripening—the ripening that is accomplished on the basis of material things, through winning over miraculous powers, arises through explaining secret Dharma, weak application, and the ripening that is accomplished merely on the basis of learning—will be only a weak form even after virtuous qualities have been cultivated for a long period of time, much less when they have been cultivated for a short period of time. 
It should be understood that all the other causes of ripening bring about the ripening in a threefold manner. 
A weak form of ripening should be understood from a weak form of practice, a middling form from a middling form , and a great form from a great form . 
Each of these three forms of ripening—weak, middling, and great—should be understood as occurring in an additional threefold manner. 
The middling form has a weak form of being middling, a middling form of being middling, and a great form of being middling. 
The great form has a weak form of being great, a middling form of being great, and a great form of being great. 
By a similar process of ever-greater subdivision, it should be understood that the variety of forms in which buddhas and bodhisattvas bring about the ripening of sentient beings is beyond measure. 
the ripening of the causes and effects that relate to a buddha’s qualities, by the methods that have been described. 
that range from the ripening of faculties to the ripening of knowledge, and range from weak to great. 
who undergo ripening are made up of three categories: 
He or she also brings about in relation to other beings and other persons in order to the final emancipation the three vehicles. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the sixth chapter, entitled “Ripening.” Regarding this , what is enlightenment? 
In brief, two types of abandonment and two types of knowledge are called “enlightenment.” Regarding this , the two types of abandonment are the abandonment of the obscurations of the mental afflictions and the abandonment of the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
The two types of knowledge, on the other hand, are the stainless knowledge that is free from the encumbrance of the mental afflictions through having abandoned the obscurations of the mental afflictions, and the knowledge that is unobstructed in relation to all objects of knowledge through having abandoned the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
Another formulation is that pure knowledge,497 knowledge of everything,498 and unimpeded knowledge,499 together with the complete destruction of all the traces of the mental afflictions and the complete abandonment of the ignorance that are unrelated to the mental afflictions, are referred to as “unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment.” Regarding this , knowledge that is characterized by the complete and permanent abandonment of all the mental afflictions along with their traces is called “pure.” Knowledge that proceeds unobstructedly in relation to all constituents, all entities of every kind, and in relation to all times is called “knowledge of everything.” Regarding this , there are two constituents: 
world spheres and the constituent elements of sentient beings.500 There are two kinds of entities: 
Regarding this , there are three aspects of time: 
A differentiation of these qualities of a buddha will be given in the chapter entitled “Preeminence.” Regarding this , supreme enlightenment is endowed with seven forms of supremacy, which are the reasons that, of all the forms of enlightenment, it is the one that is said to be supreme. 
What are the seven forms of supremacy? 
Regarding these, the physical body of a tathāgata that is well adorned with the thirty-two marks of a great person is what is called “supremacy of material basis.” A tathāgata’s dedication to his own benefit, to the benefit of others, to the benefit of a great multitude of beings, to the happiness of a great multitude of beings, his compassion toward the world, and toward the well-being, benefit, and happiness of gods and humans is what is called “supremacy of action.” A tathāgata’s quality of being endowed with four unsurpassed and unequaled forms of accomplishment— perfection of morality, perfection of view, perfection of conduct, and perfection of livelihood—is what is called “supremacy of accomplishment.” A tathāgata’s quality of being endowed with four unsurpassed and unequaled forms of knowledge— informative knowledge of Dharma, informative knowledge of meanings, informative knowledge of clear expression, and informative knowledge eloquence—is what is called “supremacy of knowledge.” A tathāgata’s quality of being endowed with the six unsurpassed and unequaled forms of supernatural knowledge that were described earlier is what is called “supremacy of power.” A tathāgata’s quality of being endowed with the abandonment of all the mental afflictions along with their traces, as well as the unsurpassed and unequaled abandonment of the obscurations to that which needs to be known, is what is called “supremacy of abandonment.” The three unsurpassed and unequaled pleasurable states— the pleasurable states of the āryas, the pleasurable states of the gods, and the divine pleasurable states—are what a tathāgata abides in to a high degree and they are what is called “supremacy of pleasurable states.” Regarding this , abiding in emptiness, signlessness, and wishlessness,508 as well as abiding in the state of composure that is a cessation,509 are what are called “the pleasurable states of the āryas.” The four meditative absorptions and the four formless states of composure are what are called “the pleasurable states of the gods.” The four immeasurables are what are called “the divine pleasurable states.” Furthermore, of these three pleasurable states, four the supreme pleasurable states in which the tathāgatas abide to a high degree. 
from the pleasurable states of the āryas— abiding in emptiness and abiding in the state of composure that is a cessation; from the pleasurable states of the gods— the fourth meditative absorption, which is known as “immobile”;510 and from the divine pleasurable states— the pleasurable state of abiding in compassion. 
which a tathāgata employs to look upon the world with his buddha eye three times during the night and three times during the day, or six times during the day and night, to determine “Who is growing spiritually? 
Who is declining spiritually? 
Whose undeveloped virtue roots can I cause to become firmly established?” ... 
and so on, up to “Whom can I establish in the highest fruit of an arhat?” Regarding this , due to the supremacy of their basis, the tathāgatas are called “great beings.” Due to the supremacy of their action, they are called “the ones whose compassion is great.” Due to the supremacy of their accomplishment, they are called “the ones whose morality and spiritual qualities are great.” Due to the supremacy of their knowledge, they are called “the ones whose wisdom is great.” Due to the supremacy of their power, they are called “the ones whose supernatural knowledge is great.” Due to the supremacy of their abandonment, they are called “the ones who have attained great liberation.” Due to the supremacy of their pleasurable states, they are called “the ones who abide in the great pleasurable states to a high degree.” Moreover, ten aspects make up the verbal description of the good qualities possessed by the tathāgatas; also recollection of their good qualities. 
What are the ten? 
He is the One who possesses knowledge and its support513 in that he is well endowed with three forms of knowledge514 and their support, which are described in the sutras as consisting of insight and quiescence as well as those elements that favor both of them. 
He is the Sugata because he has attained supreme excellence and because he has attained it irreversibly.515 He is the One who knows the world516 because of his knowledge of every way in which the constituent of world spheres and the constituent of sentient beings undergo affliction and purification. 
he teaches and properly indicates to gods and humans the remedy that gets rid of all suffering.521 Therefore, is called the Teacher of gods and humans.522 He is called the Buddha523 because he has realized in their entirety and in every respect the heap of entities that are advantageous, the heap of entities that are disadvantageous, and the heap of entities that are neither advantageous nor disadvantageous.524 He is the Bhagavān525 because he defeated the great assemblage of Māra’s army in its entirety. 
Regarding this , there are many kalpas in which not even a single buddha appears. 
It is also the case that many buddhas can arise in just a single kalpa. 
It should be understood that countless, immeasurable numbers of buddhas arise among the countless, immeasurable numbers of world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
Why is that? 
there are countless, immeasurable numbers of bodhisattvas in the ten directions who have made aspirational prayers at the same time and who have completed equal amounts of the accumulations. 
In whatever day, half-month, month, or year a single bodhisattva has made the aspirational prayer of enlightenment mind, in that very day, half-month, or year all . 
For if even in this very world sphere many hundreds of bodhisattvas are seen to make aspirational prayers at the same time, to be similar in their generosity, similar in their morality, similar in their patience, similar in their effort, similar in their meditative absorption, and similar in their wisdom, then how much more would this be so throughout the endless and limitless world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
The buddha fields that exist throughout the ten directions, a great triple-thousand world spheres, are also measureless and countless . 
Now, since it is not possible for two bodhisattvas who have similarly completed their accumulations to take birth at the same time in the buddha field of one and the same world sphere, how much more would this be so for measureless and countless numbers . 
Therefore, it should be understood that those bodhisattvas who have similarly completed their accumulations are born in separate buddha fields throughout the measureless and countless numbers in the ten directions in regions that are devoid of a buddha and according to their purity. 
In this way, it is entirely proper for there to be a multitude of buddhas in a great number of world spheres. 
However, it is not the case that two tathāgatas can take birth simultaneously in a single buddha field. 
Why is that? 
For a great length of time, bodhisattvas strongly cultivate the following aspirational prayer: 
“I so wish that I alone may become a leader in a world that has no leader, one who tames sentient beings, who liberates them from every form of suffering, and who causes them to attain complete nirvana.” The correct pursuit of spiritual practice by one who has strongly cultivated such a prayer for a great length of time is sure to bring success. 
Furthermore, a single tathāgata is able to perform all the deeds of a buddha within a single buddha field that a great triple-thousand . 
Therefore, it would be meaningless for a second tathāgata to be born . 
In addition, because of the arising of a single tathāgata in a world, the successful completion by sentient beings of their own aims occurs in much greater numbers and with much stronger devotion. 
Why is that? The following thoughts occur to : 
“Throughout the entire world, there is only this one tathāgata; there is not a second . 
If he were to travel to country or enter nirvana, there would be no second whatsoever in whose presence we could practice the spiritual life or hear the Dharma.” Having made this realization, they make haste with a very firm aspiration and exertion to abide in the spiritual life and hear the true Dharma. 
However, if they were to encounter a multitude of buddhas, they would not make haste. 
Thus, through the arising of a single tathāgata, the successful accomplishment by them of their own aims occurs in greater numbers and with stronger devotion. 
A woman cannot attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Why is that? as follows: 
Once a bodhisattva has passed beyond the first countless number of kalpas he abandons the state of being a woman, and until he sits at the seat of enlightenment,526 he will never again become a woman. 
The entirety of womankind naturally possesses a great many mental afflictions and is subject to inferior wisdom, and it is not possible for a mind stream that naturally possesses a great many mental afflictions and is subject to inferior wisdom to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Thus, it should be understood that the essential nature of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment has been described as it truly is. 
It should also be understood that the supremacy, the manner of recalling the special description of good qualities, the manner of appearance, and the differences have been described as they truly are. 
However, unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment is beyond thought, because it transcends all forms of speculative analysis. 
It cannot be fully grasped, because it possesses spiritual qualities that are immeasurably great. 
And it is truly unsurpassed in that it produces all the tathāgatas, listener , and solitary realizer . 
Therefore, this form of enlightenment alone is the foremost, the best, the most eminent, and the most excellent. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the seventh chapter, entitled “Enlightenment.” The presentation of in relation to which a bodhisattva should train himor herself has been completed.527 Now I shall describe the manner in which should train. 
At the very outset, a bodhisattva who is desirous of training himor herself here in the bodhisattva trainings must become one whose devotion is abundant. 
He or she must also become one who seeks the Dharma, one who teaches the Dharma, one who is established in a practice that accords with the Dharma, one who gives correct instruction and counsel, and one who, while abiding in correct instruction and counsel, engages in deeds of body, speech, and mind that are governed by skillful means. 
How does a bodhisattva become one whose devotion is abundant? 
Here a bodhisattva becomes endowed with a certainty and eagerness that is preceded by the faith that is a clarity toward the eight objects of devotion, about which he or she thinks: 
“There exists a means for attaining the aim that is worthy of being achieved.” Regarding this , the aim that is worthy of being achieved is unsurpassed enlightenment. 
For its part, the means of achieving is all of the paths that make up the bodhisattva training. 
Just as with them, devotion toward that which was well expounded, well spoken, and well declared—that is to say, the Dharma teachings discourses, songs, declarations, and the rest.529 Regarding this , it should be understood that an abundance of devotion toward the eight objects of devotion is due to two causes: 
the extensive cultivation of devotion and the development of strong forbearance.530 Regarding this , when a bodhisattva is seeking Dharma, what does he or she seek? 
How does he or she seek it? What are his or her motives for seeking it? 
In brief, a bodhisattva seeks the bodhisattva collection531 and also seeks the listener collection , the outer bodies of teachings,532 and the categories of secular crafts and occupations. 
Regarding these , among the twelve divisions that were mentioned, the one known as “extensive discourses” represents the bodhisattva collection. 
The remaining should be understood to make up the listener collection. 
The outer bodies of teachings, briefly, are of three types: 
Regarding the categories of secular crafts and occupations, they are of numerous types and many diverse forms, including knowledge of the occupations of a goldsmith, ironsmith, jeweler, and the like. 
All of these branches of learning are subsumed within the five branches of learning: 
These five branches of learning are the ones that the bodhisattva seeks. 
In this way, he or she seeks all the branches of learning. 
Regarding this , Buddha’s speech is referred to as “the inner body of teachings.” In how many forms does occur? 
The same up to: In how many forms do the branches of worldly crafts and occupations occur? 
The body of teachings on grammar also in two forms: 
The body of teachings on the treatment of disease occurs in four forms: 
the form that sets forth expertise regarding disease, the form that sets forth expertise regarding all the sources of disease, the form that sets forth expertise about curing diseases that have arisen, and the form that sets forth expertise about preventing diseases that have been cured from arising in the future. 
The categories of secular crafts and occupations occur in the form that sets forth how to practice and achieve the goals of each of the various categories of crafts and occupations. 
Ten causes make up the unerring presentation of causes and they should be understood as encompassing the complete enumeration of all causes that relate to becoming afflicted, becoming purified, and the occurrence of the various types of worldly and indeterminate entities such as agricultural crops. 
What are the ten causes? 
Regarding this , the names that relate to all entities, as well as the conceptions534 that are preceded by names and the statements that are preceded by conceptions, are called the causes of orderly discourse535 that relate to those entities. 
Regarding this , that entity upon which something is dependent and by which it is caused, and that entity in relation to which something is sought after and acquired are called its requisite cause. 
For example, the act of grasping is dependent on a hand and is caused by a hand; the acts of going out and coming back536 are dependent on feet and are caused by feet; the acts of contracting and extending are dependent upon joints and caused by joints; and the pursuit and acquisition of food and drink are dependent upon hunger and thirst and are caused by hunger and thirst. 
It should be understood that there are an immeasurable number of similar instances of requisite causes that conform to this principle.537 Regarding this , a seed is the propelling cause538 of its own result, which represents the culmination . 
All other conditions with the exception of the seed constitute supporting causes.539 The seed is the originating cause540 of its own result. 
Further, the result that is brought into being by the seed is the producing cause541 of the subsequent results that were propelled by the seed. 
Fixed causes are the distinct forms of causality that relate to a variety of different classes of things. 
Requisite causes, propelling causes, supporting causes, originating causes, producing causes, and fixed causes, all taken together as one group, are called “cooperating causes.”542 Causes that obstruct the arising of something are opposing causes. 
Those that lack any obstructive nature are compatible causes. 
Regarding this , briefly there are six kinds of opposition: 
Opposition relating to speech is, for example, the contradictory statements that are found at different places throughout the treatises of certain brahmins and ascetics. 
Opposition to arising is when, for example, the arising does not occur because of the absence of those causal factors that promote its arising and the presence of entities that obstruct its arising. 
Opposition to simultaneous occurrence is such pairs of things as light and darkness, desire and hatred, and pleasure and pain. 
Opposition of adversaries is species that are adversarial and hostile to one another, such as snakes and mongooses, and cats and mice. 
Opposition between bad qualities and their antidotes is , for example, desire and meditation on unattractiveness;543 malice544 and meditation on loving-kindness; harmfulness545 and compassion; and between meditation on the limbs of enlightenment546 and the eightfold noble path on the one hand and all the root and secondary mental afflictions that operate in the three realms on the other. 
All of these causes can be subsumed within two types of causes: 
Seeds, which are requisite and originating causes, constitute generative causes. 
The remaining forms of causes should be understood as instrumental causes. 
There are four conditions:547 causal conditions, homogeneous immediate conditions, objective conditions, and governing conditions. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that generative causes are forms of causal conditions, and instrumental causes are forms of governing conditions. 
Homogeneous immediate conditions and objective conditions are limited to those entities that are minds and mental factors. 
That is, those minds and mental factors that are supported by that arose before them in the sense that provide them with the opportunity are the ones that come into being. 
Therefore, it should be understood that homogeneous immediate conditions and objective conditions are subsumed within supporting causes. 
Regarding this , how is it that these ten causes produce all worldly entities? 
How is it that they bring about purification? 
The various kinds of crops that are considered forms of grain in the world and by which the world maintains its livelihood have the following variety of names, conceptions, and forms of verbal usage: 
barley, rice, wheat, sesame, urad beans,548 mung beans,549 horse gram beans,550 etc. 
“Let the barley be fetched,” “Let it be reaped,”551 “Let it be ground,” “Let it be stored,” etc., are expressions that provide examples of their causes of orderly discourse. 
Just as with barley, the same can be understood to apply in relation to the remaining . 
In dependence on being hungry, thirsty, physically weak, and the body being at rest, and in dependence on consumption of food that is taken in morsels,552 there is desire for, as well as pursuit, acquisition, and enjoyment of those . 
These are the requisite causes that relate to them. 
Whatever individual seeds are the ones from which various individual crops arise, those particular seeds are the propelling causes of those . 
The conditions of earth, rain, etc. that the arising of sprouts are the supporting causes. 
The seeds are the originating causes of sprouts. 
The continuous series of sprouts, stems, and leaves, in turn, are the producing causes of that crop’s growth and maturation. 
Barley seeds cause the arising of barley sprouts and, a barley crop; they do not of anything else. 
The same should be understood for all the remaining . 
This represents a fixed cause. 
Beginning with the requisite cause and ending with the fixed cause, all these causes the arising of a crop are the cooperating causes. 
This grain cannot reach maturity if any of these causes is absent. 
Therefore, the totality of all of them is called the “cooperating cause.” Obstacles such as the occurrence of hail and crop diseases are opposing causes. 
The absence of such obstacles is the compatible cause. 
These ten causes should also be understood to occur in relation to other mundane entities just as they do in this summary of grain , according to the circumstances . 
Regarding this , the names, conceptions, and verbal expressions that relate to all of dependent origination—ranging from “ignorance,” “formations,” “consciousness,” and “name and form” up to “old age and death,” “sorrow,” “lamentation,” “pain,” “mental suffering,” and “adversity”—constitute the causes of orderly discourse that pertain to the process of affliction. 
Regarding the orderly discourse that begins with “formations are conditioned by ignorance” and continues up to “old age and death are conditioned by birth,” the activities that occur in relation to the limbs of existence and that are dependent on the experiencing of objects represent the requisite causes of the process of affliction. 
The seeds that exist here in this life and that relate to the entities associated with ignorance, etc., are the propelling causes of the birth, old age, and death that will occur in a different life. 
that contribute to the arising of ignorance, etc.— associating with evil persons, listening to false teachings, improper attention , and engendered by one’s repeated practice in the past—constitute the supporting causes. 
Each individual seed of ignorance, etc., is the originating cause . 
Additionally, ignorance, etc., and ending with existence, which make up a series that functions in such a way that each succeeding member brings into being the next , are the producing causes of birth and old age and death that will occur in another lifetime. 
Certain of ignorance, etc., and end with existence, together with each of their individual seeds, function collectively to rebirth in the hells. 
The beginning with the requisite causes and ending with the fixed causes are called the “cooperating causes.” Additionally, the opposing causes of the process of affliction are possessing a form of spiritual lineage, the appearance of the buddhas, the teaching of the true Dharma, associating with wise persons, listening to the true Dharma, proper attention , a form of practice that conforms with Dharma, as well as all the entities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
The causes that do not oppose are a deficiency in or absence of those entities that were just mentioned. 
This is the manner in which these ten causes should be understood the entire process of affliction for all sentient beings. 
Regarding this , the names, conceptions, and verbal expressions that relate to all the spiritual qualities that are conducive to purification, as well as the cessation and nirvana, constitute the causes of orderly discourse that pertain to the process of purification. 
The kind of entities of orderly discourse include the closely placed recollections,553 the forms of correct abandonment,554 and continue up to the eightfold noble path,555 as well as the cessation of conditioning entities that is brought about by the cessation of ignorance and continues up to the cessation of old age and death that is brought about by the cessation of birth. 
Regarding this , seeking purification, accomplishing purification, and completing purification, are dependent upon the disadvantages of the formations, represent the requisite causes of the process of purification. 
The possessing spiritual lineage— that relates to those persons who abide in a spiritual lineage and that is a precondition for the attainment of the nirvana in which the support remains and in which the support does not remain—represents the propelling cause of the process of purification. 
associating with wise persons, listening to the true Dharma, proper attention , and the ripening of one’s faculties that was accomplished previously constitute the supporting causes. 
The seeds of those uncontaminated556 entities that are conducive to enlightenment and that are included within spiritual lineage are the originating causes of those entities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
Moreover, those very entities conducive to enlightenment that are generated by their respective seeds are the producing causes that gradually the realms of the nirvana in which the support remains and in which the support does not remain. 
Regarding this , the spiritual lineage of a listener is conducive to parinirvana by means of the Listeners’ Vehicle, the spiritual lineage of a solitary realizer is conducive to parinirvana by means of the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle, and the Great Vehicle’s spiritual lineage is conducive to parinirvana by means of the Great Vehicle. 
This represents the fixed causes that relate to the process of purification. 
The deficiency or absence of those opposing causes is called the compatible causes. 
Regarding this , that which is an opposing cause for affliction should be regarded as a cause for purification. 
That which is an opposing cause for purification should be regarded as a cause for affliction. 
Such is the manner in which the ten causes bring about affliction the same ten bring about purification. 
This is also how they have caused affliction and purification in the past and how they will do so in the future. 
There are no other causes of greater significance than these and none besides these. 
Regarding this , what are results? 
Briefly, there are five results: 
The maturation of nonvirtuous entities occurs in the lower realms.558 That of contaminated virtuous does so in a happy migratory state.559 This constitutes a maturation result. 
The existence of the conditions of delighting in nonvirtuous entities and of being rich in nonvirtuous entities through having focused one’s mind upon nonvirtuous entities,560 the existence of the conditions of delighting in virtuous entities and of being rich in virtuous entities through having focused one’s mind upon virtuous entities, as well as the condition in which a subsequent result conforms to a previous deed through being similar to it, represent a corresponding result. 
The cessation of the mental afflictions through the eightfold noble path constitutes the separation result. 
By contrast, the cessation of the mental afflictions by ordinary persons through the mundane path561 is not one that takes effect permanently; therefore, it does not represent a separation result. 
When any , during his or her lifetime, by means of human effort associated with some craft or occupation—whether it be cultivation of the soil, commerce, or service to the king as scribal work or counting, record keeping,562 calculating, or signing563—causes such results as grain or some other form of profit to be produced, this is called “a result of human effort.” Eye consciousness is a result that is governed by the eye faculty. 
Likewise, up to: Mind consciousness the mind faculty. 
In addition, vital airs do not become separated the faculty that is life force. 
Similarly, it should be understood that whatever results come into being through the governing influence of any of the twenty-two faculties,564 as in the Collection on Topics,565 constitute governed results. 
Having realized in this manner the form of the Buddha’s speech that correctly sets forth causes and results, and as a consequence of continually cultivating his or her lineage that relates to the power of knowledge regarding proper conditions and improper conditions,566 a bodhisattva gradually causes to be refined and further developed.567 was not done by one individual or that was done by another will not yield any ripening for that individual. 
Moreover, those deeds that did perform will not perish even after a hundred kalpas with regard to yield a result. 
Having realized in this manner, as set forth in the Buddha’s speech, that what has not been done will not yield any fruition and what has been done will not perish, a bodhisattva gradually causes the spiritual lineage the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own568 to be refined and further developed. 
Regarding this , how does a bodhisattva seek learning?569 A bodhisattva seeks the Dharma after he or she has engendered intense respect toward eloquent speech570 and excellent sayings. 
Briefly, this is the kind of respect that should be developed toward eloquent speech: 
It is in which this bodhisattva would be willing to enter a region consisting of blazing hot iron with utmost delight and respect in order to hear even a single eloquent statement, let alone a great many forms of eloquent speech, if he or she could find no other way of hearing eloquent speech. 
Between the fondness and respect that a bodhisattva feels toward the improvement of his or her own physical being,571 not to mention the entire collection of other objects , such as food and drink, and the fondness and respect he or she feels toward hearing eloquent speech, having placed the former fondness and respect next to the latter fondness and respect, does not reach a hundredth part or even a thousandth part , nor does it reach calculation, portioning, reckoning, or factoring. 
He or she is filled with faith and develops an abundance of clarity .572 He or she becomes one whose mental continuum possesses the moisture of tender feelings and one who is sincere in outlook. 
He or she approaches a Dharma teacher by a desire for virtuous qualities and a desire for the Dharma, not with the intention of trying to find fault ; with respect, not with the stiffness of pride; seeking what is virtuous, not with the aim of promoting himor herself; and does so thinking, “I shall apply myself and others to roots of virtue,” not motivated by gain or honor. 
Having approached in this manner, he or she remains unafflicted and undistracted while listening to Dharma. 
He or she does so by becoming free of the affliction of arrogance, free of the affliction of contempt, and free of the affliction of diffidence.573 Regarding this , there are six aspects by means of which becomes free of the affliction of arrogance; four aspects by means of which he or she becomes free of the affliction of contempt; and one aspect by means of which he or she becomes free of the affliction of diffidence. 
listens at an appropriate time,574 acting respectfully, being attentive,575 remaining free of discontent, aiming to put into practice , and without intending to find fault. 
By means of these six aspects, one becomes free of the affliction of arrogance. 
Having generated respect toward the Dharma and generated respect toward the Dharma teacher, avoids disdain for the Dharma and avoids disdain for a person who is a Dharma teacher. 
By means of these four aspects, one remains free of the affliction of contempt while listening . 
By means of this single aspect, one remains free of the affliction of diffidence while listening . 
This is the manner in which a bodhisattva remains unafflicted while listening to Dharma. 
Regarding this , how does a bodhisattva remain undistracted while listening to Dharma? 
by means of five aspects. 
One should listen to Dharma with a mind that is fully aware, with a one-pointed mind, with the ears directed, with the mind inclined, and having fully focused one’s entire mind. 
This is the manner in which a bodhisattva should seek learning. 
What are a bodhisattva’s motives for seeking learning? 
A bodhisattva seeks the Buddha’s speech in order to put it into practice in a manner that accords correctly with the Dharma and in order to fully reveal it to others in an extensive manner. 
A bodhisattva seeks the science of logic in order to an accurate and complete knowledge of what is badly taught and badly described in that body of teachings, in order to refute the objections that are raised by others, as well as to instill faith toward this teaching in those who lack it and to further increase the faith of those who have engendered it. 
A bodhisattva seeks the science of grammar in order to cause those who are devoted to well-composed speech to develop a firm sense of trust toward him or her by virtue of the presentation of well-derived words and syllables576 and so that he or she might engage in the orderly discourse577 that a variety of linguistic interpretations for a single meaning. 
A bodhisattva seeks the body of teachings on medicine in order to cure the many varieties of illness by sentient beings and in order to promote the welfare of the greater populace. 
A bodhisattva seeks the categories of worldly crafts and occupations in order to amass wealth so that he or she can benefit sentient beings with little difficulty, in order to generate in sentient beings high regard ,578 and in order to benefit and attract579 them by providing them with knowledge of a craft. 
A bodhisattva seeks all five of these branches of learning in order to perfect the great wisdom accumulation580 unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
This is because who fails to train in all will not attain in an orderly manner the knowledge of an omniscient being that is free of obstructions. 
This completes the presentation of what a bodhisattva seeks, as well as the manner in which it is to be sought and the motives for seeking it. 
Regarding this , what does a bodhisattva teach others, how does he or she teach , and what are his or her motives for teaching ? 
Regarding this , teaches the very same that he or she seeks . 
teaches in two ways. 
He or she explains suitable speech and speech that is pure. 
Regarding this , how does explain suitable speech? 
He or she teaches those who are seated in a manner that conforms to the modes of physical behavior,581 not in an inappropriate manner. 
This should be understood to mean that one should not a person seated on a higher seat who is not ill, a person whose head is covered , a person who is walking in front , etc., as at length in the sutras.582 Why is that? 
It is because the Dharma is an object that the buddhas and bodhisattvas venerate. 
Also, when the Dharma is being heard, others will generate reverence and they will not develop disrespect. 
also teaches everything to everyone continuously, without being stingy with the Dharma and without exhibiting a preceptor’s tightfistedness toward Dharma teachings. He or she teaches words and syllables in a systematic manner. 
With the systematic teaching of words and syllables, he or she differentiates meanings in a systematic manner. 
explains to those who are suitable to receive explanations, prompts those who are suitable to be prompted to take up practices , generates enthusiasm in those who are suitable to be encouraged, and pleases those for whom it is suitable to make them feel pleased. 
He or she teaches speech that is endowed with direct perception, inference, and trustworthy scripture, not that is unrelated to valid cognition.583 that promotes reaching the happy migratory states, is free of confusion, and easy to comprehend, not that is impenetrable. 
also that has a connection with the four noble truths. 
In all assemblies, he or she teaches in whatever manner is appropriate and whatever speech is appropriate to that . 
In these fifteen ways, the speech that bodhisattvas use when teaching should be understood as suitable to all the important aims of sentient beings. 
In addition, with regard to sentient beings who commit harm, a bodhisattva establishes mind in a state of loving-kindness before speaking . 
With regard to sentient beings who engage in misconduct, he or she establishes a beneficial state of mind before speaking . 
With regard to beings who have experienced happiness or suffering and who are behaving heedlessly or feeling dejected, establishes a compassionate state of mind that wishes to benefit and bring happiness before speaking . 
He or she does not, under the influence of the perturbation of jealousy, extol himor herself; nor does discredit others. 
With a mind that is free from corporeal desire584 and avoiding any yearning for gain, honor, or fame, he or she teaches Dharma to others. 
In these five ways, a bodhisattva explains speech that is pure. 
In brief, these can be represented as having twenty forms: 
This is the manner in which a bodhisattva should teach the Dharma to others.587 With regard to this , what is a bodhisattva’s form of practice that accords with the Dharma?588 In brief, it should be understood as having five aspects: 
conformity in body, speech, and mind with those very Dharma teachings that have been sought and taken up; correct reflection; and meditation. 
Regarding those things that the Blessed One forbade being done by body, speech, and mind and those that he approved of being done by body, speech, and mind, the complete avoidance of those deeds of body, speech, and mind in just the manner , and the cultivation and accomplishment of those is called “the practice that accords with the Dharma through conformity in body, speech, and mind.” Regarding this , what is correct reflection by a bodhisattva? 
A bodhisattva here who has gone alone to an isolated place, who is desirous of reflecting, desirous of pondering, and desirous of examining those Dharma teachings that he or she has heard, initially rejects those subjects that are unsuitable to think about, and then sets about considering those . 
He or she reflects upon them continuously, with a method of practice that is both constant and attentive, and without becoming lax. 
Some of the time, a bodhisattva who is engaged in reflection uses the applications589 to examine and penetrate590 . 
relies upon the meaning as he or she reflects, and does not rely upon the letter.591 He or she realizes “black” expressions592 and “great” expressions as they truly are.593 He or she also enters upon reflection with the initial means of engagement. 
Having become engaged , he or she attains what is of value by repeatedly applying attention.594 Rejecting what is unsuitable to think about, a bodhisattva does not develop confusion or distraction. 
Continuously engaged both constant and attentive, one reflects in a way that comprehends meanings that were not previously understood and gains of those that were understood. 
One does not allow those meanings that were gained to be lost nor allow to become inattentive . 
Because he or she possesses skill with regard to “black” expressions and “great” expressions, no one can in any way cause a bodhisattva to waver from or become unsteady about meanings that pertain to ultimate reality. 
Investigating that which is to be considered first, the bodhisattva obtains a forbearance that had not previously been obtained. 
Moreover, as he or she attains that forbearance and a state of value that has been well obtained, a bodhisattva undertakes to engage in meditation. 
By means of these eight aspects that relate to reflection, a bodhisattva becomes engaged in the form of practice that accords with Dharma that is contained within reflection. 
What is meditation? 
Regarding this , what is quiescence?598 Through having fulfilled the reflection with its eight aspects, a bodhisattva then binds mind to an object that is beyond expression—one that is a bare substance599 and a bare import600—and then, maintaining zealous devotion toward all objects through bringing to mind conceptions601 that are free of all elaboration and mental unsteadiness, he or she causes the mind to be placed, , placed anew, etc., up to causes to attain one-pointedness, and causes to attain equipoise in relation to the inner signs one-pointed concentration.602 This is what is called quiescence. 
What is the cultivation of quiescence and insight? 
It is a practice that occurs continuously and a practice that is attentive in relation to quiescence and insight. 
This is what is called “delighting in quiescence and insight.” Regarding this , however strongly a bodhisattva cultivates quiescence and insight, delighting in quiescence and insight will, to a corresponding degree, be accomplished. 
However much delighting in quiescence and insight is accomplished, quiescence and insight will, to a corresponding degree, become pure.605 As a result, however much quiescence becomes pure, physical agility and mental agility will reach a state of being abundant, strong, and developed. 
And however much insight becomes pure, knowledge-vision will reach a state of being abundant, strong, and developed. 
This is the extent of what is to be accomplished by meditation—that is to say, the indisposition that is present in a being606 is what is to be removed and knowledge-vision in relation to all knowable things is what is to be made pure. 
All of these actions of meditation are brought about by the four aspects of a bodhisattva’s meditation . 
What is instruction?607 Briefly, it should be understood as being eightfold in nature. 
Whether the situation is one in which a bodhisattva is desirous of giving instruction to others, either through relying upon one-pointed concentration or as a consequence of association , or alternatively it is a situation in which another bodhisattva or a tathāgata gives instruction to him or her, at the very outset, that examines and realizes the mind . 
Having examined mind, then examines and realizes faculties. 
Having examined faculties, then examines and realizes attitude. 
Having examined attitudes, examines and realizes latent propensities.608 Having examined latent propensities, causes to undertake a variety of means of practice, in whatever manner is suitable and in whatever manner is appropriate . 
teaches the Middle Way as the antidote to wrongly grasping at the nihilistic extreme. 
This eightfold form of instruction should be understood as being encompassed more briefly within three categories. 
What are the three categories? 
They are binding to a correct mental object, in order to initially bring stability to a mind that has not been stabilized; teaching a path of correct means to a mind has been stabilized, in order to cause to attain own aim; and causing a person who has not completed his or her purpose to give up an intermediate position.609 Regarding this , it should be understood that the act of binding to a correct mental object in order to stabilize it is accomplished by means of the knowledge of mind, faculties, attitude, and latent propensities, and by causing to undertake a means of practice in whatever way is appropriate. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that teaching a path of correct means to a mind has been stabilized, in order to cause to attain personal aim, by the Middle Way as an antidote to wrongly grasping at the eternalistic and nihilistic extremes. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that causing a person who has not completed his or her purpose to give up an intermediate position by causing to abandon the exaggerated pride something that has not been accomplished, etc., up to causing to abandon the exaggerated pride that has realized something that has not been realized. 
This is how it should be understood that the eightfold form of instruction is encompassed within these three categories. 
A bodhisattva who in this very manner either receives instruction from another person or provides it to others gradually causes the spiritual lineages of eight powers to be refined and further developed, that of the power of knowledge regarding the meditative absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration; that of the power of knowledge regarding superior and inferior faculties; that of the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion; that of the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements; that of the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere; that of the power of knowledge regarding the recollection of former existences; that of the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth; and that of the power of knowledge regarding termination of the outflows. 
In brief, the five aspects of a bodhisattva’s counsel should be understood thus: forbiddance, approval, admonishing, censuring, and encouragement. 
What does it mean for bodhisattvas’ deeds of body, speech, and mind to be supported by means? 
Briefly, the bodhisattvas’ four principles for attracting are what is called “means.” As the Blessed One declared, the bodhisattva who possesses the means that are supported by the four principles for attracting a following is called a bodhisattva.613 Why, then, are the four principles for attracting a following called “means”? 
Briefly, the means that has as its purpose teaching discipline to sentient beings and attracting them is fourfold in nature; there is nothing of greater significance than these and nothing besides these . 
Regarding this, generosity615 is the type of means that benefits. 
For instance, those beings who are benefited by various kinds of gifts having material value will think that they should listen to and act in accordance with the speech . 
Following that, by means of agreeable speech,616 a bodhisattva causes those who are confused about different subjects to grasp what is correct and to perceive in order to completely remove whatever confusion they might have. 
Similarly, induces those beings who have been caused to comprehend and perceive by means of correct to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and to adopt, be led to, become settled into, and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
Having caused beings to undertake action in this way, a bodhisattva also complies with , by conduct that represents a similar lifestyle, such that the students will not be able to reproach him or her and cause him or her to feel regret618 by saying: 
Why are you urging others to take up this ?” Therefore, sameness of purpose619 should be understood as a bodhisattva’s fourth type of means, one that has a conforming nature. 
Those deeds of body, deeds of speech, and deeds of mind that are governed by these four types of means, either collectively or individually, are described as the ones that are “governed by means” for the purpose of correctly attracting beings, teaching them discipline, and ripening them spiritually. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the eighth chapter, entitled “The Lineages of the Powers.” Both Candrakīrti and Asaṅga describe the causal condition as the seed that produces a result. 
Having gradually completed the six perfections here, a bodhisattva attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
the perfection of generosity, the perfection of morality, the perfection of patience, the perfection of effort, the perfection of meditative absorption, and the perfection of wisdom. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s perfection of generosity? 
A generosity having nine aspects is what is called a bodhisattva’s perfection of generosity. the essence of generosity, all-inclusive generosity, generosity that is difficult to carry out, generosity that is directed everywhere, the generosity of a true spiritual being, generosity in all of its forms, generosity that relates to what is wanted by those who are in distress, generosity that brings happiness here and in the next world, and generosity that is pure. What is the essence of generosity? 
It is the volition620 of a bodhisattva who is indifferent621 toward all material objects as well as own body, and that arises together with free of acquisitiveness. 
It is also the deeds of body and speech that are caused to arise by that for the purpose of giving up those objects that are suitable to be given, as well as the faultless giving up of all those objects that are suitable to be given. 
It should be understood that the essential nature of a bodhisattva’s generosity is the providing an entity to that individual by whom it is desired, and by an individual who is abiding in the discipline, who sees what is to be gained , and who recognizes the results .622 What is all-inclusive generosity? 
an inner one and an outer one. 
Regarding this, the giving up by a bodhisattva of own body down to the marrow is called “the giving up of what is exclusively an inner object.” On the other hand, the food and drink that a bodhisattva continually eats and then vomits for the sake of those who sustain themselves by consuming vomit623 is called a bodhisattva’s “giving of what is a mixture of an inner and an outer object.” The giving up of all remaining forms of objects that are suitable to be given, aside from the ones that were just mentioned, is called “the giving up of what are exclusively outer objects that are suitable to be given.” Regarding this, briefly there are two ways in which a bodhisattva offers own body to those individuals who are seeking a body. 
he or she offers himor herself to others by placing under their control and submitting to their will such that will do as they wish. 
It is like an individual agreeing to become a servant for others in order to receive food and clothing. 
Similarly, with a mind that is free of corporeal desire, a bodhisattva who is desirous of supreme enlightenment, who is desirous of benefit and happiness to others, and who is desirous of completing the perfection of generosity offers himor herself to others by placing under their control and submitting to their will such that will do as they wish. 
to those who request hands, feet, eyes, head, limbs, or minor appendages, to those who seek flesh, blood, or sinews, and to those who seek marrow, offers up to his or her marrow. 
There are two ways624 in which a bodhisattva gives up outer objects to sentient beings. 
he or she provides a borrowed object625 so that it may be used however it might please . 
offers so that might have dominion over it, and he or she does so with a mind that gives up fully and completely. 
Nevertheless, a bodhisattva does not give all inner and outer objects in every way to sentient beings without exception. 
Of this twofold distinction concerning inner and outer objects, what does a bodhisattva give to sentient beings? 
What is the manner in which one gives ? What is the manner in which one does not give ? 
Of those inner and outer objects, does not practice toward others the generosity that only brings happiness but is not beneficial, nor that neither brings happiness nor is beneficial. 
On the other hand, does practice toward others the generosity that is beneficial even though it may not necessarily bring happiness, as well as that both brings happiness and is beneficial. 
A bodhisattva who has been called upon here by an improper directive should not give himor herself up to the control of another and submit to the will of another for the sake of harming someone, or for the sake of deceiving someone. 
Although a bodhisattva may have agreed in the presence of others to give up life even a hundred times, a thousand times, or a hundred thousand times, he or she should not, because of an order by another or for the sake of pleasing another, harm someone, kill someone, or deceive someone. 
Moreover, if a bodhisattva has become one who possesses a pure attitude with regard to generosity, he or she should not offer his or her own body, limbs, or appendages when a great matter relating to sentient beings that ought to be done is near at hand, even though a person may have approached and asked for his or her body, limbs, or appendages. 
Why is that? 
The bodhisattva who possesses a pure attitude with regard to generosity would not experience any manner of apprehension whatsoever such that he or she might wonder, “Should this be given or should this not be given?” Therefore, while a bodhisattva should disregard the presence of matters relating to sentient beings and give627 in order to continue purifying his or her attitude, once his or her attitude has become purified, does not disregard the presence of matters relating to sentient beings and give . 
also should not give his or her own body, in such a way that involves the separation of the limbs, to those gods who belong to Māra’s entourage who have approached him or her with an injurious aim and have asked for . 
in order to insure that an extremely great injury or loss does not befall those .628 Just as with the gods who belong to Māra’s entourage, the same should be understood with regard to beings who have been directed by those . 
Moreover, a bodhisattva should not give his or her own body, in such a way that involves the separation of the limbs, to those who are mad and have deranged minds, for they are neither in their right minds nor petitioners who are seeking . 
Therefore, he or she does not give them because they are not in control of their minds. 
With the exception of these situations, a bodhisattva does give up his or her own body to those who ask for it in those situations that are the opposite of those , either in the sense of submitting to the will of another or in a way that involves separation of the limbs and appendages. 
This is how it should be understood that a bodhisattva does and does not practice generosity in relation to inner objects. 
On the other hand, with regard to outer objects, a bodhisattva does not offer poison, fire, weapons, or intoxicants to petitioners if they are for the purpose of harming sentient beings, regardless of whether they have been asked for by petitioners in order to harm themselves or in order to harm others. 
However, a bodhisattva does give poison, fire, weapons, and intoxicants to petitioners if they are for the purpose of benefiting sentient beings, whether they have been asked for by petitioners in order to benefit themselves or in order to benefit others.629 In addition, a bodhisattva does not offer movable property630 to others that belongs to someone else and arouses suspicion. 
A bodhisattva does not, as a form of procuring, seize someone’s wife and offer to others. Nor does offer food or drink that contains sentient beings who are alive. 
A bodhisattva also does not give to petitioners and make as the gift of a bodhisattva any object that is associated with pleasure and amusement if it is something that is harmful to sentient beings. 
Why is that? 
Even though that object might cause those to generate some measure of an approving attitude toward that bodhisattva, nevertheless his or her act of generosity might do very great harm , by reason of which would give rise to conceit, lack of mindfulness, and misdeeds, and, following the dissolution of their bodies, they would be reborn in the lower realms. 
On the other hand, if it were granted that this object of pleasure, amusement, etc., would not cause to go to the lower realms nor cause to accumulate roots of nonvirtue, then a bodhisattva should offer such an object of pleasure, amusement, etc., to petitioners in order to cause an approving attitude , and so that, by means of that object, might also be drawn and caused to undergo spiritual ripening. 
What sort of object, then, pleasure and amusement does a bodhisattva not give to petitioners? 
For example, a bodhisattva does not provide training in the killing wild animals. 
He or she does not perform either those base forms of sacrifice or those great slaughters at which many living beings are gathered together and deprived of their lives, nor does he or she cause them to be carried out by others. 
He or she also does not offer the killing of sacrificial animals in temples. 
If asked to donate geographical areas that are relied upon as a refuge by great numbers of living beings and which are inhabited by beings who are born in water or beings who are born on dry land, so that those living beings might be harmed, he or she does not offer . 
If asked to provide nets, traps, or instruction nets and traps for the purpose of harming living beings, he or she does not provide them. 
He or she also does not present enemies to enemy so that they might be reviled, killed, detained, punished, or tortured. 
In short, a bodhisattva does not give to petitioners any object at all that is a source of pleasure and amusement for sentient beings if its purpose is to inflict pain upon other beings or to injure other beings. 
elephants, horses, carts, vehicles, and conveyances; clothing and ornaments; excellent food and drink; instruction in dance, song, and music; articles used in dance, song, and music; perfumes, garlands, and ointments; as well as various implements and household utensils; parks, houses, and women for service; and instruction in various fields of crafts and occupations. 
However, a bodhisattva does not offer an immoderate amount of food or drink or that is unsuitable to a sick person even if he or she should ask for it. 
does not offer excellent food and drink to sentient beings of a greedy nature who have already been satisfied. 
A bodhisattva absolutely never offers his mother or father to petitioners, for a bodhisattva’s mother and father represent his or her highest object of veneration. 
He or she should also give himor herself to them as one who is under their control and one who is to be used by them, he were an object that is being pledged, bartered, deposited , or sold. 
How could a bodhisattva even consider giving them to others, much less actually do so? 
A bodhisattva king and lord who has been anointed does not, within his own domain of sentient beings together with their households, remove the child or wife that belongs to one person from the presence of that individual and offer to someone else. 
Even if they have been properly informed, if it pleases them, and if they are desirous , does not turn them over to hostile persons, powerful spirits633 or malignant demons,634 or those who are violent.635 Nor does he or she commit into servitude a child or spouse who is of a delicate nature or who is from a distinguished family. 
A bodhisattva does not bestow a grant of sovereignty to petitioners who are violent and inflict great injury upon others. 
A bodhisattva does not take away property from his or her mother and father and give it to petitioners. 
Just as he or she does with father and mother, so too, from his or her child, spouse, female servants, male servants, and hired persons. 
A bodhisattva practices generosity after acquiring objects of value in a manner that is just and accompanied by due consideration, not in a manner that is unjust or rash. 
Nor does he or she do so in a manner that causes pain or injury to others. 
A bodhisattva who is established in the teaching of the buddhas, the blessed ones, does not practice generosity in any manner whatsoever that involves violating the system of training. 
When a bodhisattva is giving a gift, he or she gives it with a mind that views all beings equally, fixing the view that are worthy of receiving gifts, friends, foes, or neutral persons; virtuous individuals or individuals with faults; individuals who are inferior, equal, or superior; or individuals who are happy or suffering. 
A bodhisattva does not give a petitioner a lesser gift than the one he or she stated and promised ; without exception, he or she only gives one that is equal to or greater in value than . 
Having promised an excellent object, a bodhisattva does not give an inferior one that is of lesser value. 
Having promised a poor that is of lesser value, if he should possess one whose quality is excellent, without exception he or she gives the excellent one. 
A bodhisattva does not give a gift while feeling disconsolate, angry, or in an agitated state of mind. 
Nor does he or she, after having made a gift, reproach by repeatedly declaring, “Through generosity, I have aided you in this or that way,” or “ I have fostered you ,” or “ I have lifted you up .” When giving a gift even to a person of lowly status, a bodhisattva does not offer it in a scornful or disrespectful manner, much less to someone who possesses good qualities. 
When giving a gift to petitioners who are engaged in various forms of wrongful behavior, who are rowdy636 and have an unrestrained nature, and who are verbally abusive, irascible, and vituperative, a bodhisattva does not, on account of that wrongful behavior, become disheartened. 
Without exception, when giving a gift to such individuals, a bodhisattva realizes that it is their nature to be greatly overcome by mental afflictions and fixes a compassionate attitude . 
He or she also does not give gifts that are associated with auspicious ceremonies.638 Nor does he or she believe that the purity of a mundane or transcendent form of detachment simply through gifts that are exceedingly pure in every respect. 
he or she maintains solely that generosity constitutes accumulation639 complete purity. 
He or she also dedicates all of generosity to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
A bodhisattva who, in accordance with the way things truly are,640 has developed a firm belief641 with regard to the ripening of every type of result of every type of generosity practices generosity without having to depend on anyone else and without having to be led by anyone else. 
For example, a person who gives food will become one who is strong, a person who gives clothing will become one who possesses an physical appearance, a person who gives vehicles will become one who enjoys physical comfort, and a person who gives lamps will become one who possesses eyesight. 
It should be understood at length with additional examples. A bodhisattva does not become frightened by the risk of poverty when he or she gives a gift. 
He or she has no other thought but compassion. 
A bodhisattva does not give a gift that is unsuitable for the petitioners, such as leftover food and drink to religious ascetics, or that contains excrement, urine, phlegm, mucus, vomit, purging, pus, or blood, or that has become spoiled but was not declared and made known , or porridge and gruel that ought to be discarded. 
Similarly, that contains onions or has onions mixed in with it to those who do not eat onions. 
It is also to those who do not eat meat and the giving of drink that contains alcohol or has alcohol mixed in it to those who do not drink intoxicating beverages. 
Likewise, a bodhisattva does not engage in any inappropriate action when giving a gift to others. 
A bodhisattva does not give a gift to a petitioner only after has become exhausted by having had to make repeated requests, by having had to go away and return again , and by having had to render service . 
Without exception, as soon as the request is made. 
A bodhisattva does not give a gift that is based on renown, fame, and reputation. 
He or she does not give that is based on receive something in return from another person, nor one that is based on the power of Śakra or Māra, or a wheel ruler. 
He or she does not give a gift to others in order to deceive them, by thinking, “After enticing and gaining trust with this gift, later I shall cheat them.” He or she does not give a gift to others in order to alienate them from someone else, such as by thinking, “By means of this gift, I shall create discord a village, a portion of a village, a region, or a portion of a region and their lord. 
Then, I shall take them away and gain control over them .” A bodhisattva is skillful, diligent, and poised for action. 
Without displaying any laziness himor herself, he or she directs others to make gifts. 
When he or she further becomes aware that a great multitude and gathering of petitioners has gathered and assembled, including persons of both good and bad moral character, he or she moves back and forth repeatedly presenting all the objects to be given, in an orderly manner from the most senior end to the most junior end. 
A bodhisattva who possesses abundant, extensive, and vast wealth does not give a meager gift. 
He or she does not give a gift to others in order to cause injury to someone else, nor does he or she give a gift to verbally abuse, anger, beat, threaten, reproach, kill, bind, amputate, confine, or exile someone. 
Before making a gift, a bodhisattva is in a happy state of mind. During the act of giving, he or she remains glad. After having completed the act of giving, he or she does not feel remorse. 
He or she does not, by deceit, give a gift of fake jewels, pearls, lapis lazuli, conch shell, crystal, or coral, etc., to persons who desire those . 
There is no object to be given whatsoever, small or great, that a bodhisattva has not previously given mentally to all sentient beings and that later, a petitioner requests it from the bodhisattva, as own wealth that had been borrowed and returned. 
A bodhisattva makes a gift at a suitable time, not at an unsuitable time. that is proper both for oneself and others, not one that is improper. 
in a manner that exemplifies good conduct, not in a manner that represents improper conduct. 
also with an undistracted mind, not one that is distracted. 
A bodhisattva also does not laugh at or show contempt toward a petitioner, nor does he or she cause to feel embarrassed. 
He or she does not frown. 
He or she exhibits a radiant countenance, greets with a smile, and initiates polite conversation. 
He or she does not delay in making a gift, nor does he or she do so with great haste. 
Without being asked to do so, a bodhisattva willingly chooses to extend to others whatever they may seek. 
He or she personally takes hold of the objects that are granted to them. 
A bodhisattva also does not practice unwise generosity. 
When giving, he or she only practices wise generosity. 
What is a bodhisattva’s wise generosity? 
Here a bodhisattva who possesses and has obtained objects that are fit to be given forms mind in the following manner, before a petitioner has come forward: 
“Suppose two petitioners were to approach me, one of whom is comfortable, not miserable, not wretched, has a protector, and has someone to rely upon, while the other is distressed, miserable, wretched, does not have a protector, and does not have someone to rely upon. 
In that situation, if I should have the wealth to satisfy and fulfill the desires of both, then I should satisfy both; I should fulfill the desires of both. 
But if I should not have sufficient wealth to satisfy and fulfill the desires of both, then I should turn away the one who is comfortable and make a gift to the one who is distressed. 
“That donation was committed earlier and promised earlier by me to that person who is in distress. 
Therefore, good person,644 I hope you don’t feel any antipathy toward me.” Moreover, a bodhisattva who possesses and has obtained objects that are fit to be given should approach households that are marked by stinginess, that are marked by extreme stinginess, that cling to their possessions, that are avaricious,645 that have never practiced charity toward ascetics and brahmins and, after having made a friendly greeting and established an air of goodwill, he or she should say the following: 
“Please, friends, do me a great favor that will not cause you any loss of wealth. 
In my home, there is an abundance of property and an abundance of objects that are suitable for practicing charity. 
I am one who seeks petitioners in order to complete the perfection of generosity. 
If you should encounter any petitioners, please do not abandon them by turning them away. 
Eventually, through engaging in this practice and this form of skillful means that is accompanied by wisdom, will also offer small amounts of their own wealth to others. 
After having relied upon a weak form of avoidance of desire,646 they will attain one that is middling; after having relied upon a middling form, they will attain one that is great. 
Moreover, in a situation where a bodhisattva’s teachers, preceptors, the students that he or she lives with, or his or her fellow spiritual practitioners are individuals with a nature that is marked by desire, or they are individuals who are prone to attachment, or, though not prone to attachment, they are individuals who have lost the desire because they lack objects that are suitable for giving, that bodhisattva, being someone who desires to perform substantial forms of meritorious action647 that derive from generosity and are related either to the Buddha, the Dharma, or the Sangha, gives objects that are suitable for giving to those individuals and does not perform himor herself but rather causes those individuals to perform them. 
In this manner, the bodhisattva produces a great quantity of merit for himor herself, he or she causes some of fellow spiritual practitioners to bring their mental affliction under control and others to perfect their desire for Dharma practice, and he or she also both causes sentient beings to be drawn and causes sentient beings to attain spiritual ripening. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who possesses and has obtained objects that are fit to be given, having understood a petitioner merely by a sign of his or her intention, presents with objects that are suitable to be given, according to his or her wishes. 
also causes the desire of that individual to be fulfilled, in such a way that he or she departs without being embarrassed and feeling highly pleased, confident, and happy, and also in such a way that the bodhisattva to be cheated by that fraudulent act. 
Nor does , because of this incident, reproach the cheater or cause him or her to feel regret. 
This and other examples like it should be understood as wise forms of generosity by a bodhisattva who possesses and has obtained objects that are fit to be given. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who does not possess and has not obtained objects that are fit to be given but who is skilled in a variety of crafts and occupations takes up one of those crafts or occupations in such a way that, having acquired a great amount of wealth with little difficulty, he or she is able to maintain . 
Alternatively, he or she directs those petitioners who appear continuously to the households of individuals who are faithful and where, due to the extensive wealth , charitable acts are carried out on a daily basis. 
Having gone to those places where acts of generosity are being practiced and merit is being generated, he or she is skillful, dispels any laziness, and is ready to act. 
Having gladdened the mind, he or she goes to work physically and verbally, as much as he or she is able and with all his or her strength, and makes sure that the gifts to those petitioners are well presented. 
This is the manner in which a bodhisattva who does not possess and has not obtained wealth becomes a practitioner of wise generosity, for as long as he or she has not attained purity of mental disposition. 
However, a bodhisattva whose attitude has become pure attains inexhaustible wealth in rebirth after rebirth, just as he or she transcends having to be born in the lower realms. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva does not give the Dharma to a heretic who is looking for flaws , either through verbal instruction or in the form of a book. 
Nor does he or she give a book to a person of an acquisitive nature who desires to sell it or desires to collect it, but does not seek it for knowledge. 
On the other hand, if the individual is seeking knowledge and no longer has any need of the book, then he or she may give it to as he or she sees fit. 
If has not yet completed the purpose for which the book was acquired, then, after locating another copy or causing one to be copied, he or she should give that one . 
“I hope that my mind has not been overcome by the impurity of stinginess concerning the Dharma. 
I hope that I do not have a deeply held desire not to give a written form of the Dharma.” If upon making such an examination, he or she realizes, “I have engaged in the impurity of stinginess concerning the Dharma to some extent,” then that gift of Dharma should be made, after having formulated his or her mind in the following manner: 
“Even if this gift of Dharma should cause me to be ignorant in this life, I shall make this gift of Dharma in a manner that refuses to embrace a mental affliction, let alone if it causes me to be deficient in the wisdom accumulation.” On the other hand, if upon making such an examination, he or she realizes, “I have not engaged in the impurity of stinginess concerning the Dharma to the slightest extent,” then the bodhisattva should clearly recognize the following: 
“I ought to make a gift of Dharma either to overcome my own mental afflictions, or to perfect the accumulation of wisdom, or out of affection for sentient beings. 
I do not see that I have any mental affliction . 
Further, I do see that, by not making this gift, an extensive accumulation of wisdom both in this life and in future ones. 
by making such a gift, this will not occur and a meager amount in future lives for the purpose of obtaining an abundance of Dharma.648 Moreover, if I do not make this gift, I can accumulate wisdom for the happiness and benefit of all sentient beings and I can also show kindness to this one individual and to all other sentient beings as well. 
But if I make this gift, I can only show kindness to this single individual.” If the bodhisattva refuses to give after having correctly gained this understanding, he or she remains free of any objectionable act, free of remorse, and does not violate the bodhisattva conduct. 
Now then, a bodhisattva is incapable of rejecting a petitioner by saying in a harsh manner, “I shall not give you a gift.” Rather, using skillful means, he or she should assuage before sending him or her away. 
Regarding this , the following represents skillful means. 
A bodhisattva has from the outset dedicated and entrusted, with a pure attitude, all his or her possessions and objects suitable for practicing charity to the buddhas and bodhisattvas throughout the ten directions, in the same way that a fully ordained monastic dedicates his or her robes to a teacher or preceptor. 
Because of this dedication, even though may have obtained an extensive and varied quantity of possessions and objects that are suitable for practicing charity, he or she is referred to as “a bodhisattva who abides in the ārya lineage.”649 He or she becomes one who brings forth an immeasurable amount of merit. 
He or she keeps those objects that are suitable for practicing charity as if they had been entrusted to him or her by the buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
If sees a petitioner and also sees that the granting of a charitable gift in the manner desires is suitable for this , he or she then fulfills the desire of the petitioner, after reflecting, “There is nothing whatsoever that the buddhas and bodhisattvas would not give to sentient beings.” If perceives that would be unsuitable, then, relying on that very determination,650 he or she sends away that after having assuaged him or her by declaring in a gentle voice, “Good person, that belongs to another. 
I am not authorized to give it .” Alternatively, gives a different object that is two or three times greater in value than the one asked for, and then, after showing him or her respect and honor by making that gift, sends away in such a way that realizes, “This bodhisattva was not unwilling to give due to his being of an avaricious nature. 
Rather, the reason that he did not make a gift was certainly because he did not have the authority to do so with regard to this gift of the Dharma in the form of a book.” This should also be understood as a bodhisattva’s wise form of generosity in relation to a gift of the Dharma. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva maintains an attitude of loving-kindness when practicing generosity toward beings who engage in harmful activities; he or she maintains a compassionate attitude toward beings who are experiencing suffering; he or she maintains a joyful attitude toward beings who possess virtuous qualities; he or she maintains an attitude of equanimity toward benefactors, friends, and close associates. 
This too should be understood as a bodhisattva’s wise form of generosity. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva correctly understands both the conditions that obstruct generosity and the antidotes to the conditions that obstruct generosity. 
“The reason that a bodhisattva’s mind does not move toward generosity even though he or she has objects that are suitable for giving and a petitioner is present is that he or she has not cultivated this practice. 
“It is certain that I did not practice generosity in the past regularly and this is why, even though I currently have objects that are suitable for giving and a petitioner has approached in a proper manner, my mind does not move toward generosity. 
If, after having made this analysis I should fail to make a gift at this time, then in the future I shall continue to be ill-disposed to generosity.” Having made these observations, relied on the antidote to this obstruction to generosity, and completed this analysis, makes a gift. 
He or she does not continue to adhere to the fault of failing to cultivate the practice and does not remain subject to this . 
Moreover, should, by means of wisdom, very quickly make the observation that, if a bodhisattva’s mind does not move toward generosity when a petitioner has correctly approached, due to having a limited amount of wealth, this is a consequence of adversity653 and a cause that obstructs the practice of generosity. 
Having accepted and analyzed this suffering that is a consequence of adversity, motivated by compassion, makes a gift and reflects in the following manner: 
“Either because of former karmic offenses or because of having been subject to the control of others, I have experienced many great forms of suffering, such as hunger, thirst, and the like, in existence, without my having provided any benefit to others. 
Even if this generosity were to cause me suffering in this life that leads to my death, it would still be better for me to make a gift rather than turn away this petitioner. 
This is especially true since an individual can survive by leafy vegetables.” Accepting in this way the suffering that is a consequence of adversity, a bodhisattva makes a gift. 
Moreover, should, by means of wisdom, very quickly make the observation that, if a bodhisattva’s mind does not move toward generosity when a petitioner has correctly approached, because of the great attractiveness and excellence of the object to be given, this represents for that bodhisattva a fault that is a consequence of greed. 
He or she should reflect, “This erroneous conception in which I regard what is suffering as a state of well-being654 is one that will produce suffering for me in the future.” Through realizing that it is an error, abandons . 
Moreover, should, by means of wisdom, very quickly make the observation that if a bodhisattva, after having made a gift, develops the view that the benefit of generosity is the result of great wealth and not that it is unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, this represents for that bodhisattva a fault that derives from a view that values the wrong result. 
Regarding all conditioned entities as perishing with each moment and the enjoyments that are their results as both perishable through being lost and perishable through our having to be separated from them,655 abandons the view that values result and then dedicates everything that he or she may give to great enlightenment. 
These should be understood as the four types of knowledge that constitute the antidote for the four types of obstacle that obstruct a bodhisattva’s practice of generosity. 
Regarding this , on the basis of the first three of these corrective forms of knowledge, a bodhisattva practices generosity correctly and with conviction. 
On the basis of the last form of corrective knowledge, he or she develops a correct understanding of the result of merit. 
These, too, should be understood as a bodhisattva’s wise form of generosity. 
Moreover, having gone to a secluded place, a bodhisattva fixes inwardly with a pure attitude and a deeply felt sense of goodwill656 and, repeatedly visualizing limitless varieties of extensive objects suitable for giving, he or she generates the wish to give and present them to sentient beings. 
This, too, should be understood as a bodhisattva’s wise form of generosity and one which represents a knowledgeable bodhisattva’s great form of wise generosity. 
In sum, these should be understood as the unique forms of a bodhisattva’s wise generosity that relate to the giving of material objects both by those who possess objects suitable for giving and those who do not possess them, as well as that relate to the giving of Dharma, that relate to informative knowledge, that relate to the superior attitude generosity, that relate to the knowledge that corrects obstructions to generosity, and that relate to the generosity of a superior attitude together with visualizations. 
Similarly, these should also be understood as an extensive presentation of the types of generosity that a bodhisattva practices using all forms of inner and outer objects. 
Regarding this , what is the form of generosity that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out? 
The first form of generosity that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out is that in which one must inflict hardship upon oneself because of possessing only a limited quantity of objects to give and yet one accepts this suffering as one makes an offering to others. 
The second form of generosity that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out is that in which one must overcome one’s attachment to a most excellent and choice object that is suitable for giving—an object that is cherished either because of a natural fondness for it, because of a long-term familiarity with it, or because of its great usefulness—as one makes an offering to others. 
The third form of generosity that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out is that in which one must make an offering to others of objects suitable for giving that were acquired with difficulty. 
What is the generosity of a bodhisattva that is directed everywhere? 
It is that in which a bodhisattva gives his or her own objects that are suitable for giving, or those that have been acquired from others, to his or her dependents— mother, father, children, spouse, male and female servants, workmen, hired persons, friends, advisers,657 near relations, and kinsmen—or that in which to other petitioners. 
This is known as “the generosity that is directed everywhere.” In short, it is a bodhisattva’s that has four aspects.658 Regarding this , what is the generosity of a true spiritual being that is carried out by a bodhisattva who is a true spiritual being?659 The gift that a bodhisattva makes out of faith, respectfully, with his or her own hand, at the appropriate time, and without doing harm to others is of a bodhisattva who is a true spiritual being and it is called “the generosity of a true spiritual being.”660 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s generosity of every form? 
These thirteen forms of generosity that are practiced by a bodhisattva are called “generosity of every form”: 
A bodhisattva here gives food and drink to those distressed persons who want food and drink; vehicles to those who want a vehicle; clothes to those who want clothes; ornaments to those who want ornaments; various household goods and implements to those who want various household goods and implements; fragrances, garlands, and ointments to those who want fragrances, garlands, and ointments; dwellings to those who want dwellings; and lamps to those who want lamps. 
This should be understood as a bodhisattva’s eight forms of generosity that relate to the distressed and what they want. 
In brief, it should be understood that the generosity that brings happiness to sentient beings here and in the next world consists of giving material things,670 giving the Dharma, and giving protection. 
Moreover, with the giving of material things dispels the impurity of stinginess and the impurity of hoarding, and gives that is excellent, clean, and proper. 
Regarding this, it should be understood that the impurity of stinginess is dispelled through renouncing grasping tightly with the mind, and the impurity of hoarding is dispelled through renouncing grasping tightly to possessions. 
Giving protection should be understood as that which is accomplished by providing protection from the fear caused by lions, tigers, predatory marine animals,671 the king, robbers, water, and the like. 
Giving the Dharma consists of teaching the Dharma unerringly, giving proper instruction,672 and causing to take up the precepts of spiritual training. 
All of these nine forms673 combined together constitute a bodhisattva’s generosity that brings happiness to sentient beings here and in the next world. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pure generosity? 
It should be understood as having ten forms. 
Regarding these, what is generosity that is not delayed? 
When a petitioner has appeared, a bodhisattva here makes a gift to him or her quickly and without procrastinating. 
The petitioner should not feel the urgency about receiving that a bodhisattva does in giving it. 
A bodhisattva should not consider any of the following views about generosity to be correct: 
A bodhisattva does not, after repeatedly collecting things over a long period of time, create a store of objects that are suitable for giving and then later make a gift of them all at once. 
Why is that? 
A bodhisattva who possesses objects that are suitable for giving is incapable of turning away a petitioner who has appeared in a proper manner. 
One does not even consider that it would be proper to turn someone away, much less that one should create a store . 
A bodhisattva also does not regard practicing generosity with things that have been stored up to be a greater source of merit, because this is how he or she sees things: 
“If the quantity of objects that are given is the same and the number of petitioners is identical whether they come separately or in a group, why would someone acquire a different quantity of merit if he or she made gifts to them gradually or all at once?” A bodhisattva also regards practicing generosity with things that have been stored up to be morally objectionable and practicing generosity with objects of value as they are obtained to be free of any objection. 
Why is that? 
It is because when the donor who practices generosity with things that have been stored up is asked by petitioners , by initially turning away a hundred petitioners he or she causes them to develop animosity, intolerance, and distrust. 
Therefore, a bodhisattva does not practice generosity with things that have been stored up. 
What is generosity that is free of haughtiness? 
A bodhisattva makes a gift to a petitioner with a humble mind. 
After having made a gift, he or she also does not, because of that gift, conceitedly think, “I am a donor and great patron; no one else is my equal.” What is generosity that is disinterested?675 A bodhisattva does not make a gift that is based upon fame, praise, acclaim, or renown. 
He or she considers fame to be derived from words the imagination, bound to nothing more than sound, and as insignificant as dried-up leaves. 
What is generosity that is free of dejection? 
Before making a gift, a bodhisattva here is happy. During the act of giving, he or she remains glad. After having made a gift, he or she does not feel any remorse. 
Upon hearing of bodhisattvas’ extensive and extremely liberal acts of generosity, he or she does not become timid or disparage himor herself. 
What is generosity that is not meager? 
After careful and repeated consideration, a bodhisattva offers, from the objects that has to give, the food, drink, vehicles, clothing, etc., that are best and most excellent. 
What is generosity that is free of aversion? 
When giving a gift, a bodhisattva is even-minded, impartial, and feels the same compassion toward friends, foes, and neutral persons. 
What is generosity that doesn’t seek anything in return? 
A bodhisattva maintains a compassionate mind and a sympathetic mind when making a gift and does not expect to receive anything back from someone else. 
He or she perceives that humankind desires happiness, is tormented by the fever of craving, is powerless, and is in a natural state of suffering. 
What is generosity that doesn’t seek a maturation? 
A bodhisattva who makes a gift does not expect that in the future gift will ripen into the fruit of excellent wealth or an excellent physical form. 
He or she views all conditioned entities as worthless676 and supreme enlightenment as what is beneficial. 
It is by means of these ten aspects that the generosity of bodhisattvas becomes pure. 
By relying upon the generosity in this way as consisting of these nine aspects and after completing the perfection of generosity, bodhisattvas attain unsurpassed and true enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the ninth chapter, entitled “Generosity.” Summary verses: 
The essence, all-inclusive, Difficult to carry out, directed everywhere, Connected with the qualities of a true spiritual person, Likewise, all of its forms, Relating to what is wanted by those in distress, What brings happiness here and in the next world, And, likewise, that which is pure— These, in brief, are the nine aspects of morality. 
Regarding this , what is the morality of bodhisattvas? 
In brief, it should be understood that the essence of a bodhisattva’s morality is possessed of four qualities. 
What are the four? 
Regarding this , through accepting the morality from another person, a bodhisattva develops abashment677 in relation to others if he or she violates the training. 
Through having an extremely pure attitude toward the moral precepts, a bodhisattva develops shame678 in relation to self if he or she violates the training. 
A bodhisattva remains free of regret through these two causes: remedying any transgressions of the training’s precepts and developing from the very outset a respect for remaining free of any transgressions. 
In this way, by relying on acceptance and doing so with a pure attitude, a bodhisattva generates shame and abashment. 
Through shame and abashment, he or she protects the morality that has been accepted. 
By protecting it, he or she is free of regret. 
Regarding this, the two qualities of accepting from another and having a pure attitude represent the factors that bring forth the two qualities of remedying transgressions and having respect for remaining free of transgressions. 
Regarding them, the three qualities of accepting from another person, having an extremely pure attitude, and taking care to remain free of transgressions should be understood as the ones that prevent a bodhisattva’s morality from being ruined. 
For its part, remedying transgressions should be understood as the countermeasure that restores when it has become marred. 
It should be understood as providing aid to sentient beings, because of its quality of attending to the benefit and happiness of all beings. 
It should be understood as having a great result and a great benefit because it obtains and bestows the result of unsurpassed true enlightenment.681 What is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive morality? 
In brief, the morality of a bodhisattva that pertains to the faction682 that is made up of householders and that pertains to the faction that is made up of those who have gone forth is called “all-inclusive morality.” Moreover, the morality that is observed by the faction that is made up of householders and that is observed by the faction that is made up of those who have gone forth consists in brief of three types: 
Regarding this, the morality of restraint is the acceptance of the discipline of individual liberation,683 which is made up of seven categories: 
the morality of a fully ordained monk, the morality of a fully ordained nun, the morality of a probationary nun, the morality of a novice monk, the morality of a novice nun, the morality of a layman, and the morality of a laywoman. 
These should be understood, in the appropriate manner, as relating either to the faction of beings who are householders or to the faction of beings who have gone forth. 
Regarding this , the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities is whatever virtue a bodhisattva accumulates by body and speech for the sake of enlightenment, following acceptance of the morality discipline. 
All of that , in brief, is called “the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities.” What, then, does that consist of? 
Here a bodhisattva, relying on morality and being firmly established in morality, exerts with regard to learning, reflection, and the meditation that consists of quiescence and insight and delights in solitude. 
Similarly, regularly and at appropriate times, makes respectful verbal salutations, makes obeisance, stands up , and greets with joined palms those who are worthy of being venerated. 
Likewise, one respectfully waits on those very same persons worthy of veneration. 
One cares for those who are sick and attends to their illnesses with compassion. 
Likewise, one expresses approval when an eloquent speech is made. 
One voices genuine praise of persons who possess virtuous qualities. 
Likewise, after developing a mind that is deeply pleased at all the merit of all sentient beings in the ten directions, one rejoices and says so in words. 
Likewise, after pondering all the transgressions , one generates patience toward others. 
Likewise, dedicates all the virtue that has done and not done684 by body, speech, or mind to unsurpassed true enlightenment. 
Regularly and at appropriate times, one makes a variety of correct aspirational prayers685 and all manner of extensive forms of worshipping the Three Jewels. 
One also applies oneself to and initiates effort toward that pertains to virtue, always and continuously. 
One abides in mindfulness in relation to body and speech.686 One keeps watch over the precepts of the training by practicing recollection and vigilance.687 One keeps the doors of one’s faculties guarded, knows moderation with regard to food, strives to remain wakeful during the first and last parts of the night,688 serves true spiritual beings,689 and relies upon spiritual teachers.690 One is aware of one’s own mistakes and sees them as faults.691 Having realized and seen , one rejects them. 
Having erred, one also confesses violations in the presence of the buddhas, bodhisattvas, and followers of the same form of Dharma.692 The morality in order to gain, preserve, and increase these kinds of virtuous entities is called a bodhisattva’s “morality of acquiring virtuous qualities.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s morality that acts on behalf of beings? 
In brief, it should be understood as having eleven forms. 
What are the eleven forms? 
How does a bodhisattva who is abiding in the morality of restraint, abiding in the morality of acquiring virtue, and abiding in the morality of acting on behalf of beings become one whose conduct is well restrained, one whose conduct acquires virtue effectively, and one whose conduct addresses every aspect of acting on behalf of sentient beings? 
If a bodhisattva who is established here in the discipline of individual liberation were to renounce the kingdom of a wheel ruler to become one who has gone forth , he or she would have the same lack of interest in that wheel ruler’s kingdom as he or she has toward straw or excrement. 
A person of low social standing who abandons insignificant forms of pleasure and goes forth with the aim of a means of livelihood does not have a lack of interest in those insignificant pleasures that is equal to that a bodhisattva who has gone forth motivated by a pure attitude feels toward the most excellent of all human forms of pleasure, the pleasures a wheel ruler. 
A bodhisattva also does not harbor any desire for future pleasures, not even those that are found in Māra’s domain,697 let alone those of any other divine realm. 
Nor does he or she engage in a pure spiritual life698 through having resolved to attain , he or she perceives those pleasures as they truly are— like an entrance leading into a dense forest filled with many kinds of great dangers. 
With regard to the present, a bodhisattva who has gone forth sees by means of his or her right wisdom that even great forms of gain and honor received from exalted beings are like vomited food and does not relish them, much less those insignificant forms received from beings of low standing. 
When in the midst of the Sangha, he or she maintains an isolated mind699 at all times. 
He or she is not satisfied just with practicing restraint as a form of morality. 
Relying on and established in that morality, he or she strives to develop and attain mastery of the bodhisattvas’ limitless forms of one-pointed concentration. 
When associating with others, he or she does not indulge in even the slightest form of wrongful conversation or wrongful speech. 
When in a place of solitude, he or she does not indulge in even the slightest form of wrongful deliberation.700 Regularly and at appropriate times, one generates strong regret at having engaged in those conduct due to clouded recollection701 and recognizes the disadvantages . 
Through having repeatedly generated regret and having considered its disadvantages, recollection becomes established very quickly, as soon as any form of wrongful conversation or wrongful deliberation occurs. 
One also develops the thought that wants to avoid committing and constitutes the means by which one draws back . 
Through cultivating drawing back , one gradually comes to abide delights in the avoidance of that conduct and becomes averse to that conduct to the same degree that one previously took pleasure in it. 
Upon hearing about all the bodhisattva precepts that are observed by bodhisattvas who have attained the great stages, one does not become frightened, diffident, or timid vast, unlimited, and inconceivable, or that they must be practiced for long periods of time and they are extremely difficult to carry out. 
One reflects in this very manner: 
“The ones who have trained themselves gradually in the bodhisattva trainings and who have developed restraint by possessing the physical and verbal discipline that is unlimited and inconceivable did so as human beings. 
I, too, am a human being and, by gradually training myself, I shall also without doubt attain success in that physical and verbal discipline.” A bodhisattva also is one who becomes established in the moral discipline by examining his or her own faults and inner failings, not by examining the faults and inner failings of others. 
He or she does not develop animosity or hatred toward any sentient beings who are violent and engage in wrongful conduct. 
Relying upon a form of great compassion that is entities,702 he or she develops a bodhisattva’s especially strong sympathy toward such beings and a desire to act . 
The bodhisattva who is established in the morality of restraint does not even become angry with others when struck with a hand, a lump of earth, a stick, or a weapon, much less does he or she utter evil speech or return the blow. 
This is all the more true when he or she experiences the mistreatment of being reprimanded with angry verbal abuse that causes only minor suffering. 
The bodhisattva who is established in the morality of restraint also becomes endowed with a mindfulness703 consisting of five limbs: 
one that relates to the past, one that relates to the future, one that relates to the present, one that should be cultivated in advance, and one that is practiced concurrently. 
A bodhisattva who is practicing the bodhisattva trainings and who has incurred an offense in relation to the past remedies that in accordance with the Dharma.704 This is mindfulness that relates to the past. 
Whatever offense may be incurred in the future, he or she also determines to remedy that in accordance with the Dharma. This is mindfulness that relates to the future. 
Whatever offense is incurred in the present, he or she remedies that in accordance with the Dharma. This is mindfulness that relates to the present. 
A bodhisattva develops an intensely zealous attitude prior to an offense , “May I conduct myself and maintain myself in whatever way will insure that I can avoid committing any offense.” This is a bodhisattva’s mindfulness that should be cultivated in advance. 
A bodhisattva who is established in the morality of restraint conceals his or her virtue, exposes his or her evil, has few wants, is satisfied with what he or she has, endures suffering, is indefatigable, does not become excited, is unwavering and calm in his or her physical behavior, and avoids all the qualities that lead to hypocrisy and the other forms of wrong livelihood.705 A bodhisattva who is established in the morality of restraint and who is also endowed with ten qualities becomes one whose conduct is well restrained: 
Furthermore, a bodhisattva who is established in the morality that acquires virtuous qualities does not tolerate the occurrence of even a small amount of regard for his or her body and possessions, much less a great amount. 
He or she does not tolerate the occurrence of any of the root or secondary mental afflictions, such as anger, resentment, etc., that constitute the primary cause of all forms of immoral conduct. 
He or she does not tolerate the occurrence of any feelings of animosity, hatred, or hostility toward others. 
He or she does not tolerate the occurrence of idleness or laziness. 
He or she does not tolerate the relishing of the states of composure that may occur or the mental afflictions that with the states of composure. 
also correctly learns five subjects. 
He or she correctly learns the benefits706 that result from virtue. 
He or she correctly learns the causes of virtue, what is erring and unerring about the results of virtuous causes, and the obstacles to acquiring virtue. 
Recognizing the benefits that result from virtue, a bodhisattva seeks the causes of virtue. 
Correctly knowing what is erring and unerring about acquiring virtue, a bodhisattva who has attained a result of virtue does not regard what is impermanent as permanent, does not regard what is suffering as a form of well-being, does not regard what is impure as pure, and does not regard what does not constitute a self as constituting a self. 
Knowing the obstacles to acquiring virtue, he or she abandons them. 
With these ten qualities, who is established in the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities quickly becomes one who acquires virtue, and one who acquires of every form. 
That is to say, by means of the foundation707 of generosity, by means of the foundation of morality, by means of the foundation of patience, by means of the foundation of effort, by means of the foundation of meditative absorption, and by means of the five forms of wisdom.708 Moreover, a bodhisattva who is established in all eleven aspects of the morality that acts on behalf of sentient beings possesses each individual aspect in a manner that includes all of the forms. 
Here a bodhisattva who assists beings with their activities assists them in considering what ought to be done709 and in making determinations about what ought to be done.710 He or she also assists with regard to leaving on and returning from journeys, carrying out right occupations,711 safeguarding possessions, reconciling those who are estranged from one another, religious celebrations,712 and meritorious deeds. 
He or she dispels the suffering caused by the perturbation of desire for sensory pleasures that is possessed by those who suffer from the perturbation of desire for sensory pleasures. 
He or she dispels the perturbations of malice, torpor, sleep, excitation, regret, and doubt that are possessed by those who suffer from any of those perturbations.714 He or she dispels the deliberation about sensory pleasures that is engaged in by those who are suffering from the perturbation of deliberation about sensory pleasures. 
Just as with deliberation about sensory pleasures, the same should be understood with regard to deliberation about malice, harmfulness, family relatives, one’s homeland, the unlikeliness of one’s death, contempt , and arrogance because of family. 
He or she dispels the suffering of having been defeated and humiliated by others that is felt by those who are experiencing the suffering of having been defeated and humiliated by others. 
He or she dispels the suffering of weariness and fatigue that is felt by those who are worn out from travel by providing them with a seat and a place to stay and by massaging their limbs. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who indicates to sentient beings what is proper teaches the Dharma to those beings who engage in wrongful conduct so that they will abandon that wrongful conduct, using words and syllables that are correct, fitting, conformable, appropriate, effective, agreeable, favorable, and that draw together the elements of diligent practice. 
Put another way, he or she displays skillful means. 
Just as he or she toward those sentient beings who engage in wrongful conduct so that they will abandon that wrongful conduct, similarly he or she toward stingy sentient beings so that they will abandon their stinginess and so that they can acquire and safeguard their wealth in this life, in a correct manner and with little difficulty. 
He or she toward those who are hostile to this teaching so that they will gain faith in it, so that they will develop a view,715 so that with a pure view they will transcend the lower realms, and so that by putting an end to all the fetters716 they will transcend all suffering. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva shows gratitude toward those who have benefited him or her. 
After seeing them and receiving them hospitably, he or she addresses them, converses with them in a familiar manner, and greets them by saying, “Welcome, please draw near.” He or she also receives them by offering a seat and a place to stay. 
He or she waits upon them by returning an equal or greater form of gain or honor than what was received from them; but does not return a lesser form. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva protects sentient beings who are frightened from the objects that they fear. 
He or she protects sentient beings from the fear of vicious wild beasts, as well as the fear of whirlpools and predatory marine animals, the fear of the king, the fear of robbers, the fear of adversaries, the fear of lords717 and rulers,718 the fear of loss of livelihood, the fear of bad reputation, the fear being timid in an assembly, and the fear of spirits and demons .719 Moreover, a bodhisattva dispels the sorrow of sentient beings who are in states of distress. 
He or she also dispels the sorrow that arises due to the death of a son or daughter as well as due to the death of a female or male servant, a worker, or a hired person; due to the death of friends, advisers, near relations, and kinsmen; and due to the death of a teacher, a preceptor, or any other venerable person. 
may also be stolen by robbers, destroyed by fire, swept away by water, or ruined by having been stored improperly. 
It may be lost due to having carried out an occupation badly720 or it may be appropriated by dishonest heirs.721 Or an irresponsible family member722 may appear in the family. 
A bodhisattva correctly dispels the lesser, moderate, or great forms of sorrow that sentient beings experience due to the distress created by any of these types of misfortune. 
A bodhisattva who furnishes the objects that are needed for subsistence to those who seek such objects gives food to those who seek food; drinks to those who seek drinks; vehicles to those who seek vehicles; clothing to those who seek clothing; ornaments to those who seek ornaments; implements and utensils to those who seek implements and utensils; fragrances, garlands, and ointments to those who seek fragrances, garlands, and ointments; and dwellings to those who seek a dwelling. 
He or she gives lamps to those who seek lamps. 
Moreover, employing the morality of embracing,723 a bodhisattva who is practicing embracing through the act of leading a body of practitioners initially provides a dwelling place, with a mind that is free of desire for any material gain and having initially formed a mind that is motivated exclusively by compassion. 
Following that, in a manner that conforms with the Dharma, one seeks on their behalf robes, food, bedding, seats, medicine for curing the ill, and the other personal belongings from those brahmins and householders who possess faith . 
One also shares one’s own robes, food, bedding, seats, medicine for curing the ill, and the other personal belongings that are in keeping with the Dharma and were obtained in a manner that accords with the Dharma; one does not keep them for private use. 
Regularly and at appropriate times, one also bestows the orderly instruction that has eight aspects and correctly teaches discipline using the counsel that has five aspects. 
Instruction and counsel should be understood here in the same way that they were explained in the chapter on the spiritual lineages of the powers.724 Moreover, employing the morality of compliance, a bodhisattva who is complying with the minds of sentient beings at the very outset makes himor herself aware of the attitude, fundamental nature, and constituent element of sentient beings. 
Having become aware of their attitude, fundamental nature, and constituent element, one associates with them in whatever man ner one ought to associate with them. 
One conducts oneself in relation to those sentient beings in whatever manner one ought to conduct oneself. 
If a bodhisattva who wishes to comply with the mind of a particular sentient being sees that a certain type of physical or verbal conduct of some significance will cause that to develop suffering or unhappiness of mind and he or she that that suffering or unhappiness of mind will not serve to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and cause to become established in opportunities virtuous , then, after consideration, a bodhisattva diligently abandons that significant form of physical or verbal conduct and does not engage in it. 
On the other hand, if a bodhisattva sees that that suffering or unhappiness of mind that away from opportunities nonvirtuous and cause to become established in opportunities virtuous , then, after consideration, generates compassion toward that other and does not comply with mind. 
If a certain type of physical or verbal conduct of some significance in relation to one individual should give rise to suffering or unhappiness of mind in a second individual and that does not serve to turn either of those individuals away from opportunities nonvirtuous and cause to become established in opportunities virtuous , then, after consideration, a bodhisattva abandons that physical or verbal conduct in order to preserve the opinion of the second individual . 
On the other hand, if he or she sees that either of those individuals or both would be turned away from opportunities nonvirtuous and caused to become established in opportunities virtuous , after consideration a bodhisattva engages in that physical or verbal conduct. 
After generating a compassionate attitude, he or she does not comply with the minds of those sentient beings. 
If a bodhisattva perceives that his or her particular physical or verbal conduct of some significance would give rise to suffering or unhappiness of mind in others and this physical or verbal conduct is neither included among the precepts of training nor constitutes a form of the merit or wisdom accumulations, and that suffering or unhappiness of mind also does not serve to turn others away from opportunities nonvirtuous actions, etc., as described above, then a bodhisattva avoids that physical or verbal conduct in order to preserve the opinion of others. 
In the opposite circumstances, conduct should be understood as described above.725 Just as with the suffering or unhappiness of mind , a similar explanation should be understood to apply in detail and according to circumstances for the pleasure or happiness of mind .726 A bodhisattva who complies with the minds of others does not even express praise directly to another who is perturbed by the perturbation of anger, as long as the perturbation of anger has not disappeared, much less does he criticize . 
also does not offer an apology . 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who complies with the minds of others addresses and greets another person even if that person does not address him or her. 
This is all the more true if that person does address and greet him or her. 
A bodhisattva who complies with the minds of others does not upset , except in a situation where he or she wishes to reproach someone. 
Then he or she reproaches those with a sense of compassion and with the faculties composed. 
A bodhisattva who complies with the minds of others does not ridicule or show contempt toward another , or cause him or her to feel embarrassed. 
also does not cause to develop regret in order to make feel unhappy. 
He or she also does not make known his or her own success to someone who has fallen into low circumstances. 
A bodhisattva who complies with the minds of others neither avoids the company of others nor keeps company with them to an excessive degree. 
He or she also does not criticize the friends or praise the adversaries of others in their presence. 
He or she does not repeatedly solicit . 
He or she shows moderation when accepting gifts. 
Moreover, employing the morality of encouraging based on the good qualities that they genuinely possess, a bodhisattva encourages sentient beings. 
He or she encourages those who possess the quality of faith by commenting about that quality of faith. 
Moreover, employing the morality of suppression, a bodhisattva suppresses sentient beings . 
With an attitude that is inwardly affectionate and free of distress, he or she censures a lesser offense and lesser transgression727 with a mild reprimand. 
He or she censures an intermediate offense and intermediate transgression with a moderate reprimand, and a great offense and great transgression with a severe reprimand. 
Just as with reprimands, a similar should be understood for punishments. 
For lesser and intermediate offenses and lesser and intermediate transgressions, a bodhisattva expels as a temporary measure and with the intention of allowing him or her to return. 
for the purpose of correcting those very as well as others, and it is carried out with a compassionate mind and with the intention of benefiting . 
For great offenses and great transgressions, expels without allowing him or her to associate or partake of again and without allowing him or her to be readmitted for the remainder of his or her lifetime. 
with compassion toward those very so that they will not continue to acquire any more nonmeritorious karma in relation to the teaching and with the desire to benefit others as well, by serving as instruction for them. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who is desirous of frightening sentient beings and desirous of winning them over by means of miraculous powers repeatedly brings forth and reveals to those beings who engage in misconduct the ripening of that misconduct in the lower realms of the hell regions, the great hells, the cold hells, and the partial hells.728 He or she tells them, “Honorable ones, look at this violent, extremely severe, and undesirable ripening result that is being experienced by human beings who carried out and accumulated misdeeds.” Upon seeing this, these beings become frightened, develop apprehension, and refrain from misconduct. 
A bodhisattva frightens and terrifies such beings by emanating himor herself as Vajrapāṇi or some other powerful spirit that is imposing in appearance, has a large body, and great power. 
so that, because of this , he or she can cause those who have been made to develop faith, a high degree of esteem, and respect to answer his or her questions correctly, and so that, by means of those responses, he or she might impose spiritual self-discipline upon that large body of beings. 
Alternatively, by means of a variety of magical creations—such as turning one into many; turning many back into one; traveling with an unobstructed body directly through a wall, directly through a mountain, directly through a rampart, etc.; up to gaining control with his or her body as far as Brahmā’s realm; displaying multiple forms of the twin marvelous feats;731 entering the state of mental absorption in which he or she concentrates on the fire element; or displaying the miraculous powers that are held in common with listeners—he or she wins over by pleasing and delighting them, and then causes those who lack faith to develop faith, those who are immoral to develop morality, those with little learning to develop learning, those who are stingy to develop generosity, and those of weak intelligence to develop wisdom. 
In this way, a bodhisattva becomes one who possesses, in all its aspects, the morality that acts on behalf of sentient beings. 
These are a bodhisattva’s three heaps of morality that represent immeasurable heaps of merit. 
They are the heap of morality that consists of the morality of restraint, that consists of the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities, and that consists of the morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings. 
Regarding this , whether he or she is a householder or one who has gone forth , a bodhisattva who wishes to train himor herself in the bodhisattva training that relates to this threefold heap of morality and who has generated the aspiration to achieve unsurpassed true enlightenment should initially throw himor herself at the feet of a bodhisattva who is an exemplary Dharma follower732 and who has made the aspiration , is wise, and is able to convey the meaning of the verbal informative form,733 and make the following entreaty: 
“O son of good family” ,734 “I wish to receive from you the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality. 
If it causes no trouble, may it please you, in your compassion, to hear me for a brief moment.” Following this, the bodhisattva who is capable should describe at length the benefits of the bodhisattva discipline735 to the bodhisattva who is desirous of receiving it. 
You should generate a firm attitude and a firm determination regarding this.” This should be said to those who are recognized to be unaware of these points in order to cause them to develop enthusiasm.737 After having properly made the above request, the individual desirous should place his or her upper garment on his or her shoulder and make salutation to the buddhas, the blessed ones, of the past, present, and future, as well as to those bodhisattvas of the ten directions who have reached the great stages and attained great knowledge and powers. 
He or she should also clearly bring to mind their spiritual qualities and generate a deeply felt reverence, or one that is more limited in form, to the utmost of one’s ability and strength. 
Having made reverential salutation before an image of the Tathāgata that had been set up, should place his or her knee on the ground or sit in a squatting position and humbly738 address the knowledgeable bodhisattva with the following words: 
“O son of good family ,”739 or “O long-lived one,”740 or “O venerable one,”741 “please bestow upon me the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality.” Having spoken these words, should fix his or her recollection one-pointedly and, with a state of mind that steadily becomes ever more reverential, remain silent while reflecting on the following thought: 
“Before long now, I shall gain an inexhaustible, immeasurable, and unsurpassed treasure of great merit.” Then, while standing or sitting and with an undistracted mind, the knowledgeable bodhisattva should address the bodhisattva who has spoken in this way as follows: 
“Hear me, O son of good family,” or “ O Dharma brother,” who is named so-and-so.” “Are you a bodhisattva and have you made the aspiration to enlightenment?” should then affirm, “Yes, it is so.”742 Following that, should state the following: 
“O son of good family who is named so-and-so , do you accept from me all of the bodhisattva precepts and all of the bodhisattva morality— the morality of restraint, the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities, and the morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings—those precepts and that morality which have been observed by all the bodhisattvas of the past, those precepts and that morality which shall be observed by all the bodhisattvas of the future, and those precepts and that morality which currently are being observed by all the bodhisattvas of the present throughout the ten directions, those precepts and that morality with regard to which all the bodhisattvas of the past have trained themselves, with regard to which all the bodhisattvas of the future shall train themselves, and with regard to which all the bodhisattvas of the present are training themselves?” should then affirm, “I do accept it all.” The knowledgeable bodhisattva should make this statement in the same way a second and a third time. 
The bodhisattva who is accepting should also, upon being asked, answer in the affirmative three times. 
After the knowledgeable bodhisattva has conferred the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality upon the recipient bodhisattva three times and its affirmation has also been accepted , and without the recipient bodhisattva rising up , should, in front of the very same image of the Tathāgata as before, throw himor herself at the feet of all the buddhas and bodhisattvas who exist, remain, and live throughout the ten directions and, after performing a respectful salutation, make the following announcement: 
“The bodhisattva named so-and-so has acknowledged three times that he or she accepts the discipline of bodhisattva morality from me, the bodhisattva named so-and-so. 
I, the bodhisattva named so-and-so, am a witness to this acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality by this bodhisattva named so-and-so, and I announce it to the supreme āryas in the endless and unlimited world spheres that lie in the ten directions who, though beyond our range of vision, possess an awareness whose range of vision perceives all sentient beings everywhere.” should make this declaration in the same way a second and a third time. 
It is also a fact of nature that immediately following the rite of accepting the discipline of morality, a particular type of sign743 will become evident to the tathāgatas and the bodhisattvas who have achieved the great stages and who exist, remain, and live in the endless and unlimited world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
“A bodhisattva has taken up the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality.” And immediately thereafter, their attention will turn toward that bodhisattva. 
And with that attention, their knowledge-perception744 will take effect. 
By means of this knowledge-perception, those become fully aware, in accordance with reality, that a bodhisattva named so-and-so in this particular world sphere has received the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality from another bodhisattva named so-and-so. 
And, with favorable minds, they will all react compassionately toward him or her, as one would a son or daughter or a brother or sister. 
It should be expected that the virtuous qualities of the bodhisattva who is looked upon in this way with a favorable mind and sympathy will increase greatly and they will not decline. 
Once the rite for accepting the discipline of bodhisattva morality has been completed, both of the bodhisattvas745 should perform a respectful salutation to, and fall at the feet of, the buddhas and bodhisattvas of the endless and unlimited world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
This acceptance by a bodhisattva of the discipline of morality is the most distinguished among all the forms of accepting a moral discipline. 
It is unsurpassed, it is accompanied by an immeasurable heap of merit, it is generated by a supreme mental attitude, and it is the antidote to every form of misdeed that relates to all sentient beings. 
All the acceptances of the discipline of individual liberation746 do not reach a hundredth part of this acceptance of a moral discipline, nor do they even reach a thousandth part. 
Moreover, the bodhisattva who is abiding in the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality should continually examine “This is proper for a bodhisattva to do. 
He or she should also diligently study either the collection of bodhisattva sutras or this composition that represents a manual747 for the collection of bodhisattva sutras in order to carry out a training that practices in accordance with the many thousands of precepts for bodhisattvas that the Blessed One taught in those scriptures.748 In addition, the acceptance of this moral discipline should not be received from all bodhisattvas, even though they may be knowledgeable. 
A bodhisattva should not receive it from someone who lacks faith—, from someone who, from the outset, feels no devotion toward the acceptance of this form of moral discipline, does not take up its practice, and does not accommodate himor herself to it in a well-regulated manner. 
Nor from someone who is greedy, who is overcome by attachment, whose desires are great, or who is not satisfied with what he or she has; nor from someone whose morality is ruined, who has no regard for the trainings, or who is lax; nor from someone who is inclined to anger, who is resentful, who is highly impatient, or who is intolerant of others’ transgressions; nor from someone who is slothful, who is lazy, who indulges excessively in the enjoyment of sleep during the day and night, the enjoyment of leaning on one’s side, and the enjoyment of lying down, or who spends his or her time socializing with others; nor from someone whose mind is easily distracted and cannot meditate one-pointedly on a virtuous object even for the length of time it takes to a milk a cow; nor from someone who is dull-witted, who is of a confused nature, whose mind is excessively languid, or who disparages the collection of bodhisattva sutras and the manuals the collection of bodhisattva sutras. 
A bodhisattva who has taken up and fully understood this ritual for accepting the discipline also should not, because of a failure to exercise due caution, declare and make it known to those beings who are hostile toward, and lack faith in, the bodhisattva collection. 
Why is that? 
It is because upon hearing about it, those who feel no devotion and who are greatly obscured by the obscurations to that which needs to be known will be led to speak ill of it. 
Moreover, one who speaks ill of it will remain bound fast to an immeasurable heap of wickedness that is commensurate with the immeasurable heap of merit that is possessed by the bodhisattva who is abiding in the discipline until he or she completely and entirely abandons that evil speech, that evil view, and that evil notion. 
Moreover, the precepts of the training and the occasions for transgressions that are set forth in this manual for the bodhisattva collection should be made known beforehand to the bodhisattva who wishes to undertake the acceptance of the moral discipline. 
If, he or she is eager after having earnestly examined , and after having considered them carefully749 with his or her wisdom, rather than at the instigation of others or out of rivalry with others,750 then should be known as a resolute bodhisattva. 
There are four acts that represent an extreme form of defeat751 for the bodhisattva who is abiding in the moral discipline in the manner . 
What are the four? 
Praising oneself and disparaging others by one who is attached to gain and honor is an act that represents an extreme form of defeat for a bodhisattva. 
The refusal to give material objects, because of a greedy nature and hardheartedness, to petitioners who have approached in a correct manner, who are suffering, miserable, and impoverished, and who lack a protector and someone to rely upon, even though one has and possesses wealth, and the refusal to share Dharma teachings with those who seek them and who have approached in a proper manner, because of one’s stinginess about the Dharma, are acts that represent an extreme form of defeat for a bodhisattva. 
The perturbation of anger can be of a kind that a bodhisattva will cause to become stronger and, therefore, it will not come to an end merely by uttering harsh speech. 
who has been overcome by anger may strike, harm, or cause injury to sentient beings with hand, a clod of earth, a club, or a weapon. 
Furthermore, by harboring this attitude of anger in a strong form, may not accept and forgive an acknowledgment of wrongdoing made by others, and he or she may fail to let go of that attitude . 
Disparaging the bodhisattva collection and taking pleasure in, teaching, or establishing counterfeit forms of Dharma by one who is firmly devoted to a counterfeit Dharma either on his or her own or in imitation of others, is an act that represents an extreme form of defeat for a bodhisattva. 
These are the four acts that represent an extreme form of defeat. 
A bodhisattva who commits any one of these, let alone all of them, will not be able to collect and attain, within that lifetime, an extensive amount of the bodhisattva accumulations. 
He or she also will not be able to develop the purity of attitude752 within that lifetime. 
He or she is a counterfeit bodhisattva, not a genuine one. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva does not lose the acceptance of the moral discipline these four acts that represent an extreme form of defeat on the basis of a lesser or middling perturbation. 
When a bodhisattva does not develop even a small amount of shame and abashment because he or she has engaged continually in these four acts that represent an extreme form of defeat and, due to that , he or she is both pleased with and delights in , and he or she looks upon that very as a good quality, this should be understood as constituting a great perturbation.753 However, a bodhisattva does not immediately lose the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality as soon as he or she has engaged in an act that represents an extreme form of defeat, as, for example, a bhikṣu or bhikṣuṇī does with the discipline of individual liberation by committing acts that constitute an extreme form of defeat.754 Moreover, even if a bodhisattva has lost the acceptance , he or she is still capable of once again receiving the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality in that same life. 
He or she is not incapable , as, for example, a bhikṣu or bhikṣuṇī who has accepted the discipline of individual liberation is when he or she has incurred the extreme forms of defeat. 
In short, there are only two causes that can bring about the abandonment of the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality: 
giving up the aspiration to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and committing an act that represents an extreme form of defeat on the basis of a great perturbation. 
In addition, a bodhisattva who has neither given up the aspiration nor committed any of the extreme forms of defeat on the basis of a great perturbation does not abandon the acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality even after having exchanged his or her life and wherever he or she is reborn—whether a higher , a lower one, or one that is at the same level.755 Even though a bodhisattva whose recollection has been clouded due to having exchanged his or her life may accept repeatedly after coming in contact with a spiritual teacher, he or she does so for the purpose of awakening his or her recollection; this does not constitute a new acceptance . 
Likewise, it should be understood what constitutes an offense and what does not constitute an offense for a bodhisattva who abides in the discipline of bodhisattva morality, as well as what constitutes an afflicted and one that is free of affliction, and what constitutes a lesser, intermediate, or a great . 
A bodhisattva abiding in the discipline of bodhisattva morality who allows a night and day756 to go by without performing on a daily basis the preeminent form of homage, whether small or extensive, to the Tathāgata in the form of a caitya757 that represents the Tathāgata, to the Dharma in the form of a scripture from the bodhisattva sutra collection or a manual on the bodhisattva sutra collection represents the Dharma, or to the Sangha which is made up of the bodhisattvas in the ten directions who have attained the great stages— at least a single prostration with the body; a recitation by speech of at least one verse of four lines describing the virtuous qualities of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha; or at least a single reverence with the mind that is preceded by recollection of the qualities of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha—commits an offense and commits a transgression. 
If occurs out of disrespect , or out of idleness and laziness, acquires an afflicted offense. 
If it occurs because of a lapse of recollection, he or she acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who is mentally disturbed.758 There is no offense for who has attained the stage of a pure attitude. 
That is, a bodhisattva who has attained the purity of attitude is like a bhikṣu or bhikṣuṇī who, after having attained the faith born of insight,759 naturally and at all times serves and honors the Master, the Dharma, and the Sangha with supreme forms of homage. 
A bodhisattva who persists in great desire,760 lack of satisfaction,761 and greediness for gain and honor that have arisen commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense.762 There is no offense for who has developed the aspiration to abandon , and who is making an effort and is committed to resisting them by adopting their antidote but who still repeatedly generates because he or she is naturally overcome by strong mental afflictions. 
If a bodhisattva sees an exemplary Dharma follower who is his or her spiritual elder, someone who is endowed with spiritual qualities and deserving of reverence, but he or she fails to rise up and offer a seat having been seized by pride or he or she is in a hostile or an angry state of mind, or if who is being addressed, spoken to, or greeted by others, or who has been asked a question does not reply with a proper form of verbal response he or she has been seized by pride or he or she is in a hostile or an angry state of mind, then he or she commits an offense and a transgression, and acquires an afflicted offense.763 However, if has not been seized by pride or is not in a hostile or angry state of mind but with a mind that is morally indeterminate764 out of idleness or laziness, or due to a lapse of recollection, then he or she commits an offense and a transgression but does not acquire an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is gravely ill or mentally disturbed. 
There is no offense for who is giving a Dharma teaching to others or who is engaged in settling a discussion. 
There is no offense if is involved in greeting persons other than this individual. 
There is no offense if is listening intently to someone else who is giving a Dharma teaching or who is settling a discussion. 
There is no offense if that serves as a means of disciplining or training others of turning them away from opportunities nonvirtuous and causes them to become established in opportunities virtuous ones. 
A bodhisattva who has been invited by others to a home, to another temple, or to another home for food, drink, clothing, or other material objects but who, having been seized by pride or having developed a hostile mind or an angry mind, does not go and does not accept the invitation commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to go out of idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is unable ill or is mentally disturbed. 
There is no offense if, by means of that , wishes to tame or train , or if wishes to cause him or her to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
There is no offense if is continually engaged in that pertain to virtue and he or she refuses to go in order to avoid having to interrupt that pertain to virtue. 
It should be understood that also applies in the case of settling a discussion in the same way that it does for hearing an important Dharma teaching. 
There is no offense if has been invited by someone who has the intention of causing him or her injury. 
There is no offense if is observing a rule of the Sangha. 
There is no offense for who is mentally disturbed. 
There is no offense if believes that the generosity was given in error. 
There is no offense if believes that the donor is someone who has given up all acquisitiveness, and that, by that will become impoverished and fall into a state of ruin. 
There is no offense if believes that belongs to the Sangha or has been dedicated to a stupa. 
There is no offense if believes that confiscated from someone else, and, because of that, this individual will either be killed, imprisoned, fined, or harm or reproach.767 A bodhisattva who, while in a hostile or angry state of mind, or who, because he or she has been injured by envy,768 does not impart the Dharma to those who seek it commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who does not give due to idleness and laziness commits an offense and a transgression, but does not acquire an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is a heretic769 who is looking flaws . 
There is no offense if, by means of that , wishes to spiritually tame or train the individual , or wishes to cause him or her to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
There is no offense if is not someone who is engaged in the Dharma.770 There is no offense if is someone who would receive it disrespectfully, without showing the proper regard, and would engage in improper physical behavior.771 There is no offense if believes that the teaching of a lofty Dharma instruction to a person of weak faculties and the acquisition772 of a Dharma teaching would frighten him or her and cause him or her to develop wrong views and false beliefs and to suffer injury and harm. 
A bodhisattva who, while in a hostile or angry state of mind, abandons or neglects immoral and violent persons because of their bad conduct or violence commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
If he or she abandons them due to idleness and laziness, or neglects them due to a lapse of recollection, then he or she commits an offense and a transgression, but does not acquire an afflicted offense. 
Why is that? 
It is because a bodhisattva does not feel the same amount of sympathy toward and does not have the same eagerness to act on behalf of moral individuals and those who are subdued in the performance of their physical, verbal, and mental deeds as he or she does toward those who are violent and immoral, and who are engaged in the cause of suffering. 
There is no offense for who is mentally disturbed . 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , etc., as before. 
A bodhisattva trains himor herself in the same way that listeners do and not in any different way with regard to those that the Blessed One established in the moral code of individual liberation as being objectionable by virtue of having been condemned774 based upon preserving the opinion of others in order to engender faith in those who lack it and further increase the faith of those who have already acquired it. 
Why is that? 
The listeners are indeed chiefly occupied with their own aim; yet they train themselves in the moral precepts in such a manner that they do not fail to preserve the opinion of others in order to engender faith in those who lack it and further increase the faith of those who have already acquired it. 
How much more, then, should bodhisattvas , since they are chiefly occupied with the aims of others. 
On the other hand, does not train himor herself in the same way that listeners do with regard to those that the Blessed One established for listeners as being objectionable by virtue of having been condemned based upon the principles of having few concerns,775 engaging in few activities,776 and abiding with few worries.777 Why is that? 
It is becoming for a listener who is completely devoted to his or her own aim and who does not take an interest in the aims of others to be one who, as relates to the aims of others, has few concerns, engages in few activities, and abides with few worries. 
However, it is not becoming for a bodhisattva who is completely devoted to the aims of others to be one who, as relates to the aims of others, has few concerns, engages in few activities, and abides with few worries. 
As with monks’ robes, should do the same for food bowls. 
As with those objects that are sought should also cause to be woven by weavers who are unrelated to him or her using yarn that himor herself has solicited . 
For the sake of others, should also provide a hundred silk beds and a hundred sitting mats. 
He or she should also accept a trillion agra778 of gold and silver. 
A bodhisattva abiding in the bodhisattva morality who trains himor herself with regard to these and other similar matters in the same manner as the listeners—for whom are objectionable by virtue of having been condemned based upon the principles of having few concerns, engaging in few activities, and abiding with few worries— by maintaining few concerns, engaging in few activities, and abiding with few worries as relates to the aims of other beings while in a hostile or angry state of mind commits an offense and commits a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who maintains few concerns, engages in few activities, and abides with few worries due to idleness and laziness commits an offense and a transgression, acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There are also certain naturally objectionable acts779 such that, when they are performed by a bodhisattva with a particular kind of skillful means, he or she not only remains free of any offense but also generates a great amount of merit. 
An example would be a situation in which a bodhisattva sees a thief or a robber who is intent upon killing many hundreds of living beings—great persons listeners, solitary realizers, or bodhisattvas—for the sake of a small amount of material wealth, someone who is preparing to commit many instances of an immediate misdeed.780 Having seen this, then forms the following thought with his or her mind: 
“Even though I shall have to be reborn in the hells for depriving this living being of his or her life, it is better that I should be reborn in a hell than that this sentient should end up in the hells because of having committed an immediate misdeed.” After a bodhisattva who has had such a thought determines that his or her state of mind toward this living being is either virtuous or indeterminate,781 and after developing a single-minded attitude of sympathy about the future782 while experiencing abhorrence,783 he or she then deprives of his or her life. 
Another example would be a situation in which a bodhisattva men of a royal tribe or a king’s high officials who are highly prone to violence, lacking in compassion toward sentient beings, and wholly devoted to inflicting harm on others. 
If he or she has the authority to do so, a bodhisattva, while maintaining a sympathetic mind and an attitude that wishes to benefit and bring happiness , deprives them of their royal power and the position of authority during whose tenure they generated great demerit. 
Also, thieves and robbers who steal others’ property have stolen the extensive wealth of the Sangha or a stupa and made it their own because they are desirous of enjoying it, he or she confiscates it from them, thinking to himor herself, “Indeed, the enjoyment of wealth must not be allowed to bring harm and disadvantage to these that would last for a very long time!” After confiscating on the basis of this very conviction, returns that which belongs to the Sangha to the Sangha and also that which belongs to a stupa to the stupa. 
Even though, in this manner in situations such as these, a bodhisattva is carrying out taking what was not given, he or she not only remains free of any offense but also generates a great amount of merit. 
Another example would be a situation in which a householder bodhisattva engages in sexual intercourse with a woman who is tormented by the desire not to remain chaste, someone whose mind is fixed on that and who is not married to someone else. 
After having placed his mind exclusively by sympathy and thinking to himself, “Indeed, must not be allowed to generate great demerit through having gained an attitude of hostility. 
May she become a docile wife784 both to the pursuit of whatever roots of virtue she desires and to the abandonment of the roots of nonvirtue,” who does not remain chaste and engages in the act of sexual intercourse not only remains free of any offense but also generates great merit. 
On the other hand, it is never acceptable for a bodhisattva who has gone forth 785 and who is someone who is guarding himself against doing any harm to the teaching of the listeners to violate the chastity. 
Another example would be a situation in which—in order to save the lives of many sentient beings, in order to save from bondage, in order to save from having their hands, feet, noses, or ears cut off, or in order to rescue from being deprived of their eyes—a bodhisattva, after due consideration, utters the false speech that he or she would not deliberately utter even to save his or her own life. 
In short, in those situations where a bodhisattva perceives that it would be wholly in the interest of sentient beings , and he or she perceives that it would not be harmful , and his or her mind is free of any corporeal desire,786 and, after having altered his conception motivated exclusively by a desire to benefit beings, he or she deliberately utters speech that is at variance , he or she remains free of any offense by speaking and also generates great merit. 
Having adopted a completely sympathetic mind, he or she then reflects, “May these beings not have to undergo harm and disadvantage for a very long time because of their association with these evil companions.” A bodhisattva who, in this way, causes a division between friends not only remains free of any offense but also generates great merit. 
Another example would be a situation in which a bodhisattva, using intensely harsh speech, reproaches beings who are pursuing a wrong path and conducting themselves improperly until, by that means, they have been turned away from opportunities nonvirtuous so that they can be established in opportunities virtuous . 
A bodhisattva who utters harsh speech in such a situation not only remains free of any offense but also generates great merit. 
Another example would be a situation in which a bodhisattva who, by a sympathetic state of mind, uses various kinds of dance, song, and music to satisfy and win over beings who are fond of dance, song, and music and who also employs various forms of conversation that are filled with idle talk beings who are fond of talk about such topics as the king, thieves, food, drink, prostitutes, and the street and then, after having brought them to a subdued and docile state, causes them to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and establishes them in opportunities virtuous . 
In this way, even though he or she has engaged in idle talk, a bodhisattva not only remains free of any offense but also generates great merit. 
A bodhisattva who persists in and does not shun those acts of wrong livelihood that he or she previously carried out and had a strong desire to carry out—namely, hypocrisy, flattery, intimation, oppression, and acquiring gain through gifts787—commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who has generated the aspiration and initiated the effort to give them up but who still engages in them because his or her mind has been overwhelmed by an abundance of mental afflictions. 
A bodhisattva whose mind has not been quieted due to being under the control of excitation,788 who delights in lack of calmness, who laughs loudly, plays and is boisterous in the company of others, who openly pursues excitation and diversions, and who likes to make others laugh and likes to please others commits an offense and a transgression for these very reasons, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
because of a lapse of recollection acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who has generated the aspiration to abandon such behavior, etc., as described before. 
There is no offense if he or she is desirous of removing, by means of this , the hostility that has arisen in others. 
There is no offense if he or she is desirous of dispelling, by means of this , the grief that has arisen in others. 
There is no fault if in order to indicate the absence of inner by his or her cheerfulness to those others who believe that the bodhisattva is in a bad mood, or who believe that has developed hostility or antipathy. 
Moreover, any bodhisattva who holds the following view or professes it commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense: 
“A bodhisattva should not abide with that delights in nirvana; rather, he or she should abide with that is turned away from nirvana. 
He or she should not fear the root or secondary mental afflictions, and he or she should not be striving exclusively to separate mind from them, for enlightenment must be pursued by a bodhisattva while remaining in samsara for three spans of time that are each made up of a countless number of kalpas.” Why is that? 
A bodhisattva should engender delight toward nirvana and aversion for the root and secondary mental afflictions that is a trillion times greater than the delight that a listener cultivates toward nirvana and the aversion that develops toward the root and secondary mental afflictions. 
This is because a listener is dedicated to the pursuit of his or her own welfare, but a bodhisattva is dedicated to the welfare of all sentient beings. 
Thus, must attain a state of self-discipline in which mind remains so free of afflictions that, even though not an arhat, he or she can interact with entities that have the potential to cause the outflows to arise in such a manner that the unafflicted state of mind which he or she possesses is even superior to that of an arhat. 
A bodhisattva who does not protect himor herself from and dispel the criticism789 that will cause his or her speech not to be believed and the dishonor and infamy that is based on something that truly occurred commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
does not dispel that is not based on something that truly occurred commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an unafflicted offense.790 There is no offense if is a heretic who is an adversary or someone else791 who is irreconcilably attached . 
There is no offense if the person criticizes because he or she is a homeless ascetic who begs for food or because he or she is someone who engages in virtuous conduct. 
There is no offense if the person is someone who has been overcome by anger or someone whose thoughts are erroneous. 
A bodhisattva who recognizes that some harsh or severe measure would benefit sentient beings but who does not carry it out because of wishing to avoid making them unhappy commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if recognizes that the benefit in their present life would be small and the unhappiness caused by that would be great. 
A bodhisattva who, having been scolded by others, scolds them in return, or who, having been angered , causes them to become angry in return, or who, having been beaten , beats them in return, or who, having been criticized , criticizes them in return792 commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
A bodhisattva who has wronged others or who is believed to have committed a wrong, and who, having developed a hostile mind or having been seized by pride, does not offer a suitable apology and ignores them commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
If fails to offer an apology due to idleness and laziness, or due to lack of mindfulness,793 he or she commits an offense and a transgression, and acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , or if wishes to train by causing them to turn away from opportunities nonvirtuous and become established in opportunities virtuous . 
There is no offense if, desires to receive an apology for an inappropriate and objectionable act that he or she committed. 
There is no offense if is naturally contentious and quarrelsome, and offering an apology would only cause him or her to become more agitated and belligerent. 
There is no offense if the other party is thought to have a forbearing and benign nature and he or she would feel extremely uncomfortable about accepting an apology that relates to his or her having been wronged. 
A bodhisattva who has been offered an apology in a manner that accords with Dharma and that is sincere794 by persons with whom he or she has had an argument concerning some matter but who develops a hostile mind and an injurious intention and does not accept their apology commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
If does not have a hostile mind but refuses to accept due to an impatient disposition, he or she acquires an unafflicted offense.795 There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , etc., as with the rest of the statement that occurs above in its entirety. 
There is no offense if offers an apology in a manner that is contrary to Dharma and that is insincere. 
A bodhisattva who prolongs, maintains, and persists in an attitude of anger that has arisen toward others commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who has developed the aspiration to abandon , etc., as described previously.796 A bodhisattva who gathers a following with an attitude that seeks material reward and because he or she desires to be waited on and served commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for allows himor herself to be waited on and served without harboring an attitude that seeks material reward. 
A bodhisattva who indulges in idleness and laziness that may have arisen, and the ease of sleeping, reclining, and lying on one’s side at an inappropriate time or excessively, commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is gravely ill and unable . 
It should be understood that there is no offense for who has developed the aspiration to abandon , etc., as described previously. 
A bodhisattva who, with an attitude of attachment, spends time socializing with others commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who spends time due to clouded recollection acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if someone else is speaking, and listens for a short time in order to comply with the minds of others and he or she does so with a recollection that has been closely placed.797 There is no offense if the situation is one in which has become astounded by something and is simply making an inquiry about it or if it is one in which is simply replying to a question that has been asked. 
A bodhisattva who is desirous of composing his or her mind in relation to mental stability but who, having developed a hostile mind or having been seized by pride, does not approach and request instruction commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
because of idleness and laziness, then he or she acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is ill and unable . 
There is no offense if is already learned and capable of developing mental composure, or if he or she has already completed what needed to be done by means of that instruction. 
A bodhisattva who persists in and does not dispel the hindrance798 of desire for sense pleasures that has arisen commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who has developed the aspiration to abandon and who is striving but who still generates it because his or her mind has been overcome by strong mental afflictions. 
It should be understood that the same applies for malice, torpor and sleep, excitation and regret, and doubt. 
A bodhisattva who relishes the mental absorptions or who regards doing so as a good quality799 commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who has developed the aspiration to abandon , etc., as described previously. 
Moreover, any bodhisattva who holds the following view or professes it commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense: 
“A bodhisattva should not listen to, take up,800 or train himor herself in any Dharma that pertains to the Listeners’ Vehicle. 
What does a bodhisattva gain by listening to or taking up the Dharma that pertains to the Listeners’ Vehicle? 
What need is there to train oneself in that ?” Since a bodhisattva should even strive to learn heretical treatises, how much more so should he or she the word of the Buddha. 
There is no offense for who has become exclusively devoted to in order to overcome that predilection. 
A bodhisattva who possesses the bodhisattva collection but does not engage in the bodhisattva collection and who, having completely ignored the bodhisattva collection, does engage in the listener collection commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
A bodhisattva who possesses the word of the Buddha but who does not engage in the Buddha’s word yet does engage in heretical treatises and treatises of outsider traditions commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she also acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for of superior intelligence , someone who is able to quickly grasp the meaning , who will not forget their meaning for a long period of time, who is able to discern the meaning that are reflected upon, who possesses a understanding that has investigated the word of the Buddha by means of the applications and is unshakable , and who engages the word of the Buddha each day with twice as much effort. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who has not violated these principles while becoming knowledgeable about heretical treatises and the treatises of outsider traditions but who does so as one who is delighted , and who both enjoys and takes pleasure in them rather than resorting to them as one would bitter medicine, commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
A bodhisattva who, after hearing the profound subjects in the bodhisattva collection , fails to develop devotion toward those supremely profound that pertain to the nature of reality or to the powers of the buddhas and bodhisattvas and denigrates them by saying, “These do not possess any meaning, they do not possess Dharma, they were not spoken by the Tathāgata, they do not benefit or happiness to sentient beings,” commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense, whether he or she denigrates them because of his or her own improper manner of thinking or because of his or her to comply with others. 
After hearing such profound and supremely profound subjects, a bodhisattva may indeed fail to develop an attitude of devotion . 
Regarding this , a faithful and sincere bodhisattva should train himor herself about this matter : 
“It is not right that I, who am blind and lacking in vision, and who can proceed only by relying on the Tathāgata’s vision, should reject the Tathāgata’s enigmatic statements.”801 A bodhisattva who considers himor herself to be lacking in understanding in this way and who regards the Tathāgata as the sole being who is unobscured with regard to a buddha’s qualities becomes one who is correctly established . 
A bodhisattva whose mind is associated with corporeal desire802 or who has developed a hateful mind and who then praises himor herself and disparages others in the presence of other persons commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
There is no offense for he or she wants to overcome heretics or he or she wants preserve the teaching. 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame the person , etc., as described in detail before. 
There is no offense if to engender faith in those who lack it and further increase the faith of those who have already acquired it. 
A bodhisattva who, having been seized with pride or having developed a hostile or a hateful mind, does not attend a Dharma sermon or a discussion on doctrinal exegesis803 commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to attend due to idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if was not aware or if he or she was ill and unable . 
There is no offense for who recognizes that the talk is one that he or she has heard repeatedly, and it has been learned and its meaning has been realized. 
There is no offense for someone who is engaged in the cultivation of a bodhisattva’s one-pointed concentration , since the mind must be continually fixed on a meditation object. 
There is no offense for if he or she has a very slow intellect and, therefore, would be slow at taking up Dharma, slow at retaining , and slow at fixing his or her mind on a meditation object. 
A bodhisattva who is deliberately contemptuous of, disrespectful toward, laughs at, or ridicules a person who is a Dharma teacher, or who is someone who relies upon the literal form of expression and not its meaning,805 commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she commits an afflicted offense. 
A bodhisattva who is abiding in the discipline and who, while in a hostile or hateful state of mind, does not assist beings with their activities—that is to say, making determinations about what ought to be done, leaving on and returning from journeys, carrying out right activities and occupations, safeguarding possessions, reconciling those who are estranged from one another, religious celebrations, and meritorious deeds—commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
fails to assist beings due to idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is sick and unable . 
There is no offense if the petitioner is able to do himor herself or if he or she has someone who can be relied upon. 
There is no offense if the activity is one that is harmful or contrary to Dharma. 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame that very person , etc., as described in detail before. 
There is no offense if has previously agreed someone else. 
There is no offense if asks someone else who is capable . 
There is no offense if is continuously and correctly engaged in that pertain to virtue.806 There is no offense if is naturally slow and would be slow to give advice, as described previously.807 There is no offense for who is desirous of preserving the opinion of a great many other individuals . 
There is no offense for who is desirous of observing a rule of the Sangha . 
A bodhisattva who encounters a person who is sick and afflicted by an illness and does not attend to and take care of because of being in a hostile or hateful state of mind commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to do so because of idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if is sick and unable . 
There is no offense if asks someone else who is both capable and kind . 
There is no offense if the sick person has a benefactor and someone to rely upon. 
There is no offense if has been cured of a long-standing illness. 
There is no offense if in order to avoid interrupting an ongoing virtuous endeavor that is of great importance. 
There is no offense for if he or she has a very slow intellect and, therefore, would be slow at explaining Dharma, slow at retaining , and slow at fixing his or her mind on a meditation object. 
There is no offense if he or she has previously agreed to do something for another person. 
It should be understood that to assist in dispelling the suffering of those who are afflicted by suffering is similar to to care for those who are sick. 
A bodhisattva who sees beings engaged in wrongful conduct concerning a matter that relates to this life or future ones and who, having developed a hostile or angry mind, does not indicate a proper course of conduct commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to indicate due to idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if lacks the knowledge and, is unable . 
There is no offense if he or she requests another person who is capable . 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , etc., as described in detail before. 
There is no offense if the person to whom proper instruction should be given has a hostile mind, is difficult to talk to, would take the wrong way, is devoid of any affection or respect , or has an unruly nature. 
A bodhisattva who is ungrateful and unappreciative of those persons who have assisted him or her and who, having developed a hostile mind, does not provide a suitable form of assistance in return commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to respond due to idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who makes an effort but lacks the ability or the strength . 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , etc., as described before. 
There is no offense if that person does not want to receive any form of assistance in return. 
A bodhisattva who, while in a hostile state of mind, refuses to dispel the grief that is being experienced by sentient beings who have undergone a misfortune relating to their family or their wealth commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to dispel due to idleness and laziness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
It should be understood that no offense in the same kinds of situations that were described earlier in relation to the failure to assist with their activities. 
A bodhisattva who has been asked in a proper manner and who, while in a hostile state of mind, does not provide food, drinks, and other necessities to those who are seeking food, drinks, and the like commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to provide due to idleness and laziness or due to lack of mindfulness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if lacks and does not possess these objects. 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame or train , etc., as described before. 
There is no offense if is observing a prohibition imposed by the king. 
There is no offense if is observing a rule of the Sangha. 
who fails to provide instruction and counsel or who fails to seek due to idleness and laziness or due to lack of mindfulness acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame , etc., as described previously. 
There is no offense if is observing a rule of the Sangha. 
There is no offense if he or she requests another person who is capable . 
There is no offense if the group of followers is one that has developed great merit, or themselves are capable of seeking robes, etc., or the duty of giving instructions and counsel to those needing instruction and counsel has been completed. 
There is no offense if a former heretic that has entered in order to steal Dharma and he or she is someone not suitable to be trained. 
A bodhisattva who, while in a hostile state of mind, does not comply with the minds of others commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who does not comply due to idleness and laziness, or due to lack of mindfulness, acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if because their intention is something that is unwholesome.808 There is no offense if he or she is sick and unfit to carry out . 
There is no offense if in observance of a rule of the Sangha. 
There is no offense if because although that one individual would like is wholesome for that person it is neither desired nor wholesome for a great many other persons. 
There is no offense if the person is a heretic who deserves to be suppressed.809 There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame or train , as described previously. 
A bodhisattva who, having become angry, does not make mention of the genuine good qualities of others, does not express genuine praise , and does not voice his or her approval of an eloquent statement that is made by another commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to make such statements due to idleness or laziness, or due to lack of mindfulness, acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense if believes that is someone who naturally has few desires810 because of the desire to preserve that person’s opinion. 
There is no offense if is sick and unable . 
There is no offense if, by that means, wishes to spiritually tame or train , etc., as described previously. 
There is no offense if believes that it would be harmful as it would cause to develop a mental affliction, conceit811 or the swelling up812 , and so in order to avoid that . 
There is no offense if the good qualities are counterfeit and not genuine; or if the statements only seem to be excellent but they are not truly excellent. 
There is no offense if the person is a heretic and someone who ought to be suppressed. 
A bodhisattva who, having developed an afflicted mind, fails to censure those beings who deserve to be censured, or who censures but fails to correct by means of punishment those who deserve to be punished, or who punishes but fails to banish those who deserve to be banished commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an afflicted offense. 
who fails to censure, etc., up to fails to banish, due to idleness and laziness, or due to lack of mindfulness, acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no offense for who ignores a person who is incorrigible, unfit to be spoken to, difficult to talk to, and very hostile. 
There is no offense for who perceives that would lead to strife, quarreling, contention, and disputation. 
There is no offense for who perceives that conflict and division in the Sangha. 
There is no offense if those persons, being free of guile and possessed of a strong shame and abashment, will turn away from their wrongdoing . 
A bodhisattva who possesses a variety of miraculous, supernatural, and spiritual powers but who does not, by means of those miraculous powers, frighten those beings who deserve to be frightened and win over those beings who are suitable to be won over and cause gifts of faith813 to be given up commits an offense and a transgression, and he or she acquires an unafflicted offense. 
There is no fault if in a situation that involves beings who are strongly attached , heretics who possess the wrong view that lead them to discredit āryas. 
It should be understood that no offense ever occurs for an individual whose mind is severely disturbed, or one who is experiencing intense pain or who has not accepted the discipline. 
These precepts that pertain to the spiritual training of the bodhisattvas were actually spoken by the Blessed One here and there throughout the sutra scriptures and they were set forth in relation to the morality of restraint, the morality of acquiring virtue, and the morality that acts on behalf of beings. 
A bodhisattva who has gained respect for the precepts that have been collected and presented in this manual on the bodhisattva collection of scriptures should undertake to practice the training after having generated the utmost reverence and after having accepted the discipline from another person with an attitude that is extremely pure in its desire to practice the training, an attitude that enlightenment, an attitude that is dedicated to the welfare of sentient beings, and with a reverence that not violating from the very outset. 
In addition, who does violate should restore by the method of remedy according to the Dharma. 
It should be understood that all of these offenses are included within a bodhisattva’s misdeeds and they are to be confessed before any follower of the Listeners’ Vehicle or follower of the Great Vehicle who is able to comprehend and accept the verbal informative form.814 If a bodhisattva commits an offense that represents an extreme form of defeat on the basis of a great perturbation, his or her moral discipline will be abandoned. 
it can be received again for a second time.815 If commits an offense on the basis of a middling form of perturbation, he or she should confess this form of wrongdoing before three or more persons. 
“O long-lived ones, please give heed to me. 
I, who am named so-and-so, in the circumstances that have been declared, have committed an offense that is a form of wrongdoing and that violates the bodhisattva code of ethics.” The remainder should be expressed in the same manner that a bhikṣu or bhikṣuṇī confesses the forms of wrongdoing .816 It should be understood that confession of an act that represents an extreme form of defeat on the basis of a lesser form of perturbation, as well as of all the other offenses, should be done before one person. 
If there is no suitable person before whom can make confession, one should earnestly generate the conviction not to commit again. 
In this way, is said to be raised up from those offenses. 
Moreover, regarding the acceptance of the bodhisattva discipline, if no individual possessing the good qualities is available, the bodhisattva should then, by himor herself, accept the discipline of bodhisattva morality before an image of the Tathāgata. 
This should be done in the following manner. 
After placing the upper garment on the shoulder, he or she should either place the right knee on the ground or sit in a squatting position and say the following: 
“I, who am named so-and-so, make a declaration to all the Tathāgatas of the ten directions and the bodhisattvas who have attained the great stages. 
Before them, I accept all of the bodhisattva precepts and all aspects of the bodhisattva morality— the morality of restraint, the morality of acquiring virtuous qualities, and the morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings—with regard to which all the bodhisattvas of the past have trained themselves, all the bodhisattvas of the future will train themselves, and all the bodhisattvas of the present are now training themselves throughout the ten directions.” This should be repeated a second and a third time. 
After making this recitation, should stand up. 
It should be understood that the remainder in its entirety is the same as was described previously. 
As relates to the bodhisattva’s manner of offenses, there is no offense that is beyond remediation.817 Moreover, concerning the declaration made by the Blessed One that, “It should be understood that a bodhisattva’s offenses are for the most part brought forth by hatred; they are not brought forth by desire,” the intent should be understood as follows. 
Any and all actions that a bodhisattva carries out due to his or her attachment to sentient beings— one that is due to his or her affection for sentient beings—are proper for a bodhisattva to do; they are not improper for him or her to do. 
Nor would it be fitting for someone who is doing what is proper to incur an offense. 
However, a bodhisattva who feels anger toward sentient beings does not act in a way that benefits either himor herself or others. 
Nor is that something that is proper for a bodhisattva to do. 
Thus, it is fitting that someone who is doing what is improper should incur an offense. 
The lesser, middling, and great offenses of a bodhisattva should be understood as in the Collection on Topics.818 Moreover, a bodhisattva who is engaged thus in the training that relates to his or her code of ethics819 comes to have three forms of excellence— excellence of practice, excellence of attitude, and excellence of a former cause—and abides in a contented state. 
Regarding these, what is excellence of practice? 
For example, when a bodhisattva conducts himor herself in such a manner that he or she does not break the precepts of morality, when his or her behavior of body, speech, and mind is pure, when he or she does not commit offenses repeatedly, and when he or she is someone who reveals his or her evil deeds, this is referred to as “excellence of practice.” What is excellence of attitude? 
When is one who has gone forth with the aim of pursuing Dharma and not with the aim of gaining an livelihood, when he or she is one who longs for great enlightenment and not one who fails to long for it, when he or she is one who longs for asceticism820 and nirvana and not one who fails to long for them, and when who possesses such forms of longing does not abide continuously as one who is lazy, one whose effort is inferior, one who lacks effort, and one who is filled with evil, nonvirtuous qualities that are afflicted, that promote rebirth, that are related to the fevers,821 that have a painful ripening, and that bring about birth, old age, and death in the future, this is referred to as “excellence of attitude.” What is excellence of a former cause? 
For example, when a bodhisattva has previously— in former lives—carried out meritorious acts and virtuous acts by reason of which he or she is not currently distressed by robes, food, seats, bedding, medicine for curing the ill, and personal belongings, and he or she is also able to share them with others, this should be known as a bodhisattva’s excellence of a former cause. 
A bodhisattva who possesses these three forms of excellence and who is engaged in the training that relates to the code of ethics abides continuously in a contented state. 
It should be understood that who possesses the three forms of misfortune that are the opposite of those abides continuously in a discontented state. 
This , then, which has been presented in both a succinct and an extensive manner, is referred to as the “all-inclusive morality” of a bodhisattva. It relates both to the faction that is made up of householders and to the faction that is made up of those who have gone forth . 
Furthermore, the remaining the morality that is difficult to carry out, etc.—should be understood as subdivisions of this very all-inclusive morality. 
Regarding , what is the morality of a bodhisattva that is difficult to carry out? 
It should be regarded as being of three types. 
When a bodhisattva who possesses great wealth and who has great authority and power gives up his or her wealth and gives up his or her great authority and power and accepts the discipline of morality, this is called “the morality of a bodhisattva that is difficult to carry out.” Also, when a bodhisattva who has accepted the morality has fallen into distress and is losing his or her life but refuses even to damage the acceptance of morality, much less to cause its destruction, this is a second form of what is called “the morality of a bodhisattva that is difficult to carry out.” When a bodhisattva is so attentive and his or her recollection remains so closely placed with regard to all the forms of attention that pertain both to moving about and meditative practice822 that during his or her entire lifetime he or she does not acquire even a minor offense and commits no error in relation to the morality, much less a weighty , this is a third form of what is called “the morality of a bodhisattva that is difficult to carry out.” What is the morality of a bodhisattva that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
Regarding these, the morality that is accepted is the threefold acceptance of the discipline of bodhisattva morality—namely, the morality of restraint, the morality of acquiring virtue, and the morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings. 
Regarding this , natural morality is that is possessed by a bodhisattva who abides in the spiritual lineage and who carries out pure deeds of body, speech, and mind due to the natural goodness of his or her mind continuum. 
Regarding this , the morality that has been practiced repeatedly is the threefold morality that has already been explained and that a bodhisattva has carried out previously— in former lives. 
Through having generated the strength of this former cause, he or she does not delight in any kind of evil conduct whatsoever, recoils from evil, delights in virtuous conduct, and desires virtuous conduct. 
Regarding this , the morality that is accompanied by means is a bodhisattva’s that relies upon the four principles for attracting a following to carry out virtuous deeds of body and speech on behalf of sentient beings. 
It should be understood as being of five types: 
Here a bodhisattva is endowed with morality. 
He or she causes others to accept morality. 
He or she is pleased at the sight of an exemplary Dharma follower.823 If an offense is committed, he or she remedies it according to the Dharma. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s morality of every form? 
It should be understood as the thirteen forms combining together six forms and seven forms. 
They are abundant because it is dedicated to great enlightenment and because it includes extensive precepts; it is irreproachable and rests in a state of joy because it avoids the two extremes of indulging in sense pleasures and engaging in self-mortification; it is uninterrupted because the training is not given up for as long as one lives; it is firm because it is not capable of being overcome or taken away by any form of gain, honor, false teacher, or the root and secondary mental afflictions; and it possesses the ornament of morality. 
What is the morality of a bodhisattva that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be understood to be eightfold. 
Here a bodhisattva himor herself reflects in the following manner: 
If others should carry out against me the opposite of what I want, that would cause me to become distressed and it would be unpleasant for me. 
Other persons are just like me in that they also do not want anyone to deprive them of their lives, etc., up to they do not want anyone to inflict undesirable and injurious forms of contact on them. 
If I were to carry out against them the opposite of what they want, that would cause them to be distressed and it would be unpleasant for them.” When , after making the determination, “How could I commit against others that which is so unpleasant both for myself and others?” avoids committing against others any of these eight unwanted things, even to save his or her life, this is the morality that consists of eight aspects and is called “the bodhisattva’s morality that relates to the distressed and what they want.” Regarding this , what is the morality of a bodhisattva that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being ninefold. 
Here a bodhisattva forbids those situations that are forbidden to sentient beings. 
He or she draws those beings who are worthy of being drawn. 
He or she suppresses those beings who need to be suppressed. 
The pure deeds of body and speech that are engaged in by a bodhisattva in relation to constitute the first four forms of this type of morality. 
In addition, there are five more forms: 
When these are combined into a single group, they make up a morality that consists of nine aspects. 
is conducive to happiness in this life and in future lives, both for the bodhisattva and for others ; therefore, it is called “ brings happiness here and in the next world.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pure morality? 
It should be understood as being tenfold. 
It is not overly slack, because faint regret826 with regard to transgressions are absent. 
It is not carried too far,827 because unwarranted regret are absent. 
It is free of laziness, because the ease of sleep, lying on one’s side, and reclining are avoided and strong effort is exerted day and night toward that pertains to virtue. 
It is embraced by mindfulness through cultivating the five limbs of mindfulness that were described earlier. 
It is dedicated correctly, because desire for gain and honor are absent and because does not agree to abide in a pure spiritual life after having dedicated himor herself to a god’s status. 
It is embraced by excellence of conduct, because physical behavior,828 regular activities,829 and practices that pertain to virtue830 are engaged in with physical and verbal conduct that is most excellent and exemplary. 
It is embraced by excellence of livelihood, because it has abandoned the fault of carrying out wrong forms of livelihood, such as hypocrisy, etc. 
It has abandoned the two extremes, because it has abandoned the practices of indulging in sense pleasures and engaging in self-mortification. 
It leads to deliverance because it has abandoned all forms of heretical views. 
The morality of bodhisattvas is one whose acceptance has not become ruined, because it has not been damaged or destroyed. 
This the bodhisattvas’ morality, which is made up of ten aspects, is one that is referred to as “pure.” This represents a bodhisattva’s great heap of morality, on the basis of which a bodhisattva, after he or she has fulfilled the perfection of morality, attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Throughout the period of time during which enlightenment has not yet been attained, who is training himor herself in this immeasurable heap of morality obtains five benefits: 
The buddhas hold him or her in their thoughts. 
He or she passes away while abiding in a state of great joy. 
Following the dissolution of the body, he or she is reborn in a place where there are bodhisattvas with whom he or she shares the same goal and whose morality is equal or superior to his or hers, and where are exemplary Dharma followers and spiritual teachers. 
In this life, he or she will be endowed with an immeasurable heap of merit that brings about the fulfillment of the perfection of morality. 
In future lives, he or she will also achieve a morality that occurs naturally and a morality that remains fixed in that quality. 
It should be understood that all of the morality that has been explained here, with its nine aspects of essential morality, etc., is contained within the three types of morality—that is, the morality of restraint, the moral ity of acquiring virtuous qualities, and the morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings. 
Moreover, this threefold morality accomplishes, in brief, three actions for a bodhisattva. 
The morality of restraint promotes mental stability.831 of acquiring virtuous qualities promotes the ripening of a buddha’s qualities in oneself. 
The morality of acting on behalf of sentient beings promotes the ripening of sentient beings . 
constitute the full extent of everything that a bodhisattva needs to accomplish. 
That is to say, mental stability is for one to abide in a state of ease in this life, and a person whose body and mind are not weary to ripen a buddha’s qualities and to ripen sentient beings. 
This is the extent of a bodhisattva’s morality. 
There is nothing of greater significance than this and nothing besides this. 
with regard to which the bodhisattvas of the past, present, and future—those who were, are, and shall be desirous of achieving great enlightenment—have trained themselves, are training themselves, and shall train themselves throughout the limitless world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the tenth chapter, entitled “Morality.” The summary verses should be understood to be the same as the ones that were presented in the chapter on morality. 
Regarding this , what is the essence of a bodhisattva’s patience? 
In brief, the essence of patience should be understood as consisting of the forbearance of harm caused by others, both the forbearance of everyone832 and the forbearance of everything,833 by relying upon the strength careful consideration834 or naturally,835 as well as a forbearance by a mind that is free of corporeal desire836 and by a compassion that is absolute.837 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive patience? 
It should be regarded as being of two types: 
that relates to the faction that is made up of householders and that relates to the faction that is made up of those who have gone forth . 
that relates to both factions should be understood as being of three types: 
the patience that forbears the harm that is inflicted by others,838 the patience that tolerates suffering,839 and the patience of the conviction reflecting upon entities.840 How does a bodhisattva forbear and endure the harm by others? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns841 the following in relation to intense, continuous, varied, and long-lasting suffering that is being directly experienced and that has arisen from harm inflicted by others. 
“This is the fault of my own karma, because this suffering that I am experiencing is the result of nonvirtuous deeds that I myself carried out.” “It is equally true that I do not want suffering842 and that this impatience represents a cause that will bring me suffering again in the future. 
If I continue to take up this attitude that is a cause of suffering, by doing so it will certainly be true that I alone am bringing upon myself the very thing that I wish to avoid. 
Therefore, it will be a case in which I have inflicted harm upon myself and not by others.” “It is also the case that, by their very nature, all formations843—both those of my own mental continuum and those of others’ —have a basic condition that consists of suffering. 
Others who create additional suffering for us, whose basic condition is one that consists of suffering, may well do so because they are unaware of this . 
However, it would be unseemly for those of us who are aware to create more suffering for others whose basic condition is also one that consists of suffering.” “Moreover, if it is improper for those listeners who are devoted to their own welfare the impatience that creates suffering for oneself and others, then how much more should this be true for those of us who are devoted to the welfare of others.” Having carefully considered these points, a bodhisattva who meditates on a five-part conceptions endures all forms of harm in relation to those sentient beings who are friends, foes, and neutral persons; those who are inferior, equal, and superior; those who are experiencing well-being as well as those who are suffering; and those who possess good qualities as well as those who possess faults. 
What are the five conceptions? 
They are the conception of having been a person who was well-disposed in a former life; the conception that conforms to a mere entities; the conception of impermanence; the conception of suffering; and the conception of embracing.844 How does a bodhisattva meditate on the conception of having been a person who was well-disposed toward him or her, in relation to those beings who have harmed him or her? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns the following: 
“This being is not someone who formerly, in other rebirths of the distant past, could not have been my mother, father, brother, sister, teacher, preceptor, a venerable person, or a person worthy of reverence.”845 For who cultivates proper attention in this way, the notion of being an adversary that is directed toward those beings who have harmed him or her will disappear and the notion of their being a person who is well-disposed will remain. 
By relying on this conception of being a person who is well-disposed, forbears and endures the harms . 
How does a bodhisattva meditate on the conception that conforms to mere entities, in relation to those beings who have harmed him or her? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns the following: 
He or she is a mere entities. 
There is no self here of any kind, no sentient being, no living being, no person that has taken birth who could scold , who could anger , who could beat , who could speak abusively , and who could criticize , or who could be scolded, who could be angered, who could be beaten, who could be spoken to abusively, and who could be criticized.” For who cultivates proper attention in this way, the notion of being a sentient being will disappear and the notion of being a mere entities will remain. 
By relying on and establishing this conception of mere entities, forbears and endures all the harms that are done by others. 
How does a bodhisattva meditate on the conception of impermanence in relation to those beings who have harmed him or her? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns the following: 
“Any and all sentient beings who have been born and currently exist are impermanent and subject to death. 
Moreover, this is the ultimate form of retribution—that is to say, the life will come to be extinguished. 
In addition, it is certainly improper for a knowledgeable person even to develop an agitated846 state of mind toward those impermanent sentient beings who are naturally subject to death, let alone to strike them with the hand, or with a clod of earth or a club, much less to deprive them completely of their life.” For who cultivates proper attention in this way, the notion of being permanent and substantial will disappear and the conception of being impermanent and insubstantial will remain. 
By relying on this conception of being impermanent and insubstantial, forbears and endures all the harms . 
How does a bodhisattva meditate on the conception of suffering in relation to those beings who have harmed him or her? 
Here a bodhisattva perceives that even those sentient beings who live in a state of great prosperity are closely bound to the three forms of suffering847—the suffering of conditioned existence, the suffering of change, and the suffering of suffering—not to mention those who are abiding in a state of misfortune. 
Perceiving this, he or she rightly learns the following. 
“I should be striving to remove the suffering of those beings who are always undergoing suffering in this way; not to cause them suffering.” For who cultivates proper attention in this way, the notion of happiness will be relinquished and the conception of suffering will arise. 
By relying on this conception of suffering, forbears and endures all the harms that are done by others. 
How does a bodhisattva meditate on the conception of embracing those beings who have harmed him or her? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns the following. 
“Now in generating the mind to enlightenment, I have embraced all sentient beings in the manner that a spouse848 and I have pledged to accomplish what is beneficial for all sentient beings. 
Therefore, having declared, ‘I shall do what is beneficial as relates to all sentient beings,’ it would be unseemly for me to do something injurious I was unable to endure the harm .” For who cultivates proper attention in this way, the notion of being a foe that is held toward those sentient beings who harm him or her will be relinquished and the conception of embracing them will arise. 
By relying on this conception of embracing , forbears and endures all the harms that are done by others. 
What is patience? 
that refrains from becoming angry, that refrains from retaliating for some harm that was done , and that refrains from bearing enmity849—these are what is called “patience.” What is a bodhisattva’s patience that tolerates suffering? 
Here a bodhisattva rightly learns the following: 
My willing acceptance of that meaningless great suffering for the sake of what consists of nothing but suffering was due to the fault of a lack of understanding. 
However, now, with the recognition that I am pursuing a virtuous activity that will bring about happiness, it would be proper for me to willingly tolerate suffering that is a trillion times greater than that , let alone some smaller form of suffering.” A bodhisattva who is pursuing enlightenment and who is cultivating proper attention in this way tolerates the suffering that occurs in all situations. 
What is the suffering that occurs in all situations? 
In brief, it is of eight types: 
There are four supports850 that are relied upon in order to go forth and achieve full ordination into the state of a bhikṣu or bhikṣuṇī within this well-proclaimed Dharma and Vinaya, namely, monastic robes, alms food, beds and seats, and medicine for curing the ill and personal belongings. 
A bodhisattva does not experience distress851 or become discouraged when poor forms of these are acquired, when they are acquired in small quantity, when they are provided in a disrespectful manner, or when they are acquired only after some delay. 
This is the manner in which tolerates the suffering that is based upon the supports . 
There are nine worldly conditions: 
The suffering that arises through the occurrence and appearance of these worldly conditions, whether individually or in combination, is called “that which is based on the worldly conditions.” Even if a bodhisattva is stricken by any of these , he or she does not, because of that, relax his or her effort. 
having carefully considered , he or she endures it and tolerates it. There are four modes of physical behavior:852 walking, standing, sitting, and lying down. 
Regarding these, a bodhisattva purifies his or her mind of those qualities that bring about obstruction by walking and sitting during the day, and at night tolerates the suffering that arises from the fatigue that is caused by these . 
He or she does not lean on his or her side on a couch, a seat, a bed of grass, or a bed of leaves at an inappropriate time. 
There are seven forms of embracing853 the Dharma: 
The suffering that arises for a bodhisattva who is striving in relation to these seven forms of embracing the Dharma is also something that he or she tolerates and that does not cause him or her to relax effort. 
A bodhisattva also tolerates the suffering that arises in relation to a mendicant’s way of life that is tightly bound by these kinds of austerities, and he or she does not relax effort because of them. 
Whatever causes of exhaustion may arise for a bodhisattva who is engaged in activities that pertain to virtue, whether they are of bodily fatigue or mental weariness, a bodhisattva does not relax his or her effort because of them. 
The deeds that benefit sentient beings should be understood as consisting of the eleven types that were described earlier.857 A bodhisattva also tolerates the suffering that arises due to those and does not relax his or her effort because of them. 
For homeless ascetics, regular activities are those monastic robes, alms bowl, etc.858 By contrast, for householders, they are those that relate to the correct pursuit of agriculture, commerce, service to the king, etc. 
A bodhisattva also accepts the suffering that is caused by these ; however, he or she does not relax effort because of them. 
No matter what kind of suffering may occur, a bodhisattva applies himor herself to complete and unsurpassed enlightenment; he or she does not fail to apply himor herself. 
And having done so, he or she does not turn away . 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience of the devotion reflecting upon entities? 
through repeated practice over a long period of time and through the attainment of perfectly pure knowledge. 
This constitutes the bodhisattvas’ all-inclusive patience that relates to the two groups and it should be understood that forms the basis for extensive categories , such as the patience that is difficult to carry out, etc. 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience that is difficult to carry out? It should be regarded as being of three types. 
Here a bodhisattva endures harm from beings who are weak. 
This is the first form of patience that is difficult to carry out. 
This is the second form of patience that is difficult to carry out. 
This is the third form of patience that is difficult to carry out. 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types. 
Here a bodhisattva endures harm from a friend, a foe, and a stranger, and also endures it from all three of these types who are inferior, equal, or superior to him or her. 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience of a true spiritual being? 
It should be regarded as being of five types. 
Here a bodhisattva, from the very outset, regards patience as advantageous. 
in the future, a patient person will not have many enemies; he or she will not frequently experience becoming estranged ; he or she will experience much comfort and ease of mind; he or she will not pass away in a state of regret; and, following the dissolution of the body, he or she will be reborn in a happy migratory state— in the celestial realms among the gods.863 is patient and also establishes others in patience. 
He or she extols patience . 
Upon seeing a person who possesses patience, becomes happy and gives rise to joy. 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience of every form? 
It should be understood as the thirteen forms combining together six forms and seven forms. 
Here a bodhisattva develops patience due to the fear having realized the undesirable maturations of impatience. 
who possesses a sympathetic mind and a compassionate mind and an affectionate mind toward sentient beings also develops patience due to affection. 
who has an intense aspiration to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and who is desirous of completing the perfection of patience also develops patience due to a productive cause.864 The Blessed One also referred to those who have gone forth as “the ones who possess the strength of patience.” Accordingly, because impatience is not a befitting trait for one who has gone forth and who has accepted the morality, also develops patience based upon taking up what is right.865 By abiding in and being firmly established in the excellence of his or her spiritual lineage and his or her prior repeated practice of patience, also develops patience naturally. 
Having realized that all entities are devoid of a sentient being, who has perceived the ineffable mere entities also develops patience through his or her meditation upon entities. 
develops patience with regard to every kind of harm. 
also develops patience with regard to everyone.866 also develops patience everywhere, whether in an isolated place or in the presence of a great number of people. 
develops patience at all times— during the morning, the middle of the day, and the evening; during the day as well as during the night; with regard to the past, present, and future; both when he or she is sick and when he or she is well; and both when he or she is in a fallen state and when he or she is in an elevated state. 
develops patience with his or her body, by refraining from striking . 
also develops patience with his or her speech, by refraining from expressing unpleasant speech. 
And also develops patience with his or her mind, by not becoming angered and by not remaining in an agitated867 state of mind. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s patience that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be regarded as being of eight types: 
the patience the inconvenience of being approached by beggars who are suffering; the patience that refrains from developing hostility toward violent persons who commit great evil deeds, by relying upon the Dharma and great compassion; and the patience that refrains from developing hostility toward those homeless ascetics who engage in misconduct, by relying upon the Dharma and great compassion. 
also five aspects of patience that constitute the ability to endure strenuous exertion. 
the ability to endure strenuous exertion in connection with striving to eliminate the suffering of those beings who are experiencing suffering; in connection with seeking Dharma teachings; being a person who is engaging in the form of practice that accords with Dharma;868 explaining in detail those very same Dharma teachings to others; and in connection with correctly assisting beings with their activities and the things that need to be done. 
This is called “the eightfold patience that relates to the distressed and what they want” because it is the patience that both removes those that cause sentient beings to be distressed and provides with the things that they want. 
What is a bodhisattva’s patience that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being of nine types. 
Here a bodhisattva is patient as he or she abides in a state of mindfulness with regard to virtuous activities. 
He or she is patient with regard to cold, heat, hunger and thirst, being bitten by gadflies, being bitten by mosquitoes, the wind and the sun, and being bitten by snakes . 
He or she is patient with regard to the fatigue and weariness of body and mind that arise from exertion. 
accompanied by sympathy for sentient beings, who are tormented by the suffering of birth, old age, sickness, and death, etc., throughout samsara. 
The bodhisattva who is patient in these ways will abide in a state of ease in that same life, and he or she without becoming contaminated by evil, nonvirtuous qualities. 
In future lives, he or she will also be intent on taking up the causes of happiness. 
He or she will also be one who is dedicated to achieving the happiness of others in both their present lives and their future lives. 
Therefore, this is referred to as “the patience that brings happiness here and in the next world.” What is a bodhisattva’s pure patience? 
It should be regarded as being of ten types. 
Here a bodhisattva who is the recipient of harm, distress, or wrongdoing from others does not harm in return, does not develop an angry mind, and does not harbor the attitude of being their adversary. 
Just as he or she was before , remains disposed to providing assistance after ; he or she does not abandon doing acts of assistance for the person who harmed .869 offers a conciliatory statement to those who committed harmful acts . 
does not, after having caused to be disturbed, receive an apology from him or her while thinking, “Let be disturbed.” Regarding the impatience under those very conditions, develops strong shame and abashment.870 Regarding patience, develops strong affection and reverence toward the Master. 
Regarding the avoidance of harm toward sentient beings, develops a strong feeling of compassion toward sentient beings. 
Alternatively, becomes free of attachment for the desire realm after having abandoned completely the qualities that support impatience.871 It should be understood that these ten aspects cause a bodhisattva’s patience to be pure and free of stains. 
By relying upon the patience that begins with the essential nature of patience and ends with pure patience, extensive and immeasurable and gives rise to the fruit of great enlightenment, a bodhisattva attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the eleventh chapter, entitled “Patience.” The summary verses should be understood in the same manner as before. 
What is the essence of a bodhisattva’s effort? 
mental exertion872 in order to collect immeasurable virtue and to act on behalf of sentient beings, as well as the energetic, continuous, and unerring movement873 of body, speech, and mind that is produced by that is what, in brief, should be known as the essence of a bodhisattva’s effort. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive effort? 
In brief, it should be understood as being of two types: 
Moreover, that which relates to both factions should also be understood as being of three types: 
Regarding this , here is a bodhisattva’s armor-like effort. 
By initiating effort beforehand, a bodhisattva here dons the armor that accompanies mental exertion in the following manner: 
“Even if I had to remain exclusively in the hells and not in any other migratory state for days and nights that last for a thousand great kalpas in order to liberate even a single sentient being from suffering, and it took me one trillion times as long to arrive at unsurpassed and complete enlightenment as it does for bodhisattvas874 to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, I would still exert myself. 
I would not give up striving for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
I would not give up the effort I had undertaken. 
How much more would this be true for a much shorter period of time and a much smaller amount of suffering.” This kind is what constitutes a bodhisattva’s armor-like effort. 
A bodhisattva who even generates mere devotion and mere reverence for such armor-like effort of bodhisattvas is a resolute bodhisattva and he or she nourishes the constituent element875 of the immeasurable effort that is exerted for the sake of enlightenment. 
How much more would this be true for a bodhisattva who actually achieves this kind of armor-like effort. 
Moreover, for such a bodhisattva there is no arduous deed whatsoever that needs to be done for the sake of enlightenment or on behalf of sentient beings with regard to which this bodhisattva would become fainthearted or that he or she would consider too difficult to accomplish. 
What is a bodhisattva’s effort that collects virtuous qualities? 
It is the effort that is applied to the perfection of generosity in order to complete the perfection of generosity, that which is applied to the perfections of morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom in order to complete those perfections wisdom. 
Moreover, this , in brief, should be understood as being of seven types: 
It is strong in that it is applied zealously. 
It is accompanied by means both in the sense that it follows the unerring path to aim that is worthy of being achieved and in the sense that it has attained a state of equanimity.877 It is right effort in the sense that it is dedicated to the attainment of aims that are both meaningful and worthy of being achieved. 
It is prolonged in the sense that it is applied continuously. 
With these seven aspects, the practice of initiating effort in order to collect virtuous qualities promotes the swift completion of the bodhisattvas’ perfections and the attainment of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
In addition, because effort alone is the principal and most excellent cause for attaining all the virtuous qualities that bring about enlightenment and nothing else is comparable to it, the tathāgatas point to effort when they are pointing out for unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
For its part, the bodhisattva’s effort that acts on behalf of sentient beings should be understood as being made up of eleven categories, which are the same as the ones that were described in the chapter on morality. 
What was referred to there as morality should here be called effort.878 That is the difference. 
What is a bodhisattva’s effort that is difficult to carry out? It should be regarded as being of three types. 
which a bodhisattva remains engaged in meditation upon virtuous qualities uninterruptedly and continually without forming any notion879 of monastic robes, alms food, a bed and seat, or a self the first form of a bodhisattva’s effort that is difficult to carry out. 
Moreover, with this form of effort, a bodhisattva remains engaged at all times until his or her class affiliate has been abandoned880 the second form of a bodhisattva’s effort that is difficult to carry out. 
In addition, a bodhisattva gains a effort that is accompanied by the attribute of having attained equanimity881 and is neither overly listless nor overly energetic, and that it is directed toward an unerring object, should be understood as the third form of a bodhisattva’s effort that is difficult to carry out. 
Now then, it should be understood that compassion toward sentient beings and wisdom are the acquiring causes882 bodhisattvas the strength that relates to the effort that is difficult to carry out. 
What is a bodhisattva’s effort that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
Concerning this , a bodhisattva’s effort that avoids afflicted qualities is to prevent the arising of those fetters,883 bonds,884 latencies,885 secondary mental afflictions,886 and perturbations887 that have not yet arisen and to abandon those that have arisen. 
Concerning this , a bodhisattva’s effort that gains possession of pure qualities is to generate those virtuous entities that have not yet arisen and to maintain , avoid indistinctness about, and increase and augment those that have arisen. 
Concerning this , a bodhisattva’s effort that refines deeds is to refine and collect the three types of deeds—that is, the virtuous deeds of body, speech, and mind. 
Concerning this , the form of a bodhisattva’s effort that increases knowledge promotes the attainment and development of the forms of wisdom that derive from learning, reflection, and meditation. 
What is a bodhisattva’s effort of a true spiritual being? 
It should be regarded as being of five types: 
the effort of bodhisattvas that has not been rejected due to the fact that no form of aspiration and practice is ever rejected; that is not deficient due to the development of a form of effort whose strength is equal to or greater than the task that is undertaken; that is not subject to dejection due to having a state of mind that does not become timid or despondent about having to exert strenuous effort continuously and for a long time; that is unerring due to being governed by a type of means that is directed toward a aim; and whose application is fervent888 in that it unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment with a heightened sense of urgency. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s effort of every form? 
It should be understood as the thirteen forms combining together six forms and seven forms. 
These six types of the effort of every form cause a bodhisattva who possesses them to be described in relation to virtuous qualities as “one who has taken hold of effort,” “one who possesses strength,” “one who possesses vigor,” “one who is energetic,” “one whose courage is firm,” and “one whose obligation has not been relinquished.”891 In addition, seven types : 
A bodhisattva’s effort is one that is accompanied by aspiration in that it is strengthened by repeated and fervent aspiration for and dedication to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
A bodhisattva’s effort that is endowed with equipoise is of one who remains unperturbed by keeping his or her mind from becoming afflicted by any of the root or mental afflictions it is a effort by means of which a bodhisattva becomes one who abides in equal suitability toward virtuous qualities. 
A bodhisattva’s exceptional effort is that which, in order to abandon any secondary mental affliction that may have afflicted and perturbed his or her mind, resembles the effort of a person whose head has caught fire to put out the flames. 
A bodhisattva’s effort is one that seeks in that it pursues all the branches of learning. 
A bodhisattva’s effort is one that pertains to the training in that it accomplishes the practice that accords with the Dharma, suitably and appropriately, with regard to those very qualities that are being sought. 
A bodhisattva’s effort that accomplishes the aims of others should be understood as being of eleven types in the manner that was described earlier. 
A bodhisattva’s seventh effort to safeguard his or her own correct practice and to counteract his or her errors in a manner that accords with Dharma. 
These thirteen types of a bodhisattva’s effort are called “the effort of every form.” the effort of bodhisattvas that relates to the distressed and what they want and the effort that brings happiness here and in the next world should be regarded as being like patience. 
The difference between them is this. 
What is a bodhisattva’s pure effort? 
In brief, it should be understood as being of ten types. 
Whichever one of the secondary mental afflictions greatly distresses a bodhisattva here, he or she cultivates the appropriate antidote for that secondary mental affliction in order to abandon it. 
One meditates on unattractiveness as the antidote for attachment to sense pleasures. 
on loving-kindness as the antidote for malice. 
One meditates on the principles of conditionality dependent origination as an antidote for ignorance. 
One meditates on recollection of the breath as an antidote for discursive thoughts. 
One meditates on the diversity of the constituents892 as an antidote for pride. 
This kind is called a bodhisattva’s “appropriate effort.” Here a bodhisattva does not possess the effort of a novice and a beginning practitioner—that is, to fix the mind upon the instruction and counsel. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “experienced effort.” A bodhisattva also is not one who has finished repeatedly practicing the application that relates to fixing his or her mind upon the instruction and upon counsel. 
Rather, the bodhisattva is a novice whose application is free of laxness with regard to this application in the sense that one applies oneself continuously and zealously. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “effort that is free of laxness.” Moreover, initiates effort in order to fix his or her mind by means of an unerring form of understanding, whether it is from venerable beings or due to the bodhisattva’s own kindling of the strength of extensive learning. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “well-informed effort.” Moreover, the bodhisattva who possesses such an unerring understanding meditates on quiescence at a time quiescence, takes hold of the mind at a time retention,893 and meditates on equanimity894 at a time equanimity. 
This is called “effort that is applied according to the occasion.” Moreover, a bodhisattva exerts himor herself continually and zealously to observe, to avoid becoming inattentive about, and to achieve the signs of quiescence, retention, and equanimity as well as the signs of developing, maintaining, and arising from one-pointed concentration. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “effort the perception of signs.” Moreover, having heard the most extensive, most profound, inconceivably great, and immeasurable instructions on the undertaking of effort that is carried out by bodhisattvas, a bodhisattva does not disparage himor herself, does not become disheartened, and is not satisfied merely by attaining a small or insignificant distinctive quality. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “effort that is free of dejection.” Moreover, regularly and at the appropriate time, a bodhisattva takes up and attends to guarding the doors of the senses, observing moderation with regard to food, maintaining wakefulness during the first and last parts of the night, remaining vigilant, and other similar forms of the requisites for one-pointed concentration.895 He or she also applies himor herself to them zealously. 
He or she initiates an unerring exertion that is directed toward a aim in all situations. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “effort that is not deficient.” Moreover, a bodhisattva initiates a form of effort that is neither overly listless nor overly strained. 
He or she also acts carefully and in a balanced manner with regard to all forms of exertion that need to be carried out. 
This is referred to as a bodhisattva’s “state of balanced effort.” Moreover, a bodhisattva dedicates all forms of effort that are initiated and generated to unsurpassed and complete enlightenment. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “effort that is correctly dedicated.” This the effort that is practiced by bodhisattvas—beginning with the essence of effort, etc., and ending with pure effort— that has great enlightenment as its fruit and on the basis of which bodhisattvas, after completing the perfection of effort, have attained, shall attain, and are currently attaining unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the twelfth chapter, entitled “Effort.” The summary verses should be understood in the same manner as before. 
Regarding this , what is the essence of a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption? 
It is a virtuous one-pointedness of mind that is possessed by bodhisattvas and is preceded by listening to and reflecting upon the collection of bodhisattva scriptures. 
it is a state of mental stability that pertains to quiescence, insight, or both of them in that it constitutes a path in which the two are practiced in combination. 
This should be understood as the essence of the meditative absorption898 that is practiced by bodhisattvas. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive meditative absorption? 
It should be regarded as being of two types: 
mundane and transcendent. 
In addition, it should be understood, according to circumstances, as being of three types: 
the meditative absorption in order to abide in a state of ease during this life, the meditative absorption in order to obtain for a bodhisattva qualities that relate to one-pointed concentration, and the meditative absorption in order to act on behalf of sentient beings. 
Regarding this , the meditative absorption of bodhisattvas that is free of all conceptual thought,899 that gives rise to physical and mental agility,900 that is a state of extreme tranquility,901 that is free of conjecture,902 that is not relished,903 and that is free of all signs904 should be understood as in order to abide in a state of ease during their current life. 
Regarding this , the meditative absorption of bodhisattvas that is conducive to the acquisition of those manifold, inconceivable, and immeasurable forms of one-pointed concentration that are included within the lineages of the ten powers905—forms of one-pointed concentration that listeners and solitary realizers do not even know the names of, much less actually attain—as well as that is conducive to the acquisition of those spiritual qualities that are possessed by bodhisattvas in a form that is not common to listeners, such as the deliverances,906 the bases of mastery,907 the universal bases,908 the avoidance of conflict,909 knowledge by resolve,910 etc., should be understood as in order to obtain a bodhisattva’s qualities that relate to one-pointed concentration. 
The meditative absorption that relates to acting on behalf of sentient beings should be understood as being of eleven types, in the manner that they were described earlier. 
the meditative absorption that a bodhisattva relies upon to assist beings with a variety of meaningful activities; to remove the suffering of those who are experiencing suffering; to give instruction regarding what is proper; who feels a sense of gratitude and appreciation to do something in return for the favors ; to protect from danger; to dispel the grief of those who are abiding in misfortune; to provide objects that are a means of subsistence to those who lack them; to lead an assembly ; to comply with the minds ; to encourage by their genuine good qualities; to suppress in a correct manner ; and to frighten and to win them over through miraculous powers. 
All of these combined together into one group are called the bodhisattvas’ “all-inclusive meditative absorption.” There are no of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that is difficult to carry out? 
It should be regarded as being of three types. 
Having dwelt in extensive, manifold states of meditative absorption which they have attained and to which they have become well accustomed, bodhisattvas voluntarily turn away from the supreme ease of those meditative absorptions and, by sympathy toward sentient beings, carefully consider the extensive actions the aims of sentient beings. 
Then, remaining vigilant about the spiritual ripening of sentient beings, they take birth in the desire realm . 
This should be understood as the first form of bodhisattvas’ meditative absorption that is difficult to carry out. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva relies upon meditative absorption to attain immeasurable, countless, and inconceivable forms of one-pointed concentration that are achieved by bodhisattvas but that are beyond the grasp of all listeners and solitary realizers. 
This should be understood as the second form of a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that is difficult to carry out. 
Further, a bodhisattva relies upon meditative absorption to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
This should be understood as the third form of a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that is difficult to carry out. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
that which is associated with deliberation and reflection,911 that which is associated with joy,912 that which is accompanied by the ease of pleasure,913 and that which is accompanied by equanimity.914 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption of a true spiritual being? 
It should be regarded as being of five types. 
It is that is not relished, one that is accompanied by loving-kindness, one that is accompanied by compassion, one that is accompanied by joy, and one that is accompanied by equanimity. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption of every form? 
It should be understood as the thirteen types combining together six types and seven types. 
These thirteen forms of meditative absorption bodhisattvas are called “ of every form.” What is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be regarded as being of eight types. 
What is a bodhisattva’s meditative absorption that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being of nine types. 
What is a bodhisattva’s pure meditative absorption? 
It should be regarded as being of ten types. 
the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the mundane purity of not being relished; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the transcendent purity of being unafflicted; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of having a pure form of preparation; pure by virtue of having a pure main stage; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of having a pure that is higher than and superior to the main stage; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the purity of possessing mastery over entering, abiding in, and arising from ; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the purity that, even after having turned away from states of meditative absorption, still has the power to enter them again ; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the purity of mastery over the exercise of supernatural knowledge; the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the purity in which all forms of views have been eliminated; and the meditative absorption that is pure by virtue of the purity of abandoning the obscurations of the mental afflictions and the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
These immeasurable forms of meditative absorption the fruit of great enlightenment and they are on the basis of which bodhisattvas, after having completed the perfection of meditative absorption, have attained, shall attain, and are currently attaining unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the thirteenth chapter, entitled “Meditative Absorption.” The first two bases of mastery are attained by means of the first deliverance; the third and fourth bases of mastery are attained by means of the second deliverance; and the fifth through the eighth bases of mastery are attained by means of the third deliverance. 
Regarding this , what is the essence of a bodhisattva’s wisdom? 
The discernment922 of entities that to attain or has attained all objects of knowledge923 and that operates in relation to the five branches of learning—that is, the inner science, the science of logic, the science of grammar, the science of medicine, and the science of crafts and occupations—should be understood as the essence of a bodhisattva’s wisdom. 
What is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive wisdom? 
It should be regarded as being of two types: 
that which in order to realize the object of knowledge that is reality; that which in order to develop expertise in the five branches of learning that were previously described as well as in the three heaps;924 and that which in order to accomplish the aims of sentient beings. 
This is what should be understood as the bodhisattva’s wisdom that in order to realize reality. 
Expertise in the five branches of learning should be understood in the manner that was explained previously in detail—that is, in the chapter entitled “The Lineages of the Powers.” For their part, the three heaps are the heap of entities that are advantageous, the heap of entities that are disadvantageous,925 and the heap of entities that are neither advantageous nor disadvantageous. 
Acquiring the expertise that consists of wisdom regarding these eight subjects fulfills the great, unsurpassed accumulation of wisdom in order to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Further, the activities that accomplish the aims of sentient beings should be understood as the eleven types that were described previously. 
The wisdom that relates to those very situations should be understood as the wisdom that in order to accomplish the aims of sentient beings. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s wisdom that is difficult to carry out? 
It should be regarded as being of three types: 
What is a bodhisattva’s wisdom that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
the wisdom that derives from learning both the listener collection and the bodhisattva collection ; the wisdom that derives from reflection ; the wisdom that is supported by the strength of careful consideration and that is gained by having made a careful consideration of the proper activities that a bodhisattva should pursue and the improper ones that he or she should refrain from doing; and the immeasurable wisdom that is supported by the strength of meditation and that relates to the stages of mental composure.926 What is the wisdom of a true spiritual being that is possessed by a bodhisattva who is a true spiritual being? 
It should be regarded as being of five types: 
that has completed learning the true Dharma; that is accompanied by proper forms of attention that are directed internally in relation to oneself; that is accompanied by the means of attaining one’s own and others’ aims; that has been properly ascertained with regard to the unerring formulation and the settled nature of entities;927 and the wisdom that abandons the mental afflictions. 
subtle in that it gains an understanding of objects of knowledge in terms of the mode of being that represents their true nature; skillful in that it gains an understanding of objects of knowledge in terms of the mode of being that represents their complete extent; innate in that it is attained through a prior accumulation of wisdom; endowed with the scriptural teachings in that it takes up and upholds the meanings of Dharma that have been imparted by buddhas and the bodhisattvas who have attained the great stages; and endowed with spiritual realization in that it has attained the levels ranging from the stage of a pure superior attitude928 to the stage that is the perfect manner of going.929 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s wisdom of every form? 
It should be understood as being of the thirteen types combining together six types and seven types. 
with regard to the truths, knowledge of suffering; knowledge of origination; knowledge of cessation; knowledge of the path; and, with regard to perfection, the knowledge that have been terminated and the knowledge that cannot arise again. 
These are the group of six types of wisdom. 
Further, the group of seven types are knowledge of entities; subsequent knowledge; knowledge of relative truth; knowledge of the supernatural forms of knowledge; knowledge of the major marks; knowledge that precedes the ten powers; and knowledge of the applications, which occurs in relation to the four applications.930 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s wisdom that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be regarded as being of eight types: 
a bodhisattva’s informative knowledge of the Dharma that relates to an understanding of the formulations of Dharma ; a bodhisattva’s informative knowledge of meaning that relates to an understanding of the characteristics ; a bodhisattva’s informative knowledge of clear expression that relates to an understanding of the interpretation of Dharma ; a bodhisattva’s informative knowledge eloquence and relates to making distinctions about the varieties of points that pertain to Dharma ;931 a bodhisattva’s wisdom that defeats all disputation put forth by opponents; the wisdom that establishes all the formulations of one’s own positions; a bodhisattva’s wisdom that correctly preserves the propagation of a householder’s and brings prosperity to a family; the wisdom that has ascertained the proper statecraft a king and the proper conduct in secular affairs. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s wisdom that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being of nine types: 
the wisdom that has been well refined and well established in relation to the inner science; the wisdom that has been well refined but has not been well established932 in relation to the science of logic, the science of grammar, the science of medicine, and the science of worldly crafts and occupations; and the bodhisattva’s wisdom that, on the basis of these five well-refined sciences, educates, causes to undertake , stirs to action, and gladdens, respectively, those disciples who are confused, heedless, discouraged, and correctly established . 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pure wisdom? 
In brief, it should be understood as being of ten types. 
Two types relate to the nature of reality,933 in that they grasp reality in terms of the mode of being that represents their complete extent and the mode of being that represents their true nature. 
Two types relate to the subject of progression,934 in that they correctly grasp causes and effects. 
Two types relate to the subject of grasping,935 in that they have a complete understanding of error and absence of error. 
Two types relate to the subject of means, in that they have a complete and true understanding of actions that should be carried out and actions that should not be carried out. 
Two types relate to the subject of perfection,936 in that they have a complete and true understanding of both the process by which afflicting entities cause affliction937 and the process by which purifying entities bring about purification.938 These five aspects and ten types of wisdom by bodhisattvas should be understood as being pure in terms of the highest form of purity. 
These immeasurable and well-ascertained wisdom give rise to the fruit of great enlightenment and on the basis of which bodhisattvas, after having completed the perfection of wisdom, attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Now then, this of the six perfections that were taught by the Blessed One intermittently throughout the sutras should be understood as constituting a concise summary . 
The presentations and explanations that appear in the sutras that were taught by the Tathāgata—whether they are of generosity or ranging up to wisdom—should be investigated in relation to the essence of generosity up to pure generosity. 
A summary of should also be understood in a manner that is appropriate . 
In addition, all those birth stories of the tathāgatas containing arduous bodhisattva activities during immeasurable numbers of lives that deal with generosity should be understood as relating to generosity. 
Just as with generosity, all those that contain of morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom should be understood as relating to wisdom. 
It should be understood that some only have to do with generosity; some only have to do with wisdom; some have to do with a combination of two ; some have to do with a combination of three; some have to do with a combination of four; some have to do with a combination of five; and some have to do with all six of the perfections. 
The bodhisattvas who are seeking to arrive at unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment by means of these six perfections are called “those who are great foaming seas of pure spiritual qualities” and “those who are great oceans of pure spiritual qualities.” called “those who provide939 the great jewels that give rise to every kind of good fortune for all sentient beings.” Moreover, there is no other fruit of their attainment of the immeasurable accumulations of merit and wisdom that is comparable to that of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the fourteenth chapter, entitled “Wisdom.” The summary verses should be understood in the same manner as before. 
Regarding this , what is the essence of bodhisattvas’ agreeable speech? 
Here a bodhisattva utters speech to sentient beings that is appealing, truthful, relates to Dharma, and is meaningful. 
In brief, this is the essence of bodhisattvas’ agreeable speech. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s all-inclusive agreeable speech? 
It should be regarded as being of three types. 
Here it is the speech of a bodhisattva that is friendly,940 and it is the speech by which a bodhisattva who refrains from frowning, who speaks politely,941 and who shows a welcoming facial expression accompanied by a smile, following social custom and polite behavior, extends a friendly greeting to persons by asking if they are well and enjoying good fortune, if they are in good health, if their day or night has gone well, or expresses some other form of greeting, such as, “Welcome, please draw near.” It is also the speech of a bodhisattva that pleases , and the speech by which a bodhisattva, having seen sentient beings’ good fortune relating to their children that had not been known—or their good fortune relating to a wife or husband, their good fortune relating to family relatives, their good fortune relating to wealth, and their good fortune relating to crops—comments on and pleases them. 
Alternatively, he or she pleases them their development of faith, morality, learning, generosity, or wisdom. 
It is also a bodhisattva’s speech that contains Dharma teachings endowed with every type of good quality, that is continuously and uninterruptedly concerned with bringing benefit and happiness to sentient beings, and that is beneficial to them in terms of the highest kind of benefit. 
These should be understood as the varieties of bodhisattvas’ all-inclusive agreeable speech. 
Regarding this , what is a concise presentation of bodhisattvas’ all-agreeable speech? 
It should be regarded as being of two types: 
that which corresponds to worldly affairs942 and that which corresponds to correct Dharma instruction. 
Regarding this, the speech that is friendly and that pleases should be understood as that corresponds to worldly affairs. 
Regarding this , the speech that is beneficial, that relates to the highest form of benefit, and that is declared should be understood as that corresponds to correct Dharma instruction. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s agreeable speech that is difficult to carry out? 
It should be regarded as being of three types: 
When a bodhisattva, after having engaged in careful consideration with a mind that is very pure and free of any defilement, utters friendly, pleasing, or beneficial speech toward murderers, adversaries, and enemies, this should be understood as the first type of agreeable speech that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva, after having engaged in careful consideration and without becoming discouraged, engages in conversation that pertains to Dharma with beings who are very ignorant and whose faculties are dull, and when he or she, after having accepted any trouble , causes them to take up a Dharma that is proper and virtuous, this should be understood as the second type of agreeable speech that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out. 
In addition, when a bodhisattva utters friendly, pleasing, or beneficial speech with a mind that is free of animosity and anger to beings who are devious and deceitful, who are established in wrongful forms of practice, and who mislead teachers, preceptors, venerable persons, and persons who are worthy of being honored, this should be understood as the third type of agreeable speech that is difficult for a bodhisattva to carry out. 
Regarding this what is a bodhisattva’s agreeable speech that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
the Dharma instruction that is to be given at an early stage943 in order to abandon obstacles and reach a happy migratory state; the most excellent Dharma instruction pertaining to the four noble truths that is given to one who is free of the obstacles and whose mind is fit; that correctly admonishes those beings who are inattentive, both householders and homeless ascetics, in order to turn them away from heedless conduct and cause them to become established in a mindful form of conduct; and the Dharma instruction that settles a discussion and that is meant to remove whatever doubt may have arisen. 
Regarding this , what is the agreeable speech of a true spiritual being that relates to bodhisattvas who are true spiritual beings? 
It should be regarded as being of five types. 
Here the bodhisattvas who have become true bodhisattvas944 and who have become like the tathāgatas945 teach their disciples a Dharma that is accompanied by the occasion, that is accompanied by the means of remediation, that is accompanied by the reliances, that is accompanied by strength,946 and that is accompanied by the marvelous abilities. 
Therefore, their Dharma is one that is accompanied by the occasion. 
They make known recovering from transgressions to those individuals who have undertaken the trainings and incurred violations. 
Therefore, their Dharma is one that is accompanied by the means of remediation. 
They make known the unerring practice that relates to this Dharma and Vinaya and that is governed by the four reliances.947 Therefore, their Dharma is one that is accompanied by the reliances. 
They proclaim the path that irreversibly delivers one from all suffering. 
Therefore, their Dharma is one that is accompanied by strength. 
They cause all the instructions to become fruitful by means of the three forms of marvelous ability. 
Therefore, their Dharma is one that is accompanied by the marvelous abilities. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ agreeable speech of every form? 
It should be regarded as being the thirteen types combining together six types and seven types: 
agreeable speech that relates to authorizing the activities that are permitted; that relates to forbidding the activities that are forbidden; agreeable speech that sets forth formulations of Dharma teachings in relation to entities; that sets forth unerringly the characteristics ; that sets forth the Dharma unerringly and in clear forms of expression; agreeable speech that sets forth the various kinds of Dharma teachings;948 agreeable speech that is friendly; agreeable speech that is pleasing; agreeable speech that abundantly fulfills the wishes of others as relates to abiding with few worries about all the implements as well as abiding with few worries about correctly accomplishing those activities that ought to be carried out; agreeable speech that reassures those who are frightened by a variety of dangers; agreeable speech that is made up of proper instruction; agreeable speech that admonishes and reprimands that was correctly seen, heard, or suspected, in order to turn them away from opportunities nonvirtuous and establish them in opportunities virtuous ; and agreeable speech that accomplishes by requesting others who are capable . 
These should be understood as the thirteen types that make up the bodhisattvas’ agreeable speech of every form. 
Regarding this , what is the agreeable speech of bodhisattvas that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be regarded as being of eight types. 
A bodhisattva’s speech that relates to the eight noble forms of verbal behavior on the basis of four types of purity of speech is what is called “the agreeable speech of bodhisattvas that relates to the distressed and what they want.” Regarding this , these are the four types of purity of speech: 
the abandonment of false speech; divisive speech; harsh speech; and the abandonment of meaningless speech. 
Regarding this , these are the eight noble forms of verbal behavior:949 saying that you saw what you saw; what you heard; what you thought; saying that you understood what you understood; saying that you didn’t see what you didn’t see; what you didn’t hear; what you didn’t think; and saying that you didn’t understand what you didn’t understand. 
Regarding this , what is the agreeable speech of bodhisattvas that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being of nine types: 
the agreeable speech that removes grief misfortune relating to family members; that removes grief misfortune relating to wealth; the agreeable speech that removes grief misfortune relating to health; that removes misfortune relating to morality; the agreeable speech that removes misfortune relating to views; the agreeable speech of Dharma instruction that relates to excellence of morality; that relates to excellence of views; that relates to excellence of conduct; and that relates to excellence of livelihood. 
What is a bodhisattva’s agreeable speech that is pure? 
It should be regarded as being of twenty types—that is, the twenty ways of teaching Dharma that were described previously in the chapter entitled “The Lineages of the Powers.”950 Regarding this , beneficial conduct should be understood at length in just the same manner as agreeable speech.951 I shall also now describe additional forms of beneficial conduct that are distinct from those . 
That is to say, a bodhisattva undertakes sentient beings’ aims that lead to this or that on the basis of every kind of agreeable speech. 
Regarding this , what is the essence of bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct? 
Having closely placed one’s mind in a state of compassion and with an attitude that is free of desire for material reward, according to circumstances, cause sentient beings who have been taught properly by means of agreeable speech in the manner to adopt,952 to be led to,953 to become settled into,954 or to become established in955 the trainings,956 beneficial conduct,957 or conduct that constitutes the practice that accords with the Dharma is a brief presentation of the essence of beneficial conduct. 
Regarding this , what is the all-inclusive beneficial conduct of bodhisattvas? 
It should be regarded as being of two types: 
the ripening of sentient beings who are not yet spiritually mature and the liberation of sentient beings who are spiritually mature. 
These should further be understood in terms of three modes: 
Regarding this , causing to adopt an aim that pertains to this life should be understood in terms of correctly causing to acquire, preserve, and increase their wealth by means of qualities actions that are in accord with Dharma.958 by means of which an individual acquires praise from others and abides in a state of ease during this life through being benefited by the ease objects a means of subsistence. 
Regarding this , causing to adopt an aim that pertains to future lives should be understood as causing to abandon wealth and adopt the lifestyle of going forth in which one’s subsistence is dependent upon being a mendicant. 
Regarding this , causing to adopt an aim that pertains both to this life and to future lives should be understood as causing , whether they are householders or homeless ascetics, to adopt gradually leads to freedom from attachment. 
by means of which abides in a state of happiness in this life through gaining physical and mental agility and, in future lives, is reborn among the pure gods. 
he or she will attain the complete extinction within the realm of the nirvana in which the support does not remain.959 Regarding this , what is the beneficial conduct of bodhisattvas that is difficult to carry out? 
It should be regarded as being of three types. 
The beneficial conduct in relation to beings who have not previously cultivated the causes of the roots of virtue is bodhisattvas’ that is difficult to carry out, because it is difficult to cause to adopt virtue. 
The beneficial conduct in relation to beings who possess a great abundance of wealth and who have attachment for it is a bodhisattvas’ that is difficult to carry out, because are occupied with a great object of heedlessness and a great cause of heedlessness. 
The beneficial conduct in relation to those heretics who fall outside this and in relation to those who formerly embraced the views of heretical traditions is bodhisattvas’ that is difficult to carry out, because have caused themselves to be confused about, and they have biased opinions about, this Dharma and Vinaya. 
Regarding this , what is the beneficial conduct of bodhisattvas that is directed everywhere? 
It should be regarded as being of four types: 
Here a bodhisattva causes those who lack faith to adopt an excellent form of faith, etc., up to he or she causes them to become established in . 
causes those who are immoral to adopt an excellent form of morality, those whose wisdom is inferior an excellent form of wisdom, and those who are stingy an excellent form of generosity, etc., up to he or she causes them to become established in . 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s beneficial conduct of a true spiritual being? 
It should be regarded as being of five types: 
Here a bodhisattva causes beings to adopt an aim that is genuine. 
He or she acts in a timely manner to cause them to adopt . 
He or she causes them to adopt an aim that is meaningful. 
He or she acts in a gentle manner to cause them to adopt . 
He or she maintains an attitude of loving-kindness in causing them to adopt . 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct of every form? 
It should be regarded as being of thirteen types combining together six types and seven types. 
Here a bodhisattva correctly brings those beings who are worthy of being brought to it. 
He or she correctly suppresses960 those beings who deserve to be suppressed. 
He or she dispels the opposition that is felt by those beings who are hostile toward the teaching. 
He or she causes those beings who are indifferent toward the teaching to enter it. 
He or she correctly ripens those beings who have entered in relation to the three vehicles. 
He or she causes those beings who are ripe to become liberated. 
He directs certain individuals to the preservation and collection of the accumulations that relate either to the deliverance of the Lesser Vehicle or to deliverance of the Great Vehicle. 
He or she joins those beings who possess the spiritual lineage of a listener or a solitary realizer to the Listeners’ Vehicle or to the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle. 
He or she joins those who possess the spiritual lineage of the tathāgatas to the vehicle of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct that relates to the distressed and what they want? 
It should be regarded as being of eight types: 
causes those beings who are disturbed by the perturbation of shamelessness to dispel and remove the perturbation of shamelessness in relation to those objects toward which one ought to feel shame. 
Just as with the perturbation of shamelessness, he or she also causes to dispel and remove the perturbation of lack of abashment in relation to toward which one ought to feel abashment, as well as the perturbation of torpor,961 the perturbation of sleep, the perturbation of excitation, the perturbation of regret, the perturbation of envy, and the perturbation of stinginess.962 Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s beneficial conduct that brings happiness here and in the next world? 
It should be regarded as being of nine types. 
In relation to the purity of physical deeds by other beings, it is the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from taking life; the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from taking what was not given; the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from sexual misconduct; and the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from grain-based963 or juice-based964 intoxicating drinks that are a cause of heedlessness. 
In relation to the purity of verbal deeds, it is the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from telling lies; the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from divisive speech; the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from harsh speech; and the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from meaningless speech. 
In relation to the purity of mental deeds, it is the act of causing to adopt every form of abstaining from covetousness, malice, and wrong view. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s purity of beneficial conduct? 
It should be regarded as being of ten types. 
Five types occur in relation to an outer purity and five types occur in relation to an inner purity. 
What are the bodhisattvas’ five types of beneficial conduct toward sentient beings that occur in relation to an outer purity? 
Here a bodhisattva does not direct sentient beings to engage in nonvirtuous deeds that are accompanied by misconduct, that are preceded by misconduct, that are blameworthy, or that are afflicted. 
This is the form of beneficial conduct toward sentient beings that is irreproachable. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva does not affirm about a state that is not liberation and that is not absolute purity, “This is liberation; this is absolute purity,” and then cause beings to take up . 
Moreover, in order to enable to attain virtuous qualities in a systematic manner, a bodhisattva initially gives a Dharma teaching that is easily comprehended and imparts instruction and counsel that is easily comprehended to those beings whose wisdom is immature. 
After realizing that their wisdom has reached a middling level , he or she gives them a Dharma teaching of a middling level and imparts instruction and counsel of a middling level . 
After realizing that their wisdom is extensive, he or she gives them a profound Dharma teaching and imparts subtle instruction and counsel. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva applies himor herself to the aims of from four castes and all sentient beings, including gods and humans, with all his or her power and strength. 
Moreover, whatever beings are capable of being prompted to adopt whatever small, medium, or great virtue is beneficial for them, and whatever means can be used to render them capable of being so prompted, a bodhisattva will, according to the circumstances, cause those beings to adopt those in that manner. 
These, then, are the five outer forms of purity that relate to bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct toward sentient beings. 
Regarding this , what are the five inner forms of purity that relate to bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct toward sentient beings? 
Here a bodhisattva applies himor herself to the aims with a wide-ranging compassionate attitude that is devoted to sentient beings. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva is one whose mind is not made weary despite all the pain and exertion in the aims of sentient beings and he or she is ever joyful in applying himor herself to the aims of sentient beings. 
Further, even though a bodhisattva might be living in a state of foremost and most excellent prosperity, he or she applies himor herself to the aims of sentient beings like a servant, a slave, an obedient son or daughter, or a young low-caste boy or girl, with a humble mind that has overcome conceit, pride, and haughtiness. 
Further, a bodhisattva applies himor herself to the aims of sentient beings with an affection of the highest form that is genuine and free of desire for material reward. 
In addition, a bodhisattva applies himor herself to the aims of sentient beings with a mind that possesses a loving-kindness that is absolutely irreversible. 
These should be understood as the five inner forms of purity that relate to bodhisattvas’ beneficial conduct toward sentient beings. 
When the five forms of outer purity and the five forms of inner purity are combined together, this is called the bodhisattvas’ “tenfold purity of beneficial conduct.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s sameness of purpose?965 Whatever purpose and whatever root of virtue a bodhisattva here directs others to adopt, he himself or she herself should be observed966 to adopt a purpose and a root of virtue that is equal to that one that is greater. 
Therefore, a bodhisattva’s purpose that is equal to that of others in this way is what is referred to as “sameness of purpose.” Having perceived the bodhisattvas’ sameness of purpose, those other disciples become firm in their conviction and irreversible with regard to taking up roots of virtue. 
Why is that? 
They have the following thought: 
“The that this bodhisattva has urged us to adopt is certain to benefit us and bring us happiness, because himor herself carries out the very that he or she has enjoined us to follow and would not carry out that he or she knew to be one that did not benefit and was not happiness.” Moreover, those other will not say of a bodhisattva who has the same purpose: 
Why do you believe that you should be one who urges others in such an extreme manner to take up virtue, or that you should be one who teaches others and instructs others? 
Rightfully, you are the one who should be taught, instructed, and corrected by others.” There are bodhisattvas who have the same purpose as others but do not show that sameness of purpose to others. 
Regarding this , the first alternative is a bodhisattva whose virtuous qualities and power are equal to bodhisattvas of equal virtue and power who have acknowledged themselves to be teachers of the bodhisattva path. 
By concealing his or her virtuous nature, does not show his virtuous qualities and power .967 The second alternative is a bodhisattva who, after having carefully considered , shows himor herself to be a follower of the same Dharma968 as those beings of inferior disposition who are frightened of the profound subjects, in order to spiritually tame them by this means. 
he or she knowingly takes birth in the same station as that of persons of the lowest caste969 as well as that of dogs, he or she is desirous of accomplishing the aims of as low as those of the lowest caste and as low as dogs, he or she is desirous of removing their misfortune, and he or she is desirous of taming them spiritually. 
The third alternative is a bodhisattva whose purpose is the same as or superior to and who shows himor herself to have a sameness of purpose in order to strengthen the roots of virtue of those disciples who have adopted roots of virtue that are unsteady.970 The fourth alternative is who is heedless and who is also indifferent to the aims of others. 
Regarding this , among the multiple forms of generosity that have been presented , morality, etc., up to the sameness of purpose, the ripening of the qualities of a buddha within oneself by means of the perfections, and the ripening of all sentient beings by means of the principles for attracting a following. 
In brief, these should be understood as the actions971 of a bodhisattva’s virtuous qualities. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that the practice of these multiple and immeasurable forms of virtuous qualities that are favorable to enlightenment—ranging from the multiple forms of generosity up to the sameness of purpose that have been described above— by means of three causes. 
It should be understood that their excellence by means of two causes. 
It should be understood that their purity by means of three causes. 
It should be understood that their excellence, their unsurpassed nature, and their uniqueness by their greatness and their freedom from affliction. 
Regarding this, it should be understood that their greatness stems from their absence of limitation regarding sentient beings, their absence of limitation regarding entities, and their absence of limitation regarding time. 
Regarding this , the absence of limitation regarding sentient beings is the quality by which a bodhisattva practices these roots of virtue of generosity, etc., on the basis of all sentient beings and in relation to all sentient beings; he or she does not do so only in relation to his or her own exclusive benefit. 
Regarding this , the absence of limitation regarding entities is the quality by which a bodhisattva abides in these roots of virtue of generosity, etc., after having adopted all of them in every form. 
Regarding this , the absence of limitation regarding time is the quality by which a bodhisattva practices these roots of virtue of generosity, etc., during this life, both day and night, continuously and uninterruptedly, with an application in which one’s duty is not neglected and one’s obligation is not discarded, and, for this very reason, he or she also in future lives. 
Regarding this , freedom from affliction should be understood in terms of four aspects. 
Here a bodhisattva cultivates these virtuous qualities with a joyful mind; he or she does not do so with a sense of pain or an unhappy disposition. For these reasons, he or she remains free of regret. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva practices the roots of virtue of generosity, etc., without harming others, without adhering to doctrines, and without allowing to become commingled with misconduct. 
Further, having undertaken these virtuous qualities with the devotion of his or her entire being, a bodhisattva practices them as one who regards them as advantageous,972 one who regards them as valuable,973 one who regards them as free from passions,974 one who is firmly resolved about them, one who does not rely upon others , and one who does not have to be led by others . 
In addition, a bodhisattva does not long for the ripening of those virtuous qualities of generosity, etc. 
the status of a wheel ruler or Śakra, Māra, or Brahmā, nor does he or she expect recompense from others. 
He or she is not one who clings to these . 
to any form of gain, honor, or fame, nor even one who clings to his or her body or life. 
Regarding this , the virtuous qualities of a bodhisattva who has entered the stage of a pure attitude are possessed of intensity and steadfastness. 
Regarding them, the quality of intensity is that in which all the virtuous qualities of a bodhisattva who has attained the purity of attitude are able to be carried out without the need for any close consideration. 
Regarding them, the quality of steadfastness is that in which a bodhisattva who has attained the purity of attitude does not lose any of the virtuous qualities that he or she has attained and accumulated. 
Nor is he or she vulnerable to their loss in future . 
With the passage of successive days and nights and the passage of a multiplicity of lives, the bodhisattva does nothing other than increase these virtuous qualities, like a moon during its waxing phase; he or she does not allow them to diminish. 
Moreover, it should be understood that these virtuous qualities reach complete purity for a bodhisattva who has reached the stage that is the perfect manner of going976—both one who is subject to one rebirth977 and one who is in his final existence.978 There are none which might attain some greater form of purity on a higher bodhisattva stage. 
This is how it should be understood that the practice of the virtuous qualities beginning with generosity and ending with sameness of purpose by means of three causes, their excellence by means of two causes, and their complete purity by means of three causes. 
Regarding this , the result of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment—a state in which the body possesses an adamantine nature and a state in which the true Dharma remains in existence for a long time—comes about through having practiced assiduously, through having developed great purity, and through having attained complete perfection with regard to all-inclusive generosity, all-morality, etc., up to all-sameness of purpose. 
Regarding this , the result in which a tathāgata possesses unparalleled forms of marvelous and wonderful qualities comes about through having practiced assiduously and through having developed great purity with regard to the generosity that is difficult to carry out, the morality that is difficult to carry out, etc., up to the sameness of purpose that is difficult to carry out. 
Regarding this , the result that a tathāgata is worthy of being worshipped from all sides, by preeminent beings, humans as well as gods, comes about through with regard to the generosity that is directed everywhere, the morality that is directed everywhere, etc., up to the sameness of purpose that is directed everywhere. 
Regarding this , the result that a tathāgata is the foremost of all sentient beings—whether they have no feet, are two-footed, four-footed, or have many feet; whether they are of the form realm or the formless realm; and whether they have conceptions, they have no conceptions, or they have reached the sphere in which there is neither conception nor absence of conception—comes about through with regard to the generosity of a true spiritual being, the morality of a true spiritual being, etc., up to the sameness of purpose of a true spiritual being. 
Regarding this , the result that a tathāgata possesses a body with thirty-two marks and eighty secondary signs that are produced by an immeasurable variety of virtuous acts comes about through with regard to generosity of every form, morality of every form, etc., up to the sameness of purpose of every form. 
Regarding this , the result that when a tathāgata is seated at the seat of enlightenment979 Māra and all of his hostile forces are unable to disturb, harm, or unsettle him comes about through with regard to the generosity that relates to the distressed and what they want, the morality that relates to the distressed and what they want, etc., up to the sameness of purpose that relates to the distressed and what they want. 
Regarding this , the result that a tathāgata attains the ease associated with supreme forms of meditative absorption, the liberations, and entering one-pointed concentration comes about through with regard to the generosity that brings happiness here and in the next world, the morality that brings happiness here and in the next world, etc., up to the sameness of purpose that brings happiness here and in the next world. 
Regarding this , the result that a tathāgata possesses the four forms of purity that are complete in every respect—complete purity regarding the support, complete purity regarding mental objects, complete purity regarding the mind, and complete purity regarding knowledge—comes about through having practiced assiduously, through having developed great purity, and through having attained complete perfection with regard to pure generosity, pure morality, etc., up to the sameness of purpose that is pure. 
Similarly, the result of the three qualities of having nothing that needs to be concealed, as well as the ten powers, intrepid confidence, closely placed recollection, and the purity of all the unique qualities of a buddha, also come about . 
These are the unsurpassed and consummate results of a bodhisattva’s virtuous qualities of generosity, etc. 
It should be understood that also additional in relation to the bodhisattva activities while in samsara that are immeasurable, agreeable, and beyond reproach. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the fifteenth chapter, entitled “The Principles for Attracting a Following.” Summary lines : 
Worshipping the Jewels, serving a friend, And, lastly, the immeasurables. Regarding this , what are worshipping the tathāgatas that a bodhisattva carries out in relation to the tathāgatas? 
Briefly, it should be understood as being of ten forms: 
Regarding this , the act of worship that a bodhisattva performs directly before the physical body of a tathāgata is called “body worship.” Regarding this , the act of worship by a bodhisattva of a stūpa980 monument, a gaha981 shrine, a kūṭa982 shrine, or an ancient or new caitya983 shrine, directed toward the Tathāgata, is called “shrine worship.” Regarding this , the act of worship that a bodhisattva performs while standing face-to-face before a tathāgata’s body or a tathāgata shrine, and while is perceptible to his or her own senses, is called “face-to-face worship.” Regarding this , there is a form of face-to-face worship that is done by a bodhisattva before a tathāgata’s body or a tathāgata shrine in which he or she forms the following thoughts that are accompanied by a superior attitude and accompanied by joy: 
“The nature of one tathāgata is the nature of all the tathāgatas of the past, present, and future. 
Therefore, when I worship the Tathāgata before whom I am standing face-to-face, I also worship all the tathāgatas of the past, present, and future.” “When I worship the tathāgata shrine before which I am standing face-to-face, I also worship all the other stūpa monuments, gaha shrines, kūṭa shrines, and the ancient or new caitya shrines that exist throughout the limitless world spheres of the ten directions.” This should be understood as worship of a tathāgata or worship of a tathāgata shrine in which being face-to-face and not being face-to-face both apply. 
By contrast, when a bodhisattva, after having formed the thought of a tathāgata , performs an act of worship that is directed toward all buddhas as well as toward all tathāgata shrines while he or she is not standing face-to-face before a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine, this should be understood as act of worship that is exclusively not face-to-face. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva, in relation to a tathāgata who has entered nirvana and in a manner that is directed toward a tathāgata, causes a single body or a stūpa monument, gaha shrine, or kūṭa shrine of a tathāgata to be constructed, or two , or a great many , up to a trillion , according to his or her ability and strength, this constitutes a bodhisattva’s extensive worship of the tathāgatas that is not done face-to-face and it is that yields the result of an immeasurable amount of merit and one in which the merit of Brahmā984 is obtained many times. 
Also, because of that, he or she will not fail to complete the accumulations of unsurpassed enlightenment. 
Regarding this , an act of worship by a bodhisattva that is done exclusively in relation to a tathāgata or tathāgata shrine should be regarded as one that is extensive.986 In comparison to that, an act of worship that is exclusively of the type that is not face-to-face should be regarded as yielding the result of an even more extensive amount of merit. 
In comparison with this , an act of worship in which being face-to-face and not being face-to-face both apply should be regarded as yielding the result of the most extensive amount of merit. 
Regarding this , when a bodhisattva who is desirous of performing an act of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine carries out that act by his or her own hand and does not cause it to be done by male or female servants, workmen, hired persons, friends, advisers, near relations, or kinsmen due to having become subject to idleness, laziness, or an occurrence of heedlessness, this should be known as a bodhisattva’s worship that one does oneself. 
Regarding this , when a bodhisattva who is desirous of performing an act of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine does not carry out that act exclusively by himor herself but rather causes his or her mother and father to carry out , or causes his or her children and spouse, male or female servants, workmen, hired persons, friends, advisers, near relations, and kinsmen to do so, or causes other members of the royal family, high royal officials, brahmins, householders, townspeople, countrymen, persons of wealth, heads of guilds, or leaders of caravans to do so, or even causes men and women, sons and daughters, poor persons, those afflicted by pain, and even those who are outcasts to carry out , or causes teachers and preceptors, fellow residents of a monastery, fellow spiritual practitioners, homeless ascetics, and even other heretics to perform acts of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine, this should be understood as an act of worship in which being done by oneself and being done by others both apply. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva only possesses a limited quantity of objects to give and that are suitable for performing acts of worship, and yet, after having developed a compassionate state of mind, he or she gives those objects to others, thinking, “These beings who are undergoing suffering possess only a small amount of merit and are unable . 
after they have performed acts of worship, they will experience happiness ,” and when those individuals make an offering to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine with those objects but the bodhisattva himor herself does not do so, this should be known as an act of worship that by a bodhisattva and is carried out exclusively by others. 
Further, both apply should be known as one that is unsurpassed and yields the result of the greatest amount of merit. 
Regarding this , when a bodhisattva performs an act of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine by robes, alms food, bedding, seats, medicine for curing the ill, and personal belongings ; by making respectful verbal salutations, physical gestures of homage, standing up to show respect, and joining the palms together; by fragrant scents of incense, aromatic powder, and unguents, various kinds of flower garlands, various kinds of music, or various kinds of offerings of parasols, banners, pennants, and lamps; by reciting hymns of praise, making prostrations with the five round parts ,987 or circumambulating in a clockwise manner; likewise, when worships by inexhaustible gifts,988 by making offerings of precious objects such as gems, pearls, lapis lazuli, conch shells, crystals, coral, emeralds, sapphires, gold, silver, rubies, and that turn to the right, by making offerings of jewelry encrusted with gems, such as earrings, armlets, and the like, or even by making offerings of bells, the scattering of coins, and wrapping thread, this should be known as a bodhisattva’s act of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine that is done with wealth and honor. 
Regarding this , when a bodhisattva performs this very act of worship that is done with wealth and honor in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine for a long period of time, using large amounts of objects of value and excellent objects of value, both face-to-face and not face-to-face, both done by oneself and done by others, with a joy that is felt wholeheartedly and having brought forth an intense form of devotion, and these roots of virtue are dedicated to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, this is called a bodhisattva’s seven aspects of “eminent worship.” Regarding this , when a bodhisattva performs an act of worship in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine with his or her own hand and does not have to be caused to do so at the direction of others because of heedlessness or idleness; when he or she performs with reverence and not in a dismissive manner; when he or she performs while remaining undistracted and with a mind that is free of affliction; when he or she does not worship with a counterfeit object out of hypocrisy so that gain and honor from eminent persons who have strong faith in the Buddha, such as the members of a royal family, etc.; and when he or she does not using such as ointments containing yellow orpiment,989 ablutions ghee, incense made from guggulu resin, or arka flowers, or with any other unsuitable objects,990 this should be known as the six aspects of worship that are free of affliction. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva performs such an eminent act of worship that is free of affliction and that is accomplished with wealth and honor in relation to a tathāgata or a tathāgata shrine, either with objects of wealth that he or she obtained with the strength of his or her own arms,991 that were solicited from others, or that were obtained through the controlling power over implements.992 Regarding this , a bodhisattva who has attained the controlling power over implements emanates one, two, or many bodies, up to many trillions of trillions993 of bodies, and then makes prostration to the tathāgatas with all of these bodies. 
Moreover, after emanating a hundred hands, a thousand hands, or even more than that for each of these bodies, he or she, with all of these , scatters over the tathāgatas supremely fragrant and supremely beautiful flowers that surpass those of the gods. 
All of these exalted bodies that possess the excellent physical qualities of a tathāgata voice hymns of praise. 
With all of these bodies, he or she offers various kinds of excellent and exceptional armlets, bracelets, and jewel earrings to the tathāgatas and holds up parasols, banners, and pennants. 
These , as well as others of a similar type, are acts of worship that are subject to one’s mind and are carried out by a bodhisattva who has attained the controlling power over implements. 
Why is that? 
since he or she is able to travel in an unimpeded manner to all the buddha fields, by virtue of having reached the stage of irreversibility. 
Even though a bodhisattva may not possess objects of wealth that were acquired by the strength of his or her own arms or that were acquired through having been solicited from others, and even though he or she may not be a bodhisattva who has attained the controlling power over implements, a bodhisattva who possesses faith can expand his or her mind that is possessed of joy and great devotion all the lesser, intermediate, and great acts of worship that are being carried out in this Rose Apple Continent,994 in this four continents, or in the thousand world spheres, the double-thousand world spheres, and the great triple-world spheres, up to the limitless world spheres of the ten directions, and rejoice at them. 
This, too, is a great and immeasurable form of tathāgata worship that a bodhisattva can perform with little difficulty and that obtains a great accumulation for the sake of enlightenment, which a bodhisattva should carry out with a happy mind and an elated mind, continually and without interruption. 
Regarding this , when a bodhisattva meditates upon a mind that possesses loving-kindness toward all living beings for a little while, for a moment, even merely for the length of time that it takes to milk a cow, or when he or she meditates upon a mind that is accompanied by compassion, that is accompanied by joy, and that is accompanied by equanimity; likewise, when he or she meditates upon the concept of impermanence in relation to all conditioned entities, the concept of suffering in relation to impermanence, the concept of selflessness in relation to suffering, and the concept of being advantageous in relation to nirvana; likewise, when he or she meditates upon recollection of the Tathāgata and recollection of the Dharma, the Sangha, and the perfections; likewise, when he or she has generated devotion toward the suchness that is the ineffable nature of all entities with even just a limited the awareness that possesses a weak amount of forbearance995 and abides for a little while, for a moment, in a mind that is free of conceptualization and free of signs, much less if a that is higher than this or greater than this; likewise, when he or she preserves the bodhisattva moral discipline, exerts himor herself in practicing quiescence and insight, as well as the qualities that are conducive to enlightenment; likewise, when he or she exerts himor herself correctly in practicing the perfections and the principles for attracting a following, this is a bodhisattva’s tathāgata worship that consists of practice the foremost, best, most excellent, and unsurpassed . 
It is the worship in relation to which all the preceding kinds of worship that are carried out with wealth and honor do not reach even a hundredth part, they do not even reach a thousandth part, etc., up to they do not reach factoring. 
This consisting of ten aspects should be understood as worship of the tathāgatas in all of its forms. 
Just as with worship of the tathāgatas, worship of the Dharma and worship of the Sangha should be understood in a similar way, according to the particular circumstances . 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who carries out these ten forms of worship of the Three Jewels does so with six types of superior attitude that hold the tathāgatas as their object. 
the superior attitude as the unsurpassed field of virtue; the superior attitude as the unsurpassed benefactors; the superior attitude as the foremost of all sentient beings—whether they have no feet or are two-footed, etc.; the superior attitude as extremely rare, like the udumbara flower; the superior attitude as unique in that they appear as the sole within a world system consisting of a great triple-thousand worlds; and the superior attitude as the refuge for all matters relating to mundane and transcendent forms of excellence. 
Even minor act of worship of a tathāgata with these six types of superior attitude, or his or her of the Dharma or the Sangha , yields an immeasurably great result; how much more would it be so for that is extensive. 
Regarding this , what characteristics does a bodhisattva possess in order to be known as a spiritual teacher? 
What characteristics should a spiritual teacher possess in order to take on the status of being an object of faith? 
What are the forms of service that a bodhisattva should perform in relation to a spiritual teacher? 
What kind of conceptions should a bodhisattva maintain when he or she listens to the Dharma in the presence of a spiritual teacher? 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s spiritual teacher who is possessed of eight attributes should be known as one who is complete in every aspect.996 He or she is one who maintains a virtuous way of life by being one who adheres to a bodhisattva’s morality of restraint and one who keeps them whole and unflawed.997 He or she is one who possesses extensive learning by not being one who has failed to develop understanding. 
He or she is sympathetic a compassionate person who has given up any interest in abiding in ease in this life and one who is dedicated to the welfare of others. 
He or she is possessed of self-confidence , when teaching the Dharma to others, his or her recollection and clarity of understanding998 are not lost due to the fear that arises from shyness. 
He or she is also one who patiently forbears unwelcome and undesirable remarks from others that are contemptuous, derisive, abusive, and injurious, etc., as well as various kinds of wrongful behavior carried out by beings. 
He or she is also one who does not become mentally weary he or she remains strong, exercises much careful consideration, and is tireless when teaching Dharma to the fourfold following.999 He or she is one whose speech is appealing in that he or she is endowed with the skillful qualities of speech1000 and one who is naturally articulate and distinct in his or her speech. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is a spiritual teacher and who is endowed with all the virtuous qualities causes the activities of a spiritual teacher to become fruitful in five ways: 
From the very outset, he or she is desirous of benefiting others and bringing them happiness. 
He or she also truly knows what is beneficial and will bring happiness and is not erroneous in his or her opinion about these . 
He or she avoids becoming mentally weary, and he or she feels compassion equally toward all beings and does not show any partiality toward those who are inferior, average, or superior. 
is free of pretense in that he or she does not deliberately affect physical behavior or steadfastness as an act of hypocrisy.1002 is free of envy in that he or she does not become upset in relation to a Dharma discourse that is given by others or the gain and honor that they have received. 
Instead, when requested by others to give a Dharma discourse or when receiving extensive amounts of gain and honor, he or she directs to others with a sincere and gracious mind. 
Moreover, regarding the Dharma discourses given by others or the gain and honor that they receive, he or she is much more deeply pleased by their gain and honor than by his or her own gain and honor. 
is also one who practices simplicity1003 in the sense of having few possessions and few personal belongings, and giving away all the property that is received. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is a spiritual teacher carries out five types of activities in relation to those who are his or her disciples. 
It should be understood that these terms can be differentiated at length, for example as they are in the Stage of a Listener.1004 The topics of instruction and counsel were also described above, in the chapter entitled “The Lineages of the Powers.” Regarding this , it should be understood that the act of serving a spiritual teacher is fully accomplished on the basis of four qualities. 
by the activities of taking care of who is sick and waiting upon one who is healthy, regularly and at appropriate times, and having engendered affection, respect, and joy; by the activities of respectful salutation, prostration, standing up , making the gesture of joined palms, respectful behavior, and honoring, as well as by making offerings of clothing, food, seats, bedding, and medicine for curing the ill in a manner that accords with the Dharma, regularly and at appropriate times; by obeying who is being relied upon with regard to meaningful spiritual undertakings and endeavors,1005 by being unwavering , and by disclosing in a correct manner ; and by approaching, waiting on,1006 asking questions of, and listening to who has given permission and who has the desire , and at appropriate times. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is desirous of listening to the Dharma in the presence of a spiritual teacher should listen to the Dharma while maintaining five types of conceptions. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is listening to the Dharma in the presence of a spiritual teacher should avoid bringing to mind five circumstances that relate to the person who is a Dharma teacher and, having done so, he or she should listen to the Dharma attentively and with a reverential mind. 
He or she should avoid bringing to mind that morality is in ruin. 
He or she does not maintain the discipline. 
I shall not listen from him or her.” He or she should avoid bringing to mind that family is in ruin. 
he or she should not form thoughts like the following: “This is from an inferior family. 
I shall not listen from him or her.” He or she should avoid bringing to mind that appearance is in ruin. 
“This is a person who is physically unattractive. 
I shall not listen from him or her.” He or she should avoid bringing to mind that form of expression is in ruin. 
“This is a person whose speech is unrefined. 
I shall not listen from him or her.” One should rely only upon the meaning , not its literal form of expression. 
he or she should not form thoughts like the following: “This is a person who speaks in a harsh manner. He or she is prone to anger and does not teach a Dharma that is sweet-sounding. 
I shall not listen from him or her.” Having avoided bringing to mind any of these five circumstances, a bodhisattva should embrace the true Dharma respectfully, for the Dharma can never be corrupted by the faults of a person. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva whose wisdom is weak and who, having become upset about a person’s faults, does not want to hear the Dharma should be understood to be one who has undertaken that will only bring harm to himor herself and that will bring a loss of wisdom. 
How does a bodhisattva meditate on the four immeasurables— loving-kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity? 
Here, in brief, a bodhisattva meditates on three forms of the four immeasurables: in which sentient beings are the mental object, in which entities are the mental object, and in which there is no mental object. 
After having arranged all sentient beings into three groups— those who are experiencing happiness, those who are experiencing suffering, and those who are neither experiencing happiness nor experiencing suffering—when a bodhisattva, in relation to sentient beings who have a desire for happiness, radiates into the ten directions the loving-kindness that consists of the superior attitude to provide them with happiness and he or she abides with a conviction sentient beings, this should be understood as his or her loving-kindness in which sentient beings are the mental object. 
On the other hand, when who possesses an understanding of mere entities1009 meditates on that very loving-kindness while recognizing with deep conviction that this mere entities is designated a sentient being in a figurative sense, this should be understood as his loving-kindness in which entities are the mental object. 
It should be understood that compassion, joy, and equanimity are also in the same way as loving-kindness— that in which sentient beings are the mental object, that in which entities are the mental object, and that in which there is no mental object. 
Regarding those , when a bodhisattva, in relation to sentient beings who are experiencing suffering, meditates upon a mind that is accompanied by compassion into the ten directions with a superior attitude to remove suffering, this is his or her compassion. 
Further, when , in relation to sentient beings who are experiencing happiness, meditates upon a mind that is accompanied by joy into the ten directions with a superior attitude that rejoices at their happiness, this is his or her joy. 
When meditates upon a mind that is accompanied by equanimity into the ten directions with a superior attitude to free those very same three types of sentient beings— those who are neither experiencing happiness nor experiencing suffering, those who are experiencing suffering, and those who are experiencing happiness—respectively, of their ignorance, hatred, and desire, this is his equanimity. 
Regarding these , it should be understood that a bodhisattva’s immeasurable loving-kindness, etc., in which sentient beings are the mental object are that are shared by others who are followers of non-Buddhist traditions.1010 Moreover, it should be understood that those in which entities are the mental object are that are shared by listeners and solitary realizers, but they are not that are shared by others who are followers of non-Buddhist traditions. 
However, it should be understood that a bodhisattva’s the immeasurables in which there is no mental object are not that are shared by any listeners, solitary realizers, or followers of non-Buddhist traditions. 
Regarding these , it should be understood that three of the bodhisattvas’ immeasurables—namely, loving-kindness, compassion, and joy—consist of superior attitude the happiness . 
It should be understood that one of the immeasurables consists of a superior attitude benefit —namely, equanimity. 
All of the immeasurables are referred to as a bodhisattva’s “sympathy.”1011 Therefore, those bodhisattvas who possess these are described as “the ones who are sympathetic.” Regarding this , bodhisattvas consider one hundred and ten forms of suffering that occur within the domain of sentient beings as they meditate upon compassion toward sentient beings. 
What are the one hundred and ten forms of suffering? 
Suffering has one form. 
As relates to “the suffering of progression,”1012 all sentient beings, without exception, are experiencing the suffering that occurs in a continuous manner. 
Suffering has two forms. 
“ that is rooted in desire” is the suffering that arises when objects that are held dear undergo change and turn into something different. 
“The suffering that is a ripening of ignorance” is those painful physical sensations that cause the individual who experiences them to become bewildered in the sense of an “I” or a “mine” in relation to his or her individual existence1013 and then to undergo exceedingly great distress. 
Suffering has three forms: 
Suffering has four forms. 
The suffering of separation is that which arises through being separated from those who are held dear. 
The suffering of destruction is that which arises because of death, the casting off of a class affiliate.1014 Successive suffering it is that which arises sequentially in rebirth following one’s death. 
Perpetual suffering is the five grasping heaps1015 of those sentient beings who are not capable of attaining nirvana. 
Suffering has five forms: 
the suffering that is conditioned by the perturbation of desire for sense objects, and suffering that are conditioned by the perturbations of malice, torpor and sleep, excitation and regret, and doubt. 
Suffering has six forms. 
Causal suffering is by engaging in the causes of the lower realms. 
Resultant suffering is through having been born in the lower realms. 
Collectively, these are the six forms of suffering. 
Suffering has seven forms. 
Suffering has eight forms: 
Suffering has nine forms: 
Suffering has ten forms: 
It should be understood that there is another nine forms of suffering: 
all-encompassing suffering, great suffering, suffering that is directed everywhere, suffering wrongful conduct, the suffering of progression, the suffering of being unable to fulfill one’s desires, the suffering of failure, suffering that follows necessarily, and suffering of every form. 
Regarding this , all-encompassing suffering is that which arises from a former cause, and that which arises from a condition that exists in the present. 
Regarding this , great suffering is that which is long-lasting, exceedingly painful, manifold, and constant. 
Regarding this , suffering that is directed everywhere includes that which occurs in the hells, that which occurs in the birth state of animals, that which occurs in the world of hungry ghosts, and that which occurs in the happy migratory states. 
Regarding this , suffering wrongful conduct is of this life that is experienced due to harm carried out by others and that is caused to arise by doing harm to others. 
It is the suffering that arises from an imbalance of the elements caused by eating unsuitable food. 
It is the suffering in which one experiences the perturbation the root and secondary mental afflictions due to continuously engaging in improper forms of attention.1019 It is the suffering that one experiences in a future life in the lower realms due to the widespread occurrence of misdeeds of body, speech, and mind. 
Regarding this , “the suffering of progression”1020 is that which arises due to six types of uncertainty for one who wanders in samsara. 
Due to the uncertainty of one’s individual existence, a person who was a king becomes a pauper. 
Due to the uncertainty relating to material possessions, as an individual who previously possessed great wealth continues to wander in samsara, he or she will become, at another time, someone who is extremely poor. 
Regarding this , the suffering of being unable to fulfill one’s desires is that which arises for a person who wishes to have a long life but who, contrary to his or her wishes, experiences a short life; a person who wishes to be physically attractive but who, contrary to his or her wishes, is physically unattractive; a person who wishes to be born in a family of high standing but who, contrary to his or her wishes, is born in a inferior family; a person who wishes to have power1022 but who, contrary to his or her wishes, has become one who is in a state of poverty; a person who wishes to have great strength1023 but who, contrary to his or her wishes, has become one who is weak; a person who wishes to gain knowledge of subjects but who, contrary to his or her wishes, must go through life as one who is bewildered and lacking in knowledge; and that which arises for a person who wishes to defeat others but who, contrary to his or her wishes, fails to defeat others and is instead forced to experience defeat. 
Regarding this , the suffering of failure is, in the case of householders, that arises from the decline of their children, wife or husband, etc., and, in the case of those who have gone forth , it is the suffering that arises from the increase of the mental afflictions of desire, etc. 
It is also the suffering that arises from being afflicted by a scarcity of provisions,1024 from being defeated by an opposing army, and from being harmed by the distress and danger entering a forest or a region that is difficult to traverse. 
It is also the suffering that arises from having to rely on others for one’s subsistence. 
It is also the suffering that arises from such injuries as being killed, bound, cut, beaten, or banished, etc. 
Regarding this , the suffering that follows necessarily1025 is suffering in relation to eight worldly conditions. 
It is also the suffering that arises from loss, disrepute, and blame. 
These eight types of suffering, as well as the suffering of longing , are what is referred to as “suffering that follows necessarily.” Regarding this , suffering of every form the five types of suffering that are the opposite of what was explained as happiness.1026 They should be understood as the cause of suffering; the experience of suffering; the suffering that is a mere absence of happiness; the suffering that does not cut off feelings; and the fifth type is those forms of suffering that oppose the happiness of departure, separation, tranquility, and complete enlightenment—namely, the suffering of living as a householder, that arises from being bound to the desire realm, deliberation,1027 and being an ordinary person.1028 These make up five forms of suffering. 
that is due to violence, that arises from a lack of articles necessary for subsistence, that arises from an imbalance of the elements, that arises from a transformation of that which is held dear, and the fifth is the suffering of the indisposition1029 that promotes the mental afflictions that operate in the three realms. 
This group of five combined with the previous make up the ten types of suffering that are called “suffering of every form.” When the previous fifty-five forms are combined together with this fifty-five, they make up the one hundred and ten forms that are meditation objects for the compassion that bodhisattvas. 
the meditation objects by means of which the compassion of bodhisattvas is developed and increased and their meditation reaches perfection. 
Moreover, great compassion arises when nineteen of the types of suffering within this great heap of suffering as meditation objects. 
What are the nineteen types of suffering? 
Compassion is called “great compassion” on the basis of four causal factors: that is developed after one has taken hold of the suffering of sentient beings that is profound, subtle, and difficult to realize. 
that one has become acquainted with over a long period of time and that one has cultivated for many hundreds of thousands of kalpas. 
that has engaged its object with an effort of such intensity that the bodhisattva who is filled with compassion would give up even a hundred lives in order to remove the suffering of beings, let alone a single life or the material possessions physical body. 
that is exceedingly pure due to the purity of the bodhisattva stage that those bodhisattvas who have reached the culmination and due to the purity of the stage of a tathāgata that the tathāgatas. 
Now then, those bodhisattvas who meditate upon compassion in relation to sentient beings using these one hundred and ten forms meditate on the complete bodhisattva compassion. 
Moreover, they also quickly attain the compassion that constitutes a purity of attitude— of one who has entered into the stage that constitutes a purity of attitude. 
They also develop a mind that is exceedingly tender toward sentient beings, a mind that is affectionate , a mind that is desirous of acting , a mind that is tireless , a mind that is able to endure suffering , and a mind that is both fit and has been brought under control . 
Moreover, the mind continuum of a listener ārya who has attained the culmination and possesses a realization of the truth of suffering, that has long since been accompanied by a sense of dissatisfaction , does not engage1030 with the same degree of urgency as of a bodhisattva who perceives, with a mind that possesses 1031 compassion toward sentient beings, the great mass of one hundred and ten forms of suffering that is being undergone. 
There is not any inner or outer entity that a bodhisattva whose mind is permeated with such compassion would not give up. 
There is no moral discipline that he or she would not accept. 
There is not any harm inflicted by another that he or she would not endure. 
There is no application of effort that he or she would not undertake. 
There is no meditative absorption that he or she would not cultivate. 
There is no wisdom that he or she would not develop. 
Therefore, when the tathāgatas are asked, “Upon what does the enlightenment of a bodhisattva rest?” the Ones Who Expound Things Correctly declare: 
“The enlightenment of a bodhisattva rests upon the foundation of compassion.” Regarding this , each of the immeasurables that have been explained here brings about a bodhisattva’s development by means of their immeasurable development. 
acquires immeasurable forms of desirable results.1032 is brought forth by immeasurable forms of virtue that are absolutely irreproachable. 
It should be understood that a bodhisattva who is engaged in meditation upon the immeasurables in this manner four benefits. 
It promotes a firmness of attitude in relation to true and complete enlightenment. 
It promotes the ability to endure every suffering in samsara for the sake of sentient beings. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the sixteenth chapter, entitled “Worship, Service, and the Immeasurables.” Summary verses: 
Shame, firmness, and tirelessness, Knowledge of treatises and the world, Likewise, the correct forms of reliance And the forms of informative knowledge, The accumulations, the qualities Conducive to enlightenment, Quiescence, insight, skillful means, The retentions, aspirational prayer, The three concentrations that ought to be known, And the four summary statements. Regarding this , what are the shame and abashment of bodhisattvas? In brief, they should be understood in two ways: 
in terms of their essential nature and their basis. 
Shame1033 is a bodhisattva’s embarrassment toward objectionable conduct through having realized its impropriety as relates to oneself. 
Abashment1034 is the embarrassment toward that very same object out of respect for, or fear1035 of, others. 
This embarrassment by a bodhisattva is naturally strong, not to mention after it has been developed through repeated practice. 
This is how a bodhisattva’s shame and abashment should be understood in terms of their essential nature. 
On the other hand, their basis, in brief, is fourfold. 
The embarrassment with regard to failing to carry out the practice that a bodhisattva ought to pursue is the first basis. 
Likewise, the embarrassment with regard to performing activities that a bodhisattva ought to avoid is the second basis. 
Likewise, a bodhisattva’s embarrassment with regard to the concealment of his or her evil deeds is the third basis. 
Likewise, a bodhisattva’s embarrassment with regard to the regret that arises his or her own , along with toward the object that is necessarily relied upon afterward, is the fourth basis.1036 This is how should be understood in terms of their basis. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s development of firmness? 
This also should be regarded in two ways: 
in terms of its essential nature and its basis. 
The quality of restraining one’s mind when it has become afflicted, the quality of not allowing oneself to come under the power of the mental afflictions, the quality of having a nature that tolerates suffering, the quality of not wavering from correct practice even in the face of many different and substantial kinds of fear and terror, and the firmness that either from possessing courage naturally or through careful reflection should be understood as the essential nature of the development of firmness. 
In brief, the basis for that development of firmness by bodhisattvas should be understood as being fivefold. 
the occurrence of a variety of samsaric forms of suffering and a variety of mistaken forms of practice that are carried out by disciples; the acceptance of a samsara that is very long-lasting for the sake of sentient beings; teaching the Dharma in a great assembly while one’s views are being scrutinized by rivals; the acceptance of all the bodhisattva precepts; and listening to the profound and extensive forms of the Dharma.1037 Regarding this , the bodhisattvas’ quality of remaining mentally tireless in relation to all their correct forms of practice should be understood as being due to five causes. 
Here a bodhisattva is naturally strong, which keeps him or her from becoming tired. 
Moreover, that very attribute of remaining mentally tireless is cultivated repeatedly, which keeps him or her from becoming tired. 
possesses a sharp and powerful discriminating wisdom, which keeps him or her from becoming tired. 
A bodhisattva’s compassionate mind and sympathetic mind remain fixed with great intensity upon sentient beings continually and uninterruptedly, which keeps him or her from becoming tired. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s knowledge of treatises? 
Here a bodhisattva is one who has correctly taken up from others the Dharma that is made up of the collections of names, assertions, and syllables1038 and that relates to the five branches of learning. 
Alternatively, he or she is someone who has become very learned regarding the meaning of that very Dharma from others. 
Or he or she is someone who on his or her own has reflected well and reached correct conclusions about them. 
In addition, the bodhisattva who has gained knowledge of these teachings and their meanings in this manner does not give up this activity, in order to avoid forgetting those teachings and meanings and in order to learn additional new and more advanced teachings and meanings. 
Further, with the perfection of this learning and contemplation, a ripening1039 created by the passage of time the attainment of a clarity1040 regarding both these teachings and their meanings. 
It should be understood that, by means of these elements, a bodhisattva’s knowledge of treatises becomes unlimited, complete, and unmistaken. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s knowledge of the world? 
Here a bodhisattva gains, in relation to the world that consists of sentient beings, the following type of true realization. 
That is to say, although they take birth, age, die, fall 1041 and enter ,1042 sentient beings still do not correctly discover the deliverance1043 that lies beyond old age and death.” Moreover, gains a true realization of an era in which the degeneracies1044 possessed by the world of beings are exceedingly great, as well as an era that is free of the degeneracies and one in which the degeneracies are not exceedingly great. 
That is to say, he or she does so with regard to the five degeneracies, which are the degeneracy of life spans, the degeneracy of sentient beings, the degeneracy of the mental afflictions, the degeneracy of views, and the degeneracy of a kalpa. 
For instance, nowadays the life spans of humans are short; an individual who lives a long time lives for a hundred years. 
For instance, nowadays beings to a large extent do not honor their mothers, do not honor their fathers, do not honor spiritual asceticism, do not honor the position of brahmins, do not respect family elders, do not do what is advantageous, do not do what ought to be done, are not fearful of what is objectionable in relation to this world or the next world, do not practice generosity, do not carry out meritorious acts, do not observe the fasting observance,1045 and do not abide in morality after having accepted it. 
For instance, nowadays it is evident that are attached to wickedness1046 and attached to dishonest ways,1047 and they become acquainted with many kinds of evil, nonvirtuous activities related to such improper conduct as taking up a weapon, taking up a staff,1048 strife, quarreling, discord, arguing, guile, deception, dishonesty, and lying. 
For instance, nowadays many forms of false teachings have appeared that are preceded by the formation of judgments about the meaning of false teachings and that will contribute to the destruction of the true Dharma and the disappearance of the true Dharma. 
For instance, nowadays frequent famines, which take place when an intermediate kalpa1049 ends with famine, are being perceived; widespread diseases, which take place when an intermediate kalpa ends with disease, are being perceived; and the widespread taking of life by means of weapons, which takes place when an intermediate kalpa ends with weapons, are being perceived. 
However, these circumstances did not exist in the past. 
This is the way in which a bodhisattva is one who knows the world in terms of the world of sentient beings. 
In addition, a bodhisattva gains a true realization of the formation and destruction of the external world in that the manner in which the external world comes into being and disappears. 
A bodhisattva also gains a true realization of the world,1050 the origination of the world, the cessation of the world, the path that leads to the origination of the world, the path that leads to the cessation of the world, enjoyment1051 of the world, the disadvantages , and deliverance1052 . 
A bodhisattva also realizes in a true manner that the full extent of what is called “the state of being a human”1053 consists of that range from the eye to the mind, the heaps that do not have the nature of form, and a person’s body that is made up of the four great elements; that, regarding this , the term “self” or “being” is a mere appellation; that, regarding this , the assertions “I see forms with the eye,” up to “I realize entities with the mind,” are mere assertions; and that, regarding this , the expressions “He or she was the Long-Lived One who had this name, he or she was from this particular family, he or she was from this particular clan, he or she ate this kind of food, he or she experienced these kinds of happiness and suffering, he or she was long-lived to such an extent, he or she remained alive for such a period, his or her life ended in this way” are mere expressions. 
In this way, a bodhisattva realizes in a true manner the progression of the world of sentient beings,1054 the progression of the external world,1055 the eight subjects of investigation that relate to the world,1056 and the nature of the world in an ultimate sense.1057 Therefore, he or she is said to be “one who knows the world.” Moreover, after seeing someone who is senior to himor herself or who has superior spiritual qualities, a bodhisattva addresses properly and, after standing up, offers a seat to this person and performs acts of salutation, prostration, standing up in his or her presence, making the gesture of joined palms, and respectful behavior. 
On the other hand, after seeing someone who is equal to himor herself in age or spiritual qualities, speaks to properly and gives him or her a friendly greeting with gentle and pleasant forms of speech. 
He or she does not, having resorted to pride, try to raise himor herself up . 
In addition, after seeing someone who is his or her lesser either in age or spiritual qualities, , according to his or her abilities, encourages with regard to the enhancement of one’s spiritual qualities. 
He or she also covers up and does not reveal the genuine faults that would cause that person to become embarrassed. 
In addition, he or she does not treat that person with contempt. 
After realizing that an individual is seeking some matter of a spiritual or material nature, does not turn away or frown. 
also does not humiliate a person who has fallen into misfortune. 
One greets them saying, “Welcome, please draw near,” and sets them at ease1058 in a proper manner. 
According to one’s abilities, one draws them 1059 in a proper manner, using both spiritual and material methods. 
does not falsely display toward beings that he or she possesses depth .1060 One is not haughty because of a somewhat elevated status.1061 One does not fail to attend to beings in whatever manner they are received, whether they are ill or in good health, using all one’s resources1062 and employing benevolent physical and verbal actions. 
Just as with those with whom he or she is acquainted, is also a friend and companion toward all those with whom he or she is not acquainted, and refrains from all antagonism. 
To the utmost of his or her abilities and with all his or her strength, does what is beneficial for all sentient beings who have no protector and have no refuge. 
does not, in any manner, cause suffering or mental unhappiness for others but thinks, “I sincerely hope that these do not remain in a discontented state for even a moment.” For this very reason, when he or she laughs with others it is only a proper form of laughter, not one that is improper. 
He or she also does not use vulgar speech1063 even when conversing with friends whom there is no risk of offending and in whom he or she has supreme confidence. 
He or she also does not remain angry with others for a long period of time. 
Even when angry with others, does not make known sensitive matters relating to them that ought to be kept secret.1064 When attacked by others, either physically or verbally, after considering the situation carefully, either resorts to the rule of Dharma1065 or perceives himor herself alone as being the one who is at fault. 
He or she is steadfast in mind and avoids being fickle. 
Steadfast in conduct of body, speech, and mind, turns away from the fourteen impure activities,1066 covers the six directions,1067 avoids the four kinds of evil companions,1068 and is assisted by the four kinds of virtuous friends.1069 All of these expressions should be understood as they are described in the sutra.1070 In relation to the possession of wealth for the purpose of benefiting this life, is energetic, watchful, one who shares the same way of living,1071 and attains skill in the worldly crafts and occupations. 
He or she does not engage in guile or deceit and is not disposed to cheating others. 
He or she possesses a sense of shame in relation to blameworthy conduct. 
He or she avoids doing harm to the property of others that has been entrusted to him or her. 
He or she does not break his or her word on a loan that is taken from others. 
Similarly, is also skilled in the principles of ordinary secular behavior and the acts that are beneficial to the world. 
When requested by others to provide assistance with regard to various matters that need to be accomplished, does so; he or she does not shrink from and does not equivocate.1073 He or she undertakes an activity in an excellent manner, not in an improper manner. 
When governing, does so in a just manner, not in an unjust manner. 
He or she also does not take pleasure in punishments. 
After turning the general populace away from immorality, he or she causes them to take up morality. 
Similarly, is endowed with the eight forms of noble expression—that is, he or she is endowed with the qualities of saying in relation to something that was seen, “I saw it”; in relation to something that was heard, “I heard it”; in relation to something that was thought, “I thought it”; in relation to something that was realized, “I realized it”; in relation to something that was not seen, “I did not see it”; in relation to something that was not heard, “I did not hear it”; in relation to something that was not thought, “I did not think it”; and in relation to something that was not realized, “I did not realize it.” A bodhisattva who is endowed with these kinds of qualities knows in a true manner everything as it ought to be understood in relation to the world and as it relates to that ought to be observed in the world. 
Therefore, he or she is said to be “one who knows the world.” Regarding this , how does a bodhisattva apply himor herself to the four reliances?1074 Here a bodhisattva listens to the Dharma from another person as one who is seeking meaning, not as one who is seeking an excellent form of literary expression. 
As one who seeks meaning when listening to the Dharma and not one who seeks literary expression, the bodhisattva who relies on meaning even listens respectfully to Dharma teachings that are given using vernacular speech. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva knows both “black” expressions and “great” expressions1075 as they truly are. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva whose faith and purity of mind toward the Tathāgata are firmly placed, and who is singularly devoted to speech, relies upon the Tathāgata’s sutras that are of definitive meaning; he or she does not rely on that are of provisional meaning. 
A bodhisattva who relies on the sutras that are of definitive meaning cannot be led away from this Dharma and Vinaya. 
That is to say, the distinctions relating to the subjects that are mentioned in a variety of ways in the sutras of provisional meaning are such that one cannot form definite opinions about them and they are a source of uncertainty. 
Furthermore, if a bodhisattva is uncertain about the sutras of definitive meaning, then he or she can be led away from this Dharma and Vinaya. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva is one who regards the knowledge that is gained through realization as most important, not the comprehension of the Dharma teachings and their meanings that is gained merely through listening and reflection. 
Having realized that what one understands with the knowledge that derives from meditation cannot be understood with the comprehension that is gained merely through listening and reflection, he or she does not, after having listened to the most profound Dharma teachings that were explained by the tathāgatas, reject or criticize them. 
This is the manner in which a bodhisattva practices the four reliances. Moreover, this is also the manner in which he or she becomes skilled in their practice. 
that which pertains to the meaning that was taught, that which pertains to its correctness, that which pertains to the Teacher, and that which pertains to the knowledge that consists of spiritual realization and that derives from meditation. 
Moreover, the four reliances jointly elucidate the unerring means of deliverance for a bodhisattva who has undertaken the correct form of practice. 
What are the four informative knowledge1079 that are possessed by bodhisattvas? 
skill regarding the heaps,1086 skill regarding the constituents,1087 skill regarding the bases,1088 skill regarding dependent origination,1089 and skill regarding proper and improper conditions.1090 By means of these four types , a bodhisattva becomes highly realized regarding all Dharma teachings and most proficient at revealing to others. 
If there is nothing higher than this about which can gain perfect knowledge, how could there be anything to reveal to others? 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s accumulation that leads to enlightenment? 
Moreover, it should be understood that this twofold form of accumulation has an extensive classification, for example as was presented in the chapter entitled “One’s Own and Others’ Aims.”1091 Furthermore, this accumulation of merit and wisdom should be understood as small during a bodhisattva’s first period of countless kalpas,1092 middling during the second , and great during the third . 
How does a bodhisattva practice the thirty-seven factors that are conducive to enlightenment?1093 Here, relying upon the four forms of informative knowledge and on the basis of the wisdom that is supported by means,1094 a bodhisattva comes to know the thirty-seven spiritual qualities that are conductive to enlightenment as they truly are; however, he or she does not actualize them. 
Regarding this , one comes to know as they truly are according to the system of the Listeners’ Vehicle that this entire topic should be understood as it is explained in The Stage of a Listener.1095 How does a bodhisattva come to know the thirty-seven spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment as they truly are according to the system of the Great Vehicle? 
Here a bodhisattva dwells in relation to the body as one who watches the body, but he or she does not conceive of the body as a body that exists. 
Nor does he or she as being completely, and in every way, nonexistent. 
, he or she accurately realizes the ineffable state of being that is the body’s true nature. 
This is his or her ultimate form of closely placed recollection that consists of watching the body in relation to the body. 
Moreover, it should be understood that, for the conventional method of practice, the closely placed recollection that consists of watching the body in relation to the body corresponds to a bodhisattva’s knowledge of an immeasurable number of doctrinal formulations.1096 The remaining forms of closely placed recollection and the remaining forms of the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment should be understood in a manner that is similar to the closely placed recollection that consists of watching the body in relation to the body. 
He or she also does not conceive of the abandonment that is accomplished by means of this as a cessation and does not conceive of the causes that bring about the attainment of that as a path. 
Moreover, he or she accurately realizes the true nature of suffering, the true nature of origination, the true nature of cessation, and the true nature of the path, in terms of the ineffable state of being that is their true nature. 
This represents meditation on the ultimate nature of the truths, in a manner that relies upon meditation upon the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
By contrast, the bodhisattva’s conventional form of meditation upon the object of the truths should be regarded as corresponding to knowledge of an immeasurable number of doctrinal formulations. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s avoidance of conceptualization in relation to these spiritual qualities1098 should be regarded as his or her quiescence.1099 In addition, the knowledge of these spiritual qualities that accurately realizes their ultimate nature and the knowledge of the immeasurable doctrinal formulations that are made in relation to them should be regarded as insight. 
Regarding this , in brief a bodhisattva’s quiescence should be understood as having four aspects: 
that which is the necessary antecedent of ultimate and conventional forms of knowledge; that which is the result of ultimate and conventional forms of knowledge; that which conveys effortlessly in relation to all elaborative conceptions;1100 and that which, by virtue of the signlessness1101 in relation to the ineffable bare substance and the tranquility of the mind that does not engage in conceptualization, leads to the single taste that is the sameness of all entities. 
By means of these four aspects, the bodhisattvas’ path of quiescence is practiced continually until the knowledge-perception of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment has been perfected and achieved. 
Regarding this , in brief the bodhisattvas’ insight should be understood as having four aspects: 
By means of these four aspects, the bodhisattvas’ path of insight is practiced continually until the knowledge-perception of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment has been perfected and achieved. 
This is a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ quiescence and insight. 
Regarding this , what is the skillful means of bodhisattvas? 
In brief, there are twelve aspects—six are inner forms that have to do with attainment of a buddha’s spiritual qualities and six are outer forms that have to do with the spiritual ripening of sentient beings. 
What are the six inner forms of skillful means that have to do with attainment of a buddha’s spiritual qualities? 
They are a bodhisattva’s regard toward all sentient beings that is accompanied by compassion; the knowledge of all conditioned entities as they truly are; the eagerness for the knowledge of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; the refusal to abandon samsara based upon one’s regard for sentient beings; continued rebirth in samsara in a manner that avoids becoming afflicted based upon his or her thorough knowledge of conditioned entities as they truly are; and the intensity of effort that is based upon one’s eagerness for a buddha’s knowledge. 
These should be understood as the six inner forms of skillful means that have to do with attainment of a buddha’s spiritual qualities. 
What are the six outer forms of skillful means that have to do with the spiritual ripening of sentient beings? 
They are the skillful means through which a bodhisattva causes limited roots of virtue to have immeasurable results; likewise, causes extensive and immeasurable roots of virtue to be developed and collected with little effort; and, likewise, removes the animosity felt by those beings who have a hostile attitude toward the Buddha’s teaching, causes those who have a neutral attitude to take it up, ripens those who have taken it up, and liberates those who have become ripened. 
Regarding this , how does a bodhisattva cause beings’ limited roots of virtue to have immeasurable results? 
Having completed an act of giving, causes to dedicate to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
In this manner, by the power of dedication, a root of virtue that is small, both in terms of its object and its field, is caused to have an unlimited result. 
How does a bodhisattva cause beings to generate extensive and immeasurable roots of virtue with little effort? 
Here a bodhisattva points out the noble fasting observance1105 that is made up of eight precepts to beings who are devoted to such forms of wrongful practice as the month-long fast in which food is not eaten, etc. 
He or she causes them to give up their devotion to the form of fasting that involves hardship and brings about an undesirable result, and causes them to take up this fasting observance that is easy to undertake and brings a great result. 
Similarly, he or she points out the Middle Way that is free of the two extremes to beings who are desirous of liberation but who engage in practices that consist of self-mortification and who have applied themselves in a wrongful manner, and causes them to take up that . 
Similarly, he or she points out correct forms of meditative absorption to beings who are desirous of being reborn in a celestial realm but who have applied themselves in a wrongful manner with such practices as entering fire, falling from a precipice, and abstaining from food, etc., so that they may abide in a state of ease in their current lives and so that they can effortlessly and with ease and mental satisfaction be reborn in a celestial realm in the future. 
In addition, he or she causes those who believe that receiving explanations of Vedic sacred formulas and performing their recitation will lead to a state of purification to take up the activities of receiving explanations of the Buddha’s word, engaging in its recitation, and reflecting on its meaning. 
Moreover, he or she lays open and clarifies the profound Dharma teachings on emptiness that were spoken by the Tathāgata in such ways that, after hearing them, others are caused to generate intense aversion and intense faith . 
If even a single moment of a mind that possesses aversion and faith is considered1106 to collect extensive roots of virtue, how much more would this be true for a continuous series . 
Moreover, a bodhisattva is devoted to the worship of the Three Jewels of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha with a reverential superior attitude and with every kind of excellent and outstanding flower garland and every variety of incense that there is in the world and also causes others throughout the ten directions to develop devotion. 
In addition, filling all the directions with that very reverential superior attitude, he or she rejoices at all worship of the Three Jewels and causes others to rejoice at them as well. 
In addition, he or she practices recollection of the Buddha, recollection of the Dharma, etc., up to recollection of deities, continuously and uninterruptedly, and also causes others to take up . 
Also, he or she rejoices at all the merit of all sentient beings and causes to rejoice as well. 
Moreover, with a superior attitude that is imbued with extensive compassion toward all sentient beings, wishes to take upon himor herself all suffering, and he or she prompts others to adopt this very . 
In addition, with a virtuous mind that is desirous of the trainings, he or she confesses before all the buddhas, the blessed ones, in all the directions all his or her past and present failings and transgressions, and he or she prompts others to adopt this very . 
Through repeatedly confessing his or her failings in this manner, becomes free of all karmic obscurations with little difficulty. 
In addition, a bodhisattva who possesses miraculous powers and has attained mastery of his or her mind acquires limitless merit that is based on the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha, and that is based upon sentient beings, by emitting abundant and manifold kinds of magical emanations throughout all the directions. 
Furthermore, a bodhisattva meditates upon loving-kindness, compassion, joy, and equanimity and also causes others to take up . 
In this way, a bodhisattva produces and causes extensive roots of virtue that have unlimited results to be brought about with little effort. 
How does a bodhisattva remove the animosity that is felt by those beings who have a hostile attitude ? 
ripen those who have taken up and liberate those who have become ripened? 
Here, too, it should be understood that, in brief, there are six types of method that a bodhisattva uses to accomplish these four aims that relate to sentient beings: the benevolent , of standing as an obstacle, that has a dissimilar attitude, that derives from suppression, that relates to returning a favor, and the pure method. 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s benevolent method is as follows. 
Here, at the very outset, a bodhisattva uses gentle and pleasant physical and verbal conduct and conduct that is magnanimous and compliant to remove the animosity within those beings to whom he or she is desirous of teaching the Dharma. 
Having removed their animosity, he or she engenders in them affection and respect. 
Having engendered affection and respect, he or she engenders in them an aspiration for the Dharma. 
Following that, he or she teaches them the Dharma. 
Moreover, the Dharma that he or she teaches is one that is appropriate and easily undertaken, generates an understanding, is meaningful, and at a suitable time, in an orderly manner, and correctly. 
He or she is forbearing of hostility and possesses a sympathetic mind that has the utmost desire to bring spiritual self-discipline to beings. 
He or she brings spiritual self-discipline to beings by means of miraculous powers, reading minds, and teaching a form of Dharma that is efficacious, by requesting others , or by emitting abundant and manifold kinds of magical emanations. 
benefits beings and carries out their aims by explaining in detail those treatises that are filled with meaning in an abbreviated form and by giving a condensed explanation of those that are in an extremely extensive form. 
There are persons who have not understood the intended meaning of the tathāgatas in the profound sutras that were spoken by the tathāgatas with regard to emptiness. 
These are the sutras that declare that entities lack an essential nature, that they are insubstantial, that they do not arise, that they do not cease to exist, that they are identical with space, and that they resemble illusions and dreams. 
Having failed to understand the meaning of these , these persons who are frightened by them reject them completely and totally, declaring, “These were not spoken by the Tathāgata.” Using the benevolent form of skillful means, a bodhisattva properly explains in an orderly manner the intended meaning of these sutras and causes these beings to comprehend them. 
These entities are not completely and totally nonexistent. 
However, they do not possess an essential nature that can be expressed in words. 
Therefore, they are described as “lacking an essential nature.” Even though a real substance1108 that is capable of being described is considered to exist and verbal expressions occur in relation to that , nevertheless the essential nature that is described by means of verbal expressions does not have such a mode of being in an ultimate sense. 
Therefore, are said to be “insubstantial.”1109 And, because this is so, the essential natures of entities that are expressed in words have, from the very beginning, been completely and totally incapable of being found. 
So how could it be that they arise or cease to exist? 
Therefore, it is said that they “do not arise” and they “do not cease to exist.” Consider the following analogy. 
A great variety and profusion of physical objects as well as their actions are observed in space. 
It is also the case that space makes room for those physical objects and their actions, such as those of going, coming, remaining still, rising, falling, retracting , or extending , and the like. 
In a similar way, the conceptions and false notions that resemble physical objects and their actions and that are both created by a variety of expressions and accompanied by attachment to elaborations arise in the ineffable reality that resembles space. 
In addition, the ineffable reality that resembles space makes room for all those conceptions and false notions that resemble the variety of physical objects and their actions and that are both created by a variety of expressions and accompanied by attachment to elaborations. 
Moreover, when bodhisattvas, by means of an excellent knowledge, have completely and totally removed those false conceptions and notions that are caused to arise by expressions and that are accompanied by attachment to elaborations, the ārya knowledge of those supremely excellent bodhisattvas causes the ineffable reality that is a mere absence of all the essential natures that are expressed in words and that is a space-like purity to become evident. 
do not seek any other essential nature which is superior to that. 
Therefore, entities are said to be “identical with space.” For example, an illusion is something that does not truly exist in the way that it appears. 
Nor is an object that is created by a magical illusion something that is completely and totally nonexistent. 
Similarly, entities do not truly exist in the way that they appear to immature beings by the power of their habituation to expressions. 
Nor are they completely and totally nonexistent, by virtue of their ultimate, ineffable nature. 
Therefore, they are said to “resemble illusions.” In this way, a bodhisattva does not put forward anything, does not reject anything, does not subtract anything, does not add anything, and does not cause anything to disappear in relation to this entire “entity-source.”1110 He or she perceives reality as it is and makes it known in just that manner. 
This should be known as a bodhisattva’s benevolent method. 
What is a bodhisattva’s method of standing as an obstacle? 
Here a bodhisattva stands as an obstacle to beings who are seeking the ten personal articles for the body,1111 such things as food and drink, etc., by saying, “If you honor your mother, honor your father, honor spiritual asceticism, honor the position of brahmins,” and so on as described earlier,1112 up to “If you in abide in morality after having accepted it, I shall give you as much of the personal articles for the body, food and drink, etc., as you desire. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who is capable and has the power stands as an obstacle to beings who are guilty of offenses, who have become corrupted, who have committed harmful acts, who have been seized by others for the purpose of being killed, bound, cut, beaten, reviled, threatened, or exiled, or who have been seized for the purpose of being pledged, bartered, or sold , by saying, “If you honor your mother, honor your father,” etc., at length as before, “I shall free you from this predicament.” Moreover, a bodhisattva stands as an obstacle to beings who are imperiled by the king, robbers, water, fire, humans, spirits, loss of livelihood, or a bad reputation, by saying, “If you honor your mother,” etc., at length as before, “I shall save you from this danger.” Moreover, a bodhisattva stands as an obstacle to beings who wish to meet with something agreeable or beings who wish to be separated from something disagreeable, by saying, “If you honor your mother,” etc., at length as before, “I shall bring it about that you meet with something agreeable,” or “ separated from something that is disagreeable.” Moreover, a bodhisattva stands as an obstacle to beings who have been stricken by illness and are in bad health, by saying, “If you honor your mother,” etc., at length as before, “I shall free you from the suffering caused by this illness.” These beings for whom a bodhisattva has stood as an obstacle in these ways will be caused ever so quickly to take up virtue and abandon evil deeds in the manner that is desired. 
This is what is referred to as a bodhisattva’s “method of standing as an obstacle.” On the other hand, when those beings for whom a bodhisattva has stood as an obstacle to the objects that were just described do not ever so quickly behave in the manner that is desired, he or she refuses to give the objects that were described to the beings who seek them, out of a desire to benefit them. 
However, he or she should not do so with an attitude that wishes to withhold . 
Rather, out of a desire to benefit those beings who are experiencing misfortune, those who are in a state of danger, those who are desirous of meeting with something agreeable or being separated from something disagreeable, and those who are afflicted by the suffering of an illness, he or she should remain indifferent to them for a certain period of time. 
However, he or she should not do so with an attitude that is indifferent to them or an attitude that genuinely refuses to protect them. 
These beings toward whom a bodhisattva is behaving in this way with harsh actions but not with a attitude will at a later time be caused to abandon evil deeds and take up virtuous ones in the manner that is desired. 
In addition, a bodhisattva should cause those beings who are not seeking something from him or her, those beings who are not experiencing misfortune, and so on, up to those beings who have not been stricken by an illness, but who are his or her acquaintances and friends, to take up these very same forms of virtue—namely, that of honoring one’s mother, and so on, up to that of observing the morality that has been undertaken. 
If those beings who have been urged by a bodhisattva to take up virtue in this manner should fail to practice it due to an inconstant temperament, a bodhisattva should, out of a desire to benefit them, give the appearance of having become angered. 
Out of a desire to benefit , he or she should give the appearance of being in opposition to their interests; however, he should not genuinely be opposed to them. 
Out of a desire to benefit, he or she should even bring about some worldly1113 harm; however, he or she should not genuinely have a desire to inflict harm. 
The attitude that is possessed by a bodhisattva toward these beings is one that is at variance with his or her conduct. 
It is by this that he or she causes them to abandon evil deeds and take up virtuous ones. 
Therefore, this method that brings sentient beings to a state of spiritual self-discipline is called a bodhisattva’s “ that has a dissimilar attitude.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s method that derives from suppression?1114 Here a bodhisattva who is a lord1115 or a king or who has attained authority should correctly govern his own retinue or his own subjects the following: 
The beings who are frightened by these great forms of punishment will then abandon evil deeds and, having adopted virtuous deeds, abide in them. 
On the basis of this method, which constitutes a form of forceful suppression, even those beings who do not wish to engage in virtuous deeds will do so. 
Therefore, it is called “the method that derives from suppression.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s method that relates to returning a favor? 
And he or she should express the wish that they return the favor by taking up virtue by saying the following: 
“If you would honor your mother, honor your father,” and so on, up to “ abide in morality after having accepted it, this alone would be the greatest way for you to repay my assistance.” Using this means, he or she causes others to take up these forms of virtue. 
Therefore, this is called “the method that relates to returning a favor.” Regarding this topic, what is a bodhisattva’s pure method? 
Here a bodhisattva who is abiding on the bodhisattva the stage that is the perfect manner of going1116 and who has completed the perfection of the bodhisattva path takes birth among the assembly of deities in Tuṣita Heaven so that immeasurable numbers of beings might correctly develop the following aspiration and generate it frequently: 
“A certain bodhisattva who has taken birth among the assembly of deities in Tuṣita Heaven before long shall attain unsurpassed complete and true enlightenment in the Rose Apple Continent. 
May we be reborn in the presence of this bodhisattva.” Then, after having passed away from Tuṣita Heaven and its assembly of deities, he is reborn in an exalted or a highly regarded family—that is, in a royal family or the family of a priest. 
Likewise, he gives up great pleasures and departs in order to cause beings to develop great regard . 
After that, he takes up the practice of austerities in order to cause those beings who are devoted to austerities to give up that desire. 
Then, he attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment in order to cause beings other than himself to long for the shared form of enlightenment and liberation.1117 Then, after having attained unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, he reflects to himself, “So that the declaration of Dharma does not become something of little consequence, now Brahmā himself should request that the Blessed One teach the Dharma,” and waits for Brahmā to make this request before he teaches the Dharma to beings, in order to engender in beings respect for the Dharma. 
Then, with the eye of a buddha, he gazes upon the world1118 in order to dispel the following wrong belief among certain beings, “Upon receiving a request from Brahmā, he has taught the Dharma out of respect for Brahmā. 
because he was prompted by someone else, not because of his own compassion for sentient beings and not because he realized that it was fitting for him alone to do so.” Following that, he sets in motion in the world the wheel of the Dharma that has not been set in motion before. 
In this manner, he teaches the Dharma and declares the precepts that relate to the training. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “pure method,” compared to which there is no other method that is higher, more superior, or more excellent. 
This represents the abbreviated and detailed presentation of the bodhisattva’s six types of skillful means that remove the animosity felt by those beings who have a hostile attitude, that cause those who are neutral to take it up, that ripen those who have taken up , and that liberate those who have become ripened. 
There are no of greater significance than these and none besides these. 
This completes the skillful means of bodhisattvas. 
Regarding this , what are the bodhisattvas’ forms of retention?1119 In brief, they should be regarded as being of four types: 
retention of the Dharma, retention of meaning, retention by means of spells, and the retention that is directed toward attainment of a bodhisattva’s forbearance. 
Here a bodhisattva attains a development of power1120 consisting of wisdom and recollection such that by means of it he or she can retain for an immeasurable period of time1121 immeasurable numbers of scriptures containing collections of words, assertions, and syllables that were not committed to memory and were not recited aloud, in the order that they were created and in the order that they were arranged, merely by having listened to them. 
is the same as before, but in this case there is this difference. 
retains for an immeasurable period of time immeasurable numbers of meanings relating to the very same Dharma teachings , without having committed them to memory and without having reviewed them in the mind. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “retention by means of spells.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s retention that is directed toward attainment of a bodhisattva’s forbearance? 
Here a bodhisattva who has himor herself practiced the causes fully,1122 who is possessed of wisdom, lives in solitude, who neither utters speech nor comes within the sight of anyone else, who likewise eats in moderation, does not eat in a haphazard manner,1123 and eats only one kind of food,1124 who is dedicated to meditation, sleeps only a little at night, and maintains a high degree of alertness contemplates, ponders, and examines the meaning of those mantra spells that the Tathāgata uttered for the sake of attaining forbearance, such as : 
iṭi miṭi kiṭi bhikṣānti padāni svā hā.1125 Having correctly undertaken these mantra spells and without having heard their meaning from anyone else, he or she realizes it in the following manner: 
“There is no realization of the meaning of these mantra spells. 
Their meaning is that they have no meaning.” Following that, he or she does not seek any further meaning. 
In this way, he or she gains a correct realization of the meanings of these mantra spells. 
Having gained a correct realization of the meanings of these mantra spells, he or she then gains a correct realization of the meanings of all entities that conforms with that very . 
“No meaning that pertains to a essence can be established by means of any expressions in relation to any entity. 
This ineffable essential nature is the meaning that represents their essential nature.” After he or she has correctly realized the meaning that represents the essential nature of all entities in this way, does not seek any other meaning. 
What a bodhisattva attains on the strength of these mantra spells is called a “forbearance.” Through having gained that , a bodhisattva will before long attain the purity of his or her superior attitude. 
This should be understood as the retention that is directed toward the attainment of a bodhisattva’s forbearance. 
Regarding this , after having gone beyond the first span of time that is made up of countless kalpas,1126 a bodhisattva who has entered the stage of a pure superior attitude1127 attains forms of the retention of the Dharma and the retention of meanings that are sure, firm, and exalted. 
Prior to that time, they are attained on the strength of aspirational prayers or on the basis of meditative absorptions, but they are not sure, firm, or exalted. 
However, the retention that is directed toward the attainment of a bodhisattva’s forbearance is only attained in the manner that was just described. 
Furthermore, a bodhisattva will attain all of these retention if he or she possesses four qualities; he or she will not do so if any one of them is missing. 
What are the four qualities? 
He or she does not have attachment for sensory pleasures. 
He or she does not develop envy toward those who have attained an elevated status and he or she remains free of envy. 
He or she takes pleasure in the Dharma and is devoted to the Dharma that relates to the bodhisattva collection or to the manuals for that collection. 
What is a bodhisattva’s aspirational prayer?1128 In brief, it should be regarded as being of five types: 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s initial development of the mind unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment is called “the aspirational prayer of generating mind.” A bodhisattva’s aspirational prayer to be reborn in the future in happy migratory states that are favorable to the aims of sentient beings is called “the aspirational prayer that relates to birth.” The aspirational prayer to the correct discernment of entities,1129 as well as the aspirational prayer to the objects of those meditations that relate to such spiritual qualities as the immeasurables is called a bodhisattva’s “aspirational prayer that relates to the field of action.” The brief or extensive form of aspirational prayer to obtain in the future all the spiritual qualities and all the virtuous qualities of a bodhisattva is called a bodhisattva’s “correct aspirational prayer.” The great aspirational prayer of a bodhisattva should be understood on the basis of that very correct aspirational prayer. 
Moreover, it is of ten types: 
The first aspirational prayer that is called a “great aspirational prayer” is to carry out every manner of immeasurable worship and honor of the tathāgatas in the future. 
Having perceived here how that very reality that is an ineffable essential nature becomes defiled by numerous faults through one’s having been overpowered by the mental afflictions and suffering that are generated by wrongful concepts , a bodhisattva’s state of mental stability that is preceded by the avoidance of any future aspiration for those is called “one-pointed concentration on wishlessness.” What is one-pointed concentration on signlessness? 
Having cleared away from that very reality that is an ineffable essential nature all the signs that consist of mistaken notions and verbal elaborations , a bodhisattva’s state of mental stability as it truly is, in a tranquil manner, and in a manner that brings it to mind is called “one-pointed concentration on signlessness.” What, then, is the reason for setting forth these three forms of one-pointed concentration? 
It is because there are none that are more significant or greater than these. 
The two are existence and nonexistence. 
Regarding them, conditioned and unconditioned are what exist, and the self and belonging to a self are what do not exist. 
Regarding this, the formulation of the one-pointed concentration on wishlessness is based on the fact that one should not have any aspiration for the conditioned entities that do exist, meaning that one should as disagreeable.1132 In addition, the formulation of the one-pointed concentration on signlessness is based on the fact that one should have an aspiration for the unconditioned entity of nirvana, meaning that one should apprehend it with a correct attitude of delight. 
On the other hand, a bodhisattva should neither develop an aspiration for, nor avoid developing an aspiration for, the reality that relates to what does not exist.1133 Rather, that should be regarded accurately as relates to what is nonexistent. 
And it should be understood that the formulation of the one-pointed concentration on emptiness on the basis of this perception. 
This is how a bodhisattva practices in relation to these three one-pointed concentration and it is also how he or she accurately understands their formulations. 
In addition, by taking up the accurate doctrinal formulations of the alternate versions1134 of these three one-pointed concentration and by taking up the methods of meditating upon them, he or she will also accurately understand in relation to which the listeners train themselves and attain realization. 
There are four summary Dharma statements which the buddhas and bodhisattvas teach in order to bring about the spiritual purification of sentient beings. 
What are the four? 
Therefore, they are called summary Dharma statements. 
They are also called summary statements because that were constantly repeated by the ancient munis, who possess tranquil minds. 
How does a bodhisattva perceive all formations as impermanent? 
Here a bodhisattva recognizes all formations as impermanent through having ascertained that the essential nature of all formations that is expressed in words is one that has never existed.1137 Moreover, through ascertaining that the arising and perishing is caused by the failure to realize correctly their ineffable reality,1138 he or she perceives all formations, which are whose essential nature is ineffable, as impermanent. 
considers past formations that have already arisen and passed away, and does not ascertain either a cause or an essential nature that relates to them. 
Therefore, he or she perceives that they do not have any mode of existence that relates either to a cause or an essential nature. 
He or she considers the of the present that have arisen but not yet passed away, and does not ascertain a cause in relation to them, because they are results that have been produced.1139 On the other hand, he or she does ascertain1140 an essential nature in relation to them, because they have not yet ceased to exist. 
Therefore, he or she perceives that they have a mode of existence that relates to an essential nature, but not one that relates to a cause. 
He or she considers the future formations that have neither arisen nor passed away, and ascertains a cause , because they are not results that have been produced. 
However, he or she does not an essential nature, because they have not yet come into being. 
Therefore, a bodhisattva perceives that they have a mode of existence that relates to a cause but not one that relates to an essential nature. 
Having examined the ongoing and unbroken continuum of formations in relation to the three times, he or she perceives the three attributes of conditioned entities in every single moment of a formation. 
He or she recognizes a fourth attribute of conditioned entities in the moment subsequent . 
Regarding , immediately following the destruction of the essential nature of the formation that existed in the preceding moment, he or she perceives the appearance of the essential nature of a momentary formation that had not existed before. 
This is its “arising.” He or she perceives that which has arisen does not perish during that moment . 
This is its “duration.” He or she perceives the otherness or the differentness of that which has come into being in comparison to the essential nature of the formation the previous moment and has now ceased. 
This is its “aging.” Subsequent to its arising, he or she perceives the destruction of the essential nature of that very momentary formation that had arisen. 
This is its “disappearance.” He or she recognizes that what constitutes the essential nature is limited to the moment during which a formation has arisen. 
that the arising, duration, and aging form part of its essential nature as well. 
However, he or she does not perceive anything else as forming part of its essential nature. 
He or she also perceives accurately that the passing away of the essential nature of momentary formations in the moment following also applies to their arising, etc. Taken altogether, these four attributes of conditioned entities, in brief, can also be characterized in relation to two states: 
those that are characterized as being existent and those that are characterized as being nonexistent. 
Regarding this , existent is one attribute of conditioned entities that was formulated by the Blessed One. 
nonexistent1141 is a second attribute that was formulated. 
Moreover, the existence of formations that is characterized as the “modification of duration”1142 is a third attribute that was formulated.1143 Regarding this , except for a formation’s bare reality, a bodhisattva perceives that its arising, duration, aging, and impermanence never achieve a substantive essence.1144 Why is that? 
does ascertain a formation’s bare reality that arises, but he or she does not an arising, a duration, an aging, or an impermanence that are separate from that . 
He or she also ascertains a formation’s bare reality that endures , that aging, and that destruction but does not a duration, an aging, or an impermanence from that. 
By means of reasoning too, a bodhisattva examines these arising, etc., and fails to ascertain that they exist as real substances. 
If arising were an entity that existed separately from the formations of form and the rest, it would be something that arises , just as the formations of form, etc., arise on their own. 
If that were so, there would be two births, the birth of the formation and the birth of its arising. 
Regarding this, the birth of the arising would have to be either something that is identical with the birth of the formation or something that is distinct from it. 
If it were identical with it, then the notion that arising is a real substance would be incoherent, because it would be logically untenable to maintain that a distinct arising exists as a real substance. 
In that case, an arising that brings a formation into being would not be one that is logically sound. 
Just as with arising, it should be understood that the same detailed for duration, aging, and destruction. 
If that which is called “destruction” were an entity that existed absolutely in the sense of having its own essential nature, then that would also be something that both comes into being and ceases to exist. 
And when that destruction came into being, then it would bring about the cessation of all formations. 
If this were so, then just as with one who has entered the state of composure that is a cessation,1145 the suspension of the mind and mental factors would occur with little difficulty.1146 In addition, with the cessation of that destruction, those formations that had previously been made to cease would once again come into being, because the destruction of those no longer existed. 
Therefore, it is unreasonable that destruction could that comes into being and ceases. 
It is also unreasonable that a son of good family or a daughter of good family who believes that a substantively real form of existence is one that remains in existence at all times1147 or that a nominal form of existence is one that exists absolutely in that it possesses a essential nature,1148 could dissatisfaction1149 and detachment, and liberation. 
However, it is reasonable for one who perceives the opposite of these to do so.1150 These are the ways in which a bodhisattva accurately realizes that all formations are impermanent. 
Moreover, because the formations that are impermanent in this way exist as an series, a bodhisattva perceives that they serve as the basis for the three types of suffering—that is, the suffering of conditioned existence, the suffering of change, and the suffering of suffering.1151 In this way, a bodhisattva accurately realizes that “all formations are suffering.” Furthermore, a bodhisattva accurately realizes the two types of insubstantiality that relate to conditioned and unconditioned entities— the insubstantiality of the person and the insubstantiality of entities. 
There is no entity whose essential nature is capable of being described in words that exists in relation to all the objects that are described in words. 
In this way, a bodhisattva accurately realizes that “all entities lack a self.”1152 The subsequent complete cessation of those very formations whose causes were previously eradicated and the absolute inability for any others to be produced or appear again is called “nirvana.” Further, it should be understood as a state of peace because it is one in which the mental afflictions and suffering have been brought to an end. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who has not yet attained a pure superior attitude or a follower of the Listeners’ Vehicle who has not perceived truth develops a firm conviction1153 about such a nirvana and declares, “Nirvana is a state of peace.” However, he or she does not have an accurate understanding of this nirvana and does not engage it with a correct knowledge-perception. 
Nevertheless, there is this1154 proper attention1155 . 
For example, consider the son of a king, or the son of an eminent householder, who has been raised within the inner apartments by a king or an eminent householder. 
Suppose that the king or the eminent householder provides a toy deer-cart, an ox-and-horse cart, or elephant-cart for that tender youth. 
As the young son of the king or the young son of the eminent householder plays with, enjoys, and amuses himself with those , he thinks of the toy deer as deer, the toy oxen and horses as oxen and horses, and the toy elephants as elephants. 
Then, one day, after the son has grown up and his faculties have matured, the king or the eminent householder describes real deer, and so on, up to describes real elephants. 
After hearing those descriptions, the son of the king or the son of the eminent householder has the following thought: 
“The king is describing my deer-cart,” or “The eminent householder ,” and so on, up to “ is describing my elephant-cart,” or “.” Then, on a different occasion, the king or the eminent householder takes his son outside the home and shows him real deer, and so on, up to shows real elephants. 
After seeing those , this time gains for himself a genuine understanding. 
Then he becomes embarrassed by his previous conviction and reflects to himself, “These are the real deer-carts that my father had been describing to me for such a long time,” and so on, up to “ the real elephant-carts. 
However, I had developed the firm conviction about those unreal objects, which are mere imitations, mere representations and semblances .” In the same way, the father-like buddhas, as well as the bodhisattvas who have attained the great stages and perceived nirvana directly, describe nirvana exactly as they have seen it to those son-like bodhisattvas who have been raised inside the home of samsara and who do not yet possess the pure superior attitude, and they also to those listeners who have not yet seen truth. 
On the basis of an understanding that relies merely upon the sound , those also maintain a strong conviction regarding the excellent qualities of nirvana for a long time. 
When those bodhisattvas who have gained a pure superior attitude1156 through the ripening and growth of their virtuous accumulations and those listeners who have perceived truth develop a direct knowledge1157 in relation to nirvana, they also develop a realization that accords with reality “This is the nirvana that pertains to all the listeners and solitary realizers and that the buddhas and bodhisattvas describe. 
Previously, due to our immature understanding, we did not develop an accurate conviction about it. 
For example, suppose that a certain great physician were to treat some person who was afflicted by an illness with suitable medicines in order to cure the illness that that was experiencing. 
Suppose that the great physician, having realized that the previous illness had been cured and that the illness that had arisen subsequently needed to be treated by different kinds of medicine, were to stop the previous treatment of medicine and were to prescribe a different medicine that was suitable . 
An immature afflicted person who had developed a firm conviction about the previous medicines and who thought that they alone were beneficial would not believe the great physician who prescribed medicines at earlier and later times and who said directly, “Those former medicines will not be beneficial for your subsequent illness.” would not have faith in words. 
In just this way, it should be understood that immature bodhisattvas and listeners resemble . 
The bodhisattva or listener who has faith in these does not generate the slightest doubt or uncertainty about anything that the Tathāgata has asserted. 
Moreover, he or she climbs onto the Dharma chariot of the Tathāgata’s assertions that resembles a chariot drawn by well-bred horses and possesses all the excellent components and equipment and, like a skillful driver, continues traveling ever so quickly and without delay, until he or she has reached and attained the stages. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the seventeenth chapter, entitled “The Spiritual Qualities That Are Conducive to Enlightenment.” Summary verse: 
Five should be understood as the marvelous and wonderful qualities of a bodhisattva who is training in the vehicle unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
What are the five? 
These five marvelous and wonderful qualities of bodhisattvas are not held in common with any sentient beings other than themselves. 
There are five that do not constitute marvels1159 for a bodhisattva but whose possession causes a bodhisattva to be called “one who possesses marvelous and wonderful qualities.” What are the five? 
When it is a bodhisattva’s nature to be pleased by the suffering that is caused by benefiting others and he or she accepts in its entirety the suffering that is caused by benefiting others, this is the first that does not constitute a marvel for a bodhisattva but whose possession causes a bodhisattva to be called “one who possesses marvelous and wonderful qualities.” Moreover, when a bodhisattva, knowing the faults of samsara and also knowing the good qualities of nirvana, desires to bring about the spiritual purification of sentient beings and it is his or her nature to be pleased by that very , and he or she accepts samsara solely for the purpose of bringing about the spiritual purification of sentient beings, this is the second that does not constitute a marvel for a bodhisattva, as before. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva, while aware of the pleasurable experience that comes from observing silence,1160 desires to bring about the spiritual purification of sentient beings and it is his or her nature to be pleased by that very , and he or she undertakes to teach the Dharma to sentient beings solely for the purpose of bringing about the spiritual purification of sentient beings, this is the third that does not constitute a marvel for a bodhisattva, as before. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva desires to bring about the spiritual purification of sentient beings and it is his or her nature to be pleased by that very , and he or she sincerely delivers over to all sentient beings roots of virtue that consist of the six perfections he or she has collected solely for the purpose of bringing about the spiritual purification of sentient beings, and he or she does not seek any maturation for having delivered that , this is the fourth quality that does not constitute a marvel for a bodhisattva, as before. 
Moreover, when a bodhisattva makes the concerns of others his or her very own concern and is observed to be engaging in every kind of action that accomplishes the aims of others, this is the fifth quality that does not constitute a marvel for a bodhisattva but whose possession causes a bodhisattva to be called “one who possesses marvelous and wonderful qualities.” A bodhisattva should be understood as being even-minded toward all sentient beings in five ways. 
What are the five? 
by virtue of the initial aspiration in which he or she generates the intention to achieve enlightenment, for a bodhisattva generates that mind equally on behalf of all sentient beings. 
He or she is even-minded by virtue of his or her sympathetic mind. 
A bodhisattva is even-minded by virtue of his or her affectionate mind, in that he or she all sentient beings in the same way as of an only child . 
Having realized the term sattva1161 both in relation to all sentient beings and in relation to dependently arisen formations, a bodhisattva maintains an even mind toward all sentient beings by virtue of having a mind that the sameness of entities, which is to say, “The true nature of any single sentient being is of all .” A bodhisattva maintains an even mind toward all sentient beings by virtue of having a mind that pursues the welfare in such a way that he or she acts on behalf of all in the same way that he or she does on behalf of a single sentient being. 
These are the five ways in which a bodhisattva is even-minded toward sentient beings. 
All the acts of assistance that bodhisattvas in relation to sentient beings should be understood as being of five types. 
What are the five? 
They are providing advice about correct livelihood; providing proper instruction about meaningful activities that are being pursued in a contrary manner; giving protection to those who lack a protector, who are suffering, who are wretched, and who have no one to rely upon; providing instruction about the path that leads to a happy migratory state; and providing instruction in the three vehicles. 
There are five ways in which sentient beings exert themselves to carry out acts of requital toward a bodhisattva who has benefited them. 
What are the five? 
They give protection to those who lack a protector, who are suffering, who are wretched, and who have no one to rely upon. 
They take up and worship the Dharma that was spoken by the Tathāgata, by reciting it aloud or by making a written copy. 
There are five conditions that are always wished for1162 by a bodhisattva. 
What are the five? 
They are to propitiate1163 the buddhas when they appear; to hear the six perfections and the collection of bodhisattva scriptures directly from those very buddhas; the ability to ripen sentient beings in every way; to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; and that there exist concord among the listeners1164 following the attainment of enlightenment. 
Five conditions render fruitful the methods of practice that a bodhisattva undertakes in order to carry out beneficial activities on behalf of sentient beings. 
What are the five? 
From the very outset, a bodhisattva here desires to benefit and bring happiness to sentient beings. 
He or she truly knows what will benefit and bring happiness . He or she is one whose mind is free of error. 
This entire should be understood as it was described previously in the chapter entitled “Worship, Service, and the Immeasurables.”1165 Summary verse: 
Correct methods of practice, Decline and, likewise, improvement; Counterfeit and genuine qualities; Likewise, providing guidance. 
It should be understood that all of the correct methods of practice undertaken by a bodhisattva are contained within five methods of practice. 
What are the five? 
Regarding this , using the method of practice that safeguards, a bodhisattva preserves his or her intelligence by means of an innate understanding that takes up spiritual qualities very quickly. 
He or she preserves recollection by means of a recollection that retains those spiritual qualities that have been taken up. 
He or she preserves knowledge by means of a understanding that examines the meanings of those spiritual qualities that have been retained. 
He or she achieves penetrating insight1166 by means of a right wisdom that both avoids the causes that contribute to the diminishing of one’s intelligence, recollection, and understanding and cultivates the causes that contribute to their retention and development. 
He or she watches over his or her own mind by guarding the doors of the faculties. 
He or she watches over the minds of others by correctly complying with their minds.1167 Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s irreproachable method of practice is one that is unerring, fervent, immeasurable, and constant in relation to virtuous qualities, and it is one that dedicates to enlightenment. 
For its part, the method of practice the power of analysis should be understood as the one throughout the entire stage of conduct that is based upon devotion.1168 The method of practice a pure superior attitude should be regarded as the one on both the stage of a pure superior attitude and the stage of practicing conduct.1169 The method of practice in which certainty has been reached should be regarded as the one on the stage of certainty, the stage of certain conduct, and the stage that is the perfect manner of going.1170 This is how all of the correct methods of practice that are undertaken by a bodhisattva are contained within these five methods of practice. 
It should be understood that five qualities contribute to a bodhisattva’s decline. 
What are the five? 
It should be understood that five qualities contribute to a bodhisattva’s improvement. 
What are the five? 
By contrast, it should be understood that they are, respectively, the opposite of those very five bad qualities. 
It should be understood that, for a bodhisattva, there are five faults that constitute the counterfeit qualities of bodhisattvas. 
What are the five? 
It should be understood that, for a bodhisattva, there are five genuine spiritual qualities that pertain to bodhisattvas. 
What are the five? 
In brief, bodhisattvas correctly instruct disciples in relation to ten subjects. 
What are the ten? 
Prophecy, the occurrence of certainty, What is to be done out of necessity, What is to be done continually, And the final one is what is preeminent. In brief, there are six ways in which the tathāgatas prophesy that a bodhisattva will attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
What are the six? 
at a definite time, saying, “At such a time, he or she will attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment,” or at an indefinite time—that is, they do not declare that it will occur at a specific time. 
There are three occurrences of certainty. 
What are the three? 
A bodhisattva who will always abide in spiritual lineage is said to be “one in whom certainty has occurred.” Why is that? 
He or she is possessed of fortune1179 , as the conditions are met with, unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment is certain to be attained. 
Furthermore, one type of bodhisattva is certain to generate the mind that seeks unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and will not turn back from that until he or she has attained unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
In addition, a bodhisattva who has attained the controlling powers1180 is able to cause all the activities that on behalf of sentient beings to become fruitful in just the manner that he or she desires and in just the manner that he or she undertakes them. 
These three are the occurrences of certainty: 
Regarding these, it is in relation to the last of these occurrences of certainty that the tathāgatas prophesy a bodhisattva as having become one in whom certainty has occurred. 
There are five things that are to be done by a bodhisattva out of necessity. 
They are such that, if a bodhisattva fails to do them, he or she will lack the fortune to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
What are the five? 
There are five things that are to be done by a bodhisattva continually.1181 What are the five? 
Insuring that all one’s actions, conduct, pleasurable states, and forms of attention are accompanied by enlightenment mind is the fifth thing that is to be done by a bodhisattva continually. 
There are ten things that are regarded as preeminent by bodhisattvas and that bodhisattvas hold to be foremost and that they declare to be the foremost topics of instruction. 
What are the ten? 
The bodhisattva spiritual lineage is preeminent among all the spiritual lineage. 
The initial development of mind is preeminent among all correct forms of aspirational prayer. 
Effort and wisdom are preeminent among all the perfections. 
A tathāgata is preeminent among all sentient beings. 
Compassion is preeminent among the immeasurables. 
The fourth meditative absorption1182 is preeminent among all the states of meditative absorption. 
Among the three forms of one-pointed concentration,1183 one-pointed concentration on emptiness is preeminent. 
Among all the states of composure, the state of composure that is a cessation1184 is preeminent. 
Among all the forms of skillful means, the pure skillful means1185 that was described is preeminent. 
Summary verses: The formulations of teachings; Likewise, the subjects of investigation, Knowledge of the way things truly are, And, similarly, the immeasurables. The fruits of instruction, greatness, The summary of the vehicle, The ten bodhisattvas that are to be known, And, likewise, descriptive appellations. There are four formulations of teachings that are made by bodhisattvas and that tathāgatas and bodhisattvas alone correctly make known and establish. 
No one else can make them—not a god, a human, an ascetic, or a brahmin—unless they have heard them from those . 
What are the four? 
Regarding this , the orderly expression and the arrangement of orderly formulations of the twelve divisions of the sutras, etc.,1186 that consist of speech is called “the formulation of teachings on the Dharma.” For its part, the formulation of teachings on truth is made up of numerous classifications. 
In the sense of not being false, there is only one truth;1187 it has no second form. 
This is called “the formulation of teachings on truth.” Further, it should be understood that the individual varieties would be immeasurably large. 
The four applications are called “the formulation of the teachings on the applications.” Moreover, they should be understood as they were differentiated previously.1199 The seven ways in which a formulation of teachings is made for each of the three vehicles is called “the formulation of teachings on the vehicles”— the Listeners’ Vehicle, the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle, and the Great Vehicle. 
It should be understood that the formulation of teachings on the Listeners’ Vehicle in its entirety is made up of these seven elements: 
The formulation of teachings on the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle is similar to the formulation of teachings on the Listeners’ Vehicle. 
It should be understood that the formulation of teachings on the Great Vehicle is made up of these seven elements: 
the wisdom that, having taken hold of the ineffable reality, has developed an awareness of the suchness that pertains to all entities and the sameness that does not engage in conceptualization about them, the basis of that very wisdom, as well as the object, the concomitants, the action, the requisites, and the fruit of that very wisdom. 
Any bodhisattvas of the past, future, or present who have made, shall make, or are making correct formulations of teachings, all do so by means of these four subjects. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
These are the four subjects that bodhisattvas investigate in order to gain thorough knowledge of the way things truly are: 
What are the four? 
They are the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of names, the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of substances, the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of the designation of an essential nature, and the thorough knowledge of the way things truly are that has completed the investigation of the designation of a distinguishing characteristic. 
The distinctions relating to these should also be understood as it was presented in the chapter entitled “The Nature of Reality.1202 There are five immeasurables that are conducive to making bodhisattvas skillful in all their activities. 
What are the five? 
The constituent of sentient beings consists of the sixty-four classes of sentient beings, as they are listed in the Stage of the Mind.1204 In terms of separate mental continua, is immeasurable. 
Throughout the ten directions there are world spheres immeasurable with immeasurable names. 
For example, this world sphere is named Sahā,1205 and it is because of this name that Brahmā is called the Lord of the Sahā . 
The entities that are virtuous, nonvirtuous, and indeterminate should be understood as immeasurable in terms of their variety. 
Those who are to be trained can be considered as being of one type in the sense that all sentient beings are beings who need to be trained. 
They can be considered as being of two types: 
those who are entirely bound and those who are not entirely bound. 
They can be considered as being of three types: 
those of weak faculties, those of middling faculties, and those of sharp faculties. 
They can be considered as being of four types: 
They can be considered as being of five types: 
They can be considered as being of six types: 
They can be considered as being of seven types: 
They can be considered as being of eight types, which is to say the eight assemblies,1206 ranging from the assembly of kṣatriyas to the assembly of the gods of Brahmā’s realm. 
They can be considered as being of nine types: 
They can be considered as being of ten types: 
In terms of separate categories, this consists of fifty-five types. 
However, in terms of separate mental continua, it should be understood as being immeasurable. 
The constituent of sentient beings is made up of all sentient beings without making any distinction—which is to say, both those who abide in a spiritual lineage and those who do not abide in a spiritual lineage. 
By contrast, that is limited to those who abide in a spiritual lineage and who have reached this or that stage is called “the constituent of those to be trained.” The means of training should be understood as indicated previously.1207 This is also immeasurable in terms of the variety of its individual forms. 
These topics taken together make up the five immeasurables. Why is that? 
Here those sentient beings on whose behalf a bodhisattva undertakes activities make up the first immeasurable. 
Furthermore, the in which those sentient beings find a place to live make up the second immeasurable. 
Moreover, the entities by means of which those beings who live in those various world spheres undergo both the process of affliction and the process of purification make up the third immeasurable. 
In addition, among those sentient beings, the ones who are suitable for and capable of being permanently freed of their suffering make up the fourth immeasurable. 
The methods by which those very sentient beings are liberated make up the fifth immeasurable. 
Therefore, these make up the five immeasurables that are conducive to making bodhisattvas skillful in all their activities. 
It should be understood that five extensive fruits and benefits occur when the buddhas and bodhisattvas teach the Dharma to sentient beings. 
What are the five? 
At the very time that the true Dharma is being taught, certain beings develop the Dharma eye that is free of dust and free of impurities toward all entities. 
Certain beings develop the mind that aspires unsurpassed complete and true enlightenment. 
Certain beings attain the supreme bodhisattva forbearance immediately after hearing the true Dharma. 
Furthermore, the teaching of the true Dharma by buddhas and bodhisattvas is conducive to the longstanding existence of the eye of the Dharma that guides , that occurs through its being successively taught, recited, and correctly practiced. 
These five should be understood as the extensive fruits and benefits of teaching . 
Because the vehicle of the bodhisattvas possesses seven forms of greatness, it is called the “Great Vehicle.” What are the seven? 
They are the greatness of the Dharma, that is, the bodhisattva collection of extensive discourses that is included among the twelve divisions of the speech;1208 the greatness of mental development, that is, certain individuals develop the mind that aspires to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; the greatness of devotion, that is, certain individuals are devoted to that very greatness of the Dharma; the greatness of superior attitude, that is, certain individuals enter the stage of a pure superior attitude once they have transcended the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion; the greatness of the accumulations, the accumulation of merit and the accumulation of wisdom, whose perfection brings about the attainment of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; the greatness of time, the three spans of “countless” kalpas that represent the length of time it takes to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment; and the greatness of attainment, unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment itself, whose nature is such that no other attainment has a nature that is its equal, much less one that is higher or greater. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that six of these greatness—that is, the greatness of the Dharma, the greatness of mental development, the greatness of devotion, the greatness of superior attitude, the greatness of the accumulations, and the greatness of time—make up the causes of the greatness of attainment, while that single greatness of attainment is that represents the result of those six. 
These eight qualities serve as a summary of the entire Great Vehicle: 
teaching the bodhisattva collection of scriptures; elucidating the true nature1209 of all the entities in that very bodhisattva collection of scriptures; elucidating the inconceivable and supremely vast powers of the buddhas and bodhisattvas in that very bodhisattva collection of scriptures; properly listening to those ; attaining the superior attitude1210 that is preceded by proper reflection upon those ; devoting oneself to the forms of meditation1211 that are preceded by attainment of the superior attitude; perfecting the results of meditation1212 that are preceded by devotion to the forms of meditation; and the state of permanent deliverance1213 that is achieved by having perfected those very results of meditation. 
This is the manner in which the bodhisattvas who train themselves achieve unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Who, then, are the bodhisattvas who attain supreme true and complete enlightenment by training themselves in this manner? 
In brief, it should be understood that there are ten types : 
Regarding this , a bodhisattva who abides in the spiritual lineage, is practicing the trainings, and has developed mind is called “the one who has entered .” As long as that very who has entered has not yet achieved the stage of a pure attitude, he or she is called “the one whose attitude is not pure.” However, once he or she has entered , he or she becomes “the one whose attitude is pure.” Moreover, as long as that very whose attitude is pure has not yet achieved the stage that is the perfect manner of going, he is called “the one who is not spiritually ripe.” However, once he has entered , he becomes “the one who is spiritually ripe.” As long as who is not spiritually ripe has not yet attained the stage of certainty or the stage of certain conduct, he is called “the one for whom certainty has not occurred.” However, once he has attained , he becomes “the one for whom certainty has occurred.” Moreover, there are two types of who are spiritually ripe: 
hindered by one rebirth who will attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment in his next rebirth, and in his final existence who will attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment within that very lifetime. 
These ten bodhisattvas who have been described from the spiritual lineage up to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment are the ones who train themselves in the bodhisattva trainings. 
There are no higher forms of training for them than these, in relation to which they should train themselves1215 and in which they should train themselves.1216 Nor is there any bodhisattva who surpasses the bodhisattvas described and who is someone who should train in the bodhisattva trainings. 
Moreover, all of these bodhisattvas, without distinction, are known by such names as the following ones that make reference to their spiritual qualities: 
enlightenment being,1217 great being,1218 wise one,1219 one who possesses supreme brilliance,1220 child of the victorious ones,1221 one who supports the victorious ones,1222 conqueror,1223 sprout of a victorious one,1224 valiant one,1225 supremely worthy one,1226 leader of a company of travelers,1227 one who possesses great renown,1228 compassionate one,1229 one who possesses great merit,1230 mighty lord,1231 and righteous one.1232 Moreover, it should be understood that there are immeasurable numbers of individual names that have been received by the limitless numbers of bodhisattvas who are found throughout the endless and limitless world spheres that lie in the ten directions. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that those bodhisattvas who declare themselves to be bodhisattvas but who do not correctly practice the bodhisattva trainings are counterfeit bodhisattvas; they are not genuine . 
On the other hand, it should be understood that those who declare themselves to be bodhisattvas and who also correctly practice the bodhisattva trainings are genuine bodhisattvas. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support,” this completes the eighteenth chapter, entitled “The Qualities of a Bodhisattva.” This also completes “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Support.” Here is an abbreviated description of them that appears in AS , with additional comments from ASBh . 
Essential nature, basis, fruits and benefits, Successive order, and inclusion. These five are the bodhisattva-marks of a genuine bodhisattva. 
one who possesses them is counted among those who are referred to as bodhisattvas. 
What are the five? 
Furthermore, these five spiritual qualities should be understood according to five ways of being considered: 
Regarding this , there are two aspects to the essential nature of sympathy: 
Regarding this, that relates to attitude is the attitude of wanting to benefit and the attitude of wanting to bring happiness. 
This is called a bodhisattva’s “sympathy toward sentient beings.” The essential nature of sympathy that relates to his or her activities is a bodhisattva’s use of his or her body and speech to provide sentient beings with that very attitude, as much as he or she is able and with all his or her strength. 
Regarding this , the essential nature of agreeable speech should be understood as those forms of speech that were described previously in the chapter entitled “The Principles for Attracting a Following” as pleasing, friendly, and provides assistance.1234 Regarding this , the strength of a bodhisattva that consists of courage,1235 firmness,1236 and absence of dejection1237 is called “the essential nature of a bodhisattva’s fortitude.” Regarding this , a bodhisattva’s extensive generosity as well as his or her generosity that is free of affliction should be understood as the essential nature of his or her openhandedness. 
The four forms of informative knowledge, as well as the understanding that arises from correctly applying oneself to develop those , should be understood as the essential nature of the bodhisattvas’ explain profound meanings and intents. 
Regarding this , there are five bases1238 of sympathy. 
They are sentient beings who are suffering, who engage in misconduct, who are heedless, who have undertaken a wrongful practice, and who are closely attached to the mental afflictions.1239 Any sentient beings, including those in the hells, who have entered a state in which they uninterruptedly and continuously experience feelings1240 characterized by suffering are called “those who are suffering.” Moreover, those beings who are not unavoidably experiencing suffering but who are engaging in physical misconduct and are engaging in verbal and mental misconduct to a great degree, and who have a nature that delights in those , are called “those who engage in misconduct.” Examples are individuals who slaughter sheep, hogs, poultry, and the like. 
Moreover, those beings who are not unavoidably experiencing suffering and not engaging in misconduct but who are highly attached to sensory pleasures and repeatedly enjoy them; who are chiefly devoted to spending time watching actors, dancers, jesters, and those who perform expressive dance; and who are chiefly concerned with amusing themselves are called “those who are heedless.” An example of a portion is those individuals who are fond of sensory pleasures. 
Moreover, those beings who are not unavoidably experiencing suffering, who are not engaging in misconduct, and who are not heedless but who have undertaken to free themselves from suffering by relying upon views that are ruinous are called “those who have undertaken a wrongful practice.” An example is those who have abandoned sensory pleasures and gone forth into a badly taught system of spiritual discipline. 
Moreover, those beings who are not necessarily experiencing suffering, etc., up to those who have not undertaken a wrongful practice but who are completely bound or partially bound by the mental afflictions are called “those who are closely attached to the mental afflictions.” Examples are those virtuous ordinary persons who have applied themselves correctly, as well as those who are still undergoing spiritual training. 
This represents the full extent of the bases for the sympathy of bodhisattvas. 
They are the bases and the objects by means of which sympathy is generated. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
There are five bases of bodhisattvas’ agreeable speech. 
What are the five? 
They are correctly conversing,1241 correctly pleasing,1242 correctly providing reassurance,1243 correctly fulfilling wishes,1244 and giving proper instruction.1245 Their classifications should be understood as they were explained in the chapter entitled “The Principles for Attracting a Following.” These are the five bases and objects by means of which the agreeable speech of bodhisattvas comes into being. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
It should be understood that there are five bases of a bodhisattva’s fortitude. 
What are the five? 
It should be understood that the bases of a bodhisattva’s fortitude are the very same five aspects that were mentioned in the chapter entitled “The Spiritual Qualities That Are Conducive to Enlightenment” as being the ones by means of which bodhisattvas the development of firmness.”1246 These are the bases and objects by means of which a bodhisattva’s fortitude comes into being. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
There are five bases of a bodhisattva’s openhandedness. 
What are the five? 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
What are the five? 
Those profound sutra scriptures that the Tathāgata taught in which the profound is illuminated, those that contain emptiness, and those that conform to the dependent origination the nature of the particular causes represent the first basis. 
Further, the skillfulness that relates to transgressions and the skillfulness that relates to turning away from transgressions in the Vinaya scriptures represent the second basis. 
Moreover, the unerring formulations of the attributes of entities in the summary listings1248 represent the third basis. 
The clear ascertainment of terms and meanings that are associated with obscure Dharma teachings that possess an underlying meaning represents the fourth basis. 
The differentiation of the entities, meanings, interpretations, and distinct classifications associated with all Dharma teachings represents the fifth basis. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
At the very outset, a bodhisattva’s sympathy serves to abandon animosity toward sentient beings. 
A bodhisattva who is sympathetic in this way applies himor herself to all the activities that are beneficial to sentient beings without having a dispirited mind. 
He or she does not become weary of these undertakings. 
The sympathy that remains dedicated to this to a high degree is conducive to abiding in a state of irreproachable happiness in this life and also to receiving benefits in future lives. 
In addition, it should be understood that all the benefits that the Blessed One declared in relation to loving-kindness—that neither poison nor weapons have any effect upon body, etc.1249—are also by a bodhisattva who is sympathetic. 
These should be regarded as the fruits and benefits of the sympathy that is possessed by bodhisattvas. 
A bodhisattva who engages in agreeable speech abandons four types of verbal faults in the present life. 
lying, divisive speech, harsh speech, and idle talk. 
Both in this life and in future lives, a bodhisattva who engages in agreeable speech becomes one whose speech is accepted and one whose speech is adhered to. 
It should be understood that these are the fruits and benefits of a bodhisattva’s agreeable speech. 
A resolute bodhisattva is one who is completely and entirely free of idleness and laziness in this life. 
He or she also accepts the discipline of bodhisattva morality with a joyful mind.1250 Having done so, he or she does not become despondent. 
He or she patiently benefits self and others. 
In future , he or she becomes one whose enterprising nature is firm with regard to taking up every form of a bodhisattva’s duties. 
He or she does not turn away from without having completed them. 
These should be understood as the fruits and benefits of the fortitude that is possessed by bodhisattvas. 
The fruits and benefits of openhandedness and of explaining profound meanings and intents should be understood in the manner that the power of generosity and the power of wisdom were explained in the chapter entitled “Power.”1251 This constitutes the fruits and benefits of the marks that are possessed by bodhisattvas. 
What is the successive order of these ? 
First of all, a bodhisattva assists sentient beings on the basis of sympathy. , he or she is also attentive toward them and desirous of acting on their behalf. 
As a consequence of that, he or she tells them what is proper, causes them to learn , and points out to them , in order to turn them away from opportunities nonvirtuous and establish them in opportunities virtuous . 
Because of refusing to abandon either beings who are engaged in practice or beings who are engaged in erroneous practice, is willing to endure hostile encounters with those individuals who have undertaken in the manner but who are behaving badly toward beings and who are oppressed in manifold ways by the mental afflictions. 
who is resolute in this way ripens some beings by attracting them using material objects; some by attracting them on the basis of the Dharma; and some by attracting them using both material objects and the Dharma. 
It should be understood that this is the order in which the five marks of a bodhisattva . 
These five marks of a bodhisattva are the six perfections. 
This is how the five marks of a bodhisattva should be understood according to five ways of being considered—that is, according to their essential natures, their bases, their fruits and benefits, their order, and their inclusion. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Qualities That Accord with the Support,” this completes the first chapter, entitled “The Marks of a Bodhisattva.” Summary lines : 
It should be understood that, in brief, there are four qualities that pertain to a bodhisattva who belongs either to the householder faction or to the faction of homeless ascetics. They are such that the householder or homeless ascetic who trains in relation to them will quickly attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
What are the four? 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s quality of having completed the spiritual activities well? 
How does a bodhisattva become one who carries out activities in a definite manner, specifically in relation to generosity? 
Here a bodhisattva who possesses entities that are suitable to be given will surely give them to a petitioner who has approached him or her in a correct manner, whether is someone who has harmed or benefited him or her, and whether is someone who possesses good qualities or someone who possesses faults. 
No one is capable of altering intention to practice generosity—whether a human being, nonhuman being, ascetic, brahmin, or anyone else in the world in a way that accords with the Dharma. 
How does a bodhisattva become one who carries out activities in a proficient manner, specifically in relation to generosity? 
Here a bodhisattva who possesses entities that are suitable to be given will give them all to a petitioner who has approached him or her in a correct manner. 
There is nothing that he or she would fail to give up for the sake of sentient beings—not even an entity that is an inner one, much less an outer one. 
How does a bodhisattva become one who carries out activities continually, specifically in relation to generosity? 
Here a bodhisattva is one who does not tire of generosity; he or she engages in acts of generosity whenever the opportunity arises, and does so continually, uninterruptedly, and at all times. 
How does a bodhisattva become one who carries out activities in an irreproachable manner, for instance in relation to generosity? 
Here a bodhisattva avoids those afflicted forms of generosity that were described in the chapter entitled “Generosity” and practices acts of generosity that are free of affliction.1253 This is how a bodhisattva completes the spiritual activities well in relation to generosity. 
As with generosity, this topic should be understood in a manner that accords with the circumstances for the perfections of morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom in terms of these very same four aspects of carrying out activities in a definite manner, carrying out activities in a proficient manner, carrying out activities continually, and carrying out activities in an irreproachable manner. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s skillfulness? 
In brief, it should be understood as being of ten types: 
the skillful means that removes the enmity of those beings who have hostile intentions; that causes those beings who are indifferent to enter it; that spiritually ripens those beings who have entered ; the skillful means that liberates those beings who have become spiritually ripe; skillfulness in all worldly treatises; skillfulness gained through carefully considering the errors in relation to adoption of the discipline associated with bodhisattva morality; skillfulness regarding correct aspirational prayers; skillfulness regarding the Listeners’ Vehicle; skillfulness regarding the Solitary Realizers’ Vehicle; and skillfulness regarding the Great Vehicle. 
The particulars that relate to all these forms of skillfulness should be understood according to the previous descriptions that were made here and there in this very Stage of a Bodhisattva. 
These ten forms of a bodhisattva’s skillfulness accomplish five actions: 
By means of the first four forms of skillfulness, a bodhisattva unites sentient beings with their individual aims. 
By means of skillfulness in all worldly treatises, a bodhisattva refutes all the verbal challenges made by adversaries. 
By means of skillfulness gained through carefully considering the errors in relation to adoption of the discipline associated with bodhisattva morality, a bodhisattva avoids committing transgressions. 
If should be incurred, he or she remedies it in accordance with the Dharma. 
He or she reflects constantly on exceedingly pure the morality whose discipline has been adopted. 
By means of skillfulness regarding correct aspirational prayers, a bodhisattva attains success in the future with regard to all his or her desired aims. 
By means of skillfulness in the three vehicles, a bodhisattva teaches a form of Dharma that corresponds to the spiritual lineages, faculties, and forms of devotion that are possessed by beings and points out a suitable method of practice. 
This is how a bodhisattva carries out five actions by means of the ten forms of skillfulness. 
It is by means of these five actions that all of the duties relating to the aims of both this life and future lives are fully achieved. 
Regarding this , what is the assistance that a bodhisattva provides to others? 
Here a bodhisattva, by relying upon the four principles for attracting a following— generosity, agreeable speech, beneficial conduct, and sameness of purpose—provides benefit to certain sentient beings, provides happiness , and provides both benefit and happiness . 
This is a brief statement of the assistance that bodhisattvas provide to others. 
In addition to this, the extensive explanation should be understood as described earlier in the chapter entitled “One’s Own and Others’ Aims.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s dedication? 
Here, with deep-felt faith, a bodhisattva dedicates to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment any and all roots of virtue of the past, present, or future that he or she has ever collected by these three methods, the quality of having completed spiritual activities well, skillfulness, and providing assistance to others. 
He or she does not wish for the ripening of those roots of virtue in the form of any fruit other than unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
It should be understood that whatever elements of spiritual training the Blessed One taught to householder 1254 and homeless bodhisattvas, they are all included within these four categories: the quality of having completed spiritual activities well, skillfulness, providing assistance to others, and dedication. 
Therefore, it should be understood that for a bodhisattva who has completed the spiritual activities well, who is skillful, who provides assistance to others, and who engages in dedication, the enlightenment that is difficult to reach and difficult to attain becomes is nearby and in close proximity. 
Any and all bodhisattvas of the three times who train themselves in the factions of householder and homeless bodhisattvas have attained, are attaining, and shall attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment on the basis of these very four spiritual qualities. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
Moreover, the manner in which a householder and a homeless bodhisattva become correctly applied to these four spiritual qualities. 
Nevertheless, it should be understood that, compared to a householder bodhisattva, a bodhisattva who has gone forth into the homeless state is greatly superior and also has qualities that distinguish it greatly. 
For example, a bodhisattva who is a homeless ascetic is from the very outset free of the faults a household that consists of such as a mother, father, children, and a spouse.1255 However, it should be understood that a householder is not free . 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who is a homeless ascetic is also free of the suffering associated with like agriculture, commerce, and service to the king for the sake of one’s household. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who is a homeless ascetic is able to engage in a form of pure spiritual conduct in which he or she adheres to it completely; however, a householder bodhisattva is not able to do so. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva who is a homeless ascetic quickly becomes knowledgeable about all the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, and he or she is able to perfect very easily whatever form of virtue is undertaken. 
However, a householder bodhisattva cannot accomplish these things in the same way. 
However, a householder bodhisattva is not regarded in the same way. 
Because of such qualities as these, it should be understood that a bodhisattva who is a homeless ascetic is very different from that of a householder bodhisattva. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Qualities That Accord with the Support,” this completes the second chapter, entitled “Factions.” Summary verse: 
The affection of the intelligent ones Toward all beings has seven aspects. Their fifteen attitudes are regarded As accomplishing ten actions. The affection1256 that bodhisattvas develop toward sentient beings has seven aspects. 
by virtue of possessing it, bodhisattvas are described as “the ones who have a virtuous attitude” and “the ones who have a supremely virtuous attitude.” What are the seven aspects of affection? 
free of fear, proper, tireless, unsolicited, free of desire for material reward, extensive, and impartial. 
A bodhisattva is not affectionate due to fear of anyone. 
Moreover, the affection that a bodhisattva develops toward beings is not one that is lacking in propriety. 
For example, in order to induce to take up any form of wickedness,1257 immodesty,1258 vulgar conduct,1259 or conduct that is inappropriate for the occasion. 
Similarly, a bodhisattva is affectionate toward beings in such a way that he or she never feels weary from all the exertions that are made on their behalf. 
A bodhisattva also is affectionate toward beings in a manner that is unsolicited; he or she has not been asked by anyone . 
also possesses an affectionate mind that is free of any desire for material reward; he or she does not expect to receive something in return from others nor does he or she hope for a desirable maturation in the future. 
Therefore, he or she is a bodhisattva whose affection toward beings is not prompted by any motive. 
The affection of such a bodhisattva toward beings is also great; it is not limited. 
It is so great that even though every kind of harm is done to him or her by other beings, would not reject them. 
He or she lets them do whatever unkind things they may wish to do to him or her and does not desire any kind of evil deed to them. 
Moreover, the affection of bodhisattvas that has such characteristics and that is endowed with these good qualities is felt equally toward all sentient beings in their entirety; it is not limited to a portion of the realm of sentient beings. 
Those bodhisattvas who are endowed with an affection having these seven aspects are described as “the ones who have a virtuous attitude”1260 and “the ones who have a supremely virtuous attitude.”1261 Regarding this , the conviction,1262 understanding, and determination regarding a buddha’s qualities, which are preceded by faith and the discernment of entities, are referred to as a “superior attitude.” Moreover, it should be understood that, in brief, there are fifteen superior attitudes that pertain to a bodhisattva. 
What are the fifteen? 
Regarding this , the superior attitude of a bodhisattva that is directed toward the Jewels of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha is called “the attitude that relates to the foremost objects.” The superior attitude that is directed toward the acceptance of the discipline associated with bodhisattva morality is called “the attitude that relates to virtuous conduct.” The superior attitude that seeks to attain full knowledge of generosity, morality, patience, effort, meditative absorption, and wisdom is called “the attitude that relates to the perfections.” The superior attitude that is directed toward the insubstantiality of entities and of the person, the highest truth—which is to say, the profound suchness of entitiesis called “the attitude that relates to the nature of reality.” The superior attitude that is directed toward the inconceivable powers of supernatural knowledge that are possessed by buddhas and bodhisattvas, as well as that is directed toward their natural powers, is called “the attitude that relates to power.” The desire to provide beings with virtue is called “the attitude that seeks to benefit others.” The desire to provide assistance to beings is called “the attitude that seeks to bring happiness .” The state of mind in which has no desire to receive any material reward from sentient beings and the state of mind that is unhindered by for a desirable karmic maturation are called “the detached attitude.” The single-minded dedication to unsurpassed true and supreme enlightenment is called “the firm attitude.” The devotion that is accompanied by unerring knowledge regarding the means of the aims of beings and the means of enlightenment is called “the attitude that does not disagree with reality.” The superior attitude of bodhisattvas that is present throughout the entire stage of conduct that is based upon devotion is called “the impure attitude.” The superior attitude of bodhisattvas that is present from the stage of a pure attitude up to the stage of certain conduct is called “the pure attitude.” The superior attitude of bodhisattvas on the stage that is the perfect manner of going is called “the exceedingly pure attitude.” Regarding this , the impure attitude is also called “the attitude in which the mind needs to be curbed,” because systematic analysis must still be cultivated. 
In brief, bodhisattvas accomplish ten actions by means of these fifteen forms of virtuous superior attitude that are present on all of the stages . 
What are the ten? 
By means of the attitude that relates to the foremost objects, undertake every aspect of worshipping the Jewels, which constitutes the foremost among all the accumulations for enlightenment. 
By means of the attitude that relates to virtuous conduct, they do not incur any deliberate transgressions in relation to the acceptance of the bodhisattvas’ moral discipline, even to save their lives, and, if they should incur , they confess it very quickly. 
By means of the attitude that relates to the perfections, they abide in a state of mindfulness and they abide in a state of supreme mindfulness through engaging in the continual practice of virtuous qualities. 
By means of the attitude that relates to the nature of reality, they maintain a mind that is free of the afflictions as they continue to be reborn in samsara for the sake of sentient beings, and they also refrain from giving up the superior attitude nirvana. 
By means of the attitude that seeks to benefit , the attitude that seeks to bring happiness , and the detached attitude, they undertake every form of activity that accomplishes the aims of others and, having undertaken them, they do not become weary . 
By means of the firm attitude, they initiate and maintain a fervent effort and an extensive effort; they refrain from becoming lax in their practice and they do not develop a defective practice. 
By means of the attitude that does not disagree with reality, they gain forms of supernatural knowledge that quickly accomplish various kinds of virtuous qualities. 
They also do not become satisfied merely by attaining lesser forms that are smaller and ordinary. 
Finally, by means of the natural attitude, they quickly attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment for the welfare, benefit, and happiness of gods and human beings. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that whatever forms of superior attitude the Buddha, the Blessed One, declared, prescribed, and revealed to bodhisattvas in relation to a variety of different subjects, they can all be included within these very fifteen forms of superior attitude. 
Therefore, all bodhisattvas of the three times who have attained, are attaining, and shall attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment on the basis of virtuous superior attitudes do so on the basis of these very fifteen forms of superior attitude. 
There are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
This is the manner in which these fifteen forms of superior attitude are possessed of the fruit and benefit of great enlightenment.1263 Therefore, a bodhisattva should attain unsurpassed and supreme enlightenment by relying upon them. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Qualities That Accord with the Support,” this completes the third chapter, entitled “Superior Attitudes.” Summary verses: 
There are, in brief, twelve pleasurable states1264 that pertain to bodhisattvas, beginning with the excellence of the spiritual lineage and who are training themselves in the bodhisattva trainings that were described, who are displaying the marks of bodhisattvas that were described, who are correctly engaged in the practices that relate to the bodhisattvas, and who are refining the bodhisattva superior attitudes that were described. 
It should be understood that these pleasurable states of bodhisattvas are such that all bodhisattva conduct are included within them. 
The thirteenth pleasurable state is that of a tathāgata and it is the unsurpassed pleasurable state of true and complete enlightenment. 
Regarding this , what are the twelve bodhisattva pleasurable states? 
the pleasurable state of the spiritual lineage; the pleasurable state in which conduct is based upon devotion; the pleasurable state of great joy; the pleasurable state of superior morality; and the pleasurable state of superior mind training. 
There are three pleasurable states of superior wisdom: that relates to the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment; that relates to the truths; and that relates to the forward and reverse forms of dependent origination. 
by means of which a bodhisattva perceives reality, that perceives reality, and the manner in which the suffering of sentient beings arises because reality has not been realized as well as does not arise because has been realized. 
These are the three pleasurable states of superior wisdom in which a bodhisattva employs wisdom to deliberate in three separate ways. 
the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by both mental preparation and effort, in which one proceeds by a path that is free of interruptions; the pleasurable state that is free of signs and free of any mental preparation, in which one proceeds by a path that is effortless; the pleasurable state of informative knowledge; and the bodhisattva’s supreme and fully developed pleasurable state. 
These are the twelve types of pleasurable states that pertain to bodhisattvas. 
They include all of their pleasurable states and they include all forms of bodhisattva conduct. 
In addition, the pleasurable state of a tathāgata is the pleasurable state that transcends all the bodhisattva pleasurable states and pertains to the enlightenment of a complete buddha. 
A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE TWELVE BODHISATTVA PLEASURABLE STATES What is the bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of the spiritual lineage? 
How does a bodhisattva who is established in the spiritual lineage abide? 
Here a bodhisattva who is abiding in the spiritual lineage naturally possesses the qualities of a bodhisattva and the virtuous qualities that are appropriate to a bodhisattva because his or her mental continuum is one that is naturally excellent. 
He or she engages in those virtues on the basis of natural excellence, not in a forced manner. 
Nevertheless, he or she is one who maintains restraint on the basis of careful consideration.1266 The bodhisattva who is abiding in the spiritual lineage is also one who holds the seeds of all the spiritual qualities possessed by a buddha. 
All the seeds of the totality of a buddha’s spiritual qualities are present within his or her being and within his or her substratum. 
A bodhisattva who is abiding in the spiritual lineage is also one in whom the coarse impurities are not present. 
He or she is not one who is capable of exhibiting the type of perturbation of the mental afflictions such that, having become upset by that perturbation, he or she would commit any of the deeds that have an immediate consequence1267 or completely sever his or her roots of virtue.1268 The comportment of an individual who is established in the spiritual lineage that was presented in the chapter entitled “The Spiritual Lineage” should be understood as a detailed account of a bodhisattva who is abiding in the spiritual lineage. 
This is called “a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of the spiritual lineage.” Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion? 
Here, any bodhisattva conduct whatsoever by a bodhisattva from the time that he or she first generates mind and throughout the period that his or her attitude remains impure is called his or her “pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion.”1269 Regarding this , a bodhisattva who is abiding in the spiritual lineage is only occupied with the causes of all the other eleven pleasurable states of a bodhisattva, as well as the pleasurable state of a tathāgata, in the sense of gain mastery of those causes. 
However, he or she has not commenced any bodhisattva pleasurable state other than , nor has he or she attained or perfected , much less has he or she done so with regard to the pleasurable state of a tathāgata. 
By contrast, the bodhisattva who is abiding in the conduct that is based upon devotion has commenced all of the bodhisattva pleasurable states as well as the pleasurable state of a tathāgata; however, he or she has not attained nor perfected . 
When the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion has been perfected, attains the initial onset of the pleasurable state of great joy and also becomes one who has set out to perfect that very . 
When the pleasurable state of great joy has been perfected, attains the initial onset of the pleasurable state of superior morality and also becomes one who has set out to perfect that very . 
It should be understood that this process continues in the same way until the bodhisattva’s supreme and fully developed pleasurable state. 
It should also be understood that immediately after the bodhisattva’s supreme and fully developed pleasurable state has been perfected, the attainment of the initial onset of the pleasurable state of a tathāgata and the perfection occur simultaneously. 
This should be understood as the characteristic that distinguishes the pleasurable state of a tathāgata from that of the pleasurable states that pertain to bodhisattvas. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of great joy? 
It is the pleasurable state of a bodhisattva whose superior attitude has become pure. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior morality? It is the pleasurable state of who possesses a form of morality that occurs naturally, based upon the purity of his or her superior attitude. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior mind training? 
It is the pleasurable state in which in the worldly forms of meditative absorption, one-pointed concentration, and states of composure, on the basis of the purity of the pleasurable state of superior morality. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment? 
It is the pleasurable state in which, through reliance upon the worldly forms of one-pointed concentration that represent the basis for purity of spiritual realization, correctly investigates the thirty-seven spiritual qualities of closely placed recollection, etc., that are conducive to enlightenment, in order to gain a deep awareness of the truths. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the truths? 
It is the pleasurable state in which, through reliance upon the investigation of that are conducive to enlightenment, deep awareness regarding the exact nature of the truths. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the forward and reverse forms of dependent origination? 
It is the pleasurable state that, on the strength of that deep awareness of the truths, is distinguished by the investigation of how suffering, together with its causes, arises because those have not been realized and is also distinguished by the investigation of how suffering, together with its causes, ceases when have been realized. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by both mental preparation and effort? 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state that is free of signs and is also free of both mental preparation and effort? 
It is the pleasurable state in which, through having practiced extensively the meditation of that very previous pleasurable state that is free of signs, arrives at a path that conveys continuously and uninterruptedly, through its own inclination. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of informative knowledge? 
It is a pleasurable state in which, through relying upon those highly refined forms of unwavering wisdom and concentration, who has attained an abundance of great intelligence examines the verbal formulations, meanings, clear expression, and the different points that relate to the Dharma, in connection with teaching the Dharma in an unsurpassed manner to other beings. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattva’s supreme pleasurable state? 
The bodhisattva who is established in this is one who has perfected the bodhisattva path and has received the great Dharma consecration that relates to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, and he is either one who is subject to one rebirth or one who is in his final existence. 
It is the pleasurable state immediately following which and just after which attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and performs all the activities of a buddha. 
During the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion, a bodhisattva practices the bodhisattva meditation in a limited way. 
During the pleasurable state of great joy, a bodhisattva is able to practice the very same bodhisattva meditation extensively. 
He practices in an unbroken and certain manner and does not lose whatever has been gained. 
Just as it is during the pleasurable state of great joy, is the same up through the three pleasurable states that relate to superior wisdom. 
From the first pleasurable state that is free of signs up to the bodhisattva’s supreme pleasurable state, a bodhisattva practices the bodhisattva meditation in an unbroken and certain manner, and in a way that is beyond measure.1270 Regarding this , it should be understood that, during the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion, there is a commencement of the bodhisattva meditation that is free of signs. 
It should be understood that, during the pleasurable state of great joy, as well as during the pleasurable states that relate to superior morality, superior mind training, and superior wisdom, there is a gaining of the bodhisattva meditation that is free of signs. 
It should be understood that, during the first pleasurable state that is free of signs, there is a full realization of the bodhisattva meditation that is free of signs, and on the second pleasurable state that is free of signs, there is a complete refinement . 
It should be understood that, during the pleasurable state of informative knowledge and the supreme pleasurable state, there is a recurrent experiencing of the fruit of the bodhisattva meditation that is free of signs. 
What are the aspects, marks, and signs1271 of a bodhisattva who is abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion? 
A bodhisattva who is abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion is one who possesses the ability to engage in repeated analysis in a powerful manner. 
Having carefully considered the proper forms of bodhisattva practice, he or she employs wisdom to apply himor herself to them. 
However, he or she has not attained to practice the bodhisattva meditation in that manner naturally, firmly, and irreversibly. 
As is the case with meditation, the same is true for the various types of informative knowledge, supernatural knowledge, liberations, one-pointed concentration, and states of composure that are the fruit of that meditation. 
In addition, he or she has not transcended the five fears: 
the fear of having no livelihood, the fear of gaining a bad reputation, the fear of dying, the fear of the unhappy migratory states, and the fear of being timid in a group. 
Moreover, while he or she does pursue the welfare of sentient beings after having engaged in careful consideration, does not do so on the basis of an affection that stems from a natural sympathy. 
Sometimes, he or she even carries out a mistaken form of physical, verbal, or mental practice as relates to sentient beings.1272 Sometimes, he or she even develops attachment1273 toward an object. 
Sometimes, he or she even exhibits the quality of acquisitiveness toward personal possessions.1274 is one who proceeds on the basis of faith1275 in others, buddhas and bodhisattvas. 
Moreover, this sometimes becomes clouded. 
He or she is subject to inattention.1277 He or she possesses the bodhisattva path in which supernatural knowledge is slow and acquired with difficulty. 
His or her aspiration for enlightenment is not intense. 
develops clouded recollection1279 in connection with three circumstances. 
On certain occasions, in relation to attractive and unattractive objects that consist of forms, sounds, smells, tastes, and tangible entities, due to of an erroneous state of mind.1280 for one who has been reborn repeatedly in rebirths within a variety of different states of existence, due to having forgotten former states of existence. 
On certain occasions, also due to the failure to recall—among the Dharma teachings that were explained to him or her and that he or she took up—the ones that were given a long time ago and that were taught a long time ago. 
This is the way that clouded recollection occurs in relation to these three circumstances. 
Sometimes he or she is astute and able to take up, retain, and understand the meaning of Dharma teachings; sometimes he or she is not able to do so. 
Sometimes he or she is possessed of recollection; sometimes his or her nature is that of one whose recollection is clouded. 
does not know in an exact manner the means by which sentient beings can be spiritually tamed; nor does he or she know the means by which he or she can develop a buddha’s spiritual qualities. 
Sometimes is fruitless and sometimes it is fruitful. 
As such, its success is accidental, like arrows that have been shot in the night. 
Sometimes, he or she will even abandon the mind that has been generated to great enlightenment. 
Sometimes, he or she will stop observing the acceptance of the bodhisattva moral discipline, or he or she will not strive . 
Sometimes, even though having dedicated himor herself to acting on behalf of sentient beings, he or she may become weary during the course of doing so and, therefore, turn away from that practice of acting on behalf of sentient beings. 
He or she desires his or her own happiness with heartfelt sincerity desires the happiness of others after having engaged in repeated reflection. 
He or she possesses extensive knowledge regarding the erroneous actions of bodhisattvas. 
Sometimes, he or she is led away from the Dharma and Vinaya that is contained in this bodhisattva collection . 
Sometimes, he or she becomes frightened after hearing a Dharma teaching on the profound and extensive . 
Mental wavering, uncertainty, and doubt also arise. 
He or she may also abandon, completely and totally, exercising great compassion toward sentient beings. 
He or she also serves sentient beings by providing small forms of benefit and happiness; he or she does not do so by providing extensive and immeasurable forms . 
He or she does not train fully in all the bodhisattva trainings as they have been presented. 
He or she is not endowed fully with all of the marks of a bodhisattva as they have been presented. 
He or she does not fully exhibit all of the practices that pertain to bodhisattvas as they have been presented. 
Even though it has been a long time since he or she agreed unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, he or she has not developed a superior attitude toward nirvana that is anything like that he or she continues to have toward his or her ongoing transmigration in samsara. 
He or she does not possess ardent and unwavering forms of the virtuous spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
These marks, signs, and aspects, and others like them, should be understood as the ones that are possessed by a bodhisattva who is abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion. 
It should be understood that a bodhisattva who has reached the lesser level of forbearance1282 on the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion possesses these aspects, marks, and signs in a great form. 
It should be understood that who has reached the middling level of forbearance possesses them in a moderate form. 
Moreover, it should also be understood that immediately after a bodhisattva who is abiding in the great level of forbearance has completely abandoned these aspects, marks, and signs, he or she enters the pleasurable state of great joy, by virtue of having attained it. 
For that who is abiding in the pleasurable state of great joy, all of those qualities are completely and totally gone. 
Moreover, all those qualities that belong to the side of purity and that are the opposite of the ones that were said to be possessed by who is abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion are now present there. 
By being endowed with these qualities, this bodhisattva is said to be “one who has a pure superior attitude.” Moreover, for a bodhisattva who is abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion, no matter how much the purity of his or her conviction1283 increases through lesser, middling, and great stages of development, it can never be called “a purity of superior attitude.” Why is that? 
It is because that conviction is one that is afflicted by those multiple forms of secondary mental afflictions . 
However, because all of the secondary mental afflictions his or her conviction have been abandoned, the conviction of the bodhisattva who is established in the pleasurable state of great joy is one that is free of those mental afflictions and it is one that is pure. 
Regarding this , what aspects, what marks, and what signs should a bodhisattva who is abiding in the pleasurable state of great joy be understood to possess? 
Here a bodhisattva who enters the pleasurable state of great joy after the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion abandons the former bodhisattva aspirational prayers to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment—which did not properly fathom enlightenment and did not properly fathom the means of enlightenment, and which were made, for the most part, through relying upon others and had not yet been fully ascertained—and gives rise to different and new forms of bodhisattva aspirational prayers which, on the basis of six aspects, are extremely well ascertained and the product of meditation that has been generated by oneself. 
They are both that relates to the world and one that completely surpasses all objects that are found throughout all the worlds. 
Because they have the effect of delivering all sentient beings from suffering, they are distinct from anything that pertains to all the listeners and the solitary realizers. 
Even if this aspirational prayer is generated for only a single instant, its Dharma nature is such that it brings the result of immeasurable spiritual qualities that are desired by bodhisattvas. 
Moreover, these aspirational prayers are not subject to change and they are inexhaustible. 
Their character is to become ever more excellent, they continue to be effective until the furthest end , and they are conducive to great enlightenment.1284 Moreover, this bodhisattva aspirational prayer that has been extremely well ascertained is referred to as “the development of mind.”1285 Also, this development of mind by a bodhisattva should be understood in brief as having four aspects. 
What are the four aspects? 
What kind of bodhisattvas initially develop this mind? 
What have been taken hold of when it is developed? 
It should be understood that these are the four aspects that relate to this development of mind.1286 Regarding this , this mind is developed by bodhisattvas who are abiding in the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion, who have fully collected every form of virtue roots, and who, in brief, have familiarized themselves completely with the correct forms of bodhisattva conduct. 
This mind is developed by bodhisattvas after they have mentally taken hold of to be swiftly and correctly accomplished in the future: 
the perfection of all the accumulations enlightenment, the perfection of all the ways that a bodhisattva acts on behalf of sentient beings, unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, the perfection of every aspect of the spiritual qualities possessed by a buddha, and the perfection of the activities that are performed by a buddha. 
This mind is also developed that swiftly and correctly accords with all the forms of all the accumulations enlightenment, that accords with all the kinds of bodhisattva activities that should be carried out in relation to sentient beings, that accords with attaining the self-originated knowledge of unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, and that accords with carrying out every kind of a buddha’s activities. 
In addition, through having developed this mind, a bodhisattva has gone beyond the stage of an immature bodhisattva who is an ordinary person.1287 He has entered into the bodhisattva’s state of certainty.1288 He has been born into the family of the tathāgatas. 
He is a spiritual son born from the Tathāgata’s breast.1289 He is one who with certainty is destined to reach complete enlightenment and one who is established in the lineage of the tathāgatas. 
Being of such a nature, he attains the faith that is born of insight1290 and experiences great elation. 
He greatly avoids being contentious, wanting to do harm, or developing anger toward others. 
With a pure superior attitude, holds in mind every way in which bodhisattvas act on behalf of sentient beings and every way in which to perfect all the accumulations enlightenment, as well as every aspect of enlightenment, of a buddha’s spiritual qualities, and of the manner in which a buddha’s activities are carried out. 
He maintains strong devotion and undertakes them. 
Seeing and realizing himself to be in accord with the swift attainment of these , he feels great elation. 
“I am endowed with extensive virtue that relates to departure , is free of desire, and is unequaled; I am endowed with an elation that benefits both body and mind; and I am endowed with intense forms of virtuous qualities. 
I am also near to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
My superior attitude toward great enlightenment is completely pure. 
All my fears are gone.” For these reasons, too, he feels great elation. 
The five fears that have ceased for a bodhisattva who has developed the extremely well-ascertained form of mind are as follows. 
Therefore, he has no fear of being without a livelihood. 
He also does not hope to receive anything from others. 
“May I be able to provide these beings with every object.” Therefore, he has no fear of gaining a bad reputation. 
Because the view that believes in a self is gone, he no longer develops the belief that the self will cease to exist. 
Therefore, he has no fear of dying. 
“In the future following my death, I am sure to meet with buddhas and bodhisattvas.” Therefore, he has no fear of the unhappy migratory states. 
He thinks, “Throughout the entire world, no one1291 is seen to have a attitude that is the equal of mine, much less one that is higher.” Therefore, he has no fear of becoming timid in a group. 
In these ways, he is one in whom all fears are gone, one in whom all trepidation about instructions regarding the profound is gone, one in whom all arrogance and pride due to having an elevated status1292 are gone, one in whom all hatred toward those who commit acts of harm and wrongful behavior is gone, and one in whom all excitement about worldly enjoyment is gone. 
With a attitude that is unimpaired because it is free of mental afflictions and that is extraordinary because of its fervor, he generates every form of bodhisattva effort in this life in order to attain every form of virtuous quality, and he does so governed by and preceded by faith. 
While on this pleasurable state of great joy, with regard to the future he also carries out, based upon the purity of his attitude, the ten great aspirational prayers that were described previously in the chapter entitled “The Spiritual Qualities That Are Conducive to Enlightenment.”1293 Having carried out the great aspirational prayer to honor the masters and lords of Dharma, the foremost beings who are worthy of being venerated, he carries out the second to maintain the true Dharma that they teach, the third to advance the true Dharma in a regular manner, the fourth to practice the bodhisattva conduct in a manner that accords with that , the fifth to ripen those beings who are vessels for that , the sixth to travel to buddha fields, see the tathāgatas who are present there, honor them, and hear the true Dharma , the seventh to purify one’s own buddha field, the eighth never to be separated from buddhas and bodhisattvas in all one’s rebirths and to have the same thoughts and actions as those of other bodhisattvas, the ninth that all one’s activities that are done to benefit sentient beings should be fruitful, and the tenth great aspirational prayer to attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment and perform the deeds of a buddha. 
“In an uninterrupted manner that resembles both the limitlessness of the realm of sentient beings and the limitlessness of worldly qualities, may these great aspirational prayers of mine never fail to come to pass, never be lost , and never become disconnected , in rebirth after rebirth until I reach the ultimate goal of enlightenment.” It should be understood that the former1294 the aspirational prayers in terms of the goals toward which the mind is being fixed, while the latter1295 in terms of the manner in which the mind is being fixed . 
Moreover, after having carried out these initial great aspirational prayers, the bodhisattva generates countless hundreds of thousands of groups of ten aspirational prayers as correct forms of aspirational prayers. 
In order to perfect the pleasurable state of great joy, ten spiritual qualities are developed by the who, in this manner, has carried out aspirational prayers that relate to the future and has generated effort in this life. 
He develops intense faith toward all the spiritual qualities of a buddha. 
Through reflecting, “I must be the one who liberates sentient beings from this entire mass of suffering,” loving-kindness . 
Through having the intention to save from their suffering, a lack of concern for oneself. 
The tirelessness that seeks mundane and transcendent qualities from others for the sake of those very sentient beings also . 
Shame and abashment concerning the observance of a time, opportunity, and measure in relation to those very activities also . 
The power of firmness in the sense that one never turns back from those very activities. 
In addition, the qualities of worshipping and serving the tathāgatas through the practices of both gain and honor. 
Having taken up these ten qualities, the bodhisattva observes them and practices them extensively. 
In addition, he seeks from the buddhas and bodhisattvas every aspect of the path’s virtuous qualities and faults that pertain to the remaining nine pleasurable states of superior morality, etc. 
He also conveys a great company of sentient beings along the path that leads them out of samsara’s wilderness. 
On the basis of two causes, many buddhas appear to the vision of who is established in this pleasurable state. 
These are both the ones that he has learned about in the bodhisattva collection of scriptures and the ones toward whom he has developed devotion. 
They are tathāgatas who have many different names in world spheres having many different names that lie throughout the ten directions. 
With a mind possessed of great faith, he implores them to let themselves be seen. 
This is one of the causes. 
“May I take birth in that where a buddha has appeared.” This aspirational prayer of who has such a nature continues to grow ever stronger. 
Having seen these tathāgatas on the basis of a vision that is gained through sincere faith and by means of the strength of his aspirational prayers, he provides them with every form of worship and means of comfort. 
With all his ability and strength, he also honors the Sangha. 
He also listens to the Dharma from those tathāgatas, and then both takes up and maintains it. 
He successfully implements by means of a practice that accords with the Dharma.1296 He dedicates these roots of virtue to great enlightenment. 
He ripens sentient beings by means of the four principles for attracting a following. 
By means of these three purifying causes—worshipping and paying homage to the tathāgatas, the Dharma, and the Sangha; ripening beings with the principles for attracting a following; and dedicating roots of virtue to enlightenment— roots of virtue are purified to an ever-greater degree over a period lasting many trillions of trillions of kalpas. 
For example, gold that is in its natural state becomes ever more pure as it is repeatedly placed into fire by an expert smith. 
In the same way, the virtue roots of a bodhisattva who possesses a pure attitude become ever more refined by means of these purifying causes. 
Moreover, as a form of birth, the who is established on this mostly becomes a wheel ruler who is lord of the Rose Apple Continent in rebirth after rebirth. 
Having become free of all forms of the stain of stinginess, he is a master at removing the stinginess that is possessed by sentient beings. 
Whatever action he undertakes on the basis of the four principles for attracting a following never fails to be accompanied by thoughts that are directed toward the Jewels and the attainment of every aspect of enlightenment. 
Having done so, he can enter a hundred bodhisattva concentrations within a single instant, moment, or brief period;1297 see a hundred tathāgatas in their separate buddha fields with his divine eye; and perceive the magical emanations and supernatural power of those as well as the supernatural power of bodhisattvas. 
He can cause a hundred world spheres to shake1298 and, similarly, can travel to them with his body. 
Having filled with light, he can reveal them to others. 
By a hundred magical emanations, he can ripen a hundred sentient beings who are suitable to be disciplined. 
If he wishes to, he can also empower himself to remain alive for a hundred kalpas. 
His knowledge-perception can reach a hundred kalpas into the past or the future.1299 He can examine a hundred Dharma doors,1300 which are Dharma doors for such topics as the heaps, the constituents, and the bases.1301 He can magically create a hundred physical forms and also manifest a hundred bodhisattvas as a retinue for each of those physical forms. 
Beyond these qualities, it should be understood that bodhisattvas who are established in this pleasurable state of great joy are able to produce immeasurable numbers of supernatural magical creations on the strength of aspirational prayers, for they are beings who possess the power of aspirational prayers and, by means of special kinds of aspirational prayers, they generate .1302 It would not be easy to count the number of these correct aspirational prayers, even if one spent up to a trillion trillion kalpas trying to do so. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of great joy, in terms of that are extremely well ascertained, in terms of the four aspects of the mind that is developed, in terms of the correct aspirational prayers that are carried out and the effort that is generated, in terms of the manner in which this pleasurable state is perfected, in terms of the manner in which the subsequent pleasurable states are caused to arise, in terms of the manner in which roots of virtue are refined, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
In addition, a more extensive description can be found in the sutra itself, within the section of the Sutra on the Ten Stages that addresses the stage of great joy.1303 It should also be understood that the ten bodhisattva stages in the Sutra on the Ten Stages are the ten pleasurable states that are presented here in this manual on the bodhisattva collection , beginning with the pleasurable state of great joy and continuing in the same order up to the supreme pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , it is called a “stage” in the sense of being that bodhisattvas take possession of1304 and it is called a “pleasurable state” in the sense of being in which they remain in a state of enjoyment.1305 Regarding this , what aspects, what marks, and what signs should the bodhisattvas in the pleasurable state of superior morality be understood to possess? 
In this case, a bodhisattva first attains a purity of attitude that is characterized by ten types of mental attitude while he is still in the pleasurable state of great joy. 
They are the superior attitude that never violates a promise made to any spiritual teacher, anyone worthy of respect, or anyone worthy of being venerated; the attitude that is genial toward those bodhisattvas who are exemplary Dharma practitioners and dwells happily with them; the attitude that exercises control over one’s own mind and overcomes all the root and secondary mental afflictions and deeds of Māra;1306 the attitude that all formations1307 are flawed; the attitude that nirvana is advantageous; the attitude that the virtuous entities that are conducive to enlightenment are to be cultivated continually; the attitude of solitude because it is conducive to meditation upon those ; the attitude that is indifferent to worldly objects of desire and positions of eminence, as well as gain and honor; the attitude that rejects the Lesser Vehicle and master the Great Vehicle; and the attitude that accomplish all the aims of all sentient beings. 
It is due to the arising of these ten correct attitudes in the mind that attitude is said to be purified. 
Moreover, through having developed these same ten attitudes to a level of greatness and having brought them to a state of fullness, a bodhisattva enters into and advances along the second , which is the pleasurable state of superior morality. 
He does not engage in even very minor forms of immorality that are included among the wrongful action-paths,1308 much less any of the middling or great forms. 
He also naturally displays complete forms of the ten virtuous action-paths. 
He also correctly discerns deeds in terms of their maturation results and corresponding results.1309 can be seen to abandon nonvirtuous deeds and take up virtuous deeds. 
He also wants to cause others to take up this same behavior and causes them to do so. 
Through feeling sympathetic toward the entire realm of sentient beings who are defiled by the fault of having engaged in wicked deeds, who without exception are suffering in an ultimate sense whether they are in prosperous or unfortunate circumstances, and who live in a state of adversity that subjects them to multiple forms of calamity, develops a sympathy that is extensive and repeatedly considers . 
It should be understood that, as in the previous , who is established in this pleasurable state of superior morality sees buddhas and purifies his roots of virtue. 
In this case there is the following difference. 
For example, just as that same gold that is being placed into fire by an expert smith becomes even more pure when it is also dipped in vitriol, it should be understood that this bodhisattva’s roots of virtue similarly purity. 
Because the purity of mental attitude in this pleasurable state has reached a point of culmination, he is mostly reborn as a wheel ruler with dominion over all four continents, and to a great degree causes beings to turn away from immorality and the nonvirtuous action-paths and to take up the virtuous action-paths. 
It should be understood that his powers are ten times greater than they were during the previous . 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of superior morality, in terms of the natural observance of morality, in terms of the elimination of every aspect of the impurity of immorality, in terms of the knowledge that fathoms every aspect of the causes and results that pertain to every action-path, in terms of the desire to cause others to take up virtuous deeds, in terms of the development of extensive sympathy , in terms of reflection upon the suffering and misfortune that the realm of sentient beings create by their deeds, in terms of the purification of roots of virtue, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
In addition, a more extensive description can be found in the sutra itself, within the section of the Sutra on the Ten Stages that addresses the stainless stage. 
It is called the “stainless stage”1310 because the stain of immorality is gone. 
It is called the “pleasurable state of superior morality” for the very same reason that the stain of immorality is gone. 
It should be understood that what is there as the stainless stage is here as the pleasurable state of superior morality. 
Regarding this , what aspects, what marks, and what signs are possessed by bodhisattvas in the pleasurable state of superior mind training? 
In this case, a bodhisattva previously brought to mind, delighted in, and thoroughly comprehended ten pure attitude while he was still in the pleasurable state of superior morality. 
By employing ten further ways of bringing to mind these pure attitudes in order to develop them to a level of greatness and bring them to fullness, he rises above the pleasurable state of superior morality and enters the pleasurable state of superior mind training. 
the form of attention , “My mental attitude is pure in ten ways”; the form of attention , “It is improper for me to lose these ten kinds of virtuous attitude”; the form of attention , “My mind does not rush toward the outflows or the entities that are related to the outflows; it remains in a state of opposition to them”; the form of attention , “My consciousness remains fixed in meditation upon their antidotes”; the form of attention , “It is improper for me to subsequently lose these antidotes”; the form of attention , “It is improper that I, who adhere firmly in this way to the antidotes, should be overcome by any of the outflows, by any of the entities that are related to the outflows, or by any Māra”; the form of attention , “My mind remains free of any despondency with regard to all the spiritual qualities of a buddha”; the form of attention , “There is no uneasiness in my mind with regard to any of the forms of conduct that are difficult to carry out”; the form of attention , “My mind is devoted exclusively to the Great Vehicle; it does not toward any of the other that pertain to the Lesser Vehicle”; and the form of attention , “My mind delights in accomplishing the aims of all sentient beings.” The bodhisattva who is established in the pleasurable state of superior mind training discredits1311 conditioning formations on the basis of their manifold disadvantages. 
He also deliberately develops aversion1312 toward them. 
He remains mindful with regard to all conditioning formations and possesses a form of effort that pur sues enlightenment ardently. 
He possesses an attitude that feels abundant compassion toward sentient beings. 
He recognizes that the sole means of liberating sentient beings from suffering permanently is the knowledge that is completely free of the obstruction caused by the mental afflictions. 
He recognizes as well that attainment of the meditative absorptions, the deliverances,1316 one-pointed concentration, and the states of composure must be preceded by learning the bodhisattva collection of scriptures and that such learning constitutes their cause. 
Having understood , he undertakes to seek such learning by putting forth great effort. 
There is no property, possession, or inner or outer object that he would not give up for the sake of learning the true Dharma. 
There is no form of service to a venerable teacher that he would not accept. 
There is no act of humility1317 that he would not accept. 
There is no physical pain that he would not accept. 
He is more pleased at hearing a single verse of four lines than if he a great heap of jewels so large that it would fill the triple-thousand . 
He is more pleased at hearing a single Dharma saying on the purification of bodhisattva activities that was taught by a true and complete buddha than if he were to obtain birth in all such positions as those of Śakra, Māra, Brahmā, a Lokapāla, or a wheel ruler. 
“I will enable you to hear a Dharma statement on the purification of bodhisattva activities that was taught by a true and complete buddha if you will throw yourself into a great pit of fire and agree to undergo that great suffering,” upon hearing this, he would think, “For the sake of that Dharma statement . 
I would endure throwing myself from Brahmā’s domain into a pit of fire equal in size to the great triple-thousand , let alone into an ordinary . 
We should seek the Buddha’s Dharma teachings even if it means having to endure the suffering of the hells multiple times, not to mention having to undergo ordinary suffering.” Having sought Dharma teachings while putting forth this kind of effort, he properly brings to mind the following thought: 
After having stayed in these extensively, turns away from the meditative absorptions, one-pointed concentrations, and states of composure, and by the strength of aspirational prayers is reborn in the desire realm in places where he perceives that the welfare of beings and the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment can be perfected. 
His wrongful desire, anger, and ignorance have become completely inactive. 
The manner in which he sees buddhas and purifies his roots of virtue should be understood as it was described at length previously.1324 In this instance there is the following difference. 
For example, just as the gold from which impurities and contaminants have been removed retains the same weight and measure in the hands of a skillful smith, it should be understood that this roots of virtue also become purified in the same way.1325 In terms of rebirth, for the most part he becomes Śakra, the lord of gods, and one who is skilled at turning sentient beings away from desire for sensory pleasures. 
It should be understood that the spiritual powers described in the previous pleasurable state in a magnitude of a thousand are possessed here in a magnitude of a hundred thousand. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of superior mind training, in terms of its being entered by perfecting attention in which mental states are reflected upon, in terms of having correctly understood conditioning formations, the body of sentient beings, and great enlightenment, in terms of correctly seeking the means of liberating sentient beings from their suffering, in terms of seeking the Dharma with an attitude of great respect, in terms of a form of practice that accords with the Dharma and to achieve and abide in the mundane states of meditative absorption, one-pointed concentration, states of composure, and supernatural knowledge, in terms of generating the aspirational prayers that turn back those and taking birth wherever one desires, in terms of the purification of roots of virtue, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
In addition, a more extensive description can be found in the sutra itself, within the section of the Sutra on the Ten Stages that addresses the stage that produces light. 
Because this stage is characterized by the appearance of the light of the Dharma in the form of learning and the appearance of the light that consists of one-pointed concentration, it is called “ produces light.”1326 This light comes into being due to the inner purity of the mind. 
Therefore, this pleasurable state is called “superior mind training.” it should be understood that the very same reason the stage that produces light is also the reason the pleasurable state of superior mind training. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment? 
In this case, a bodhisattva previously attained ten entry into the light of the Dharma1327 on the strength of his having pursued learning, while he was still in the pleasurable state of superior mind training. 
Through developing those to a level of greatness and bringing them to fullness, he goes beyond the pleasurable state of superior mind training and enters the first pleasurable state of superior wisdom. 
Furthermore, the wording for the ten forms of entry into the light of the Dharma should be understood just as it appears in the sutra. 
The essential import of what is indicated by these into the light of the Dharma should be understood as follows: 
They are described in the sutra as causing one’s knowledge to be ripened in ten ways. 
Through acquiring the qualities that possess this nature, he becomes one who has joined the family of the tathāgatas. 
As described in the sutra, meditate upon the thirty-seven spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, beginning with the closely placed recollections, on the basis of every aspect of the bodhisattva perspective.1330 Through cultivating those spiritual qualities in a manner that is supported by skillful means, even subtle forms of the perishable collection view, as well as all the impulses to believe that the heaps, bases, and constituents are real, are abandoned in the sense that they become completely inactive. 
Through their abandonment, completely and entirely refrains from engaging in those acts that the Tathāgata disapproves of. 
In addition, he also pursues in a proper manner all those acts that the Tathāgata approves of. 
Having developed such a nature, he becomes one whose mind is increasingly more agreeable, gentle, and endowed with fitness.1331 Likewise, he becomes one whose mind is extremely pure in a variety of ways. 
He becomes one who possesses a range of virtuous qualities that are in keeping with those attitudes, including gratitude and appreciation , etc. 
Seeking the acts that purify the higher stages, he achieves and maintains the ability to put forth great effort. 
Because of that, the constituent elements of his attitude, superior attitude, and devotion1332 become fully developed. 
Because of that, he also becomes incapable of being led astray or shaken by any heretics, Māra, or persons who are hostile to the teaching. 
The manner in which sees buddhas and purifies his roots of virtue should be understood as it was described at length previously. 
In this instance there is the following difference. 
For example, just as that same gold that a skillful smith has fashioned into decorative objects cannot be outshone by gold that has not been made into ornaments, this bodhisattva’s roots of virtue cannot be outshone by the virtue roots of bodhisattvas who are established on other less developed pleasurable states. 
For example, the light that is emitted by the precious jewel1333 cannot be outshone by that of any other jewels and its splendor cannot be destroyed by any form of wind, water, or rain. 
Similarly, this bodhisattva cannot be outshone by all the listeners and solitary realizers nor can the light of his wisdom be destroyed by any form of Māra or other adversary. 
In terms of rebirth, he becomes a king of the class of gods known as Suyāma1334 and one who is skilled at removing the perishable collection view that is possessed by sentient beings. 
With regard to the spiritual powers that were declared to have a magnitude of a hundred thousand on the previous pleasurable state, it should be understood that here they are declared to have a magnitude of ten million. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, in terms of perfecting entry into the light of the Dharma; in terms of ripening their knowledge; in terms of cultivating the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment; in terms of abandoning all the impulses to generate erring beliefs, such as the perishable collection view, etc.; in terms of avoiding those acts that are forbidden and observing those that are approved of; in terms of how that causes the mind to become more gentle; in terms of increasing those spiritual qualities that accord with that ; in terms of putting forth the great effort that relates to seeking the acts that purify the stages; in terms of how that purifies one’s attitude, superior attitude, and devotion; in terms of how that prevents one from being led astray by any persons who are hostile to the teaching; in terms of the purification of roots of virtue; in terms of rebirth ; and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
A more extensive description can be found in the section of the Sutra on the Ten Stages that addresses the stage of blazing light. 
On this stage the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment are light rays of knowledge that correctly teach the Dharma and generate the light of wisdom throughout the worlds. 
Therefore, this stage is called “blazing light.”1335 That very is referred to here as “the pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment.” Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ second pleasurable state of superior wisdom—that is, the one that relates to the truths? 
Here a bodhisattva enters the second pleasurable state of superior wisdom by developing to a level of greatness and bringing to fullness the ten sameness of purified attitude1336 that were attained on the previous pleasurable state of superior wisdom. 
The wording for the ten sameness of purified attitude should be understood as it appears in the sutra. 
The essential import of sameness of purified attitude should be understood as follows: 
who is established in this pleasurable state and who is desirous of a more excellent form of knowledge perceives the four noble truths as they truly are on the basis of ten aspects. 
The wording for all of them should be understood as it appears in the sutra. 
The essential import of the ten aspects of knowledge regarding the four noble truths should be understood as follows: 
He strengthens a compassionate attitude toward the realm of sentient beings. 
He correctly discerns the wrong forms of practice that immature sentient beings carry out in relation to both the past and the future. 
He firmly fixes his upon acquiring a great quantity of the merit and wisdom accumulations in order to liberate those and also develops an attitude that is directed toward that . 
Having abandoned other forms of thought, he ripens sentient beings using a variety of methods that cause them to become spiritually mature. 
Out of compassion for sentient beings and with the aim of ultimately establishing them in enlightenment, engages in every kind of secular occupation and craft that is beneficial to sentient beings, such as scribal work, treatises, signing, counting, keeping security deposits, etc.,1339 as mentioned in the sutra. 
With the aim of progressively until they have been brought to enlightenment, in a manner that conforms with the affairs of secular life, using methods for overcoming poverty; by removing imbalances of the elements and the harm that is inflicted by humans and nonhuman ; by turning away from wicked forms of pleasure through providing them with objects irreproachable forms of entertainment and enjoyment; by enabling those who desire the elements that are needed for communal living to obtain those elements with little difficulty; by providing protection from the harm that is inflicted by the king, robbers, and the like; by approving of proper activities and forbidding improper ones; by causing beings to take up auspicious subjects and abandon inauspicious ones; and by teaching beings not to injure one another in this life and the correct paths to a high status in future lives. 
everything else are the same as the ones that were given previously. 
Regarding this , there is the following difference. 
For example, just as that same gold which a skillful smith has embellished with sapphires and adorned in an incomparable manner cannot be outshone by any other kinds of gold, this bodhisattva cannot be outshone by any of the listeners and solitary realizers or by the bodhisattvas who are established in any of the other stages. 
For example, just as the light of the moon, the sun, and the stars remains undiverted by all the whirlwinds even as all share the quality of being conveyed by the wind,1340 the wisdom of this bodhisattva cannot be diverted by any of the listeners and solitary realizers even as it also operates in concert with worldly activities.1341 In terms of rebirth, he becomes a king among the Tuṣita class of gods and one who is skilled at turning away from all heretical teachers. 
It should also be understood that spiritual powers are described as being possessed in a magnitude of a billion. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the truths, in terms of its being entered by perfecting a sameness of pure attitude; in terms of strengthening the manner in which means and the truths are investigated; in terms of discrediting all conditioning formations; in terms of the strengthening of one’s compassionate attitude toward sentient beings; in terms of generating aspirational prayers to collect the merit and wisdom accumulations for the sake of those ; in terms of strengthening such virtuous qualities as recollection, understanding, and realization; in terms of having no other thought except applying oneself to the ripening of sentient beings in every manner; in terms of their engaging in secular occupations; in terms of the purification of roots of virtue; in terms of rebirth ; and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
A more extensive description can be found in the sutra itself, in the section of the Sutra on the Ten Stages that addresses the stage on which it is very difficult to be overcome. 
That is why this stage is called “very difficult to be overcome.”1342 For the very same reason, should also be regarded as the pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the truths. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattva’s pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to dependent origination? 
In this case, a bodhisattva attains ten sameness that apply to all entities while still on the pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to the truths. 
The wording them should be understood as it appears in the sutra. 
Through developing these to a level of greatness and bringing them to fullness, he gains entry to this pleasurable state. 
The individual meanings of these ten forms of sameness that apply to entities should be understood as follows:1343 by means of the sameness in which all entities lack any sign of an essence that exists in an ultimate sense, the sameness in which lack any attribute by the appearances that are described with words and that carry out actions, the sameness in which not to have been born on their own due to the nonexistence of that very attribute, the sameness in which not to have arisen from a cause, the sameness in which have always been completely tranquil1344 because they have not arisen on their own and from causes, the sameness in which free of elaboration1345 when the awareness that apprehends reality is present, the sameness in which abstain from the activities of taking on and giving up,1346 the sameness in which are isolated1347 in the sense that those very are separated from the state of affliction the mental afflictions and suffering, the sameness in which entities that possess conceptually fabricated essences resemble illusions and magical creations,1348 and the sameness in which beyond the duality of existence and nonexistence,1349 this being their essence and the one that is discerned by nonconceptual awareness. 
who is established in this pleasurable state is one whose compassion toward sentient beings has increased greatly and one who has generated an intense aspiration and desire for enlightenment. 
He exam ines and discerns the origin and disintegration of the worlds by correctly scrutinizing dependent origination in every way. 
He also develops the three doors to liberation that is based upon this knowledge of dependent origination—namely, of emptiness, of signlessness, and of wishlessness.1350 Because of that, he does not give rise to the conceptions of self and other, an agent and a being that experiences1351 , or existence and nonexistence. 
“Conditioned entities—which are naturally weak, which neither constitute a self nor belong to a self, and which are marred by a multitude of faults—come into being through a connection with the mental afflictions and through the convergence of causal conditions. 
They will not in the absence of a connection with the mental afflictions and when those causal conditions have not converged. 
Therefore, I should disrupt the connection with the mental afflictions and the convergence of the causal conditions in order to safeguard myself, but I should not completely and totally put an end to conditioned entities so that I may continue to benefit sentient beings.” who possesses such a form of knowledge and compassion on this pleasurable state is one who is facing toward a pleasurable state of the perfection of wisdom that is called “facing unobstructed knowledge.” by means of which he remains free of attachment while engaging in every mundane conduct. 
It should be understood that this pleasurable state also includes a forbearance that conforms to the intense bodhisattva forbearance on the seventh stage and marks the culmination of conduct that derives from the application . 
Through being one whose face is turned toward the pleasurable state the perfection of wisdom that is called “facing unobstructed knowledge,” collects the causal factors that bring forth enlightenment but does not remain in a state of continuous association with worldly conditioned entities. 
He perceives the quietude1352 to be a state of peace but does not settle down in it. 
A hundred thousand sets of ten doors to one-pointed concentration , beginning with the one-pointed concentration “the emptiness that enters,” become manifest to who has attained this knowledge that includes means and wisdom. 
It should be understood that, just as with the one-pointed concentration on emptiness, the same also occurs for one-pointed concentration on wishlessness and on signlessness. 
He also becomes one who is incapable of being led away from any aspect of the teaching by any form of Māra or heretics or persons who are hostile to the teaching. 
The remaining are the same as the ones that were given previously. 
For example, just as that same gold which a skillful smith has embellished and adorned with gems of lapis lazuli cannot be outshone by any other kinds of gold, similarly the roots of virtue of this bodhisattva have been purified to a much higher extent and cannot be outshone. 
as was described previously. 
For example, just as the light of the moon refreshes the bodies of sentient beings and is a light that cannot be destroyed by any of the four spheres of wind, similarly the light of wisdom possessed by this bodhisattva extinguishes the burning fires of all sentient beings’ mental afflictions and it cannot be destroyed by any Māra or by any hostile persons. 
He becomes a king of the Sunirmita1353 class of gods and one who is skilled at turning away from all forms of exaggerated pride. 
It should also be recognized that spiritual powers are described in a magnitude of a trillion. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the pleasurable state of superior wisdom that relates to dependent origination, in terms of its being entered by perfecting the forms of sameness that apply to all entities, in terms of how dependent origination is realized and the doors to liberation arise, in terms of how all forms of wrong conception are no longer developed, in terms of the means by which samsara is embraced, in terms of being one who is facing toward a pleasurable state of the perfection of wisdom that is called “facing unobstructed knowledge,” in terms of attaining immeasurable forms of one-pointed concentration, in terms of attaining an adamantine attitude, in terms of being incapable of being led away from the teaching, in terms of the purification of roots of virtue, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
A more extensive description can be found in the stage of facing toward. 
is called “facing toward”1354 because one is facing toward the pleasurable state of the perfection of wisdom that is called “facing unobstructed knowledge.” It should be understood that this very reason also this pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by both mental preparation and effort? 
In this case, immediately following the pleasurable state of superior wisdom, a bodhisattva attains ten extraordinary ways of undertaking a distinct path1355 which are accomplished by both means and wisdom, and which, though mundane in nature, have nothing in common with all sentient beings and all worlds. 
Through developing them to a level of greatness and bringing them to fullness, he enters the seventh pleasurable state. 
The extensive wording them should be understood as it appears in the sutra. 
They relate to the acquisition of the merit that produces mundane forms of excellence; the attitude that wishes to benefit and bring happiness to sentient beings; increasing to a higher level the merit accumulation and the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, in order to enlightenment; being separate from the listeners; being separate from the solitary realizers; the entity-source of sentient beings; the entity-source of the worlds; and knowledge of a tathāgata’s body, speech, and mind. 
Endowed with these comprehends the immeasurable and innumerable objects that constitute a tathāgata’s sphere of action. 
Perceiving as well that a tathāgata’s immeasurable sphere of action arises by means of effortlessness, signlessness, and becoming free of concepts and conceptual thoughts,1356 he applies himself continuously and without interruption, in all physical behavior, conduct, pleasurable states of abiding, and forms of attention, to the aim of generating that . 
In every situation that is in, he never strays from the path. 
In each moment of thought, all the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, headed by the ten perfections, are being developed to an extraordinary degree. 
This is not, however, accomplished in the same way in other pleasurable states. 
In the first pleasurable state of great joy, by strongly taking hold of aspirational prayers. 
By contrast, in this seventh pleasurable state, the limbs of enlightenment are developed in a way that creates all the spiritual qualities of a buddha, because the culmination of the bodhisattva conduct that derives from the application of effort occurs within this pleasurable state and also because brings entry into the eighth state of abiding in which transcendent awareness, supernatural knowledge, and conduct have become pure. 
That is to say, immediately following this pleasurable state, a bodhisattva enters the eighth pleasurable state, and that pleasurable state is one that is absolutely pure. 
These seven pleasurable states, however, have a mixed. 
They are unafflicted in that they are the precursors of the pleasurable state that is completely pure; however, because they have not yet attained that , they are said to be where afflicted conduct has occurred. 
All of the mental afflictions—beginning with desire, etc.—are abandoned on this state of abiding. 
He should be understood as one who is neither subject to mental affliction nor completely free of affliction, because he no longer generates and because he desires a buddha’s knowledge. 
who possesses such a nature gives rise to unlimited acts of body, speech, and mind that are endowed with a pure superior attitude. 
He those acts that were condemned by the Tathāgata, as previously. 
The knowledge of the worldly crafts that was pursued by him during the fifth pleasurable state is perfected here. 
He is esteemed as a teacher throughout the great triple-thousand except for the tathāgatas and those bodhisattvas who are established in higher pleasurable states. 
All the meditative absorption, etc., that are spiritual qualities conducive to enlightenment become manifest through his being turned toward the kinds of meditation. 
They do not, however, through being a condition that is a ripening , as they do on the eighth pleasurable state. 
Having applied himself in this way, he achieves, among the bodhisattva forms of one-pointed concentration, a hundred thousand sets of ten forms of one-pointed concentration, beginning with the one-pointed concentration “well-examined examination.”1357 Through having attained these goes completely beyond the range of the one-pointed concentration that are possessed by listeners and solitary realizers. 
With a sympathetic regard for sentient beings, he does not relax the effort to seek higher forms of excellence. 
In order to bring about enlightenment, he gives rise to acts of body, speech, and mind that are limitless, free of all signs, and extremely purified, and that will cause the appearance of the forbearance of the nonarising of entities.1358 On this pleasurable state, completely surpass all the listeners and solitary realizers on the basis of the range of their intellect. 
However, on the other six on the basis of they strongly take hold of the qualities of a buddha. 
Also, while a bodhisattva enter the state of composure that is a cessation on the sixth pleasurable state, on this he enter it in each instant . 
It is also a marvelous and inconceivable quality of actions that, although he abides in the summit of reality,1359 he does not manifest that cessation.1360 On the strength of practicing this very skill and knowledge, he carries out a bodhisattva conduct that is distinct from that of all sentient beings , while it has the appearance of being worldly , it does not have such a nature. 
as in the sutra.1361 Nevertheless, an abbreviated meaning of this is as follows. 
The remaining are the same as the ones that were given previously. 
With regard to this , there is the following difference. 
For example, just as the same gold which a skillful smith has embellished and adorned all over with precious jewels, and that glitters so strikingly, cannot be outshone by any other of the Rose Apple Continent’s ornaments, similarly the roots of virtue of that have been purified to such a high extent cannot be outshone by the roots of virtue that are possessed by any of the listeners and solitary realizers or the roots of virtue that are possessed by any other bodhisattvas who are established in much lower pleasurable states. 
For example, just as the light of the sun causes the great majority of whatever wet things there are in the Rose Apple Continent to become completely dry and it also cannot be outshone by the light of any other , similarly the light of wisdom that is possessed by this bodhisattva destroys all the poison of the mental afflictions that is possessed by sentient beings and it cannot be outshone by the light of the knowledge possessed by all the listeners, etc., as described before. 
becomes a king of the Vaśavartī1363 class of gods and one who is skilled at causing listeners and solitary realizers to attain spiritual realizations. 
It should be understood that spiritual powers are described in a magnitude of one trillion trillion.1364 It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by both mental preparation and effort, in terms of its being entered by perfecting the extraordinary ways of undertaking a distinct path that are accomplished by both means and wisdom, in terms of how generating a tathāgata’s sphere of action is comprehended and are carried out uninterruptedly, in terms of how all the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment are developed each moment, in terms of how it is formulated that are both afflicted and unafflicted, in terms of how the culmination of the bodhisattva conduct that derives from the application of effort occurs within this pleasurable state, in terms of how every kind of mundane occupation and craft, etc., becomes perfected on the strength of actions that are brought forth with a pure attitude, in terms of how immeasurable forms of one-pointed concentration that are distinct from those possessed by listeners and solitary realizers are attained, in terms of being able to enter the state of composure that is a cessation in each instant , in terms of how worldly conduct that is distinct from that of all sentient beings is carried out, in terms of the purification of roots of virtue, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
As stated previously, a more extensive description can be found in the stage that goes a long way. 
It is called goes a long way”1365 because the culmination of the form of bodhisattva conduct that derives from the application of effort occurs within it. 
It should be understood that this very reason also this pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state that is free of signs and also free of effort? 
In this case, on the immediately prior pleasurable state a bodhisattva attains ten1366 forms of knowledge that penetrate into the highest truth as it relates to all entities. 
With regard to the three times and according to the particular circumstances, have to do with the fact that are primordially without origination, that do not undergo birth, and that lack any attributes; they have to do with the fact that are neither produced nor destroyed by some other entity that has a causal nature; they have to do with the fact that the very same essence which appears to be capable of verbal description and to carry out an action, but which, in relation to the reality that is ineffable in an ultimate sense, does not exist by way of an attribute or a causal nature, also is not something by which the process of affliction is set in motion or terminated; they have to do with the fact that, in relation to the ineffable reality that does exist, affliction—which is caused by ignorance of that or a belief that apprehends it wrongly—is characterized by a sameness that applies at all times beginning, middle, and end; and they have to do with the process of affliction is eliminated by means of the sameness that does not conceptualize and that correctly enters into suchness. 
Through developing these ten forms of knowledge to a level of greatness and bringing them to fullness, enters into this eighth pleasurable state that is totally pure. 
established here attains the supreme and exceedingly pure form of a bodhisattva’s forbearance of the nonarising of entities. 
Having investigated all entities by means of the four investigations,1367 when a bodhisattva fully comprehends them on the basis of the four kinds of thorough knowledge of the way things truly are, and after all forms of adherence to mistaken concepts have been dispelled, he perceives, in that life, a condition that is favorable to the nonarising of any afflictive states in relation to all entities.1368 Moreover, he perceive, in a future life, the complete and total nonarising without remainder in relation to those very entities that previously arose because of adherence to mistaken conceptual thoughts. 
However, on this pleasurable state, they do become totally pure. 
Therefore, the bodhisattva is said to be “one who has attained the forbearance that relates to the nonarising of entities.”1369 Through having attained this forbearance, he becomes one who has achieved the bodhisattva’s pleasurable state that has a profound nature. 
four defects that occur on the previous pleasurable state that is free of signs are abandoned: 
The way in which who has been urged in this manner develops knowledge using immeasurable varieties of bodies and his attainment of the ten controlling powers1371 should be understood as they are described at length in the sutra. 
who has attained the controlling powers is able to live for as long as he wishes.1372 He is able to remain in such mental states as the meditative absorptions and the deliverances for as long as he wishes.1373 He can obtain an abundance of every kind of implement, such as food, etc., merely by forming the determination .1374 He is able to perform any artistic craft or occupation that he wishes to. 
He can also take birth however may be desired in relation to deeds that are conducive to every rebirth and in relation to every place that one can be reborn.1375 He can perform every feat of miraculous power according to his wishes.1376 All his aspirational prayers are achieved just as they were intended.1377 However may form a desiderative intention toward some particular substance, that comes into being in exactly that form and not in any other.1378 Whatever object he is desirous of knowing, he realizes it exactly as it is.1379 He is able to obtain whatever is wished for in relation to the collections of names, assertions, and syllables. 
He is skilled at presenting a correct formulation for every form of Dharma teaching.1380 These are the controlling powers that are attained by this bodhisattva. 
In addition to this, the benefits that derive from having attained the controlling powers should be understood as they are described at length in the sutra. 
Having abandoned the ordinary way of seeing buddhas, he is never without a constant and continuous vision of buddhas. 
The remaining his roots of virtue are purified, together with the analogies of gold and light, should be understood as they appear in the sutra. 
The type of rebirth that is taken by the bodhisattva who is in this pleasurable state, as well as the particular form of his spiritual powers, should also be understood as in the sutra. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is also free of effort, in terms of how it is entered by perfecting the ten forms of knowledge that penetrate into the highest truth; in terms of the forbearance that is attained in relation to the nonarising of entities; in terms of the attainment of the profound form of a bodhisattva’s pleasurable state in which all faults are gone; in terms of how by the buddhas to collect, within the stream that is a entry into the Dharma, unlimited ways of attaining transcendent knowledge, supernatural knowledge, and deeds; in terms of how knowledge is developed using immeasurable varieties of bodies; in terms of the controlling powers that are attained; in terms of the benefits of the controlling powers that are experienced; in terms of the purification of roots of virtue; in terms of rebirth ; and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
A more extensive description can be found in the sutra that discusses] the stage of immovability. 
This stage is called immovability”1381 because the mental preparation that occurred previously is gone and because on this stage the mind has entered a path where no effort is required and where it can proceed in an unwavering manner. 
This very reason should also be regarded as this pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of informative knowledge? 
In this case, the bodhisattva, being unsatisfied even with the profound pleasurable state, pursues ever higher and more excellent forms of knowledge. 
In doing so, he realizes everything as it truly is about the formative actions of entities1382 and the knowledge —which enable a bodhisattva to teach every aspect of the Dharma to others—and also about what ought to be done in relation to proclaiming the Dharma. 
These are all points that should be understood as they are described at length in the sutra. 
The particular way in which roots of virtue are purified, the particular type of rebirth that is taken, and the particular qualities of his spiritual powers should also be understood as in the sutra. 
It should be understood that this represents a brief description of the bodhisattvas’ pleasurable state of informative knowledge, in terms of how it is entered by his not being satisfied with a state of tranquil liberation, in terms of knowledge of the formative actions and its relation to proclaiming the Dharma, in terms of knowledge of what ought to be done in relation to that , in terms of attaining the quality of being an inconceivably great Dharma teacher, in terms of the purification of roots of virtue, in terms of rebirth , and in terms of the spiritual powers . 
A more extensive description can be found in the sutra the stage of excellent understanding. 
This stage is called “excellent understanding”1387 because it is a position of spiritual authority in which the Dharma is correctly explained on the strength of a form of understanding that consists of the bodhisattva forms of informative knowledge and that is thoroughly pure in its intention to benefit and bring happiness to all sentient beings. 
This very reason should also be regarded as this pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , what is the bodhisattvas’ supreme pleasurable state? A brief description of the supreme pleasurable state should be understood in terms of . 
When every aspect of the pleasurable state of informative knowledge has been purified, the bodhisattva who here has become worthy of the rank of a Dharma king and has reached the point where he is about to undergo the Dharma consecration attains immeasurable numbers of one-pointed concentrations, beginning with the one named “stainless,” and completes their aims. 
After coming face-to-face with the final concentration, “consecration into the excellence of omniscient knowledge,” who has attained a seat, bodily form, and retinue that are suitable for this , through emanating and drawing back light rays, receives from all the buddhas the consecration of the knowledge that is omniscient in every way. 
After having been consecrated, realizes assemble all those beings who are to be converted as well as the means of liberating them, and the buddha activities. 
attains immeasurable numbers of deliverances, forms of mental retention, and supernatural knowledge. 
The great recollection and knowledge that is developed by the influence of those is establishing the literal explanation . 
Great forms of supernatural knowledge are developed. 
There are also the extraordinary purity of the roots of virtue, the manner of rebirth, and the spiritual powers. 
A more extensive description can be found in the sutra the Dharma cloud stage. 
The bodhisattva who has completed the bodhisattva path and who has fully completed the accumulations for enlightenment receives from the tathāgatas an extremely vast shower of the true Dharma, one that resembles a cloud of Dharma and that cannot be borne by all other sentient beings. 
resembles a great cloud— do not represent the enlightenment of a complete buddha and do represent the enlightenment of a complete buddha—and causes the dust of innumerable sentient beings’ mental afflictions to be settled by an incomparably great rain of true Dharma. 
While established in this stage, he also causes manifold roots of virtue to sprout, grow, and ripen. 
Therefore, this stage is called “the Dharma cloud.”1388 This very reason should also be regarded as this pleasurable state. 
It is not the case that the elements that were described in the higher pleasurable states are completely absent in the preceding pleasurable states. 
However, due to their weakness, they are not counted . 
It should be understood that they are formulated as having either been achieved or perfected on those other higher stages because they have been developed to a moderate or great degree. 
Moreover, concerning this , each pleasurable state is achieved and then perfected over many trillions of great kalpas, or over even a much larger number . 
All of these pleasurable states are completed during three spans of time that are each made up of a countless number of kalpas. 
The interval of countless great kalpas is one goes beyond the pleasurable state of conduct that is based upon devotion and attains the pleasurable state of great joy. 
Moreover, who strives with firmness that , not one who fails to strive . 
During the second interval of countless great kalpas, goes beyond the pleasurable state of great joy up to the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by effort and attains the free of signs and also free of effort. 
This is also one that occurs within a definite period of time, since a bodhisattva whose attitude has become pure strives constantly. 
During the third interval of countless great kalpas, goes beyond the pleasurable state that is free of signs and also free of effort as well as the informative knowledge, and attains the bodhisattva’s supreme pleasurable state. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that “countless kalpas” has two senses. 
A great kalpa itself is said to be “countless” because it is a time that cannot be measured by an enumeration of days, nights, months, and half-months. 
“Countless” also means that the number of those great kalpas is something that is beyond all forms of reckoning.1389 According to the former sense of countless kalpas, enlightenment is attained over a period lasting a great many countless kalpas. 
In addition, according to the latter sense, over a period of three countless kalpas, and a greater number is not required. 
Nevertheless, some of those individuals who exert themselves with the greatest of the great forms of effort can reduce by a great many intermediate kalpas.1390 Others can reduce by as much as great kalpas. 
However, it should be understood that no one reduces by an countless . 
In addition, over the course of these twelve bodhisattva pleasurable states and three countless , both the indisposition that is associated with the obscurations of the mental afflictions and that is associated with the obscurations to that which needs to be known are abandoned. 
Regarding this, it should be understood that the abandonment of the form of indisposition that is associated with the obscurations of the mental afflictions occurs during three pleasurable states. 
On the pleasurable state of great joy, the portion of the mental afflictions that lead to the lower realms has been completely and totally abandoned. 
However, in terms of the active arising , that of the great and middling portions of all the mental afflictions .1391 It should be understood that, on the pleasurable state that is free of signs and also free of effort, the indisposition associated with the portion of the mental afflictions that obstruct the purity the forbearance of the nonarising of entities has been completely and totally abandoned. 
However, in terms of the active arising , that of all the mental afflictions .1392 By contrast, it should be understood that, on the supreme pleasurable state, all of the mental afflictions, together with the obscurations that relate to their traces and latencies, are abandoned. 
It should also be understood that the indisposition that relates to the obscurations to that which needs to be known is of three types: 
that which constitutes the outer covering;1393 that which constitutes the underlying layer;1394 and that which constitutes the innermost core.1395 Regarding these, the form that constitutes the outer covering is abandoned upon the pleasurable state of great joy; the form that constitutes the underlying layer is abandoned upon the pleasurable state that is free of signs and also free of effort; and the form that constitutes the innermost core is abandoned upon the tathāgatas’ pleasurable state. 
This also the state of knowledge in which all the obscurations have been purified. 
The other pleasurable states, in due succession, represent the stages for collecting the accumulations that are needed to abandon the obscurations of the mental afflictions and to that which needs to be known on those three pleasurable states. 
It should be understood that, in brief, there are eleven types of purity that relate to these thirteen pleasurable states: The purity of the spiritual lineage in the first . 
The purity of faith and devotion in the second . 
The purity of superior attitude in the third . 
The purity of morality in the fourth . 
The purity of mind training in the fifth . 
The purity of developing correct knowledge in the sixth, seventh, and eighth . 
The purity that completes the conduct that derives from application in the ninth . 
The purity of the informative knowledge that correctly explains the meaning of that to others in the eleventh . 
The purity of all the obscurations of the mental afflictions and to that which needs to be known, together with their traces, in the thirteenth pleasurable state of the tathāgatas. 
It should also be understood that these thirteen pleasurable states are included within the eight qualities that constitute a summary of the Great Vehicle and that were presented earlier.1396 It should be understood that listening to and reflecting upon the bodhisattva collection of scriptures on the first and second pleasurable states by has generated faith and developed firm devotion; practicing a superior attitude that is preceded by the attainment of various forms of meditation on the third pleasurable state; an abundance of meditation on all the other pleasurable states up to the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by effort; perfecting the fruits of meditation on the three pleasurable states that lie above those and that contain conduct that is completely pure; and the state of absolute deliverance on the pleasurable state of the tathāgatas. 
It should be understood that the succession of the twelve bodhisattva pleasurable states is comparable to that of the listeners’ pleasurable states. 
first should be understood to resemble a listener disciple’s pleasurable state of abiding in his or her own spiritual lineage. 
second resembles pleasurable state that prepares him or her for entry into the flawlessness ultimate correctness.1397 third resembles pleasurable state of entry into flawlessness. 
fourth resembles pleasurable state of the superior morality that is dear to the āryas, which by one who has achieved the faith that is born of insight1398 in order to terminate additional forms of the outflows. 
fifth resembles pleasurable state in which the superior form of mind training is completed on the basis of that superior morality. 
It should be understood that sixth, seventh, and eighth resemble pleasurable state in which the training of superior wisdom in accord with the knowledge of the that was achieved. 
ninth resembles the pleasurable state in which who has closely examined objects of knowledge prepares himor herself to enter the one-pointed concentration that is free of signs. 
tenth resembles perfected pleasurable state that is free of signs. 
eleventh resembles pleasurable state of the seat of liberation, which is attained by one who has arisen from . 
It should be understood that twelfth resembles pleasurable state of abiding in every aspect of the status of an arhat. 
In brief, the births of bodhisattvas are of five types. 
all of all bodhisattvas in all the pleasurable states, and they are irreproachable and dedicated to the benefit and happiness of all sentient beings. 
In this case, during times of famine, distress, and great catastrophe, after having made aspirational prayers ,1399 a bodhisattva is born in such birth states as that of a large fish, etc., in order to become a means of sustenance for sentient beings that only requires little effort. 
Possessing a large body wherever he or she has taken birth, satiates an entire populace with his or her own flesh. 
After having made aspirational prayers , he or she assumes the physical form of a great physician who has attained mastery of magic spells in the midst of sentient beings who are afflicted by many illnesses, in order to cure those afflicted beings. 
With regard to sentient beings who are being attacked by a powerful and hostile army, he or she becomes a strong monarch in order to quell the attack made by a hostile army in a just manner, peacefully, and using skillful means. 
With regard to sentient beings who are at odds with one another, he or she becomes a person whose speech is accepted , for the purpose of bringing about their reconciliation and causing them to abandon their hostile attitudes. 
With regard to kings who engage in all manner of harmful actions toward their subjects, punishing and imprisoning them, he or she takes birth in the royal families of such kings, in order to put an end to the misfortune that is being experienced by such beings. 
Out of compassion for sentient beings who hold wrong views and commit evil deeds, and who also have devotion toward some particular deity’s abode, he or she takes birth in that deity’s abode, in order to cause those to give up their wrong views and evil conduct.1400 It should also be understood that this birth—which is generated on the strength of aspirational prayers and through the controlling power , and which is preceded by compassion—can occur in immeasurable ways. 
An extensive presentation would include were reborn in a variety of birth states and among many different kinds of sentient beings. 
A BIRTH THAT CONFORMS BY TAKING ON A SEMBLANCE OF SHARED QUALITIES What are births that conform by taking on a semblance of shared qualities?1401 In this case, after having made aspirational prayers or through having achieved the controlling power , a bodhisattva takes birth among a variety of sentient beings who have been reborn in the animal birth state, as well as among deities, yakṣas, nāgas, asuras, and the like, and among beings who are at odds with one another and trying to harm one another. 
Likewise, among sentient beings who have a strong attachment or devotion to sensory pleasures. 
in a form that is the same as these sentient beings as their chief, in order to turn them away from those faults. 
In addition, he or she teaches them the Dharma so that they will carry out virtuous deeds. 
By these teaching the Dharma and engaging in dissimilar conduct, he or she exercises the skillful means that turns back from those faults. 
As with the previous , it should be understood that this birth is also one that can occur in immeasurable ways. 
In this case, a bodhisattva who is taking birth naturally generates a maturation that is superior to everyone in the world as relates to such qualities as life span, physical appearance, family, power, etc. 
He then carries out deeds on the basis of the maturations that were mentioned in the chapter entitled “One’s Own and Others’ Aims.”1402 It should be understood that this bodhisattva’s birth is also one that can occur in immeasurable ways in a variety of different birth states. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s birth as a lord? 
The bodhisattva’s birth that were described from the first one, the pleasurable state of great joy, and continue up through the tenth are referred to as his “birth as a lord.” These range from a lord of the Rose Apple Continent and continue up through the Great Supreme Lord.1403 This most distinguished of all the states of birth lies beyond that of the deities Those Who Are Below None,1404 and it is one in which only the bodhisattvas who have attained the supreme pleasurable state take birth. 
Regarding this , what is a bodhisattva’s final birth? 
It is the birth that is taken into the family of a religious priest or the family of a king1405 by a bodhisattva who has completed the accumulations for enlightenment, and the one in which true and complete enlightenment is attained. 
also carries out all the activities of a buddha. 
This birth is called the “final ” and the “last .” Whatever bodhisattvas have been reborn, are being reborn, or shall be reborn in splendid, auspicious, and excellent births of the past, present, or future, all do so within these very five . 
Excluding the births that take place on the stage of an immature being, there are none that are higher than these and none that are greater than these, for these five birth are the ones that have been approved of by wise bodhisattvas. 
Indeed, these are the births that yield the fruit of great enlightenment and they are the ones on the basis of which bodhisattvas quickly attain unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Perfection of the Support,” this completes the first chapter, entitled “Births.” It should be understood that, in brief, bodhisattvas carry out six forms of correct embracing1406 in relation to all the bodhisattva activities that occur during the pleasurable states: 
When enlightenment mind is developed for the very first time, a bodhisattva embraces the entire sphere of sentient beings in the manner that a spouse .1407 , “I must use all my abilities and all my strength to provide every form of benefit and happiness to ,” he or she also acts in just this way. 
This constitutes a bodhisattva’s embracing of all sentient beings at once. 
A bodhisattva who is the head maintains the conception of embracing through authority toward the household that is made up of his or her mother, father, children, spouse, male and female servants, workmen, and hired persons; and who is a sovereign ruler toward his or her subjects. 
maintains by activities that are appropriate to that household and by in a manner that accords with a bodhisattva. 
Using a variety of methods, he or she causes his or her mother and father to take up virtue. 
At appropriate times, he or she honors and serves them. 
He or she shows gratitude and appreciation . 
He or she complies with the wishes of mother and father. 
He or she submits to their will in matters that relate to duty. 
He or she provides food and clothing properly and at appropriate times to children, spouse, and male and female servants, etc. 
He or she does not overburden them with work. 
He or she is tolerant of their errant behavior. 
He or she takes care of them properly when they are sick. 
He or she causes them to take up virtue. 
At appropriate times, he or she shows them affection in the form of a reward of considerable value and expressions of kind speech. 
He or she enjoys the kingdom that he or she has inherited and does not forcefully and without warning invade a foreign country. 
Using all his or her abilities and powers, he or she causes beings to turn away from evil. 
He or she acts as a parent to his or her subjects. 
He or she is naturally disposed to share even with strangers, needless to say with those who are his or her own dependents. 
He or she avoids doing injury and speaks truthfully. 
given up doing such forms of harm to sentient beings as killing, imprisoning, punishing, cutting off , and beating, etc. 
He or she embraces with a mind that does not seek any selfish gain and he or she directs each individual to his or her own aim. 
does not employ a wrongful means to deceive them. 
In all forms of embracing , he or she maintains an impartial mind and does not fall into favoritism. 
He or she is not stingy with the Dharma in relation to them and also is not a teacher who withholds instructions .1410 He or she does not expect them to engage in the service of waiting on him or her. 
When the circumstances are appropriate, also carries out the service of waiting on them. 
He or she causes them to develop meanings that they have not yet attained, to perfect those that they have attained, and to overcome all forms of doubt that may arise. 
Having fathomed statements of profound meaning with his or her wisdom, he or she reveals them at appropriate times. 
He or she shares in their suffering and happiness. 
He or she will make an exceptional exertion for the sake of objects of material value so that might from him or her. 
At appropriate times, he or she is one who correctly admonishes them for their transgressions. 
At appropriate times, he or she is also one who censures them in the proper manner. 
He or she does not fail to pursue in every possible way the aim of curing the illness of those who are afflicted by disease or eliminating the sadness of those who are mentally distraught. 
He or she does not humiliate those who have an inferior physical appearance recollection, effort, or knowledge, etc. 
Having comprehended their distress,1411 he or she gives them a suitable form of Dharma teaching at appropriate times. 
He or she also gives them correct instruction about meditation objects1412 at appropriate times. 
He or she is forbearing of conflict and does not become agitated. 
He or she engages in conduct that is similar or superior to , not a lower form. 
He or she has no desire for gain or honor. 
He or she is compassionate. 
He or she is one who shows a welcoming facial expression and is one who refrains from frowning. 
He or she is amiable, speaks in a kindly manner, and speaks politely and accompanied by a smile. 
He or she is always and continually intent upon that which relates to virtue. 
He or she is free of heedlessness and laziness. 
A bodhisattva does not always acquire a following, nor does he or she avoid acquiring a following. 
He or she also does not act in a contrary manner.1413 Regarding this , those sentient beings whose state of ripening is slight are said to be a bodhisattva’s long-term acceptance, because their suitability for purification is such that it will take a long period of time. 
On the other hand, those whose state of ripening is moderate are said to be a bodhisattva’s short-term acceptance, because their suitability for purification is such that it will not take a long period of time. 
For their part, those whose state of ripening is great are said to be a bodhisattva’s final acceptance, because their suitability for purification is such that it will occur in that very birth. 
These are the bodhisattvas’ six forms of correctly embracing sentient beings, and they are ones by means of which the bodhisattvas of the past, present, and future have embraced, are embracing, and shall embrace sentient beings. 
Moreover, there are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
It should also be understood that there are twelve encounters with stressful and difficult situations that can be experienced by bodhisattvas who are engaging in correct forms of embracing sentient beings. 
Moreover, a bodhisattva should exercise sagacity in dealing with them. 
To protect one’s own mind from mental afflictions while carrying out a harsh procedure in relation to a sentient being is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
To be asked by many persons to assist them with a multitude of activities that have arisen when one is by oneself is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
whether to teach the Dharma to sentient beings who are dull-witted, deceitful, and unruly or to ignore them is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
To die in a state of clouded recollection without having attained a pure form of superior attitude is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
To be requested by others to give them the object of foremost importance that is held to be extremely precious when one has not yet attained a pure form of superior attitude is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
whether to provide instruction to sentient beings who have a variety of different opinions and diverse aspirations or to ignore them is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
To maintain a very great form of mindfulness while refraining from completely abandoning all of the mental afflictions is an encounter with a difficult situation that is stressful. 
A bodhisattva who encounters any of these stressful and difficult situations should take action only after having considered its relative importance. 
In some cases, he or she should investigate the persons who are involved. 
In some cases, he or she should maintain composure and, after having adopted a motive, carry it out. 
He or she should also make correct aspirational prayers. 
In some cases, he or she should not allow the mind to engage . 
In some cases, after having given intense consideration, he or she should maintain tireless patience. 
In some cases, he or she should remain indifferent. 
In some cases, he or she should generate effort and act with fervor. 
In some cases, he or she should employ skillful means. 
In this way, a bodhisattva who is skilled at the correct remedy does not become despondent no matter what kind of encounter with a stressful and difficult situation he or she may be faced with, and he or she also protects himor herself correctly. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Perfection of the Support,” this completes the second chapter, entitled “Embracing.” It should be understood that seven stages correspond to the thirteen pleasurable states that were already described. 
Six are stages that pertain to a bodhisattva and one is a stage that is a mixture of a bodhisattva’s stage and a tathāgata’s stage. 
The last of these is a mixed . 
The pleasurable state of great joy corresponds to the stage of a pure superior attitude. 
The pleasurable states that relate to superior morality and superior mind training, the three pleasurable states that relate to superior wisdom, and the pleasurable state that is free of signs and is accompanied by effort correspond to the stage of practicing conduct. 
The pleasurable state that is free of signs and free of effort corresponds to the stage of certainty. 
In this stage, a bodhisattva enters the third occurrence of a certainty.1415 The pleasurable state of informative knowledge corresponds to the stage of certain conduct. 
The pleasurable state of a tathāgata and the stage of a tathāgata will be described later in the chapter which addresses the preeminence of a buddha’s qualities. 
Regarding this , how does a bodhisattva who is entering the stage of a pure superior attitude following the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion transcend the lower realms? 
In this case, relying on a purified mundane meditative absorption, the bodhisattva who is on the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion and who has accumulated extremely well the accumulations for enlightenment meditates with attention focused exclusively on compassion toward sentient beings, using the one hundred and ten aspects that were described previously.1416 As a consequence of this meditation, he or she attains a sympathetic and compassionate attitude toward sentient beings having the form . 
He or she also generates the wish that never commit any form of nonvirtuous deed. 
The purified mundane meditative absorption that is being cultivated by him or her in this way removes from being the indisposition that relates to the mental afflictions that bring rebirth in the lower realms. 
Not long after that has been abandoned, the individual nature of that bodhisattva is transformed in such a manner that he or she never again commits the type of evil deed that causes rebirth in lower realms and he or she has to go to the lower realms. 
This is how a bodhisattva transcends all forms of the lower realms and also how he or she transcends the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion and enters the stage of a pure superior attitude. 
The ten spiritual qualities of faith, etc.,1418 that were described in the chapter entitled “The Pleasurable States” as bringing about the purification of the pleasurable states should also be understood in this case as bringing about the purification of the stages. 
Their formulation should be understood in terms of as antidotes for specific negative qualities. 
With regard to this , there are ten qualities that oppose the ten qualities that bring about the purification of the stages and for the sake of which those were formulated as antidotes. 
What are the ten? 
The condition of having never, at any time, generated enlightenment mind or accepted the precepts of the bodhisattva training is the quality that opposes faith and for which faith serves as an antidote. 
The mind that wishes to harm sentient beings is the quality that opposes compassion and for which compassion serves as an antidote. 
Malice toward sentient beings is the quality that opposes loving-kindness and for which loving-kindness serves as an antidote. 
The concern for possessions and for remaining alive is the quality that opposes generosity and for which the willingness to give up serves as an antidote. 
Developing a wrong form of practice that harms sentient beings and the quality of that one has too much to do are the qualities that oppose tirelessness and for which tirelessness serves as an antidote. 
The undertaking of ineffective activities is the quality that opposes knowledge of the teaching and for which knowledge of the teaching serves as an antidote. 
Unfriendliness and the unwillingness to comply with others’ minds are the qualities that oppose knowledge of the world and for which knowledge of the world serves as an antidote. 
Heedlessness and laziness with regard to the cultivation of virtuous qualities are the qualities that oppose shame and abashment and for which shame and abashment serve as an antidote. 
Being afraid of the manifold, continuous, intense, and long-lasting forms of suffering in samsara is the quality that opposes developing the power of firmness and for which developing the power of firmness serves as an antidote. 
Uncertainty, ambivalence, and doubt toward the Master are the qualities that oppose worshipping and serving the tathāgatas and for which worshipping and serving the tathāgatas serve as an antidote. 
This is the formulation of those in terms of how they serve as antidotes. 
What, then, is their essential purpose? 
In brief, these ten qualities kindle purity of attitude and purity of activities. 
Regarding this, it should be understood that the first three qualities purity of attitude and the remaining ones purity of activities. 
A bodhisattva who has intense faith in enlightenment feels compassion for sentient beings who are afflicted by suffering. 
who feels compassion reflects, “I must save these ,” and develops loving-kindness. 
Similarly, who has loving-kindness in his or her mind is willing to give up everything and is indifferent to possessions and remaining alive. 
who is indifferent will apply himor herself on behalf of and not become tired. 
who is tireless will develop knowledge of the teaching. 
who possesses knowledge of the teaching will know the proper way to apply himor herself in the world and thus will develop knowledge of the world. 
He or she will feel shame and abashment if he or she should develop any of the mental afflictions. 
who feels shame and abashment will not let himor herself be controlled by the mental afflictions and will attain the power of firmness. 
Through engaging in correct practice, who has attained the power of firmness will not become deficient, will strengthen the virtuous qualities, and will worship and serve the tathāgatas, by means of the form of worship that consists of spiritual practice and by means of the form of worship that is carried out with wealth and honor. 
It should be understood that this represents the successive order in which these ten qualities are attained. 
The purification of all the stages is accomplished by means of these ten qualities. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, the Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Perfection of the Support, this completes the third chapter, entitled “The Stages.” It should be understood that in all the bodhisattva stages, beginning with the stage of conduct that is based upon devotion, the conduct of bodhisattvas is, in brief, of four types.1419 What are the four? 
the six perfections that were presented earlier, the perfection of skillful means, the perfection of aspirational prayer, the perfection of power, and the perfection of knowledge. 
Regarding this, the twelve types of skillful means that were described earlier1420 constitute the perfection of skillful means. 
The five types of aspirational prayer that were described earlier1421 constitute the perfection of aspirational prayer. 
The purification of the practice the ten powers1422 constitutes the perfection of power. 
The knowledge of a systematic formulation of all entities as they truly are constitutes the perfection of knowledge. 
Regarding this, the wisdom that is occupied with grasping ultimate truth is the perfection of wisdom. 
By contrast, that is occupied with grasping conventional truth is the perfection of knowledge. 
This represents the difference between these two . 
Immeasurable knowledge is the perfection of skillful means. 
The aspiration higher and higher forms of excellent knowledge is the perfection of aspirational prayers. 
The quality that makes one incapable of being cut off from the path by any of Māra’s forces is the perfection of power. 
The proper realization of that which needs to be known is the perfection of knowledge. 
The combination of all thirty-seven of the spiritual qualities that are conducive to enlightenment, which begin with closely placed recollection, as well as the four investigations1423 and the four forms of thorough knowledge of the way things are,1424 as they were described earlier, is called the bodhisattvas’ “conduct that is conducive to enlightenment.” The six forms of supernatural knowledge, as they were explained in the chapter entitled “Power,” are called the bodhisattvas’ “conduct relating to supernatural knowledge.” Two topics that are beyond measure were presented earlier—the immeasurable forms of beings to be trained and the immeasurable means of accomplishing their training. 
The combination of all these forms of ripening sentient beings, which were presented in the chapter entitled “Ripening,” is called a bodhisattva’s “conduct relating to the ripening of sentient beings.” It should be understood that all the forms of bodhisattva conduct are included within these four categories of bodhisattva conduct. 
What are the three? 
They are that relates to their being an antidote, that relates to their arising, and that relates to their maturation results.1426 Regarding this , the six qualities of stinginess, bad conduct, hostility and harmfulness toward sentient beings, laziness, distraction, and dull-wittedness and extreme bewilderment represent obstructions to enlightenment. 
In the same order, the six perfections should be understood as the antidotes for these six qualities. 
The other perfections are also included within these . 
This is the how their formulation relates to the manner in which they serve as antidotes. 
In this case, at the very outset a bodhisattva who is indifferent to possessions adopts morality after having given up the sensory pleasures that relate to the householder’s state. 
Out of respect for morality, he or she bears patiently the harm that is carried out by others and does not carry out harm against others. 
whose morality is pure both through having adopted it and through patience undertakes activities that relate to virtue in an unwavering and continuous manner. 
Having become free of heedlessness in this way through effort, he or she attains a one-pointedness of mind that is virtuous in nature. 
Having become one whose mind is composed in this way, he or she realizes those objects that need to be known and perceives those objects that need to be seen, as they truly are. 
It should be understood that this is how their formulation corresponds to the successive manner in which they arise. 
In this case, a bodhisattva who has taken up and observes the virtuous qualities of generosity and the rest in the present life, will, because of that, become one who in future attains the external quality of having an abundance of possessions, through having practiced generosity. 
He or she will also become one who attains a fivefold inner excellence of his or her individual existence, through having practiced the five remaining perfections of morality and the rest. 
What is the fivefold excellence of one’s individual existence? 
The first excellence is in a happy migratory state as a god or a human being who possesses a life span, etc., that are superior to those of other beings. 
The second excellence is being naturally tireless about carrying out virtuous activities, tolerant of the wrongs committed by others, and averse to harming others. 
The third excellence is the quality of being naturally firm in one’s efforts all activities that are undertaken. 
The fourth excellence is the fact that a person who possesses weak forms of the mental afflictions possesses a natural ability to control the mind and a natural fitness of mind, both of which lead to the swift supernatural knowledge regarding all matters. 
The fifth excellence is to possess a vast intellect from birth and to achieve erudition and sagacity with regard to all matters. 
These are that are produced through the ripening of results. It should be understood that this represents another for the order in which the six perfections are arranged. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that the bodhisattvas’ training of superior morality is completed by means of four of the perfections—which constitute its requisite, essential nature, attendant factor, and preservation; the training of superior mind practice by means of the perfection of meditative absorption; and the training of superior wisdom by means of the perfection of wisdom. 
Moreover, there is no higher course of training for a bodhisattva to attain . 
Therefore, because the entire course of training for bodhisattvas is included within these three , it is established that there are just six perfections. 
Moreover, there are none of greater significance than these and there are none besides these. 
In brief, there are four acts that bodhisattvas must accomplish, which are inclusive of all their acts: 
Bodhisattvas carry out and practice these four acts in this order, by means of the four types of conduct. 
Therefore, there are also no higher forms of conduct than these to be formulated. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Perfection of the Support,” this completes the fourth chapter, entitled “Conduct.” Regarding this , in relation to the pleasurable state of a tathāgata and the tathāgatas’ aspect of the stage that is the perfect manner of going, the blessed ones possess one hundred and forty unique buddha qualities. 
What are the thirty-two marks of a great person? 
A great person is one whose feet are placed down well—that is, he treads evenly upon the earth. 
This is a great person’s mark of a great person. 
On the undersides of the feet,1427 on both soles, a wheel with a thousand spokes that is fully formed in every respect, including a hub and a rim, is apparent. 
A great person is one whose fingers are long. 
His feet have prominent1428 heels. 
His hands and feet are soft and youthful. 
His hands and feet have a weblike membrane . 
His body is not bent over.1430 His sexual organ is concealed in a sheath. 
His is symmetrical, like the nyagrodha tree. 
His body hairs grow singly and hair that grows singly on his body1432 is soft,1433 dark blue, and curls to the right. 
His skin is golden colored. 
His skin is smooth and, because of its smoothness, dust and impurities do not remain on his body. 
His body has seven elevated areas, there are seven areas on his body is well filled out: two are on the hands, two are on the feet, two are on the shoulders, and one is on the neck. 
The upper part of his body is like that of a lion. 
His shoulders are well developed.1434 The area between his shoulders is well filled out.1435 His body is large and straight. 
He possesses forty even teeth.1436 His teeth have no gaps. 
His teeth are extremely white. 
His jaws are like those of a lion. 
His tongue is large and slender and, because of its length, if the tongue is extended from the mouth it can cover the entire face up to the hairline. 
He has attained tastes as a supreme taste.1437 He possesses divine speech, his speech is as appealing as the kalaviṅka bird and the sound of his voice has a drumlike resonance. 
His eyes are an intensely dark shade of blue. 
His eyelashes are like those of an ox. 
A circle of hair that is as white as a conch shell and turns to the right grows between his eyebrows. 
This is a great person’s mark of a great person. 
What are the eighty secondary signs? 
The twenty fingers and toes of the hands and feet, together with the joints and nails make up twenty secondary signs. 
The hands and feet have eight surfaces; four are those of the two hands and four are those of the two feet. 
These make up eight secondary signs. 
The sixfold collection that is associated with the ankles, knees, and thighs1438 makes up six secondary signs. 
The sixfold collection that is associated with the arms makes up six secondary signs. 
The hips1439 and the perineal raphe1440 . 
The testicles make up two secondary signs. 
The buttocks make up two secondary signs. 
The two lateral rib areas, the two armpits, and the two breasts taken together make up six secondary signs. 
The chest, the heart,1443 the throat, and the back . 
These are the sixty secondary signs that are situated in the lower part of the body, and they are exclusive of those that appear above the neck. 
The two rows of teeth make up two secondary signs. 
The two lips that cover make up two secondary signs. 
The well-developed cheeks1444 . The two well-formed sides of the face1445 make up two secondary signs. 
The two eyes and the surrounding areas make up two secondary signs. 
The two eyebrows make up two secondary signs. 
The two nostrils make up two secondary signs. 
The forehead . 
The two temporal bones1446 and the two ears form a set of four secondary signs. 
The head, together with the hair, makes up a single secondary sign. 
These are the twenty secondary signs that are found on the body in the area above the neck. 
The sixty previous combined with these latter twenty make up the eighty secondary signs. 
These are the excellent marks and signs that a bodhisattva who has entered the stage of a pure attitude attains through a maturation. 
It should be understood that beyond that , their purity becomes ever greater until becomes seated at the seat of enlightenment. 
he also attains the unique and thoroughly excellent of the purities, etc., that are most pure and perfectly complete in every respect. 
However, prior to that time, he or she also possesses in an incomplete form while still a bodhisattva, beginning with the stage of a pure superior attitude. 
Without distinction, the accumulation for enlightenment, in its entirety, brings about all of the marks and secondary signs. 
Moreover, the accumulation for enlightenment is of two types: 
that which is distant from enlightenment and that which is near to it. 
Regarding this , the type that is distant is the one that occurs during the time that the marks and secondary signs have not yet been attained in the form of a maturation. 
The type that is near is the one that occurs after the marks and secondary signs have been attained initially in the form of a maturation, as well as following that point, during the time that they are becoming more excellent as their purity increases to an ever-greater degree. 
However, these marks and secondary signs are results that are formed by a variety of deeds, which the Blessed One taught for the sake of those disciples who are desirous . 
Why is that? 
Sentient beings delight in carrying out many different kinds of evil deeds. 
On the other hand, upon hearing about the variety of virtuous deeds that are antidotes for those manifold evil deeds that are inimical to , and that also bring about the marks and secondary signs, as well as that have a variety of beneficial results, they develop a strong aspiration those great beneficial results and they turn away from those evil deeds. 
as they are described in the Lakṣaṇa Sūtra.1447 By having been firmly established in morality, austerities, patience, and liberality , one attains the quality of having feet that are placed down well. 
Through traveling about here and there, etc., in order to serve one’s father and mother in manifold ways, and in order to protect beings from many kinds of calamities, one attains the quality of feet that are marked with a wheel. 
By abandoning doing harm to others and taking what was not given, by making verbal salutations, honoring, standing up , and greeting with joined palms and performing acts of homage to those worthy of being venerated, by pleasing others, by not diminishing their cherished wealth, and by overcoming one’s own pride, one attains the quality of having long fingers that is a mark of a great person. 
By a combination of all three deeds that were taught those three marks of a great being, one attains the quality of having feet with heels that are prominent. 
Moreover, regarding this because it depends upon those three marks as its support. 
By bringing together venerable persons1449 on the basis of the four principles for attracting a following, one attains the quality of hands and feet that have a weblike membrane. 
By massaging the limbs of venerable beings with fragrant unguents, bathing them, and presenting them with clothing, one attains the quality of having hands and feet that are soft and youthful. 
By being insatiable about virtuous qualities, and by developing virtuous qualities to an ever-higher degree, one attains the quality of having feet do not protrude. 
By having taken up and mastered the Dharma teachings properly and then taught them to others, as well as by having served properly as an emissary for others, one attains the quality of having calves like those of the eṇeya deer. 
By being a leader who teaches the Dharma in an orderly manner, by becoming a person who has restrained himor herself evil deeds of body, speech, and mind and one who is not inclined to commit them, by taking care of those who are sick and giving them medicine, by raising up those who are bent over from illness, and by being a person who is moderate in his or her food and is not inclined in sensory pleasures, one attains the quality of having a body that is not bent over. 
A person who, in a just and suitable manner, takes in those sentient beings who have been expelled by others and who, possessing shame and abashment, gives them clothing attains the quality of having a sexual organ that is concealed in a sheath. 
Through avoiding the pursuit of wicked acts or improper1450 gifts and forms of enjoyment and through properly treating an imbalance of the elements, a person who is restrained in body, speech, and mind, who knows moderation regarding the acceptance of gifts and food, and who gives medicine to the sick attains symmetrical, like the nyagrodha tree. 
By means of the very same acts that enable one to attain the quality of having feet do not protrude, one also attains the quality of having body hairs that point upward. 
Through dwelling alone, through relying upon singularly excellent friends, through gaining an understanding of subtle meanings, through clearing away rubbish, such as grass, leaves, etc., and through clearing away dirt that occurs occasionally,1451 a person who investigates virtue for himor herself, who frequents those who are learned and wise, who reflects on subtle meanings, and who cleans the dwellings of those who are venerable, gives them massages, and bathes them attains the quality of having body hairs that grow singly. 
Through having given beautiful and pleasing articles for the body, such as food, drink, vehicles, clothing, and ornaments, a person who is free of anger attains both the quality of having skin that is golden colored and that emits light a distance of one fathom. 
It should be understood that the very same acts that were said the quality of having body hairs that grow singly cause one to attain the quality of skin that is fine and smooth. 
By satisfying a large multitude of people with large amounts of many different kinds of excellent food and drink, one attains the quality of seven elevated areas. 
This is because resembles that of a lion in that acts courageously in relation to the concerns of sentient beings. 
It should be understood that also both the quality of having well developed shoulders and the quality of having the area between the shoulders well filled out by means of these very same deeds. 
The very same deeds that cause one to attain the quality of having long fingers also cause one to attain the quality of having a large and straight body. 
Through abandoning slanderous speech that separates friends and reconciling those persons who are estranged, one attains the quality of having forty teeth as well as the qualities of having teeth that are even and that have no gaps. 
By meditating on the form of loving-kindness that relates to the desire realm, a person who reflects upon subjects that relate to the Dharma attains the quality of having teeth that are extremely white. 
One attains the quality of having jaws that resemble those of a lion by correctly giving wealth to those sentient beings who are petitioners in accordance with their wishes. 
A person who is faithful and compassionate, who provides medicine and is kind1454 attains the quality of tastes as a supreme taste through protecting sentient beings as one would one’s own children. 
also through having given the taste of the Dharma, through having experienced the taste of the Dharma, and through having restored the taste that was lost.1455 By taking up oneself and safeguarding the five precepts of training that consist of refraining from taking lives, etc.,1456 by prompting others to take them up, and by being a person who, on the basis of a compassionate mind, practices taking up the Dharma to a high degree, one attains the quality of having a crown protrusion on the head and the quality of having a tongue that is large and slender. 
By viewing the entire world sympathetically with an attitude of loving-kindness, as a mother and father do , one obtains the quality of eyes that are an intensely dark shade of blue and the quality of eyelashes that are like those of an ox. 
A person who expresses genuine approval and praise for those who possess virtuous qualities attains the circle of hair between the eyebrows that is as white as a conch shell and turns to the right. 
It should be understood that, without distinction, morality is the cause for attaining all of the thirty-two marks of a great person. 
Why is that? 
A bodhisattva whose morality is ruined will indeed not even attain the status of a human being, let alone the marks of a great person. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that the quality of having a crown protrusion on the head is one and the same mark of a great person as the quality of not being able to see the top of head, because is not considered to be distinct from . 
This constitutes a detailed formulation of the various kinds of deeds that accord with the creation of the marks . 
It should be understood that the creation of all the marks is accomplished by means of the four aspects of the quality of having completed one’s spiritual activities well,1457 which pertains to the two factions.1458 Regarding this , the quality of having feet that are placed down well is produced by having carried out activities in a definite manner. 
The qualities of having a wheel on the feet, having feet that do not protrude, having hands and feet with a weblike membrane, having fine1459 skin, having seven elevated areas, having the area between the shoulders well filled out, having shoulders that are well developed, having a body that is large and straight, and having a tongue that is large and slender are produced by having carried out activities in a complete manner. 
The qualities of having long fingers , having feet with prominent heels, having an erect body, having symmetrical, like the nyagrodha tree, and having teeth without gaps are produced by having carried out activities continually. 
Regarding this , the quality of having hands and feet that are soft and youthful and the quality of having skin that is smooth and fine are produced by employing a method of practice that does not harm sentient beings. 
The qualities of emitting light that extends a distance of one fathom, having golden-colored skin, white teeth, and a white circle of hair are produced by practicing virtue with a clear mind that is joyful and glad. 
The quality of having a sexual organ that is concealed in a sheath is produced by not being devoted to fame, renown, and praise, and by concealing one’s good qualities. 
The qualities of having body hairs that point upward, having forty even teeth, tastes as a supreme taste, and having a crown protrusion on the head are produced by dedicating one’s virtue roots to enlightenment. 
The qualities of having a body whose upper part resembles that of a lion and jaws that resemble those of a lion are produced by employing a method of practice virtue insatiably and free of dejection. 
The qualities of having even teeth, eyes that are intensely dark blue, and eyelashes that are like those of an ox are produced by regarding all sentient beings equally and with a mind that seeks to benefit them. 
The quality of divine speech is produced by employing a method of practice that is not satisfied with anything that is deficient. 
This is the manner in which the thirty-two marks of a great person are attained and perfected by means of the four aspects that relate to the quality of having completed one’s spiritual activities well. 
Regarding this , it should be understood that these marks exist for bodhisattvas merely in a seedlike condition during the stage of the spiritual lineage. 
It should be understood that their refinement occurs during the remaining bodhisattva stages that lie above these . 
It should be understood that their complete perfection and the state in which they have become unsurpassed occurs on the tathāgatas’ aspect of the stage that is the perfect manner of going. 
Regarding this , because among all the spiritual qualities that are possessed by a buddha and that represent distinguishing characteristics of a great person, these marks can be easily observed by lesser, middling, and superior beings due to their physical nature, they alone are the ones that are designated as “the marks of a great person.” Moreover, are called “secondary signs” because they support the thirty-two marks of a great person by serving as their seat,1460 and they enhance the physical beauty of by their agreeable form. 
Regarding this , in brief, each individual body pore of a tathāgata is produced by a heap of merit that is equal to the merit that is possessed by all sentient beings. 
Each individual secondary sign is produced by the same amount of merit as that which is contained in the heap of merit all the body pores . 
A single mark of a tathāgata is produced by a heap of merit that is a hundred times greater than that which is contained in the heap of merit all the secondary signs. 
The circle of hair is produced by a heap of merit that is a thousand times greater than that which is contained in the heap of merit all the marks excluding the circle of hair and the crown protrusion. 
The crown protrusion on top of the head, the quality of not being able to see the crown of head, is produced by a heap of merit that is a hundred thousand times greater than that which is contained in the heap of merit the circle of hair . 
Another quality of a tathāgata, called “the Dharma conch shell,”1461 which is not included among the marks and secondary signs, is produced by a heap of merit that is a trillion times greater than that which is contained in the heap of merit the crown protrusion. 
by which a tathāgata, if he wishes to, can cause his voice to be understood throughout the endless and limitless world systems. 
This is the manner in which the inconceivable and unsurpassed physical body of the tathāgatas is produced, that is attained by an immeasurable collection of merit and that encompasses every aspect of excellence.1462 Moreover, in brief, it should be understood that the characteristic of being immeasurable that pertains to the virtuous qualities that produce the marks and secondary signs is due to three reasons. 
Since are attained by practicing for three countless kalpas, there is an immeasurability of time. 
Since are governed by an attitude that seeks to bring benefit and happiness to an immea surable number of sentient beings, there is an immeasurability of attitude. 
Since are produced by an immeasurable variety of virtuous deeds, there is an immeasurability of the types . 
Therefore, the attainment of an immeasurable collection of merit is called “the creation of the marks and secondary signs” that are possessed by the tathāgatas. 
They are complete purity regarding the support, complete purity regarding mental objects, complete purity regarding the mind, and complete purity regarding knowledge. 
The absolute termination without remainder from one’s being of all forms of indisposition that relate to the mental afflictions, including their traces, along with the quality of having control over taking on,1463 maintaining,1464 and discarding1465 one’s body in whatever manner is desired is called “the purity that is complete in every respect regarding the support.” Regarding this , what is complete purity regarding mental objects? 
The quality of having control over all mental objects with regard to emanating,1466 transforming,1467 and manifesting1468 is called “the purity that is complete in every respect regarding mental objects.” Regarding this , what is complete purity regarding the mind? 
As before,1469 the removal of all forms of indisposition that relate to the mind as well as the accumulation of every form of the roots of virtue in the mind is called “the purity that is complete in every respect regarding the mind.”1470 Regarding this , what is complete purity regarding knowledge? 
As before, the quality of having control over knowledge because all forms of indisposition that relate to ignorance have been removed and because one’s knowledge is not obscured anywhere with regard to objects that need to be known is called “the purity that is complete in every respect regarding knowledge.” Regarding this , what are the ten powers of a tathāgata? 
They are the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions; the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own; the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration; the power of knowledge regarding superior and inferior faculties; the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion; the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements; the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere; the power of knowledge regarding recollection of former existences; the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth; and the power of knowledge regarding termina tion of the outflows. 
These ten powers should be understood as they are described at length in the Sutra on the Ten Powers.1471 Regarding this , he is called “the Tathāgata” because everything whatsoever that he utters, speaks, or declares is unerring and exists in the manner .1472 Regarding this , a cause that is not at variance with both pleasant and unpleasant results and that will truly lead to their occurrence is called their “proper condition,”1473 their “base,”1474 their “foundation,”1475 and their “originating factor.”1476 A cause that is incompatible with those very pleasant and unpleasant results is called their “improper condition” by virtue of its being the opposite of . 
Knowledge that is free of exaggerated pride1477 is said to be “in accordance with reality.” It should be understood that knowledge of everything, unimpeded knowledge, and pure are free of exaggerated pride. 
The explanation of such terms as “knowledge of everything,” etc., should be understood as previously in the chapter on supreme enlightenment.1478 In accordance with the regular order of enumeration, is the first . 
Because it is unsurpassed, because it possesses the ability to act on behalf of all sentient beings in every manner, and because it defeats absolutely1479 all the forces of Māra, it is called a “power.” The quality of having control over the use in whatever way is desired, through having correctly acquired the causes attainment, is called its “possession.” Because it is unsurpassed, nirvana is called an “exalted” . 
Because it is attained by means of the eightfold ārya path and because it in which all misfortune and fear have been eliminated, is called the “most excellent”1480 . 
Because, following his own attainment , he also taught it to others extensively out of compassion, states that he “turns the divine wheel.” Why is that ? 
Therefore, it is called “the divine wheel.” Because he proclaimed himself to be the one whose instruction is supreme and the one who attained the perfection of the unsurpassed teacher, because he defeats all false doctrines by teaching the path, because he remains completely undaunted in the presence of those who voice opposition to his path, and because he raises his exalted and unsurpassed voice to defeat all opponents, states “he utters the true roar of a lion in an assembly.” In short, lays open, reveals, points out, and expresses the perfection of knowledge regarding what is beneficial to oneself, the perfection of knowledge regarding what is beneficial to others, and the unique nature of the perfection of knowledge regarding what is beneficial both to oneself and to others. 
Another formulation of the summary meaning “There is to be attained, a method of attaining it, and the protection to all beings by that method. 
Any and all human beings or gods who wish to can obtain that method from me.” Regarding this , the exalted and most excellent state should be regarded as resembling an illness has been cured. 
The turning of the divine wheel should be regarded as resembling the means of curing that illness. 
The utterance of the true roar of a lion in an assembly should be regarded as resembling the refutation of all the assertions made by inferior physicians as well as the affirmation that he is the one who will surely cure the illness. 
Those deeds that have been performed and accumulated,1485 and that have since ceased, are said to be of the “past.” Those that have not yet been performed, have not yet ceased, and are not being performed but will be performed in the future are said to be those of the “future.” Those deeds whose performance has not yet been completed and has not yet ceased but which have been resolved and are in the course of being carried out are said to be those of the “present.” Moreover, these are classified as being of three kinds: 
physical deeds, verbal deeds, and mental deeds. 
As was described earlier,1486 there are four ways of taking up what is right—that is to say, “there is a way of taking up what is right that is pleasant in the present but has a ripening that consists of suffering,”1487 and so forth. 
The region in which are carried out is called their “place.” The animate or inanimate entities in relation to which are carried out is called their “basis.” The particular root of nonvirtue or root of virtue that is the motivating factor which causes to be carried out is called their “cause.” The desirable results that have beneficial qualities and the undesirable that have adverse qualities are called the “ripening” . 
There is no that is superior to this and none that exceeds it. 
There are four “meditative absorptions” and eight “liberations.” The way in which those who have gained fitness of mind1489 and control of the mind by means of the meditative absorptions and liberations are able to enter various forms of one-pointed concentration that conform to those in order to achieve any aim that is desired is called “entering a state of one-pointed concentration.”1490 As a portion declares, “The Blessed One entered a state of one-pointed concentration that conformed to that . 
In accordance with the way his mind was composed, the entire Brahmā realm became filled with extraordinary light. 
The sound of his speech was also heard, but no one could see him.” In just this way, whatever common worldly aim or unique a tathāgata desires to accomplish, he does so with great ease by entering a state of one-pointed concentration that conforms to that . 
Regarding this , the successful attainment of all the desired aims that depend on the mind by means of the meditative absorptions and the liberations and through gaining power over the mind. 
That is the full extent of what all practitioners of meditative absorption need to accomplish. 
There is nothing superior to this and nothing beyond this. 
And the tathāgatas have attained every aspect of what practitioners of meditative absorption need to accomplish. 
“the meditative absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration.” Moreover, in brief there are two “becoming afflicted” that pertain to the meditative absorptions, etc. 
the affliction an obstruction to the attainment of those that have not yet been attained, such as making use of an ineffective means or engaging in any of the hindrances.1491 the perturbing action of an mental affliction that occurs on the particular level that has been attained or the latency1492 . 
By contrast, there are two “becoming more refined.” They should be understood as being the opposites of those . 
The formulating, in an appropriate manner and using suitable words and expressions, those various states of meditative absorption, etc., that have been achieved is called their “formulation.”1493 The further development of those very states of meditative absorption, etc., that have been attained, by means of meditative practice, as well as the attainment in the manner desired and the attainment of a state of excellence without difficulty is called their “purification.”1494 Regarding this , a tathāgata knows everything about how these fail to be achieved, how they are achieved, what is inferior about them, what is excellent about them, the terms them, as well as the culmination of their development. 
Therefore, this unsurpassed of the tathāgatas is called “the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration.” The condition of being weak, middling, or great that pertains to the five faculties1496 of faith, etc., according to the development that their ripening has reached, is called “the superior and inferior state of the faculties.” The lesser, moderate, and great forms of admiration1498 that are preceded by faith toward others1499 and the precise understanding1500 that is preceded by reflection upon the Dharma1501 are called “the nature of diverse forms of devotion.” The formulations of the different kinds of spiritual lineage include the spiritual lineages of the listener disciple, the solitary realizer, and the tathāgatas. 
In addition, according to the doctrine that classifies a strong tendency to develop desire, etc.,1503 there are also up to eighty thousand kinds of unfavorable mental traits1504 sentient beings. 
For example, in the Kālāma Sūtra1509 and others. 
As recalls his diverse former existences, he remembers, in brief, six circumstances1511 about his previous, bygone existences that correlate with the eight basic elements of life1512 that consist of having distinct names, customs, and occurrences a variety of classes of sentient being—such as those that lie in the east, south, west, and north. 
What are the eight basic elements of life? 
They are having a certain name, being of a certain family, being of a certain clan, eating certain kinds of food, experiencing certain kinds of happiness and suffering, being one who has a certain longevity, being one who remains alive for a certain period of time, and being one whose life ends in a certain way. 
What are the six circumstances that relate to the basic elements of life? 
Thus, when individuals describe themselves or others in the world, they make reference to these six circumstances that are based on the eight basic elements of life. 
“This is my father,” or “This is his or her father.” Just as with someone’s father, the same applies to that mother. 
There are no circumstances or basic elements of life beyond these. 
Therefore, this is the full range of what recalls. 
Because eye is based upon those , because it is the fruit of those , and because it is taken hold of by those , it is called the “divine eye.” Because eye is the fruit of the meditative absorptions that have been most highly accomplished and fully perfected, it is called “perfectly pure.” Because is distinct even in name from that of humans, it called “which surpasses that of humans.” There is also a divine eye that the gods who live in the desire realm obtain at birth and that resembles only to the extent that it has the same name. 
Sentient beings who are dying are described by the expression “ who are passing away.” Those who are in the intermediate state are described by the expression “those who are being reborn.” Those two types who are traveling into darkness1516 are proceeding to their next existence as intermediate state beings whose mental body resembles either a black felt cloth or a night that is enveloped in thick darkness. 
Therefore, they are called “those of bad appearance.” On the other hand, those two types who are traveling into light1517 are proceeding to their next existence as intermediate state beings whose mental body resembles either a moonlit night or a fine Varanasi cloth. 
Therefore, they are called “those of good appearance.” Regarding this , those of bad appearance are “inferior”; those of good appearance are “excellent.” Those who are inferior are the ones who are proceeding to the unhappy migratory states. 
Those who are excellent are the ones who are proceeding to the happy migratory states. 
Due to their errant conduct, along with that gave rise to , they are described as “those who possess physical, verbal, and mental misdeeds.” Those who hold the two types of wrong understanding and errant views— the discrediting of everything1518 and the discrediting of those āryas who abide in the opposite of that opinion1519—are called “those who hold wrong views” and “those who discredit the āryas.” Due to these wrong views, develop wrong beliefs about causes and results. 
For that reason and due to that condition, they carry out wrongful deeds. 
Those who carry out wrongful deeds adopt either the way of taking up what is right that is pleasurable in the present but has a painful ripening in the future or the way of taking up what is right that is both painful in the present and also has a painful ripening in the future. 
Therefore, states: 
“ the dissolution of their bodies.” Because this is the very lowest of all deaths, states: 
“following death.” In order to present an expression that refers to the hells, refers to them as “the lower realms, the unhappy migratory states, and the states of downfall.” In order to describe the nature , the bodies , and the conditions refers to as “the hells.” Regarding this , wicked and crude conduct is called “a downward path,” because it leads to a place. 
Therefore, are called “the lower realms.”1520 They are called “unhappy migratory states”1521 because one encounters suffering there and because many kinds of intense suffering are experienced there continually and for a long time. 
They are called “states of downfall”1522 because abide in a lower region, because those resemble a great abyss, and because wail anguished, pitiful, wretched, and loud cries of woe. 
On the basis of these terms, this has clarified what causes to be born , what who are born there experience, and, due to those experiences, what other suffering create for themselves. 
In the appropriate manner, the opposite of the above explanations should be understood as constituting the virtuous side of this topic. 
A migratory state that is preceded by good conduct is called a “happy migratory state.”1524 Because it is a place where the highest forms of happiness are experienced, it is called a “celestial world.”1525 The mind that is free of the outflows and is their antidote in that it abandons in their entirety the latent forms of all the outflows, as well as the wisdom that is free of the outflows—which together constitute the supreme forms of superior mind and superior wisdom —are referred to as “the liberation of mind and the liberation of wisdom” “through having terminated the outflows.” Moreover, after having attained that liberation of mind and that liberation of wisdom in their final existence on the basis of the path of seeing and on the basis of the path of meditation, realize for themselves, by means of the sixth supernatural knowledge,1527 their own attainment as it truly is, and they announce to those others who are desirous of knowing it. 
Therefore, declare “and after having manifested and attained by means of his own supernatural knowledge and within his very lifetime , the tathāgatas proclaim1528 . 
Essential nature; category; exclusivity; And, likewise, sameness; Performance of action; successive order; And, lastly, differences. 
The essential nature of the tathāgatas’ ten powers should be understood; their categories should be understood; their exclusivity should be understood; their sameness should be understood; the action that performs should be understood; their successive order should be understood; and their differences should be understood. 
In short, a tathāgata’s ten powers should be understood on the basis of these seven aspects. 
Their essential nature is the five faculties;1530 however, they are described as having the essential nature of wisdom, because of wisdom’s predominance. 
For example, as “the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions”; it is not described as the power of faith nor is it described as the power of any of the other . 
Regarding this , what are the categories ? 
In brief, it should be understood that they possess three types of immeasurability. 
This is because, in relation to the category of time, they engage all the entities that exist in the past, present, and future; in relation to the category of kinds of entities, they engage every form of individual and general characteristic that relates to each and every conditioned entity; and, in relation to the category of mind continuum,1531 they engage all the needs of every individual mind stream that exists within the sphere of all sentient beings that extends throughout the ten directions. 
In this way, it should be understood, on the basis of these categories, a tathāgata’s ten powers possess the quality of being immeasurable. 
These ten powers are qualities that are possessed exclusively and solely by a tathāgata. 
They are not possessed by any of the listeners or solitary realizers. 
These powers are the same for all tathāgatas and there are no variations . 
However, there is a difference regarding the manner in which the tathāgatas resort to . 
One particular tathāgata may rely to a great degree on one particular power; another may do so with a different one. 
Regarding a tathāgata’s ten powers, what action does he perform with each one? 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions, a tathāgata knows, in accordance with reality, the manner in which causes are causes and results are results. 
He also repudiates those ascetics and brahmins who profess what is not a cause and what is an incompatible cause . 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own, a tathāgata knows, in accordance with reality, the nature of the deeds that an individual performs himor herself and the results that he or she experiences. 
He also repudiates those ascetics and brahmins who profess that generosity and merit can be transferred.1532 By means of the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration, a tathāgata correctly instructs his followers on the basis of the three marvelous abilities1533 and also repudiates those ascetics and brahmins who maintain doctrines that are hostile, contentious, and adversarial. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding superior and inferior faculties, a tathāgata distinguishes and knows, in accordance with reality, the lesser, middling, and great faculties of sentient beings. 
He also gives them Dharma teachings in a manner that is befitting and appropriate. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion, a tathāgata knows, in accordance with reality, the virtuous and nonvirtuous forms of devotion that are lesser, middling, and great. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements, a tathāgata distinguishes and knows, in accordance with reality, the inferior, intermediate, and excellent forms of constituent element . 
In accordance with their faculties, attitudes, and latent propensities, correctly and in an appropriate manner joins sentient beings to this or that starting point for engaging in , through the action of instruction. 
Regarding this , the manner in which the tathāgatas give instruction to listeners about the various starting points for engaging in has been promulgated, laid out, disclosed, prescribed, and made clear in its entirety and without leaving any gaps in The Stage of a Listener. 
How, then, do the tathāgatas present instructions for mental stability to a bodhisattva who is a novice and a beginning practitioner, and who is both engaged in the effort to acquire the requisites for one-pointed concentration and desirous of mental stability? 
In this case, a tathāgata initially instructs a sincere bodhisattva, one who is a novice and a beginning practitioner, and who is serious about the requisites for one-pointed concentration, in the following manner: 
Draw near, O child of good family. 
Having gone alone and unaccompanied to an isolated dwelling place, direct your attention inwardly to that very name given to you by your mother andfather, or by your teacher and preceptor. 
“This adventitious appellation only occurs in relation to these adventitious entities.” O child of good family, when this conception of being adventitious has arisen in you and been understood in relation to your name, then also direct your attention inwardly in a proper manner to the name “eye,” the appellation “eye,” and the designation “eye” in relation to your eye. 
Two things are perceived in relation to the eye. 
“This is the name, the appellation, and the designation ‘eye,’” and “That is the bare substance1535 in relation to which this name, appellation, and designation .” There is nothing beyond that and nothing more than that. 
Regarding this , not only are the name, appellation, and designation in relation to the eye not the eye, that substance in relation to which the appellation “eye” is also not an eye that exists inherently. 
Why is that? 
Concerning this , without the name “eye,” the appellation “eye,” and the designation “eye,” no one could develop the awareness of an eye. 
if that substance were truly established in the sense of possessing an essence that could be described by a name, then the awareness of an “eye” would no longer come into being in such a way that is dependent ; the awareness of an “eye” would simply occur naturally in relation to that substance, even without ever having heard or conceived of any names. 
Therefore, this name “eye” and appellation “eye” are also adventitious in relation to an adventitious entity. 
Through directing your attention to the eye in this way, inwardly and in a proper manner, the conception of being adventitious will also arise and be understood in relation to the appellation “eye.” As is the case with respect to the eye, the same is true with respect to the ear, the nose, the tongue, the body, and so on at length up to those that are seen, heard, thought about, and realized, those that have been attained, those that are sought after, as well as those that are deliberated about and reflected upon with the mind. 
In short, the conception of being adventitious will also arise and be understood in relation to all the appellations that occur in relation to entities. 
You will correctly take hold of the path of preparation whose aim is to remove the settled conception that you have regarding all entities. 
In this way, having repeatedly cleared away all the elaborative conceptions that occur in relation to all entities by means of an awareness that effectively examines all objects of knowledge and by means of the conception that all the appellations regarding entities are adventitious, abide at length in the substance1536 with a nonconceptualizing mind that is free of signs and is engaged in apprehending merely the true mode of being. 
In this way, through the lineage of one-pointed concentration that pertains to a tathāgata’s pure knowledge, you will attain one-pointedness of mind. 
If you direct your attention to unattractiveness, you should not relinquish this form of attention . 
If you direct your attention to loving-kindness, the mere conditionality of dependent origination, the diversity of the elements, recollection of one’s breath, the first meditative absorption, and so on up to the sphere in which there is neither conception nor absence of conception, or the immeasurable bodhisattva forms of meditative absorption, supernatural knowledge, one-pointed concentration, and states of composure, you should not relinquish this very form of attention. 
In this way, this bodhisattva form of attention by you will eventually arrive at unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
It should be understood that this is the path that leads everywhere by bodhisattvas. 
This is the way that the tathāgatas have instructed novice bodhisattvas in the past, the way that they shall instruct them in the future, and the way that they are currently instructing them. 
A listener who applies himor herself using this form of attention will also become one who attains supernatural knowledge very swiftly for the purpose of realizing the Dharma, if he or she is capable of understanding it properly. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere, a tathāgata knows, in accordance with reality, the paths that deliverance from all suffering as well as the paths that do not lead to deliverance. 
Rejecting the paths that do not lead to deliverance, he sets forth the path that leads to deliverance. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding recollection of former existences, a tathāgata recalls both past events and the experiences of past births and reveals them to his followers in order to engender in their minds aversion and faith . 
He also repudiates those ascetics and brahmins who profess an eternalistic doctrine. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth, a tathāgata declares where listeners who died at some time in the past were reborn. 
He also repudiates those ascetics and brahmins who profess a nihilistic doctrine. 
By means of the power of knowledge regarding the termination of the outflows, a tathāgata becomes free of doubt and uncertainty regarding his own liberation. 
He also repudiates the exaggerated pride of those ascetics and brahmins the status of an arhat. 
This, then, should be understood the actions of the ten powers. 
Regarding this , what is the successive order of a tathāgata’s ten powers? 
A tathāgata acquires all of the ten powers at the same time that he attains unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
Though acquired simultaneously, they become evident in a successive manner. 
As soon as a tathāgata has attained enlightenment, he correctly observes the systematic arrangement of causes and effects that relate to entities by means of the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions. 
Having observed that, by means of the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own, he correctly reveals to those in the desire realm who wish to attain certain kinds of favorable results that correspond to that realm avoid nonvirtuous karma and undertake virtuous karma. 
Moreover, by means of the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration, he provides instruction in a correct manner for achieving the paths that will bring about attainment of the worldly form of detachment to those beings who are desirous of gaining the worldly form of detachment. 
In addition, by means of a tathāgata’s remaining seven powers, he reveals the path for attaining the transcendent form of detachment to those who are desirous of gaining the transcendent form of detachment. 
Regarding this , by means of the power of knowledge regarding inferior and superior faculties, first examines the faculties of those who desire the transcendent form of detachment. 
Then, by means of the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion, he examines the attitudes that accompany those faculties. 
Following that, by means of the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements, he examines the latent propensities that accompany those attitudes. 
Having realized the faculties, attitudes, and latent propensities in this way, he introduces them in an appropriate manner to the objects that represent the starting points by means of the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere. 
Following that, once they have been caused to take hold of mental stability by practicing the appropriate meditation object that represents the starting point for engaging in and after they have purified themselves of their unfavorable mental traits,1537 he reveals, by means of the power of knowledge regarding recollection of former lives and the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth, the middle way that rejects grasping at the eternalistic and nihilistic extremes that are rooted in the perishable collection view, so that they will abandon all the mental afflictions. 
After that, by means of the power of knowledge regarding the termination of the outflows, he likewise causes those who have applied themselves to the practice correctly and who are established in quiescence to abandon the form of exaggerated pride that, as a consequence of no longer exhibiting overt forms of the mental afflictions even though they have not been abandoned, wrongly leads them to believe they have completed when they have not done so. 
This, then, constitutes one formulation of the order of the powers. 
In this case, after having attained unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment, a tathāgata first manifests the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions and ponders well the supreme knowledge of the settled nature of entities1538 in relation to all entities that arise dependently. 
Relying upon the knowledge the settled nature of entities, he observes the faction of householders with the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own. 
As he surveys , he manifests the knowledge of inferior and superior faculties and realizes, “There are sentient beings who have been born in the world and who have become full-grown in the world whose faculties are weak, whose faculties are moderately developed, and whose faculties are sharp.” Having realized this, his mind moves toward teaching the Dharma. 
Following that, it should be understood that the succession of the remaining powers of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion, etc., takes place in the manner previously. 
This is a second formulation of the successive order of the powers. 
At the very outset, as soon as a tathāgata has attained enlightenment, he examines the sphere of dependently arisen entities with the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions. 
Following that, he examines the sphere of sentient beings— among the dependently arisen entities that is universally recognized as sentient beings—and “These sentient beings are experiencing this type of result of this type of deed that each one has carried out himor herself.” Having closely examined in accordance with reality the sphere of entities and the sphere of sentient beings by means of the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration, he correctly instructs those very sentient beings on the basis of the three marvelous abilities in order to free them from their suffering. 
who instructs after having realized their faculties, etc., and who then causes them to enter the path, liberates them from their suffering by means of the remaining powers in the successive manner that previously. 
This is the third formulation of the successive order of the powers. 
Regarding this , what is the difference between the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions and the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own? 
The way in which virtuous and nonvirtuous deeds bring about desirable and undesirable results is through the power of knowledge regarding proper and improper conditions. 
On the other hand, the way in which only that very individual who performs a particular virtuous or nonvirtuous deed will experience its desirable or undesirable result is through the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own. 
The way in which only that very individual who enters a particular meditative absorption, liberation, etc., will possess it and not anyone else is through the power of knowledge regarding one’s deeds are one’s own. 
By contrast, the way in which relies upon those very same meditative absorptions, etc., to instruct his followers using the three marvelous abilities is through the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration. 
The way in which perceives minds that are naturally accompanied by faith, etc., is through the power of knowledge regarding the absorptions, the liberations, and entering states of one-pointed concentration. 
By contrast, the way in which distinguishes the different types of lesser, middling, and great faculties is through the power of knowledge regarding inferior and superior faculties. 
The way in which perceives attitudes, which are accompanied by the faculties and toward a variety of different objects, is through the power of knowledge regarding inferior and superior faculties. 
By contrast, the way in which distinguishes the diversity of those very attitudes is through the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion. 
Moreover, in brief, it should be understood that there are six different types of attitude: 
the attitude that does not lead to deliverance—such as that of beings who aspire to such worlds as those of Maheśvara, Narāyana, and Brahmā; the attitude that does lead to deliverance—such as that of beings who aspire to the three vehicles; the attitude that is far from purity—such as that of beings who are established in a ripening that is small or middling; the attitude that is near to purity—such as that of beings who are established in a ripening that is great; the attitude that can bring attainment of nirvana within the same lifetime—such as that of beings who aspire to attain nirvana by means of the Listeners’ Vehicle; the attitude that will bring attainment of nirvana in the future—such as that of beings who aspire to attain nirvana by means of the Great Vehicle. 
The way in which perceives the seeds that correspond to and are awakened by those forms of devotion is through the power of knowledge regarding diverse forms of devotion. 
By contrast, the way in which distinguishes and perceives the different forms of those very seeds is through the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements. 
Moreover, in brief, it should be understood that there are four different types of constituent element: 
the seed that exists naturally;1539 the seed that has been awakened by former practice;1540 the seed that is capable of being purified, that is to say, those who have the capacity to attain nirvana; and the seed that is incapable of being purified, that is to say, those who do not have the capacity to attain nirvana. 
The way in which knows entering the path that accords with a particular constituent element is through the power of knowledge regarding diverse constituent elements. 
By contrast, the way in which distinguishes all the individual aspects of these very paths—that is to say, this path leads to affliction, this path leads to purification, this path leads to ultimate purification, this path does not lead to ultimate purification—is through the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere. 
The way in which who is remembering the past knows, in accord with reality, all the causes of the migratory states that occurred in the past is through the power of knowledge regarding the paths that lead everywhere. 
By contrast, the way in which distinguishes and knows the six circumstances that correlate with the basic elements of life as earlier is through the power of knowledge regarding the recollection of former existences. 
The way in which knows the passing away and rebirth of sentient beings in relation to the past is through the power of knowledge regarding the recollection of former existences. 
By contrast, the way in which sees the passing away and rebirth of sentient beings that will occur in the future is through the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth. 
The way in which knows the conception1541 and future rebirth of those sentient beings who have not completed their aim is through the power of knowledge regarding death and rebirth. 
By contrast, the way in which knows those beings who have completed their aim and achieved a fully liberated mind by attaining nirvana within their lifetime is through the power of knowledge regarding termination of the outflows. 
This should be understood to constitute both the differences and similarities that exist among a tathāgata’s ten powers. 
The scriptural description of the four forms of intrepid confidence should be understood as it appears in the sutras.1542 Regarding this topic, these four states are ones that the tathāgatas affirm in an assembly. 
that is not shared with the listeners, the supremely perfect understanding all aspects of all entities through having become liberated from the obscurations to that which needs to be known. 
This is the first state. 
This is the second state. 
the path is one whose purpose is to transcend suffering and it is one that will lead those beings who are desirous of attaining liberation to deliverance . 
This is the third state. 
the qualities that to be obstacles and that are obstructions to the attainment of that very path are, that ought to be abandoned. 
This is the fourth state. 
A tathāgata is also one who makes affirmations that accord with reality about these four states. 
This also constitutes the extent of what the Master has affirmed—namely, that the practice what is beneficial to oneself and the practice what is beneficial to others have been fulfilled. 
Regarding this , fulfillment of the practice what is beneficial to oneself is affirmed by the former two states and fulfillment of the practice what is beneficial to others is affirmed by the latter two states. 
Regarding this , through his own the supremely perfect understanding all entities, a tathāgata affirms true and complete buddhahood to those bodhisattvas who are firmly established in the Great Vehicle. 
In addition, he affirms the termination of all the outflows to those who are firmly established in the Listeners’ and Solitary Realizers’ vehicles. 
He affirms the path that leads to deliverance and the qualities that are obstructive to both of those . 
This is how the tathāgata taught this sutra statement: 
“The path that leads to deliverance which I taught to bodhisattvas and listeners . 
The compilers of the listener collection of scriptures have taken out the word “bodhisattva” from that section . 
By contrast, in the bodhisattva collection of scriptures, the word “bodhisattva” alone is mentioned. 
The scriptural description of the three closely placed recollections should be understood as it appears in the sutras.1543 The Tathāgata has long held the following aspiration: 
Moreover these three are established on the basis of three types of assembly. 
What are the three assemblies? 
A second is an assembly in which everyone without exception practices incorrectly. 
In addition, a third assembly is one in which some practice correctly while others practice incorrectly. 
The scriptural description of the three forms of having nothing that needs to be concealed should be understood as it appears in the sutras.1544 In brief, the condition of having abandoned any form of misdeed that needs to be covered up is what is indicated by a tathāgata’s three forms of having nothing that needs to be concealed. 
A tathāgata also never at any time incurs any form of those slight indeterminate misdeeds that even arhats sometimes, occasionally, commit due to a lapse of recollection. 
Therefore, a tathāgata’s nature is exactly as he has affirmed it to be. 
He proclaims to listeners as a way of suppressing1545 them repeatedly. 
He censures some of them as a way of continually subduing them. 
Nor do I want them to report it to others.” Regarding this , all the aspects of the tathāgatas’ great compassion should be understood as they were explained in the chapter entitled “Worship, Service, and the Immeasurables.” Moreover, it should be understood that the possessed by the tathāgatas is immeasurable and unsurpassed. 
Regarding this , because a tathāgata correctly carries out that which he intends to carry out, in relation to the intended object, in the intended manner, and at the intended time, this is called a tathāgata’s “nature of being completely free of confusion.”1546 Thus, regarding this , the condition by which a tathāgata’s recollection avoids inattentiveness and his recollection remains ever fixed at all times, in relation to all things that ought to be done, in relation to all places, and in relation to all means those actions, should be regarded here as the nature of being completely free of confusion. 
Regarding this , a tathāgata’s quality of not displaying any physical actions pertaining to bodily movement, gaze, speech, or comportment that correspond to the existence of a mental affliction is called a tathāgata’s “complete destruction of the traces.”1547 By contrast, even though arhats have terminated the mental afflictions, they still display actions that correspond to the existence of mental afflictions in their bodily movements, manner of gazing, speech, or comportment.1548 In brief, a tathāgata attains supreme enlightenment with regard to three groups of entities. 
What are the three? 
Regarding this , a tathāgata’s knowledge of all those entities that are disadvantageous and that are neither advantageous nor disadvantageous is called a tathāgata’s “knowledge of all aspects.”1551 Regarding this , a tathāgata’s knowledge of all those entities that are advantageous is called a tathāgata’s “knowledge of what is most excellent.”1552 Regarding this , the combination of a tathāgata’s knowledge of all aspects and his knowledge of what is most excellent is called a tathāgata’s “knowledge of all aspects and of what is most excellent.”1553 All of these combined together constitute a buddha’s one hundred and forty unique qualities. 
Among them, the marks and secondary signs are attained in their most perfect form by a bodhisattva in his final existence. 
When a bodhisattva who is in his last existence and who has fully completed the path of the accumulations for enlightenment sits down at the seat of enlightenment, and as he is meditating on the thirty-seven qualities that are conducive to enlightenment without a teacher, he attains a one-pointed concentration called “that bestows in an instant the knowledge that is free from any obstructions.” included in the diamond-like one-pointed concentration that is possessed by a bodhisattva who is still pursuing the spiritual training. 
In the moment immediately following that, he attains the unsurpassed state of perfect purity in which all the remaining qualities ranging from the ten powers up to the knowledge of all aspects and what is most excellent arise simultaneously. 
By virtue of their attainment, the perfectly pure and immaculate awareness that engages the totality of objects of knowledge is free of any resistance or obstruction and is subject to nothing more than the turning .1554 He becomes one who has fulfilled all his aims. 
Having become one who in this manner has fulfilled his desired object, he has transcended the conduct of a bodhisattva and the stage of a bodhisattva, and has entered upon the conduct of a buddha and the stage of a buddha. 
This is the unsurpassed transformation by his being. 
It should be understood that all the other transformations by bodhisattvas up to the supreme pleasurable state have a form that is superior to them. 
Regarding this , how should the distinguishing characteristics of the transcendent awareness possessed by a bodhisattva who is established in the stage that is the perfect manner of going and those of possessed by a tathāgata be understood? 
In this instance, the transcendent awareness of a bodhisattva who is established in the stage that is the perfect manner of going should be understood all objects of knowledge in a manner that resembles the way a sighted person perceives visible objects that are covered by a thin cloth. 
By contrast, the transcendent awareness of a tathāgata should be regarded in a manner that are not covered by anything. 
For example, the transcendent awareness of the bodhisattva should be regarded as being like a painting that has been filled in with every type of color but has not yet been completed by the last, perfected paint strokes. 
A tathāgata’s transcendent awareness should be regarded as being like a perfectly completed . 
For example, the transcendent awareness of the bodhisattva in a manner that resembles the way a sighted person perceives visible objects under slightly darkened conditions. 
The transcendent awareness of a tathāgata should be regarded in a manner when there are no elements of darkness at all. 
For example, of the bodhisattva in a manner that resembles the way a sighted person visible objects from a distance. 
of a tathāgata in a manner that resembles that are near. 
For example, of the bodhisattva in a manner that resembles the way a person with slightly diminished eyesight perceives visible objects. 
of a tathāgata in a manner that resembles the way a person with extremely clear eyesight . 
A bodhisattva who is established in the stage that is the perfect manner of going should be regarded as resembling the body who is still in the womb. 
A tathāgata should be regarded as resembling the body of a being who has been born into a birth existence.1557 The mental activity of a bodhisattva who is situated on the stage that is the perfect manner of going should be regarded as resembling that of an arhat while he or she is in the dream state.1558 A tathāgata’s should be regarded as resembling that of the very same when he or she is awake. 
The nature of the transcendent awareness of a bodhisattva who is established in the stage that is the perfect manner of going should be regarded as resembling that of a lamp that is not bright. 
The nature of a tathāgata’s transcendent awareness should be regarded as resembling that of a lamp that is extremely bright. 
Therefore, it should be understood that there are great differences between the transcendent awareness, body, and thought of a tathāgata and of a bodhisattva who is established in the stage that is the perfect manner of going. 
A BUDDHA’S TEN DEEDS A tathāgata who possesses the understanding associated with such a supreme enlightenment carries out all the activities of a fully enlightened being throughout the entire buddha realm that extends in the ten directions. 
In brief, the following ten are the deeds of a tathāgata that ought to be done and the activities of a tathāgata that ought to be carried out. 
Each of the deeds carried out by a tathāgata accomplishes the aims of immeasurable sentient beings. 
There are none that are higher than these and none that are greater than these. 
What are the ten? 
The first deed of a tathāgata is to engender, at the very outset, a clarity of mind1559 toward his own nature as a great being and to generate a firm conviction1560 about the state of a great person. 
He accomplishes this by means of the marks and secondary signs. 
This is the second deed of a tathāgata. 
The ability to accomplish all sentient beings’ aims combined with the ability to remove all their doubts represents the third deed of a tathāgata and it is one that he accomplishes by means of a tathāgata’s ten powers. 
That is to say, a tathāgata is able to accomplish all the aims of all sentient beings by means of the ten powers that were described earlier. 
The refutation of all the verbal challenges made by opponents combined with the formulation of his own doctrine represents the fourth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of the four forms of intrepid confidence. 
The condition of remaining free of mental affliction toward both those followers who abide by his directives and those who do not abide by them is the fifth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of the closely placed recollections. 
The quality of acting in a manner that accords with what he asserts is the sixth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of the forms of having nothing that needs to be concealed. 
The quality of watching over the entire world both day and night with the eye of a buddha is the seventh deed of a tathāgata and one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of his great compassion. 
The quality of never failing to do everything that needs to be done for all sentient beings is the eighth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by possessing a nature that is completely free of confusion. 
A tathāgata’s quality of carrying out and practicing proper behavior is the ninth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of the condition of having completely destroyed all the traces . 
The rejection of those entities that are disadvantageous and those entities that are neither advantageous nor disadvantageous, followed by the naming, explaining, and revealing of those entities that are advantageous, is the tenth deed of a tathāgata and it is one that a tathāgata accomplishes by means of his knowledge of all aspects and what is most excellent. 
This is the manner in which a tathāgata, by carrying out the ten deeds of a tathāgata, accomplishes all the activities of a buddha by means of a buddha’s one hundred and forty unique qualities. 
Furthermore, it would not be easy to give a detailed enumeration of the different forms of a buddha’s activities even for up to a trillion trillion kalpas. 
The pleasurable state of a tathāgata and the stage of a tathāgata are called “preeminence.” Why is that? 
It is that which zealous bodhisattvas are desirous of achieving and which they rely upon and depend upon as they train themselves in the bodhisattva training. 
After it has been attained, it is also the high position that is relied upon and depended upon in order to accomplish all the aims of all sentient beings. 
Therefore, it is called “preeminence.” All of these buddha qualities that the tathāgatas possess are conducive to accomplishing others’ aims to an exceedingly great degree and they are distinguished by accomplishing others’ aims, unlike that the listeners and solitary realizers possess. 
Therefore, those are said to be “unique.”1561 There are certain qualities of a buddha that are not seen in any form at all among the listeners and solitary realizers. 
These include, for example, great compassion, the nature of being completely free of confusion, the complete destruction of the traces, and the knowledge of all aspects and what is most excellent. 
However, all of those that are possessed by a tathāgata are perceived in a form that is complete in every respect, that have greatly surpassed , and that are most excellent. 
Therefore, they are called “unique.” It should be understood that the meaning of the term “unique” is that of being exclusive. 
This has revealed the bodhisattvas’ complete path of training as well as the result of that training. 
It constitutes a foundation for describing the entire path of training for bodhisattvas and all the aspects of the results of that path of training. 
Indeed, this The Stage of a Bodhisattva, can also be referred to as “A Manual1562 for the Bodhisattva Collection,” “A Summary of the Great Vehicle,” “An Explanation of the Path That Leads to Destruction and the Path That Avoids Destruction,” and “The Foundation for Developing the Purity of Unobstructed Knowledge.” Within the world of gods, humans, and demigods, whatever divine being, human being, ascetic, or brahmin generates a strong devotion toward this Stage of a Bodhisattva, and then listens to it, takes it up, retains it, and practices it in the form of meditation, reveals it at length to others, or at least preserves it through causing it to be copied, and then worships and honors it should, in brief, expect a heap of merit that is as great in size as the heap of merit that the Lord promulgated, laid out, disclosed, prescribed, and made clear by the act of listening to, etc., the sutras that are contained in the bodhisattva collection . 
Why is that? 
It is because all the most important brief and extensive explanations the entire bodhisattva collection have been included and set forth in this Stage of a Bodhisattva. 
Moreover, as long as the Dharma and Vinaya that has been revealed at length in this Stage of a Bodhisattva shall endure, develop widely, and achieve greatness through being frequently explained, recited, and practiced in a manner that accords with the Dharma, for that length of time the counterfeit forms of the true Dharma that bring about the disappearance of the true Dharma will not abound. 
On the other hand, as soon as the counterfeit forms of the true Dharma abound, that will bring about the disappearance of the true Dharma that is connected with what really exists. 
Within The Stage of a Bodhisattva, “The Object of Mental Application That Relates to the Perfection of the Support,” this completes the sixth chapter, entitled “Preeminence.” This concludes The Stage of a Bodhisattva. 
A bodhisattva who abides in the spiritual lineage generates the thought to unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
who has generated that thought applies himor herself to one’s own aim and that of others. 
The person who remains unafflicted finds the means by which to remain free of weariness. 
The person who is unwearied finds the means by which to increase roots of virtue. 
The person who increases his or her roots of virtue achieves unsurpassed true and complete enlightenment. 
The person who is pursuing the practices one’s own aim and that of others, the means by which one can avoid becoming afflicted, the means by which one will remain free of weariness, the means by which one will increase roots of virtue, and the attainment of enlightenment, at the very outset fixes his or her devotion upon the profound and extensive subjects. 
The person who has fixed his or her devotion upon those subjects will seek them. 
Having sought them, one will both teach them to others and achieve them by one’s own practice. 
While proceeding in that way, in relation to that object, and for that purpose, one practices in whatever way will bring about the accumulation of merit and the accumulation of wisdom. 
The person who has accumulated merit and wisdom practices the means by which to avoid abandoning samsara. 
While practicing in that way, one undertakes to avoid developing the mental afflictions in samsara. 
While practicing in that way, one undertakes to avoid becoming attached to one’s own happiness. 
While practicing in that way, one undertakes to avoid being made weary by the suffering of samsara. 
Having become a person who knows the bodies of teachings, learns what should be taught to whom and how to go about doing so, thereby becoming one who knows the world. 
The person who knows the bodies of teachings and who knows the world in this way seeks the Dharma in a proper manner. 
The person who is seeking in this way develops the ability to remove all doubts possessed by all sentient beings. 
As the person who possesses this ability increases his or her merit through removing the doubts of others, he or she will complete the accumulation of merit. 
By increasing one’s knowledge, one will also complete the accumulation of wisdom. 
While completing , one will apply oneself in a genuine manner to meditating upon the qualities that are conducive to enlightenment. 
The person who has applied himor herself in this manner will dedicate his or her meditation to the Great Vehicle’s form of complete nirvana, not to the form of complete nirvana the vehicles of the listeners or the solitary realizers. 
The person who possesses this kind of skillful means will retain uttered by all the buddhas and bodhisattvas and that were heard. 
Through the power of meditation, every aspect of the Dharma that one has not previously heard will also become clear. 
The person who possesses this power of retention and this clarity of understanding will practice the three doors to liberation with the aim of abandoning all the obscurations.1563 The person who practices in this way will become one who is established in the aim of abandoning one’s own erring belief and exaggerated pride as well as those of others. 
This constitutes form of practice that is excellent in every respect. 
A bodhisattva is established in order to benefit oneself and others, and he or she is also one who considers one’s duty to be the pursuit of others’ aims. 
A listener and a solitary realizer do not consider their duty to be the pursuit of others’ aims in the same way. 
is one who has the same attitude toward all sentient beings as one does toward oneself. 
With this mind that views equally, he or she is always intent upon aiding , and does not wish for anything in return. 
As one is directed in this way, always desires to benefit others and bring them happiness. 
Having such an intention to benefit and bring happiness , he or she puts forth fruitful efforts on their behalf. 
This constitutes the distinguishing characteristic that relates to the qualities of spiritual practice, one that is accomplished to an ever-increasing degree. 
Regarding this , the differences in their favorable qualities1564 . 
A bodhisattva receives a prophecy from the buddhas. 
A listener and a solitary realizer disciple do not. 
who has received a prophecy is one who resides on the stage of irreversibility. 
who abides there obtains the nature of being completely free of confusion with regard to what is to be done out of necessity and what is to be done continually. 
A declaration about the quality of being completely free of confusion in this way is made by buddhas and bodhisattvas when they are making pronouncements about those who are the best among all sentient beings. 
also does not fail to carry out all those activities that ought to be done. 
Nor does one leave unfinished those that are unattained and still incomplete. 
By not leaving anything unfinished, is always increasing his or her virtuous qualities. 
Because increases his or her virtuous qualities like during the waxing half , he or she is a genuine bodhisattva, not a counterfeit one. 
By being a genuine bodhisattva, one knows every aspect of every method for self-discipline. 
By knowing this, one becomes skilled about all the circumstances that relate to why something should be investigated, what subjects should be investigated, and the means by which they should be investigated. 
Through engaging in these investigations, one causes these matters to be ascertained. 
By becoming skilled regarding these circumstances, will become skilled about giving instruction. 
By becoming skilled about giving instruction, he or she attains the king of one-pointed concentrations, one whose objects are immeasurable. 
Having attained this concentration, becomes one who teaches the Dharma in a fruitful manner. 
Having become familiar with that to a high degree, one becomes a supporter of the Great Vehicle. 
On any of a variety of occasions when one has become completely familiar with the Great Vehicle, one receives any of a variety of names, and the buddhas and bodhisattvas refer to and praise one with a name that is common to all bodhisattvas. 
These should be understood to be distinguishing characteristics that relate to the favorable qualities. 
The ones who have such names1565 should be understood to they are a mark of being a bodhisattva. 
By possessing these marks, one can be successful in every aspect of the practice both within the householder faction and within the faction of those who have gone forth . 
who can be successful within either of these two factions becomes one whose practice is meaningful and one whose superior attitude is solely devoted to the side of virtue. 
Whether adopting the householder faction or the faction of those who have gone forth, the person who has such an attitude will remain on the side of virtue for as long as he or she lives. 
Following that , one will knowingly take birth where one can meet with buddhas and bodhisattvas and be of benefit to sentient beings. 
One will experience circumstances in which buddhas and bodhisattvas continually and uninterruptedly provide the support of their instruction and in which one will attain superior qualities that relate to the side of virtue. 
Seizing the benefits of that experience, one enters into that situation in which superior qualities can be attained in a manner abode.1566 With a mind that is established in that situation, one advances in every way to ever-higher extraordinary states, without being satisfied until the state of perfection has been reached. 
Advancing in this way, one will obtain the state of perfection beyond which one no longer seeks anything higher or greater and where the unsurpassed state has been attained. 
This concludes the successive order of The Stage of a Bodhisattva. 
Again, we ask, how do you know that the various characteristics of conditioned dharmas have a real nature apart from form, mind, etc.? 
this scripture does not say that they have a real nature apart from form, mind, etc., so your proof is inconclusive. 
The genitive relationship I between characteristics and dharmas does not signify a different substance, because the substance of form and mind is identical with form and mind. 
You cannot clearly distinguish the substance of that which can characterize from that which is characterized, because the characteristics of conditioned dharmas, such as solidity, etc., are not different from earth, etc. 
If the characteristics of conditioned dharmas are different from the characterized substance, then the substance of the characteristics of unconditioned dharmas will not differ from what is characterized. 
But, if characteristics such as birth, etc., and their substances always exist simultaneously, then all the characteristics will always function simultaneously. 
If it is claimed that the characteristics are contradictory, they cannot function simultaneously. 
This must also be true of their function, because it has no separate nature. 
if it is claimed that their functioning requires causes and conditions, then the causes and conditions must not always exist. 
Moreover, your concept of birth, etc., would serve no purpose. If those things that are characterized are united with characteristics such as birth, then those things that are unconditioned must also be provided with birth, Icessation,l etc. 
It is not clear why the one should require them and not the other. 
Cessation is nonexistence, so it must not exist at present. 
If cessation is not nonexistent, I as claimed by the Sarvstivdins, I then birth must not exist. 
Also, since cessation contradicts duration, how could they exist simultaneously? 
If duration does not contradict birth, how do they contain different times? 
Thus these theories pose dilemmas and are unreasonable. 
When the dharma endures for a while, we refer it as duration. 
The change of the enduring dharma from earlier to later states is called differentiation. 
After existing for a while, it reverts to nonexistence, and this state is called cessation. 
The first three states are states of existence and occur in the present. The last state is one of nonexistence and therefore is in the past. 
But, how can nonexistence be a characteristic of a dharma that exists? 
what is wrong with indicating a future nonexistence as a characteristic? 
Cessation means that a present dharma will be nonexistent later. Differentiation means that the dharma is not static. Duration means that this dharma is active for a while. Therefore even though these four characteristics designate and indicate conditioned dharmas, they indicate differences !in their state. 
Therefore in accordance with their momentariness, we designate them conventionally as these four characteristics, or they can be conventionally designated as lasting for a period of time. 
The beginning of the dharmas career is called birth ; later nonexistence is destruction ; born, an apparent series is called duration ; since the series evolves and changes, we speak of differentiation. Therefore we conventionally speak of four characteristics. 
Again, because a scripture says so. 
According to a scripture, the Buddha acquired extraordinary names, phrases, and syllables. 
I We reply, this scripture does not say that there are real names, phrases, and syllables apart from form, mind, etc. Your proof is inconclusive. 
If names, phrases, and syllables really exist apart from sounds, then, like color, etc., they do not express. 
If you say that sound can produce names, phrases, and syllables, this sound must possess inflections of tone, and this alone suffices to express, so what is the use of names, phrases, etc.? 
If you say that inflections of tone in sounds are themselves names, phrases, and syllables, and that they exist separately from sound itself, we reply that the modifications of shape and quantity in visible form would be different from form and have real, distinct substances. 
If you say that the inflections of tones in sound do not express, just as sounds of a lute string or a flute do not, we answer that like that sound, inflections of voice do not produce names, etc. 
Also, who says that the voice alone definitely does not express? 
if sound by itself can express, then the sound of such things as wind bells must have the function of expressing I which sounds unreasonable. 
Furthermore, it is only in this Buddha world that we conventionally establish names, phrases, and syllables as dependent on sound. It is not the case in other Buddha worlds, because in those worlds, these three are established in dependence on light, odor, taste, etc. 
There is also a theory among some Buddhists that the propensities differ from mind and its activities and are not included among dharmas associated with mind. 
This is not reasonable, because those passions that are also anusayas are not unassociated with mind. 
There is also a theory that there are other dharmas unassociated with mind, but this can be refuted by the same principle as before. 
Also, the theory that there are real unconditioned dharmas apart from form, mind, etc., is unacceptable. 
Dharmas that exist can be classified in three ways: dharmas known by direct evidence, such as form and mind; dharmas that are clearly enjoyed, such as pots, clothing, etc.; everyone in the world knows that these things exist, and they do not have to be proved. 
The third consists of active, functioning dharmas, such as eyes, ears, etc., which we know exist because of the evidence of their functioning. 
But the world does not know that real unconditioned dharmas exist, because they do not function in the way that eyes and ears do. Besides, if you say that unconditioned dharmas function, then they are not eternal. Therefore unconditioned dharmas cannot be held to exist really. 
However, since unconditioned dharmas can be known, and since their nature is revealed through form, mind, and mental activities, you cannot establish a real nature of unconditioned dharmas apart from form, mind, etc. 
is space unitary or not? 
If its substance is unitary and extends everywhere, then since it harbors and receives forms, etc., then the substance of space must be multiple in accordance with the dharmas that occupy it, because the location occupied by one thing is not occupied by others. 
If that is not so, then all dharmas would interpenetrate. 
If, on the other hand, you say that space is not occupied by dharmas, then it cannot harbor and receive them, as in the case of other unconditioned dharmas. 
Also, is there a space within things or not? 
If there is there is confusion; if there is not, then space is not pervasive. 
I, then if this state is unitary one would obtain cessation as a result of discrimination of all bonds. 
When a single condition is absent, then if this state is unitary all conditions would be absent. 
If, however, unconditioned dharmas are multiple, then they will be divided into classes and types and, like form, etc., will not be unconditioned. 
Real unconditioned dharmas clung to by other Buddhist schools must be refuted in the same way. 
Finally, if you claim that unconditioned dharmas have no causes or effects, then they must be like the horns of a rabbit and nonexistent apart from mind. 
Scriptures say that there are I three unconditioned dharmas: 
They are of two kinds. First, we may provisionally grant their existence as dependent on the transformation of consciousness. That is, one has heard the name of space , and the characteristics of space, etc., arise through reflection. Through the scDemonstration of Consciousness Only power of habit, when mind, etc., appear, they appear in the form of these unconditioned dharmas. 
In the absence of change in the characteristics that appear in prior or subsequent appearances, we may conventionally speak of them as permanent. 
The second kind is that which is conventionally accepted as existing on the basis of the true nature of things. That is, the ultimate reality that is revealed by emptiness and absence of self exists, does not exist, both exists and does not exist, and neither exists nor does not exist. It demolishes the processes of thought and language and is neither the same as dharmas nor different from them, etc. It is the true principle of dharmas, hence it is called the true nature of dharmas. 
It is called cessation resulting from discrimination because through the power of discrimination it ends various impurities and one understands thoroughly. 
Or, as a result of being revealed by the absence of conditions, it is called cessation resulting from the absence of conditions. 
Feelings of pleasure and pain are removed, so it is called immovable. It is called cessation of thought and feeling because thought and feeling are not active. 
These five unconditioned dharmas are provisionally established on the basis of ultimate reality. But ultimate reality itself is merely a provisionally granted name. To refute the idea that it does not exist, it is said to exist. To refute the idea that it does exist, it is said to be empty. 
Because this principle is not false or erroneous, it is said to be the ultimate nature of everything. It is also called the ultimate nature of everything because it is not the same as the real, eternal dharma called ultimate nature of everything apart from form, mind, etc., of other schools. 
Dharmas grasped by non Buddhist schools and other schools of Buddhism do not really exist apart from mind and mental activities, because they are grasped in the same way that mind and mental activities are grasped by mind itself. 
The apprehension that grasps them does not have them as objects, because it grasps, like the apprehension that takes as an object this same intellect. 
Also, because mind and its activities arise in mutual dependence, they do not really exist, just as magical illusions do not. 
In order to refute the false attachment to a really existing realm exterior to mind and its activities, we teach that there is nothing but consciousness. 
But if one believes that consciousness only really exists, this is no different from attachment to external objects, and it remains attachment to dharmas. 
Innate attachment to dharmas results from an innate power of false perfuming existing from beginningless time and is always present in the individual. It does not arise from false teachings or imagination but evolves spontaneously; hence it is called innate. 
This in turn takes two forms. The first is constant and continuous. It is located in the seventh consciousness , which, taking the eighth consciousness as its object, produces an image that is natural to the mind and grasps it as a real dharma. 
The second kind is discontinuous. It is located in the sixth consciousness and takes as its object images of the aggregates, sense bases, and sense fields that evolve from the eighth consciousness. It produces an image that is natural to the mind, wholly or in part, and grasps it as a real dharma. 
These two forms of attachment to dharmas are subtle and difficult to eliminate. They can only be eliminated later in the ten bodhisattva stages through the repeated cultivation of the most excellent contemplation of the emptiness of dharmas. 
Attachment to dharmas through imagination results from the power of present, external conditions; therefore it is not innate. 
It is found only in the sixth consciousness, and it is of two kinds. The first kind takes as its object the aggregates, sense bases, etc., taught in a false teaching, produces an image that is natural to the mind, and imagines and judges it to be a real dharma. 
The second kind takes as its object images such as self nature, etc., taught in false teachings, produces an image that is natural to the mind, and judges such things to be real dharmas. 
These two forms of attachment are coarse and thus easy to eliminate. They are eliminated upon entrance into the first of the ten bodhisattva stages when one contemplates the true state of things as the emptiness of all dharmas. 
Of these different kinds of attachment to dharmas, dharmas external to mind may or may not be grasped, but all dharmas within mind are grasped. Therefore all attachment to dharmas has as an object apparently real dharmas that appear from the mind but are grasped as real dharmas. 
However, the images of apparently real dharmas are produced from conditions and are therefore like illusory phenomena. 
These real dharmas as objects of attachment are falsely imagined and thus do not really exist. 
Therefore the Buddha has said, You should realize, O Maitreya, that objects of consciousness are only the manifestations of consciousness and are dependent upon other dharmas for their appearance, like illusions, etc. 
Therefore mind and its activities do not have external dharmas as their condition in the form of object, because the function of taking something as an object must have a reality as an object. 
A certain present unit of mind and its activities are not the object of another unit of consciousness because they are categorized as being different units of consciousness, resembling dharmas that are not objects. 
Also, the activities of one group are not the immediate condition for the consciousness of the same group, because they are separate from consciousness itself, resembling other things that are not grasped. 
Consequently, you must realize that there is no real external realm but only internal consciousness appearing as if it were an external realm. 
Thus a verse from a scripture says, No external realm imagined by the ignorant exists; Mind is agitated by perfuming and therefore evolves as objects. 
It is objected that if there are no real selves or dharmas apart from consciousness, then there can be no metaphorical use of terms. 
If you establish a metaphor without any common qualities, you would metaphorically speak of water as fire. 
If you say that even though fierceness, etc., are not qualities of a species but are never separated from the species, and therefore the use of metaphor is legitimate, this is wrong, because when a human being and fierceness and redness are present but not united, the species. 
If you say that it is possible to speak metaphorically because the qualities of men and fires resemble each other, this is unfounded, because you are speaking of fire in a man, not in his qualities. Consequently, metaphorical expression does not occur on the basis of substance. 
Also, it is not reasonable to say that a metaphor requires a real thing , because reality means the distinct characteristics , and it is not the object of conventional knowledge and expression. 
That is, conventional knowledge and expression do not reach the distinct characteristic of the thing. They only function with regard to common characteristics of dharmas. But there is no other way of reaching the object apart from conventional knowledge and expression, so it is agreed that the distinct characteristic is the support of the knowledge and expression. 
However, conventional knowledge and expression must occur on the basis of sound. However, they do not occur if the sound does not reach the organ. 
Neither that which expresses nor that which is expressed are the distinct characteristic, and so we say that metaphorical expression does not have a real entity as a support. 
Quasi means that is a superimposition, not a real characteristic. 
Sound evolves on the basis of the quasi characteristic of superimposition, and therefore it cannot be claimed that metaphor necessarily has a real thing as its support. Therefore these objections do not conform to proper principles. 
Thus a verse from the Ghanavyaha Sictra says, To refute real selves and dharmas grasped by the foolish, He spoke metaphorically of selves and dharmas in connection with the transformation of consciousness. 
The Evolutions of Consciousness Though the forms of the evolutions of consciousness are many, the consciousness that evolves is of three kinds. The first is called retribution or different results ; that is, the eighth consciousness, so called because its nature is that of many different results. 
The second is called thought; that is, the seventh consciousness , because it constantly judges and thinks. 
The third is called perception of the external realm; that is, the first six consciousnesses, because the objects that they perceive are gross. The word and of the eighth consciousness: 
The second kind, transformation as result , means that as a result of the power of the above two forms of causal energy, the eight forms of consciousness are born and exhibit their various characteristics. 
Because habit energy of similar species is the cause, the substance and characteristics of the eight forms of consciousness are born in their diversity. The name result of similar species derives from the fact that the result is similar to the cause. 
Habit energy of retribution is the dominant condition. It is called retribution because of its power to influence the eighth consciousness to repay karma leading to a specific form of rebirth from past lives, and because it exists as a continuous series. 
It also stirs the first six forms of consciousness to repay karma that fills out the details inherited from the past lives. 
It is called born of retribution rather than simply retribution because it is intermittent. 
That is, the above retribution and born of retribution are called result of retribution because the result differs from the cause. 
Here, only the consciousness that harbors self attachment, holds the impure seeds, and transforms the results is called retribution. 
The Store Consciousness We have already discussed briefly the names of the three forms of consciousness that transform, but we have yet to discuss their three characteristics. 
What are the characteristics of the first transforming consciousness? 
The term store shows the specific characteristic of this first transforming consciousness, because its specific character is that of being both cause and effect. 
Although the states of the specific character of this consciousness are many , the term store is used broadly for all its states, because of its serious fault. 
It is called retribution because it is the result of retribution for good and bad action that draws an individual to a certain realm , destination , and form of birth. 
The term retribution shows the characteristics of the fruit of this first transforming consciousness. 
Though there are many states and varieties of fruit of this consciousness, it is referred to broadly as retribution and fruit because the terms apply to all states, though not common to all. 
Because this I eighth consciousness holds all seeds of all dharmas and does not allow them to be lost, it is called holder of all seeds. Apart from it, no other dharma capable of holding the seeds of all dharmas can be found. 
This term holder of all seeds shows the causal aspect of this first consciousness. 
Though there are many ways in which consciousness is causal in its nature, nothing else holds the seeds, and for that reason it is called holder of all seeds. 
Though the substance and characteristics of this transforming consciousness are many, it is said that it only has these three characteristics. 
What are the dharmas that are called seeds ? 
They are different energies in the fundamental consciousness that immediately engender their own fruit or results. These seeds are neither the same as, nor different from, the fundamental consciousness and their fruit, because the principle must be so regarding substance and function, and cause and effect. 
Although they are neither identical with, nor different from, they really exist, because a fictional dharma is as if nonexistent and cannot be a causal condition. 
being neither identical with nor different from all dharmas, they must be only conventionally and not actually real, like pots, etc. 
But if this were so, then ultimate reality must also exist only conventionally, and to concede that would mean that there would be no real ultimate truth. 
However, the seeds are only existent from the point of view of conventional, worldly truth; they are not the same as ultimate reality. 
Even though the seeds are supported on the substance of the eighth consciousness, they are nothing but the seen part of this consciousness. las Dharmapalal says, this is because the seeing part always takes them as its objects. 
Because there is no distinction in substance between impure seeds and consciousness as retribution, the seeds are morally indeterminate, but their causes and results are good, bad, etc., and they are therefore said to be good, bad, etc. 
Since the pure seeds are not included in the nature of consciousness as retribution, and since their causes and results are categorized as good, then they are said to be only good. 
But if this is so, why does the Viniscayasamgraha I section of the Yogcarabhmi Sstra I say that all twenty two faculties have seeds of retribution and are all born of retribution? 
Even though they are called retribution, they are not indeterminate. They are called seeds of retribution because they are supported by the consciousness that is retribution. Different kinds of consciousness support each other, such as visual consciousness, etc. 
Also, pure seeds get the name retribution or maturation because they mature and evolve through the power of perfuming, but they are not retribution categorized as indeterminate by nature. 
There is an interpretation of the origin of seeds to the effect that all seeds exist naturally and primordially and are not produced by perfuming. They can be said to increase and grow through the power of perfuming. 
According to a scripture, All sentient beings, from beginningless time, have within them diverse kinds of elements , like seeds in a myrobalan fruit, that exist by the nature of things. 
Here, elements is another name for seeds. 
Also, a scripture says, From beginningless time, elements are the support of all dharmas, etc. Elements mean cause. 
The Yogacarabhmi Sastra says, Though the substance of the seeds exists from beginningless time in a natural and fundamental way, they are perfumed and develop anew by pure and impure that sentient beings are naturally divided into five families lone of which cannot attain ni.rvanal, which must mean that seeds must exist by the nature of things and do not result from perfuming. 
According to the Yogacarabhami Sastra, beings in the purgatories are provided with three pure faculties , but these exist as seeds and not as actual faculties. Another text speaks of natural, innate families of bodhisattvas, etc. 
that exist by the nature of things and continue in an unbroken series from beginningless time. 
Consequently, as a result of these proofs, pure seeds exist naturally, by the nature of things, and are not born from perfuming. 
They increase and grow as a result of perfuming, but are not born from perfuming. 
Thus cause and effect are established without confusion. 
There is also an interpretation I by Nanda and Srisenal that all the seeds are born as a result of perfuming. 
According to the Yogdcdrabhmi Sasha, To that class of beings who will not attain nirvana belong those who are obstructed by the seeds of the two obstacles to the realm of the ultimate I i.e., moral and cognitive faults I. Those who have the cognitive obstacle to the ultimate but not the or to the family of pratyekahuddhas. 
One without seeds of the obstacles to the ultimate belongs to the family of Tathgatas. 
Thus the distinction of families with different capacities existing from beginningless time is the result of the presence or absence of the two obstacles, not the presence or absence of pure seeds. 
The reference in the above text having pure seeds refers to seeds that will be born, not to already existing seeds. 
There is another interpretation I by DharmaplaJ, which holds that seeds are of two kinds. The first consists of primordial seeds. This refers to different energies in consciousness as retribution that have existed since beginningless time by the nature of things, and which give birth to aggregates, sense bases, and sense fields. 
The World Honored One has accordingly said, All sentient beings since beginningless time have within them diverse elements resembling seeds of the myrobalan fruit that exist by the nature of things. 
These and other quotations are similar to consciousness; consciousness approaches the dharmas. They are reciprocally of the nature of effect, And always reciprocally of the nature of cause. 
The meaning of this verse is that at all times, the laya consciousness and the first seven consciousnesses generate each in a steady process and are reciprocally cause and effect. The Maheiynasamgraha says, Alaya consciousness and pure and impure dharmas are reciprocally conditions as cause, just as a candle and a flame produce heat, and just as bundles of reeds support each other. 
Conditions as cause are found only in the relationship between seeds and laya, because no other conditions as cause can be found. 
If seeds were not produced as a result of perfuming, how could the first seven forms of consciousness act as conditions as cause for the alaya? 
These first seven forms of consciousness are not called conditions as cause because they perfume seeds and make them grow, because in that case good and bad actions would be conditions as cause for the fruit of retribution, the eighth consciousness. 
Also, holy teachings say that there are seeds born of perfuming, and that contradicts this interpretation. Therefore, the idea that seeds are only natural and innate contradicts reason and scripture. 
Also, if seeds only originate with a beginning I and are not innate, there would be no conditions as cause for conditioned, pure dharmas, and therefore they would not originate. 
Impure dharmas cannot be the causes of pure ones, because a pure seed must not be born from an impure one. 
To concede that they can would mean that Buddhas would produce impure dharmas again, and good seeds would create bad ones. 
The V ibhajyavdins say that the nature of mind is intrinsically pure and is soiled by adventitious defilements , and that for that reason it is called soiled. When separated from the passions, it is pure again. Therefore there is a cause for pure dharmas. 
r We ask, what does nature of mind mean? 
If it refers to the principle of emptiness , emptiness is not the cause of mind, because an eternal dharma certainly is not the seed of dharmas, because its substance remains unchanged before and after. Is the nature of mind mind itself? 
This would resemble the theory of the Smkhyas, which is that although the characteristics of mind change, the substance remains the same. 
But if it is intrinsically pure, bad or indeterminate minds would remain good, and if you concede that, then mind would be associated with such things as faith. If you do not concede it, then mind does not have the substance of good mind. 
The impure but good mind is called defiled, and like a bad mind it is not pure by nature. Therefore it cannot be the cause for pure dharmas, because it must not be that good and bad can be causes for each other. 
If the nature of an impure mind is pure, then the nature of a pure mind must be impure, because it would be impossible to distinguish causal conditions. 
What is more, if the minds of ordinary beings are basically pure, then pure dharmas would be active when one is still in the stage of ordinary beings, and such ordinary sDemonstration of Consciousness Only beings would be called holy ones. 
And, if you claim that the reason beings are said to be pure is that although the minds of beings are innately pure, the characteristics are impure, but the nature of mind does not have these faults, then the seeds of this mind are not pure. Why does your treatise say that there are ordinary beings who possess pure seeds? 
The nature and characteristics of seeds and dharmas in activity are the same. 
However, when the scripture says that mind is pure by nature, it is referring to the ultimate reality revealed by the emptiness of the mind, because ultimate reality is the minds true nature. 
Or, they mean that because the substance of mind is not afflicted, it can therefore be called pure by nature. They do not mean that it is called fundamentally pure because the nature of an impure mind is pure. 
As a result, we may believe that from beginningless time sentient beings possess pure seeds that are not the result of perfuming, and that they possess them by the nature of things. Later, in the spiritual stage of Superior Progress, the pure seeds are made to increase and grow through perfuming. 
The pure seeds that come into being have these seeds as their cause. When pure dharmas come into being, they subsequently perfume in turn and create new seeds. 
The seeds of impure dharmas can be understood in the same way. 
Even though holy teachings say that the internal seeds are definitely perfumed, they do not say that the seeds are produced as a result of perfuming. How can they be understood to deny natural seeds? 
However, these natural seeds are made to increase and grow as a result of perfuming and can then produce results. For this reason, these texts say that internal seeds are perfumed. 
On the other hand, the purity of this perfuming by hearing is not to be eliminated I at the stage of cultivation and is properly the condition as cause of supramundane dharmas. 
This proper condition as cause is subtle, obscure, and difficult to comprehend. These texts are only concerned with gross, obvious dominant conditions and therefore say, as an expedient, that these conditions are the seeds of supramundane thought. 
As for the idea of families being distinguished on the basis of obstacles, the Yogcccrabhr2mi Sstra says that families of beings are distinguished according to the presence or absence of pure seeds. 
That is, if one is wholly lacking in pure seeds, the seeds of the two obstacles can never be destroyed, and that puts one in the family of those who will never attain nirvna. 
If one possesses the pure seeds of the two vehicles, the seeds of the obstacle to that which is to be known can never be destroyed, and part of this family is assigned to the family of disciples and part is assigned to the family of pratyekabuddhas. 
If one possesses the pure seeds of a Buddha, both obstacles can be destroyed, and one is assigned to the family of Tathgatas. Consequently, whether or not the obstacles. 
If it were not for pure seeds, what other cause would there be for the destructibility of the obstacles? 
If you say that the obstacles exist naturally, then why not admit the same possibility for the seeds of pure dharmas? 
If seeds of pure dharmas are fundamentally and wholly nonexistent, then the holy paths will not arise. Who then will be able to destroy the seeds of the two obstacles, and how could it be said that families are distinguished on the basis of obstacles? 
Since the holy paths could not arise, it makes no sense to claim that it would. 
But, in place after place in the scriptures, it is said that there are innate seeds, and all contradict this position of the YogdcrabhUmi Sstra. 
Consequently, you must understand that seeds are of two kinds: the innate, and those that originate in time. 
In summary, seeds have six characteristics. They are instantaneous. Only those things can be seeds whose substance perishes without interval as soon as they are born and that possess superior power. 
This excludes eternal dharmas, because they are eternal and changeless and therefore cannot be said to have the ability to generate activity. 
Seeds exist simultaneously with their fruit. Only those things that are present with the fruit already functioning actively and in union with it can be seeds. 
This excludes dharmas prior to or anterior to the fruit, as well as those that are not related to the fruit. Actualities and seeds of dissimilar species can coexist with no contradiction. Within an individual, seeds presently existing coexist with the generating power. They are unlike seeds of the same kind, which, being mutually contradictory, cannot coexist. 
Even though the cause may or may not exist simultaneously with the result I in different cases, still only those present can exert a causal function, because dharmas that do not yet exist or that have already perished have no self nature. 
The term seed applies to those things that produce actual, present dharmas, not to things that produce their own kind, and hence it must be said that a seed exists simultaneously with its resultant fruit. Seeds always continue in a series. 
Only those things are seeds that continue in a single species over a long time, until the Bodhisattva reaches the ultimate stage of development. 
This excludes the evolving consciousnesses that change and are discontinuous, because they are not associated with seeds. This expression shows that seeds of the same species are produced in a series. 
The nature of seeds is determinate. Those things are seeds that produce good, bad, and indeterminate factual dharmasl according to the power of the causes. 
This excludes doctrines of other schools of Buddhism that hold that a cause of one nature can have a causal relation to a result of another nature. Seeds require multiple conditions. 
Only those things are seeds that require a number of conditions uniting so that their power is overwhelming. 
This refutes the non Buddhist idea that a spontaneous cause produces a result suddenly, without need for other conditions. 
This characteristic shows that the required conditions are not always present, and therefore seeds do not always produce their fruit suddenly. 
Seeds attract their own results. Those things are seeds that attract results such as form, mind, etc., in accordance with the specific type of causal seed. 
This excludes the non Buddhist idea that a single cause may produce all results of all kinds. 
This also excludes other Buddhist ideas to the effect that form, mind, etc., are causes for each other. 
Those, and only those, are seeds that exist as species of potentialities within the fundamental consciousness and that satisfy these six requirements. 
Seeds external to consciousness, such as wheat seeds, rice seeds, etc., are developments of consciousness itself and, though referred to metaphorically as seeds, are not real seeds. 
The power of these seeds to produce a proximate or true fruit is called the productive cause. The power of these seeds to attract distant and decaying fruits and prevent them from perishing immediately is called the attracting cause. 
Internal seeds must be perfumed in order to arise and mature and for new seeds to produce fruits. These are the conditions as cause. 
External seeds may or may not be perfumed. These are the dominant conditions for the fruit. 
The real causes of resulting dharmas are the internal seeds, because they are fruit born of seeds of like characteristics. 
On the basis of what characteristics can we speak of perfuming ? 
We speak of perfuming on the basis of four characteristics of that which is perfumed and that which perfumes that cause seeds to be born and grow. 
What are the four meanings of perfumable ? First, with regard to that which is perfumable, it is enduring. 
It is perfumable if a dharma continues from beginning to end as a single kind in an unbroken series and can for that reason hold perfuming. 
This excludes the consciousnesses, as well as wind, sound, etc. They are not enduring by nature and therefore not perfumable. 
Second, the dharma that is perfumable is indeterminate. It is perfumable if it is neither morally good nor bad, does not conflict with good or bad, and holds perfuming. 
This excludes good and bad, which, being strong by nature, cannot hold perfuming and therefore are not perfumable. 
Consequently, this excludes the purified eighth consciousness of a Tathagata, which holds old seeds but does not receive new perfuming. 
Third, it is perfumable by nature. It is perfumable if it is independent and not resistant and dense. 
This excludes mental functions and unconditioned dharmas, which are not perfumable because they are, respectively, dependent consciousness as retribution and mental activities, etc., because their power is slight and they are therefore unable to perfume. 
A dharma can perfume if it possesses superior functioning, can increase and decrease, and can hold and implant habit energy. 
This excludes the perfect, good dharmas of Buddhahood, which neither increase nor decrease and therefore cannot perfume. 
If they could perfume, they would not be perfect, and the fruit of Buddhahood would consist of different grades of strong and weak in the beginning and later. 
Fourth, it is united with that which it perfumes and evolves along with it. 
A dharma can perfume if it exists simultaneously with the perfumable, exists in the same place, and is neither identical with nor different from it. 
This excludes other bodies and prior and subsequent moments, where there is no union and hence no ability to perfume. 
The only things satisfying these four requirements and thus able to perfume are the first seven consciousnesses and their mental activities, which possess a superior functioning and increase and decrease. 
Perfuming occurs when these seven forms of consciousness as perfumers are born with and perish with the consciousness that is perfumed. 
The seeds in the perfumed consciousness are made to be generated and grow, like perfumed sesame, hence the name perfuming. 
When the consciousness that perfumes, etc., is born from seeds, it is capable of being a cause and perfuming and creating seeds. Three dharmas evolve together and act as simultaneous loaDemonstration of Consciousness Only causes and results of each other, just as a candle wick produces flame and flame produces a burning wick, or just as bundles of reeds support each other. 
Cause and result are simultaneous, with no violation of reason. 
The perfumer creates seeds, the seeds create actual dharmas, just as the two reciprocal and simultaneous causes produce a result useful to man. 
Seeds produce other seeds of the same species, which is similar to causes of the same species attracting results of similar species. 
These two forms of generation are of the nature of conditions as cause for the result, and apart from them no other dharmas are causes. To call something else a cause is merely a metaphorical use of the term. 
These are the characteristics of all seeds in summary. 
What is the mode of activity and object of this , and the perfuming of imagination. 
Body provided with organs refers to physical organs and the support of the organs. 
These two are what is grasped by consciousness. They are incorporated into the substance I of consciousness and share its tranquility and dangers. 
Both that which is grasped and the location are its objects. 
When, due to the power of causes and conditions, the substance of laya consciousness is born, it transforms internally into seeds and the body provided with organs, and externally into the world receptacle. These things that are its transformations become its own object of perception , because its mode of activity appears in reliance on them. 
The function of perceiving is the seeing part of this consciousness. 
As apparent object it is the seen part, and as the apparent subject it is the seeing part. 
If mind and its activities did not have the seen part, they would not have the ability to take their own objective realm as an object. Or, each would take as an object every kind of object, and one objective realm would be like all others. 
If mind and its activities did not have the seeing part, they would know nothing, just as space does not, or else we would have to concede that space is a knowing subject. Consequently, mind and its activities must have these two parts. 
As a scripture says, Everything is consciousness only; there is no I real I object of consciousness. The subjective and objective parts of consciousness evolve naturally. 
As for the doctrine that there is an objective realm apart from consciousness, this means that the external realm is the object of consciousness, the seen part of consciousness is its mode of activity, and the seeing part of consciousness is the thing itself, because is the character of the very substance of mind and its activities. 
Mind and its activities have the same support and object, because their mode of activity and objective images are similar. Associated objects are equal in number I i.e., one to one, but their characteristics are different, because consciousness, feeling, thought, etc., are different in their activity. 
if we grasp the fact that there is no objective realm apart from consciousness, then we must say that the seen part of consciousness is the object and the seeing part is the mode of activity. The substance that serves as support for both the seeing and seen parts of consciousness is called the self authenticating part of consciousness. 
If this did not exist, there would be no recollection of mind and its activities, just as there would be no recollection of objects never perceived. 
Mind and its activities have the same objective basis. The characteristics of their objects are similar, but their modes of activity differ, because the functions of perceptions, etc., are different. The things in question I i.e., consciousness and its activities. 
If this fourth part did not exist, what would authenticate the third part, selfauthentication? 
Also, the self authenticating part would have no fruit, and knowers must have results, or fruit. 
It cannot be said that the seeing part of consciousness is the fruit of the third part, because the seeing part is sometimes categorized as nondirect perception. 
Consequently, the seeing part of consciousness does not authenticate the third part, because that which authenticates its own substance must be direct perception. 
Of these four parts, the first two are external, and the latter two are internal. The first part is demonstrated. 
Thus a verse from the Ghanavvha Stra says, The minds of being are of two natures, All divided into internal and external. They are bound up with apprehending and being apprehended. The seeing part is distinguished in several ways. 
io, The verse says that beings minds are composed of the union of the two parts. Whether the parts are internal or external, they are bound up with apprehending and being apprehended. The varieties of seeing include knowing or not knowing, either direct perception or inference. 
Here seeing refers to the seeing part of consciousness. These four parts may be seen only as three, because the fourth part may be included in the third part. 
Or the four may be reduced to two, because the last three are all subjects with objects; that is, all three are the seeing part. Seeing means having objects. 
Or they all may be reduced to one, because they are one in substance. 
A verse in the Lañikoatra Stra says, Mind, attached to itself, Evolves resembling an external realm. What is perceived by mind does not exist, And therefore there is nothing but mind. 
Thus in many places in the scriptures it is said that there is only the one mind. One mind also includes mental activities. Therefore the mode of activity of consciousness is perception, and perception is the seeing part of consciousness. 
in the Thirty Verses I means that as a result of the maturation of its common seeds, the consciousness that is retribution transforms to resemble images of an external world, The word such as form, world, and what would be the point of that? 
Therefore it is the consciousnesses of beings born in this world, or who will be born into it, that transform into this apparent world. 
The scripture quoted above means only a part of sentient beings when it mentions all, because, their karma being the same, the transformation of consciousness is common to all. However, there is an objection. 
If this were so, then when the world receptacle is destroyed lat the end of the eon, and no one is left, nor anyone to be reborn in it, whose consciousness as retribution would transform into this realm? 
Also, beings who are disgusted with the realm of form and have left it to be reborn in the formless realm have immaterial bodies, so of what use would it be for them to evolve a world in advance of rebirth? 
If we concede that there are distinctions of gross and subtle, etc., between those with immaterial bodies and different world receptacles, with no mutual support, then what would be the value of a consciousness in the formless realm transforming into one of these world receptacles? 
However, the world receptacle that evolves is basically the support of, and is for the use of, those material bodies, and therefore the world evolves in such a way that it can support and be used by those bodies. 
Consequently, we affirm that a consciousness born in a certain world ii can be born in the same kind of world elsewhere by transforming into that world. 
Thus a world receptacle about to be destroyed or about to appear, even without any sentient beings in it, can exist I because of the transformation of consciousness in another world. 
With regard to this world being the support of, and being used by, beings in common, demons, celestials, and humans see the world differently and thus enjoy it differently, but you can understand this on the same principle as above. 
Seeds refers to all the impure seeds held by the consciousness that is retribution. They are included in the nature of this consciousness and are therefore its object of perception. 
Although pure seeds are connected with this consciousness, they are not included in its nature, and therefore they are not its perceptual object. Even though they are not its object of perception, they are not apart from it, just as ultimate reality is not, so this does not conflict with the principle of consciousness only. 
Body provided with organs means that because of the power of the maturation of seeds in the consciousness that is retribution that are not common to all individuals, consciousness evolves into the material organs and the place li.e., body that supports the organs; in other words, the internal great elements and their derivatives. 
Because of the power of the maturation of common seeds, consciousness evolves into the apparent existence of other beings. If this were not so, one would not experience other people. 
There is an opinion that consciousness evolves into the apparent sense organs of others, because the Madhyantavibhaga says that it appears as the five sense organs of oneself and others. However, there is another opinion: 
even though consciousness evolves as if it were a supporting body, the organs of someone else are of no use to oneself. 
The statement of the above treatise that the five organs of oneself and others appear means that oneself and others evolve the organs from their own individual consciousnesses. Therefore when one is reborn in another world or enters nirvana, the surviving corpse is still visible to us. 
The body and world receptacle that evolve in most cases continue in an unbroken series, but light, sound, etc., that evolve from consciousness often last only a short time, because their appearance is the result of contemporary conditions. 
This has been a brief discussion of the objects that evolve from consciousness; i.e., the impure seeds, the ten material sense bases , and the real form that falls into the category of the sense base for dharmas. 
Why does this consciousness not evolve as mind, mental activities, etc., and take them as objects? 
The transformation of defiled consciousness is of two kinds: transforming due to the power of causes and conditions, and transforming due to the power of imagination. 
The first transformation must have a function, and the second is always an objective realm. 
The transformation of consciousness that is retribution always obeys causes and conditions, but the form, etc., that transform from it must have a real function. 
If consciousness transformed into mind I and its activities, they would have no real function, because, as the seen part of consciousness, they would have no perceptual objects. 
Nor does this consciousness transform into unconditioned dharmas , which also has no real function. 
When this consciousness arrives at the stage of purity, it is associated with a superior wisdom, and although there is no discrimination, still, since it is pure, we say that it has no real function. 
Still, however, it manifests those images or the realm of form , it still has these three perceptual objects. 
In the formless realm , it has as an object only the impure seeds. Because one is separated from form in this realm, one has no form resulting from action, but one does have form resulting from meditation, which makes sense. The eighth consciousness has this form as its perceptual object. 
the term imperceptible means that the mode of activity of this consciousness is extremely subtle and fine and therefore difficult to know thoroughly. 
Or, we may say that it is hard to know because the internal objects that it grasps and holds are extremely subtle, while the extent of the external world is hard to fathom. 
Why are the objects it grasps and the mode of activity of this consciousness difficult to know, consciousness associated ? 
it is always associated with mental contact, attention, feeling, conceptualization, and volition. 
From beginningless time up to the time of its final transformation, the alaya consciousness in all its states is always associated with these five mental activities, because they are categorized as universal mental activities. 
Mental Contact mental contact means the union of the three, replica, and transformation, and it causes contact between mind and its activities and their object. Its action is to serve as a support for feeling, conceptualization, volition, etc. 
The union of the three refers to the conformability of an organ, an object, and the resulting consciousness. 
In a state of union, they conform to each other and have the power to generate mental activity, and this power is called transformation. 
Contact resembles the appearance of what is transformed and is therefore called its replica , because it is similar in power to the three transformed things. 
Being similar to the power lof the organ, etc. to conform and produce mental activity, its activity is to be the support of feeling, etc. The Sutra of Birth and Extinction says, Contact is the condition for such aggregates as feeling, conceptualization, and volition. 
As for the Yogdcdrabhz7mi Sastra saying that it is the support of only feeling, conceptualization, and volition, this is because volition is the dominant factor in the aggregate of the karmic predispositions, and thus to mention it is to include the other karmic predispositions. The Abhidharmasamuccaya says that contact is the support of feeling, but this is because contact is the proximate and principal factor in the generation of feeling. 
That is, the characteristics of agreeableness, etc., grasped through contact are extremely close to the characteristics of advantageousness, etc., grasped by feeling, and for that reason, contact is the most important factor in arousing feeling. 
The nature of contact is real, not fictional, because it is a mental activity included among the traditional six hexads, because it is categorized as a form of nutriment, and because it is one of the conditions among the twelve elements of conditioned arising , just as feeling, etc., are, so it is not simply I a conventional name for the union of three elements. 
